(lp1
S"It has also become a common accompaniment to fireworks displays.The overture debuted in Moscow on 20 August 1882, conducted by Ippolit Al'tani under a tent near the then unfinished Cathedral of Christ the Saviour, which also memorialized the 1812 defense of Russia."
p2
aS'The overture was conducted by Tchaikovsky himself in 1891 at the dedication of Carnegie Hall.'
p3
aS'The overture is best known for its climactic volley of cannon fire, ringing chimes, and brass fanfare finale. Instrumentation The 1812_Overture is scored for an orchestra that consists of the following:Brass band (finale only)Woodwinds: a piccolo, 2 flutes, 2 oboes, 1 English horn, 2 clarinets in B and 2 bassoonsBrass: 4 horns in F, 2 cornets in B, 2 trumpets in E, 3 trombones (2 tenor, 1 bass) and a tubaPercussion: timpani, an orchestral bass drum, a snare drum, cymbals, a tambourine, a triangle, a carillon and a battery of cannonsStrings: first and second violins, violas, violoncellos and double basses Musical structure Beginning with the plaintive Russian melody of the Eastern Orthodox Troparion of the Holy Cross (also known as "O Lord, Save Thy People") played by four cellos and two violas, the piece moves through a mixture of pastoral and martial themes portraying the increasing distress of the Russian people at the hands of the invading French.'
p4
aS'This passage includes a Russian folk dance, At the Gate, at my Gate ("U Vorot, Vorot").'
p5
aS'At the turning point of the invasion--the Battle of Borodino--the score calls for five Russian cannon shots to counter a fragment of La Marseillaise.'
p6
aS'A descending string passage represents the subsequent retreat of the French forces, followed by victory bells and a triumphant repetition of O Lord, Save Thy People as Moscow burns to deny winter quarters to the French.'
p7
aS'A musical chase scene appears, out of which emerges the anthem God Save the Tsar!'
p8
aS'An integer is called even if it is divisible by 2.'
p9
aS'For integers written in a numeral system based on an even number, such as decimal and hexadecimal, divisibility by 2 is easily tested by merely looking at the last digit.'
p10
aS'If it is even, then the whole number is even.'
p11
aS'In particular, when written in the decimal system, all multiples of 2 will end in 0, 2, 4, 6, or 8.Two is the smallest and the first prime number, and the only even prime number  (for this reason it is sometimes called "the oddest prime").'
p12
aS'The next prime is three.'
p13
aS'Two and three are the only two consecutive prime numbers.'
p14
aS'2 is the first Sophie Germain prime, the first factorial prime, the first Lucas prime, the first Ramanujan prime, and the first Smarandache-Wellin prime.'
p15
aS'(The Ancient Romans usually wrote 4 as IIII, but this was almost entirely replaced by the subtractive notation IV in the Middle Ages.)'
p16
aS'To this day 3 is written as three lines in Roman and Chinese numerals.'
p17
aS'This was the way the Brahmin Indians wrote it, and the Gupta made the three lines more curved.'
p18
aS'The Nagari started rotating the lines clockwise and ending each line with a slight downward stroke on the right.'
p19
aS'Eventually they made these strokes connect with the lines below, and evolved it to a character that looks very much like a modern 3 with an extra stroke at the bottom.'
p20
aS'It was the Western Ghubar Arabs who finally eliminated the extra stroke and created our modern 3.'
p21
aS'(The "extra" stroke, however, was very important to the Eastern Arabs, and they made it much larger, while rotating the strokes above to lie along a horizontal axis, and to this day Eastern Arabs write a 3 that looks like a mirrored 7 with ridges on its top line): 3While the shape of the 3 character has an ascender in most modern typefaces, in typefaces with text figures the character usually has a descender, as, for example, in .'
p22
aS'Four is the only number that has the same number of characters as its value in the English language. In mathematics Four is the smallest composite number, its proper divisors being 1 and 2.'
p23
aS'Four is also a highly composite number.'
p24
aS'The next highly composite number is 6.Four is the second square number, the second centered triangular number.4 is the smallest squared prime (p2) and the only even number in this form.'
p25
aS'It has an aliquot sum of 3 which is itself prime.'
p26
aS'The aliquot sequence of 4 has 4 members (4, 3, 1, 0) and is accordingly the first member of the 3-aliquot tree.A number is a multiple of 4 if its last two digits are a multiple of 4.'
p27
aS'For example, 1092 is a multiple of 4 because 92  4x23.Only one number has an aliquot sum of 4 and that is squared prime 9.The prime factorization of four is two times two.Four is the smallest composite number that is equal to the sum of its prime factors.'
p28
aS'(As a consequence of this, it is the smallest Smith number).'
p29
aS'Because it can be written as 221+1, five is classified as a Fermat prime; therefore a regular polygon with 5 sides (a regular pentagon) is constructible with compass and unmarked straightedge.'
p30
aS'5 is the third Sophie Germain prime, the first safe prime, the third Catalan number, and the third Mersenne prime exponent.'
p31
aS'Five is the first Wilson prime and the third factorial prime, also an alternating factorial.'
p32
aS'Five is the first good prime.'
p33
aS'It is an Eisenstein prime with no imaginary part and real part of the form .'
p34
aS'It is also the only number that is part of more than one pair of twin primes.'
p35
aS'Five is a congruent number.'
p36
aS"(See Lagrange's four-square theorem#Historical development."
p37
aS')Seven is the aliquot sum of one number, the cubic number 8 and is the base of the 7-aliquot tree.n  7 is the first natural number for which the next statement does not hold: "Two nilpotent endomorphisms from Cn with the same minimal polynomial and the same rank are similar.'
p38
aS'"7 is the only number D for which the equation 2n-Dx2 has more than two solutions for n and x natural.'
p39
aS'In particular, the equation 2n-7x2 is known as the Ramanujan-Nagell equation.7 is the only dimension, besides the familiar 3, in which a vector cross product can be defined.7 is the lowest dimension of a known exotic sphere, although there may exist as yet unknown exotic smooth structures on the 4-dimensional sphere.999,999 divided by 7 is exactly 142,857.'
p40
aS'Therefore, when a vulgar fraction with 7 in the denominator is converted to a decimal expansion, the result has the same six-digit repeating sequence after the decimal point, but the sequence can start with any of those six digits.'
p41
aS'For example, 1/7  0.142857 142857... and 2/7  0.285714 285714....In fact, if one sorts the digits in the number 142857 in ascending order, 124578, it is possible to know from which of the digits the decimal part of the number is going to begin with.'
p42
aS'The remainder of dividing any number by 7 will give the position in the sequence 124578 that the decimal part of the resulting number will start.'
p43
aS"Salim observes the rapid changes in Africa with an outsider's distance.Salim, the protagonist, grows up in the Indian community of traders on the east coast of Africa."
p44
aS'Feeling insecure about his future in East Africa, he buys a business from Nazruddin in a town at "a bend in the river" in the heart of Africa.'
p45
aS'When he moves there, he finds the town decrepit, a "ghost town", its former European suburb reclaimed by the bush, and many of its European vestiges ruined in a "rage" by the locals in response to their suppression and humiliation during the colonial times.'
p46
aS'Old tribal distinctions have become important again.'
p47
aS'Salim trades in what people in the villages need, pencils and paper, pots and pans, various household utensils.'
p48
aS'Soon he is joined by his assistant Metty who comes from a family of house slaves his family had maintained in the east.'
p49
aS'One of his steady customers is Zabeth, a "marchande" from a village and a magician, too.'
p50
aS'It treats an ordinary provincial funeral with unflattering realism, and on the giant scale traditionally reserved for the heroic or religious scenes of history painting.'
p51
aS'Its exhibition at the 1850-51 Paris Salon created an "explosive reaction" and brought Courbet instant fame.'
p52
aS"It is currently displayed at the Musee d'Orsay in Paris, France.The Salon found Courbet triumphant with The Stone Breakers, the Peasants of Flagey, and A Burial at Ornans."
p53
aS'People who had attended the funeral were used as models for the painting.'
p54
aS'Previously, models had been used as actors in historical narratives; here Courbet said that he "painted the very people who had been present at the interment, all the townspeople".'
p55
aS'The result is a realistic presentation of them, and of life, in Ornans.The painting, which drew both praise and fierce denunciations from critics and the public, is an enormous work, measuring 10 by 22 feet (3.1 by 6.6 metres), depicting a prosaic ritual on a scale which previously would have been reserved for a work of history painting.'
p56
aS'According to art historian Sarah Faunce, "In Paris the Burial was judged as a work that had thrust itself into the grand tradition of history painting, like an upstart in dirty boots crashing a genteel party, and in terms of that tradition it was of course found wanting."'
p57
aS'It aroused great controversy at the time, as it concludes with the protagonist, Nora, leaving her husband and children because she wants to discover herself.'
p58
aS'Ibsen was inspired by the belief that "a woman cannot be herself in modern society," since it is "an exclusively male society, with laws made by men and with prosecutors and judges who assess feminine conduct from a masculine standpoint."'
p59
aS'Its ideas can also be seen as having a wider application: Michael Meyer argued that the play\'s theme is not women\'s rights, but rather "the need of every individual to find out the kind of person he or she really is and to strive to become that person."'
p60
aS'In a speech given to the Norwegian Association for Women\'s Rights in 1898, Ibsen insisted that he "must disclaim the honor of having consciously worked for the women\'s rights movement," since he wrote "without any conscious thought of making propaganda," his task having been "the description of humanity.'
p61
aS'"In 2006, the centennial of Ibsen\'s death, A_Doll\'s_House held the distinction of being the world\'s most performed play for that year.'
p62
aS"UNESCO has inscribed Ibsen's autographed manuscripts of A_Doll's_House on the Memory of the World Register in 2001, in recognition of their historical value. Title The title of the play is most commonly translated as A_Doll's_House, though some scholars use A Doll House."
p63
aS'John Simon argues that the only significance in the alternative translation is the difference in the way the toy is named in Britain and the United_States.'
p64
aS'The title is taken from a poem by 16th-century English dramatist George Peele.A_Farewell_to_Arms is about a love affair between the expatriate American Henry and Catherine Barkley against the backdrop of the First World War, cynical soldiers, fighting and the displacement of populations.'
p65
aS'The publication of A_Farewell_to_Arms cemented Hemingway\'s stature as a modern American writer, became his first best-seller, and is described by biographer Michael Reynolds as "the premier American war novel from that debacle World_War_I.'
p66
aS'"The novel has been adapted for the stage, initially in 1930 and subsequently, for film in 1932 and 1957, and as a television miniseries in 1966.'
p67
aS"The 1996 film In Love and War, directed by Richard Attenborough and starring Sandra Bullock, depicts Hemingway's life in Italy as an ambulance driver in the events prior to his writing of A_Farewell_to_Arms. Plot summary The novel is divided into five books."
p68
aS'In the first book, Rinaldi introduces Frederic Henry to Catherine Barkley.'
p69
aS'Frederic attempts to seduce her, and their relationship begins.'
p70
aS'While on the Italian front, Frederic is wounded in the knee by a mortar shell and sent to a hospital in Milan.'
p71
aS'The title is taken from the Gospel According to St. John, 12:24.'
p72
aS"The novel weaves together several stories set during the state of emergency in Kenya's struggle for independence (1952-59), focusing on the quiet Mugo, whose life is ruled by a dark secret."
p73
aS"The plot revolves around his home village's preparations for Kenya's independence day celebration, Uhuru day."
p74
aS'On that day, former resistance fighters General R and Koinandu plan on publicly executing the traitor who betrayed Kihika (a heroic resistance fighter hailing from the village). Characters Mugo, a loner who became a hero after leading a hunger strike in a British concentration camp and trying to stop a village guard from beating a pregnant woman to death.'
p75
aS'Although he is thought to be a hero throughout the whole book, he is the traitor who betrayed Kihika to the British in the hope of collecting a reward.Gikonyo, an ambitious carpenter and business man married to Mumbi.'
p76
aS'He confessed to taking the oath of the resistance while in a concentration camp, securing an early release only to find that his wife had borne a child with his hated rival Karanja while he was away.Mumbi, the wife of Gikonyo and sister of Kihika.'
p77
aS'While Gikonyo was imprisoned she slept with Karanja, who had been appointed village chief by the colonial power.Karanja, a collaborator with the British and widely suspected to be the traitor.Kihika, a resistance fighter who conquered a police station and killed the hated District Officer Robson.'
p78
aS"Commentators have, however, drawn attention to its serious undertones, and have regarded it as a transitional work pointing towards Waugh's more substantial postwar fiction.The story concerns the misfortunes of Tony Last, a contented but shallow English country squire who, having been betrayed by his wife and seen his illusions shattered one by one, seeks solace by joining an expedition to the Brazilian jungle, only to find himself trapped in a remote outpost as the prisoner and plaything of an insane settler."
p79
aS'Waugh incorporated several autobiographical elements into the story, notably his own recent desertion by his young wife.'
p80
aS'In 1933-34 he had undertaken a journey into the South American interior, and a number of incidents and personalities from the voyage are incorporated into the novel.'
p81
aS'Tony\'s singular fate in the jungle was first used by Waugh as the subject of an independent short story, published in 1933 under the title "The Man Who Liked Dickens".The book\'s initial critical reception was modest, but it was popular with the public and has never been out of print.'
p82
aS"In the years since publication the book's reputation has grown; it is generally considered one of Waugh's best works, and has more than once figured on unofficial lists of the 20th century's best novels.Waugh had converted to Roman Catholicism in 1930, after which his satirical, secular writings drew hostility from some conservative Catholic quarters."
p83
aS'He did not introduce overt religious themes into A_Handful_of_Dust, but later explained that he intended the book to demonstrate the futility of humanist, as distinct from religious (that is, Catholic) values.'
p84
aS'The book has been dramatised for radio, stage and screen. Plot Tony Last is a country gentleman, living with his wife Brenda and his eight-year-old son John Andrew in his ancestral home, Hetton Abbey.'
p85
aS"Drawing some elements from the life of Naipaul's father, the work is primarily a sharply drawn look at life that uses postcolonial perspectives to view a vanished colonial world.In 1998, the Modern Library ranked A_House_for_Mr_Biswas number 72 on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century."
p86
aS'Time magazine included the novel in its "TIME 100 Best English-language Novels from 1923 to 2005". Plot Mohun Biswas is born in rural Trinidad to parents of Indian origin.'
p87
aS'His birth is considered inauspicious as he is born "in the wrong way" and with an extra finger.'
p88
aS'A pandit prophesies that the newborn child "will be a lecher and a spendthrift.'
p89
aS'Possibly a liar as well", and that he will "eat up his mother and father".'
p90
aS'The pandit advises that the boy be kept "away from trees and water.'
p91
aS'Particularly water".'
p92
aS'Time magazine included the novel in its "All Time 100 Novels" list.'
p93
aS"The novel is based on Forster's experiences in India, borrowing the title from Walt_Whitman's 1870 poem in Leaves of Grass.The story revolves around four characters: Dr. Aziz, his British friend Mr. Cyril Fielding, Mrs. Moore, and Miss Adela Quested."
p94
aS'During a trip to the Marabar Caves (modelled on the Barabar Caves of Bihar), Adela finds herself alone with Dr. Aziz in one of the caves, panics and flees; it is assumed that Dr. Aziz has attempted to assault her.'
p95
aS"Aziz's trial, and its run-up and aftermath, bring to a boil the common racial tensions and prejudices between indigenous Indians and the British who rule India. Plot summary A young British schoolmistress, Adela Quested, and her elderly friend, Mrs. Moore, visit the fictional city of Chandrapore, British India."
p96
aS"Adela is to decide if she wants to marry Mrs. Moore's son, Ronny Heaslop, the city magistrate.Meanwhile, Dr. Aziz, a young Indian Muslim physician, is dining with two of his Indian friends and conversing about whether it is possible to be a friend of an Englishman."
p97
aS"During the meal, a summons arrives from Major Callendar, Aziz's unpleasant superior at the hospital."
p98
aS"Aziz hastens to Callendar's bungalow as ordered but is delayed by a flat tyre and difficulty in finding a tonga and the major has already left in a huff.Disconsolate, Aziz walks down the road toward the railway station."
p99
aS"The story is based upon a black family's experiences in the Washington Park Subdivision of Chicago's Woodlawn neighborhood. Plot Walter and Ruth Younger, their son Travis, along with Walter's mother Lena (Mama) and sister Beneatha, live in poverty in a dilapidated two-bedroom apartment on Chicago's south side."
p100
aS'Walter is barely making a living as a limousine driver.'
p101
aS"Though Ruth is content with their lot, Walter is not and desperately wishes to become wealthy, to which end he plans to invest in a liquor store in partnership with Willy and Bobo, street-smart acquaintances of Walter's.At the beginning of the play, their father has recently died, and Mama is waiting for a life insurance check for $10,000."
p102
aS"Walter has a sense of entitlement to the money, but Mama has religious objections to alcohol and Beneatha has to remind him it is Mama's call how to spend it."
p103
aS'Eventually Mama puts some of the money down on a new house, choosing an all-white neighborhood over a black one for the practical reason that it happens to be much cheaper.'
p104
aS"Later she relents and gives the rest of the money to Walter to invest with the provision that he reserve $3,000 for Beneatha's education."
p105
aS"Walter passes the money on to Willy's naive sidekick Bobo, who gives it to Willy, who absconds with it, depriving Walter and Beneatha of their dreams, though not the Youngers of their new home."
p106
aS"Merchant-Ivory produced an award-winning film adaptation in 1985.The Modern Library ranked A_Room_with_a_View 79th on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century (1998). Plot summary  Part one The first part of the novel is set in Florence, Italy, and describes a young English woman's first visit to Florence, at a time when upper middle class English women were starting to lead independent, adventurous lives."
p107
aS'Lucy Honeychurch is touring Italy with her overbearing older cousin and chaperone, Charlotte Bartlett, and the novel opens with their complaints about the hotel, "The Pension Bertolini."'
p108
aS'Their primary concern is that although rooms with a view of the River Arno have been promised for each of them, their rooms instead look over a courtyard.'
p109
aS'A Mr. Emerson interrupts their "peevish wrangling," offering to swap rooms as he and his son, George Emerson, look over the Arno.'
p110
aS'This behaviour causes Miss Bartlett some consternation, as it appears impolite.'
p111
aS'Without letting Lucy speak, Miss Bartlett refuses the offer, looking down on the Emersons because of their unconventional behaviour and thinking it would place her under an "unseemly obligation" towards them.'
p112
aS'However, another guest at the pension, an Anglican clergyman named Mr. Beebe, persuades the pair to accept the offer, assuring Miss Bartlett that Mr. Emerson only meant to be kind.The next day, Lucy embarks on a tour of Florence with another guest, Miss Eleanor Lavish, a novelist who shows Lucy the back streets of Florence, takes her Baedeker guidebook and subsequently loses her in Santa Croce, where Lucy meets the Emersons again.'
p113
aS"The book had a considerable influence on later artists and poets, including the Surrealists. Writing and publication history Rimbaud began writing the poem in April 1873 during a visit to his family's farm in Roche, near Charleville on the French-Belgian border."
p114
aS'According to Bertrand Mathieu, Rimbaud wrote the work in a dilapidated barn.'
p115
aS'In the following weeks, Rimbaud travelled with poet Paul Verlaine through Belgium and to London again.'
p116
aS'They had begun a complicated homosexual relationship in spring 1872, and they quarreled frequently.'
p117
aS'Verlaine had bouts of suicidial behavior and drunkenness.'
p118
aS'When Rimbaud announced he planned to leave while they stayed in Brussels in July 1873, Verlaine fired three shots from his revolver, wounding Rimbaud once, and after subsequent threats of violence Verlaine was arrested and incarcerated to two years hard labour.'
p119
aS'After their parting, he returned home to complete the work and published A_Season_in_Hell.'
p120
aS"Housman originally titled the book The Poems of Terence Hearsay, referring to a character there, but changed the title at the suggestion of his publisher. Reception A_Shropshire_Lad was first published during 1896 at Housman's own expense after several publishers had turned it down."
p121
aS'His colleagues and students were surprised by the emotional depth and vulnerability it revealed in an apparently distant and self-contained man.'
p122
aS"At first the book sold slowly, but during the Second_Boer_War (1899-1902), Housman's nostalgic description of rural life and young men's early deaths struck a chord with English readers and the book became a best-seller."
p123
aS'Its popularity increased during World_War_I. Arthur Somervell and other composers were inspired by the folksong-like simplicity of the poems, and the most famous musical settings are by George Butterworth (Six Songs from A_Shropshire_Lad and Bredon Hill and Other Songs) and Ralph Vaughan Williams (On Wenlock Edge), with others by Ivor Gurney, John Ireland and Ernest John Moeran.Housman was surprised by the success of A_Shropshire_Lad, thinking that its deep pessimism and obsession with death, without the consolations of religion, would not appeal to a Victorian audience.'
p124
aS'The poems are set in a half-imaginary pastoral Shropshire, "the land of lost content", and Housman wrote most of them before visiting the county.'
p125
aS'He described the transience of love and youth in simple, unadorned language that many critics of the time thought old-fashioned.'
p126
aS'Housman himself acknowledged the influence of the songs of William_Shakespeare, the Scottish Border ballads and Heinrich_Heine, but specifically denied any influence of Greek and Latin classics in his poetry. Themes and style The main theme of A_Shropshire_Lad is mortality and the need to seize the day, because death can strike at any time.'
p127
aS'The Broadway production was directed by Elia Kazan and starred Marlon Brando, Jessica Tandy, Kim Hunter, and Karl Malden.'
p128
aS'The London production opened in 1949 with Bonar Colleano, Vivien Leigh, and Renee Asherson and was directed by Laurence Olivier.'
p129
aS"The drama A Streetcar Named Desire is often regarded among the finest of American plays of the 20th century, alongside Long Day's Journey into Night and Death_of_a_Salesman. Plot After the loss of her family home, Belle Reve, to creditors, Blanche DuBois travels from the small town of Laurel, Mississippi to the New_Orleans French Quarter to live with her younger, married sister, Stella, and brother-in-law, Stanley Kowalski."
p130
aS'Blanche is in her thirties, and with no money, she has nowhere else to go.Blanche tells Stella that she has taken a leave of absence from her English teaching position because of her nerves.'
p131
aS"Blanche laments the shabbiness of her sister's two-room flat."
p132
aS'She finds Stanley loud and rough, eventually referring to him as "common."'
p133
aS"Stanley, in return, does not care for Blanche's manners and dislikes her presence.Stanley later questions Blanche about her earlier marriage."
p134
aS'The following year, Seurat began to work on La Grand Jatte and exhibited the painting in the spring of 1886 with the Impressionists.'
p135
aS'With La Grande Jatte, Seurat was immediately acknowledged as the leader of a new and rebellious form of Impressionism called Neo-Impressionism.Seurat spent over two years painting A Sunday Afternoon, focusing meticulously on the landscape of the park.'
p136
aS'He reworked the original as well as completed numerous preliminary drawings and oil sketches.'
p137
aS'He sat in the park, creating numerous sketches of the various figures in order to perfect their form.'
p138
aS'He concentrated on the issues of colour, light, and form.'
p139
aS'The painting is approximately 2 by 3 meters (7 by 10 feet) in size.Inspired by optical effects and perception inherent in the color theories of Michel Eugene Chevreul, Ogden Rood and others, Seurat adapted this scientific research to his painting.'
p140
aS'Seurat contrasted miniature dots or small brushstrokes of colors that when unified optically in the human eye were perceived as a single shade or hue.'
p141
aS'It follows the lives of several characters through these events.'
p142
aS"A_Tale_of_Two_Cities was published in weekly installments from April 1859 to November 1859 in Dickens's new literary periodical titled All the Year Round."
p143
aS"All but three of Dickens's previous novels had appeared only as monthly installments."
p144
aS'With sales of about 200 million copies, A_Tale_of_Two_Cities is the biggest selling novel of all time. Synopsis  Book the First: Recalled to Life Dickens\'s famous opening sentence introduces the universal approach of the book, the French Revolution, and the drama depicted within:"It was the best of times, it was the worst of times, it was the age of wisdom, it was the age of foolishness, it was the epoch of belief, it was the epoch of incredulity, it was the season of Light, it was the season of Darkness, it was the spring of hope, it was the winter of despair, we had everything before us, we had nothing before us, we were all going direct to Heaven, we were all going direct the other way - in short, the period was so far like the present period, that some of its noisiest authorities insisted on its being received, for good or for evil, in the superlative degree of comparison only.As a result of his long imprisonment, Dr. Manette suffers a form of psychosis, an obsession with making shoes, a skill he learned in prison to distract himself from his thoughts.'
p145
aS'At first, he does not recognise his daughter, whose existence he was unaware of; but he eventually recognises her similarity to her mother, through her blue eyes and long golden hair (a strand of which he found on his sleeve when he was incarcerated).'
p146
aS'Mr. Lorry and Miss Manette take Dr. Manette back with them to England. Book the Second: The Golden Thread Five years later, two British spies, John Barsad (later determined to be Solomon Pross) and Roger Cly, are trying to frame French emigre Charles Darnay for their own gain; and Darnay is on trial for treason at the Old Bailey.'
p147
aS'They claim, falsely, that Darnay gave information about British troops in North America to the French.'
p148
aS'During the Second World War Ayer was a Special Operations Executive and MI6 agent.He was Grote Professor of the Philosophy of Mind and Logic at University College London from 1946 until 1959, after which he returned to Oxford to become Wykeham Professor of Logic.'
p149
aS"He was president of the Aristotelian Society from 1951 to 1952 and knighted in 1970. Early life Ayer was born in St John's Wood, in north west London, to a wealthy family from continental Europe."
p150
aS'His mother, Reine Citroen, was from the Dutch Jewish family who founded the Citroen car company in France.'
p151
aS"His father, Jules Ayer, was a Swiss Calvinist financier who worked for the Rothschild family. Education Ayer was educated at Ascham St Vincent's School, a former boarding preparatory school for boys in the seaside town of Eastbourne in Sussex, in which he started boarding at the comparatively early age of seven, due to the First World War, and Eton College, a boarding school in Eton (near Windsor) in Berkshire."
p152
aS'It was at Eton that Ayer first became known for his characteristic bravado and precocity.'
p153
aS'Although primarily interested in furthering his intellectual pursuits, he was very keen on sports, particularly rugby, and reputedly played the Eton Wall Game very well.'
p154
aS'In the final examinations at Eton, Ayer came second in his year, and first in classics.'
p155
aS'Works in this vein include the ballets Appalachian Spring, Billy the Kid and Rodeo, his Fanfare for the Common Man and Third Symphony.'
p156
aS'The open, slowly changing harmonies of many of his works are archetypical of what many people consider to be the sound of American music, evoking the vast American landscape and pioneer spirit.'
p157
aS'In addition to his ballets and orchestral works, he produced music in many other genres including chamber music, vocal works, opera and film scores.After some initial studies with composer Rubin Goldmark, Copland traveled to Paris, where he studied at first with Isidor Philipp and Paul Vidal, then with noted pedagogue Nadia Boulanger.'
p158
aS'He studied three years with Boulanger, whose eclectic approach to music inspired his own broad taste in that area.'
p159
aS'Determined upon his return to the U.S. to make his way as a full-time composer, Copland gave lecture-recitals, wrote works on commission and did some teaching and writing.'
p160
aS'He found composing orchestral music in the "modernist" style he had adapted abroad a financially contradictory approach, particularly in light of the Great Depression.'
p161
aS'He shifted in the mid-1930s to a more accessible musical style which mirrored the German idea of Gebrauchsmusik ("music for use"), music that could serve utilitarian and artistic purposes.'
p162
aS'When Moses first confronted the Egyptian king about the Israelites, Aaron served as his brother\'s spokesman ("prophet") to Pharaoh.'
p163
aS'(Exodus 7:1) Part of the Law (Torah) that Moses received from God at Sinai granted Aaron the priesthood for himself and his male descendants, and he became the first High Priest of the Israelites.'
p164
aS'Various dates for his life have been proposed, ranging from approximately 1600 to 1200 BC.'
p165
aS'Aaron died before the Israelites crossed the Jordan river and he was buried on Mount Hor (Numbers 33:39; Deuteronomy 10:6 says he died and was buried at Moserah).'
p166
aS"Aaron is also mentioned in the New Testament of the Bible. Account in the Hebrew Bible  Traditional genealogy Descended from Abraham, Isaac, and JacobGreat-grandfather: LeviGrandfather: KohathFather: AmramMother: JochebedOlder Sister: MiriamYounger Brother: MosesUncles: Izhar, Hebron, UzzielWife: ElishebaSons: Nadab, Abihu, Eleazar, IthamarGrandson: PhinehasAccording to the Book of Exodus, Aaron first functioned as Moses' assistant."
p167
aS'Because Moses complained that he could not speak well, God appointed Aaron as Moses\' "prophet" (Exodus 4:10-17; 7:1).'
p168
aS'At the command of Moses, he let his rod turn into a snake (Exodus 7:9-12).'
p169
aS'They ruled as caliphs, for most of their period from their capital in Baghdad in modern-day Iraq, after taking back authority of the Muslim empire from the Umayyads in 750 CE (132 AH).The Abbasid caliphate first centered their government in Kufa, but in 762 the caliph Al-Mansur founded the city of Baghdad, north of the Sasanian capital city of Ctesiphon.'
p170
aS'The choice of a capital so close to Persia proper reflects a growing reliance on Persian bureaucrats, most notably of the Barmakid family, to govern the territories conquered by Arab Muslims, as well as an increasing inclusion of non-Arab Muslims in the ummah.'
p171
aS"Despite this cooperation, the Abbasids of the 8th century were forced to cede authority over Al-Andalus and Maghreb to the Umayyads, Morocco to the Idrisid dynasty, Ifriqiya to the Aghlabids, and Egypt to the Shi'ite Caliphate of the Fatimids."
p172
aS'The political power of the caliphs largely ended with the rise of the Buyids and the Seljuq Turks.'
p173
aS'Although Abbasid leadership over the vast Islamic empire was gradually reduced to a ceremonial religious function, the dynasty retained control over its Mesopotamian demesne.'
p174
aS'The capital city of Baghdad became a center of science, culture, philosophy and invention during the Golden Age of Islam.This period of cultural fruition ended in 1258 with the sack of Baghdad by the Mongols under Hulagu Khan.'
p175
aS'The Abbasid line of rulers, and Muslim culture in general, recentered themselves in the Mamluk capital of Cairo in 1261.'
p176
aS'Abraham was called by God to leave the house of his father Terah and settle in a land which was already settled by the descendants of Canaan; however, God promised it to Abraham and his progeny.'
p177
aS"Various candidates were put forward who might inherit the land after him, but all were dismissed except for Isaac, Abraham's son by his half-sister Sarah."
p178
aS"Abraham purchased the Cave of the Patriarchs at Hebron to be Sarah's grave when she died, thus establishing his right to that land."
p179
aS"In the second generation, Abraham's heir Isaac was married to a woman from his own relatives, thus ruling the Canaanites out of any right to his inheritance."
p180
aS'Abraham later married Keturah and had six more sons, but on his death, when he was buried beside Sarah, it was Isaac who received "all Abraham\'s goods", while the other sons received only "gifts".The Bible\'s internal chronology places Abraham around 2000 BCE.'
p181
aS'Despite this, "there is nothing specific in the Genesis stories that can be definitively related to known history in or around Canaan in the early second millennium B.C.E."'
p182
aS'As a result, "it is now widely agreed that the so-called \'patriarchal/ancestral period\' is a later literary construct, not a period in the actual history of the ancient world" (Professor Paula McNutt).'
p183
aS"It is degraded by the enzyme (+)-abscisic acid 8'-hydroxylase into phaseic acid. Function ABA was originally believed to be involved in abscission."
p184
aS'This is now known to be the case only in a small number of plants.'
p185
aS'ABA-mediated signaling also plays an important part in plant responses to environmental stress and plant pathogens.'
p186
aS'The plant genes for ABA biosynthesis and sequence of the pathway have been elucidated.'
p187
aS'ABA is also produced by some plant pathogenic fungi via a biosynthetic route different from ABA biosynthesis in plants.Abscisic_acid owes its names to its role in the abscission of plant leaves.'
p188
aS'In preparation for winter, ABA is produced in terminal buds.'
p189
aS'This slows plant growth and directs leaf primordia to develop scales to protect the dormant buds during the cold season.'
p190
aS'81.'
p191
aS'Brahms composed the work during the summer of 1880 as a musical "thank you" to the University of Breslau, which had awarded him an honorary doctorate the previous year. Background Initially, Brahms had contented himself with sending a simple handwritten note of acknowledgment to the University, since he loathed the public fanfare of celebrity.'
p192
aS'However, the conductor Bernard Scholz, who had nominated him for the degree, convinced him that protocol required him to make a grander gesture of gratitude.'
p193
aS'The University expected nothing less than a musical offering from the composer.'
p194
aS'"Compose a fine symphony for us!"'
p195
aS'he wrote to Brahms.'
p196
aS'"But well orchestrated, old boy, not too uniformly thick!'
p197
aS'The SI unit for acceleration is the metre per second squared (m/s2).'
p198
aS'Accelerations are vector quantities (they have magnitude and direction) and add according to the parallelogram law.'
p199
aS"As a vector, the calculated net force is equal to the product of the object's mass (a scalar quantity) and the acceleration.For example, when a car starts from a standstill (zero relative velocity) and travels in a straight line at increasing speeds, it is accelerating in the direction of travel."
p200
aS'If the car turns there is an acceleration toward the new direction.'
p201
aS'For this example, we can call the accelerating of the car forward a "linear acceleration", which passengers in the car might experience as force pushing them back into their seats.'
p202
aS'When changing directions, we might call this "non-linear acceleration", which passengers might experience as a sideways force.'
p203
aS'If the speed of the car decreases, this is an acceleration in the opposite direction of the direction of the vehicle, sometimes called deceleration.'
p204
aS'It is a colorless, volatile, flammable liquid, and is the simplest ketone.Acetone is miscible with water and serves as an important solvent in its own right, typically for cleaning purposes in the laboratory.'
p205
aS'About 6.7 million tonnes were produced worldwide in 2010, mainly for use as a solvent and production of methyl methacrylate and bisphenol A.'
p206
aS'It is a common building block in organic chemistry.'
p207
aS'Familiar household uses of acetone are as the active ingredient in nail polish remover and as paint thinner.Acetone is produced and disposed of in the human body through normal metabolic processes.'
p208
aS'It is normally present in blood and urine.'
p209
aS'People with diabetes produce it in larger amounts.'
p210
aS'Reproductive toxicity tests show that it has low potential to cause reproductive problems.'
p211
aS'Non-aqueous acids are usually formed when an anion (negative ion) reacts with one or more positively charged hydrogen cations.'
p212
aS'A lower pH means a higher acidity, and thus a higher concentration of positive hydrogen ions in the solution.'
p213
aS'Chemicals or substances having the property of an acid are said to be acidic.There are three common definitions for acids: the Arrhenius definition, the Bronsted-Lowry definition, and the Lewis definition.'
p214
aS'The Arrhenius definition defines acids as substances which increase the concentration of hydrogen ions (H+), or more accurately, hydronium ions (H3O+), when dissolved in water.'
p215
aS'The Bronsted-Lowry definition is an expansion: an acid is a substance which can act as a proton donor.'
p216
aS'By this definition, any compound which can easily be deprotonated can be considered an acid.'
p217
aS'Examples include alcohols and amines which contain O-H or N-H fragments.'
p218
aS"An actin protein's mass is roughly 42-kDa and it is the monomeric subunit of two types of filaments in cells: microfilaments, one of the three major components of the cytoskeleton, and thin filaments, part of the contractile apparatus in muscle cells."
p219
aS'It can be present as either a free monomer called G-actin (globular) or as part of a linear polymer microfilament called F-actin (filamentous), both of which are essential for such important cellular functions as the mobility and contraction of cells during cell division.Actin participates in many important cellular processes, including muscle contraction, cell motility, cell division and cytokinesis, vesicle and organelle movement, cell signaling, and the establishment and maintenance of cell junctions and cell shape.'
p220
aS'Many of these processes are mediated by extensive and intimate interactions of actin with cellular membranes.'
p221
aS'In vertebrates, three main groups of actin isoforms, alpha, beta, and gamma have been identified.'
p222
aS'The alpha actins, found in muscle tissues, are a major constituent of the contractile apparatus.'
p223
aS'The beta and gamma actins coexist in most cell types as components of the cytoskeleton, and as mediators of internal cell motility.'
p224
aS"It is believed that the diverse range of structures formed by actin enabling it to fulfill such a large range of functions is regulated through the binding of tropomyosin along the filaments.A cell's ability to dynamically form microfilaments provides the scaffolding that allows it to rapidly remodel itself in response to its environment or to the organism's internal signals, for example, to increase cell membrane absorption or increase cell adhesion in order to form cell tissue."
p225
aS'Generally, the action takes different values for different paths.'
p226
aS'Action has the dimensions of [energy]*[time], and its SI unit is joule-second.'
p227
aS'This is the same unit as that of angular momentum. Introduction Empirical laws are frequently expressed as differential equations, which describe how physical quantities such as position and momentum change continuously with time.'
p228
aS'Given the initial and boundary conditions for the situation, the "solution" to these empirical equations is an implicit function describing the behavior of the system.There is an alternative approach to finding equations of motion.'
p229
aS'Classical mechanics postulates that the path actually followed by a physical system is that for which the action is minimized, or, more generally, is stationary.'
p230
aS'In other words, the action satisfies a variational principle: the principle of stationary action (see also below).'
p231
aS"The action is defined by an integral, and the classical equations of motion of a system can be derived by minimizing the value of that integral.This simple principle provides deep insights into physics, and is an important concept in modern theoretical physics.The equivalence of these two approaches is contained in Hamilton's principle, which states that the differential equations of motion for any physical system can be re-formulated as an equivalent integral equation."
p232
aS'The activation energy of a reaction is usually denoted by Ea and given in units of kilojoules per mole ().Activation_energy can be thought of as the height of the potential barrier (sometimes called the energy barrier) separating two minima of potential energy (of the reactants and products of a reaction).'
p233
aS'For a chemical reaction to proceed at a reasonable rate, there should exist an appreciable number of molecules with translational energy equal to or greater than the activation energy.At a more advanced level, the Arrhenius Activation_energy term from the Arrhenius_equation is best regarded as an experimentally determined parameter that indicates the sensitivity of the reaction rate to temperature.'
p234
aS'There are two objections to associating this activation energy with the threshold barrier for an elementary reaction.'
p235
aS'First, it is often unclear as to whether or not reaction does proceed in one step; threshold barriers that are averaged out over all elementary steps have little theoretical value.'
p236
aS"Second, even if the reaction being studied is elementary, a spectrum of individual collisions contributes to rate constants obtained from bulk ('bulb') experiments involving billions of molecules, with many different reactant collision geometries and angles, different translational and (possibly) vibrational energies--all of which may lead to different microscopic reaction rates. Temperature independence and the relation to the Arrhenius_equation The Arrhenius_equation gives the quantitative basis of the relationship between the activation energy and the rate at which a reaction proceeds."
p237
aS'From the Arrhenius_equation, the activation energy can be found through the relationwhere A is the frequency factor for the reaction, R is the universal gas constant, T is the temperature (in kelvin), and k is the reaction rate coefficient.'
p238
aS'Even without knowing A, Ea can be evaluated from the variation in reaction rate coefficients as a function of temperature (within the validity of the Arrhenius_equation). Negative activation energy In some cases, rates of reaction decrease with increasing temperature.'
p239
aS'The novel has remained in print ever since, and is used in university studies of 19th-century English literature. Plot summary According to The Oxford Companion to English Literature (1967),"the plot is founded on a story told to George_Eliot by her aunt Elizabeth Evans, a Methodist preacher, and the original of Dinah Morris of the novel, of a confession of child-murder, made to her by a girl in prison.'
p240
aS'"The story\'s plot follows four characters\' rural lives in the fictional community of Hayslope--a rural, pastoral and close-knit community in 1799.'
p241
aS'The novel revolves around a love "rectangle" among beautiful but self-absorbed Hetty Sorrel; Captain Arthur Donnithorne, the young squire who seduces her; Adam_Bede, her unacknowledged suitor; and Dinah Morris, Hetty\'s cousin, a fervent, virtuous and beautiful Methodist lay preacher.'
p242
aS'(The real village where Adam_Bede was set is Ellastoneon the Staffordshire / Derbyshire border, a few miles from Uttoxeter and Ashbourne, and near to Alton Towers.'
p243
aS"Eliot's father lived in the village as a carpenter in a substantial house now known as Adam_Bede's Cottage).Adam is a local carpenter much admired for his integrity and intelligence, in love with Hetty."
p244
aS"She is attracted to Arthur, the charming local squire's grandson and heir, and falls in love with him."
p245
aS'When Adam interrupts a tryst between them, Adam and Arthur fight.'
p246
aS'Smith is cited as the "father of modern economics" and is still among the most influential thinkers in the field of economics today.Smith studied social philosophy at the University of Glasgow and at Balliol College, Oxford, where he was one of the first students to benefit from scholarships set up by fellow Scot, John Snell.'
p247
aS'After graduating, he delivered a successful series of public lectures at Edinburgh, leading him to collaborate with David Hume during the Scottish Enlightenment.'
p248
aS'Smith obtained a professorship at Glasgow teaching moral philosophy, and during this time he wrote and published The Theory of Moral Sentiments.'
p249
aS'In his later life, he took a tutoring position that allowed him to travel throughout Europe, where he met other intellectual leaders of his day.Smith laid the foundations of classical free market economic theory.'
p250
aS'The Wealth of Nations was a precursor to the modern academic discipline of economics.'
p251
aS'In this and other works, he expounded upon how rational self-interest and competition can lead to economic prosperity.'
p252
aS'Smith was controversial in his own day and his general approach and writing style were often satirised by Tory writers in the moralising tradition of William Hogarth and Jonathan_Swift.'
p253
aS'As effective dictator of Nazi Germany, Hitler was at the centre of World_War_II in Europe and the Holocaust.Hitler was a decorated veteran of World_War_I.'
p254
aS"He joined the precursor of the NSDAP, the German Workers' Party, in 1919 and became leader of the NSDAP in 1921."
p255
aS'In 1923 he attempted a coup in Munich to seize power.'
p256
aS'The failed coup resulted in Hitler\'s imprisonment, during which time he wrote his autobiography and political manifesto Mein Kampf ("My Struggle").'
p257
aS'After his release in 1924, Hitler gained popular support by attacking the Treaty_of_Versailles and promoting Pan-Germanism, anti-Semitism, and anti-communism with charismatic oratory and Nazi propaganda.'
p258
aS"Hitler frequently denounced international capitalism and communism as being part of a Jewish conspiracy.Hitler's Nazi Party became the largest elected party in the German Reichstag, leading to his appointment as chancellor in 1933."
p259
aS'Following fresh elections won by his coalition, the Reichstag passed the Enabling Act, which began the process of transforming the Weimar Republic into the Third Reich, a single-party dictatorship based on the totalitarian and autocratic ideology of National Socialism.'
p260
aS"The poem, which is in 495 lines in 55 Spenserian stanzas, was composed in the spring of 1821 immediately after 11 April, when Shelley heard of Keats' death (seven weeks earlier)."
p261
aS"It is a pastoral elegy, in the English tradition of John Milton's Lycidas."
p262
aS'Shelley had studied and translated classical elegies.'
p263
aS'The title of the poem is likely a merging of the Greek "Adonis", the god of fertility, and the Hebrew "Adonai" (meaning "Lord").'
p264
aS"Most critics suggest that Shelley used Virgil's tenth Eclogue, in praise of Cornelius Gallus, as a model.It was published by Charles Ollier in July 1821 (see 1821 in poetry) with a preface in which Shelley made the mistaken assertion that Keats had died from a rupture of the lung induced by rage at the unfairly harsh reviews of his verse in the Quarterly Review and other journals."
p265
aS'He also thanked Joseph Severn for caring for Keats in Rome.'
p266
aS"This praise increased literary interest in Severn's works.Shelley was introduced to Keats in Hampstead towards the end of 1816 by their mutual friend, Leigh Hunt, who was to transfer his enthusiasm from Keats to Shelley."
p267
aS"He is a character in Greek mythology and is mentioned in Homer's Iliad."
p268
aS"Aeneas receives full treatment in Roman mythology, most extensively in Virgil's Aeneid where he is an ancestor of Romulus_and_Remus."
p269
aS'He became the first true hero of Rome. Greek myth and epos  Homeric Hymn to Aphrodite The story of the birth of Aeneas is told in the "Hymn to Aphrodite," one of the major Homeric Hymns.'
p270
aS'Aphrodite has caused the other gods, especially Zeus, to fall in love with mortal women.'
p271
aS'In retaliation, Zeus puts desire in her heart for Anchises, who is tending his cattle among the hills near Mount Ida.'
p272
aS'When Aphrodite sees him she is smitten.'
p273
aS'She adorns herself as if for a wedding among the gods and appears before him.'
p274
aS'Although AEthelred was not personally suspected of participation, the murder was committed at Corfe Castle by his attendants, making it more difficult for the new king to rally the nation against the military raids by Danes, especially as the legend of St Edward the Martyr grew.From 991 onwards, AEthelred paid tribute, or Danegeld, to the Danish king.'
p275
aS'In 1002, AEthelred ordered a massacre of Danish settlers.'
p276
aS'In 1003, King Sweyn invaded England, and in 1013, AEthelred fled to Normandy and was replaced by Sweyn, who was also King of Denmark.'
p277
aS'AEthelred returned as king, however, after Sweyn died in 1014.'
p278
aS'"Unready" is a mistranslation of Old English unraed (meaning bad-counsel)--a twist on his name "AEthelred", meaning noble-counsel.'
p279
aS"A better translation would be ill-advised. Name The story of AEthelred's notorious nickname, from Old English AEthelraed Unraed, goes a long way toward explaining how his reputation has declined through history."
p280
aS'His first name, composed of the elements aedele (comparable to Dutch edel(e) and adel; as in Old Saxon athal-), meaning "noble", and raed (comparable to Dutch raad and Old Dutch rat), meaning "counsel" or "advice", is typical of the compound names of those who belonged to the royal House of Wessex, and it characteristically alliterates with the names of his ancestors, like AEthelwulf ("noble-wolf"), AElfred ("elf-counsel"), Edward ("rich-protection"), and Edgar ("rich-spear").'
p281
aS'The sacrifices made to Agni go to the deities because Agni is a messenger from and to the other gods.'
p282
aS'He is ever-young, because the fire is re-lit every day, and is immortal.'
p283
aS'In the Rig Veda (I.95.2), a Rishi prays - for the ten eternal powers to bless Tvashtr (the supreme mind which creates all things) with the birth of Agni which is a reference to the ten undisclosed powers that nourish Agni.'
p284
aS'Yaskacharya explains that the fire-god is called agni (Agni) because he is agrnnii (Agrani), the forward leader who is the ever awake disseminator of knowledge and the first principle of thought which manifests as Speech; it is carried at the front in all ritualistic undertakings (yajnas).'
p285
aS'Pippalada, the sage of the Prashna Upanishad, merely highlights the ekaayuH (the Sole person) status of Agni when he tells Kabandhi Katayana - " That very one, Surya who is Aditya, rises up who is Prana and Agni, who is identified with all creatures and who is possessed of all fame. "'
p286
aS'The Vedic Rishis knew knowledge to be the quality of the Atman.'
p287
aS'Surya, Aditya, Prana and Agni stand for the Atman who reveals itself as knowledge by the all-illuminating bright rays of light and who reveals itself as objects cognized by the mind and described through speech (Rig Veda X.135.7).'
p288
aS'The literal meaning of the word Ahura is light and Mazda is wisdom.'
p289
aS"Zoroastrianism revolves around three basic tenets - Good Thoughts, Good Words and Good Deeds.Ahura_Mazda first appeared in the Achaemenid period (c. 550 - 330 BCE) under Darius_I's Behistun Inscription."
p290
aS'Until Artaxerxes II (405-04 to 359-58 BCE), Ahura_Mazda was worshiped and invoked alone.'
p291
aS'With Artaxerxes II, Ahura_Mazda was invoked in a triad, with Mithra and Apam Napat.'
p292
aS'In the Achaemenid period, there are no representations of Ahura_Mazda other than the custom for every emperor to have an empty chariot drawn by white horses, to invite Ahura_Mazda to accompany the Persian army on battles.'
p293
aS'Images of Ahura_Mazda began in the Parthian period, but were stopped and replaced with stone carved figures in the Sassanid period. Nomenclature "Mazda", or rather the Avestan stem-form Mazda-, nominative Mazda, reflects Proto-Iranian *Mazdah (female).'
p294
aS'It is generally taken to be the proper name of the spirit, and like its Sanskrit cognate medha, means "intelligence" or "wisdom".'
p295
aS'Akbar succeeded his father, Humayun, under a regent, Bairam Khan, who helped the young emperor expand and consolidate Mughal domains in India.'
p296
aS'A strong personality and a successful general, Akbar gradually enlarged the Mughal_Empire to include nearly all of the Indian Subcontinent north of the Godavari river.'
p297
aS'His power and influence, however, extended over the entire country because of Mughal military, political, cultural, and economic dominance.'
p298
aS'To unify the vast Mughal state, Akbar established a centralised system of administration throughout his empire and adopted a policy of conciliating conquered rulers through marriage and diplomacy.'
p299
aS'In order to preserve peace and order in a religiously and culturally diverse empire, he adopted policies that won him the support of his non-Muslim subjects.'
p300
aS'Eschewing tribal bonds and Islamic state identity, Akbar strived to unite far-flung lands of his realm through loyalty, expressed through a Persianised culture, to himself as an emperor who had near-divine status.Mughal India developed a strong and stable economy, leading to commercial expansion and greater patronage of culture.'
p301
aS'Akbar himself was a patron of art and culture.'
p302
aS'After graduation, Paton worked as a teacher, first at the Ixopo High School, and subsequently at Maritzburg College While at Ixopo he met Dorrie Francis Lusted.'
p303
aS'They were married in 1928 and remained together until her death from emphysema in 1967.'
p304
aS"Their life together is documented in Paton's book Kontakion for You Departed, published in 1969."
p305
aS'They had two sons. Early career He served as the principal of Diepkloof Reformatory for young (African Black) offenders from 1935 to 1949, where he introduced controversial progressive reforms, including policies on open dormitories, work permits, and home visitation.'
p306
aS'Boys were initially housed in closed dormitories; once they had proven themselves trustworthy, they would be transferred to open dormitories within the compound.'
p307
aS'Boys who showed great trustworthiness would be permitted to work outside the compound.'
p308
aS'In some cases, boys were even permitted to reside outside the compound under the supervision of a care family.'
p309
aS"Turing is widely considered to be the father of theoretical computer science and artificial intelligence.During the Second World War, Turing worked for the Government Code and Cypher School (GC&CS) at Bletchley Park, Britain's codebreaking centre."
p310
aS'For a time he led Hut 8, the section responsible for German naval cryptanalysis.'
p311
aS'He devised a number of techniques for breaking German ciphers, including improvements to the pre-war Polish bombe method, an electromechanical machine that could find settings for the Enigma machine.'
p312
aS'Turing played a pivotal role in cracking intercepted coded messages that enabled the Allies to defeat the Nazis in many crucial engagements, including the Battle of the Atlantic; it has been estimated that this work shortened the war in Europe by as many as two to four years.After the war, he worked at the National Physical Laboratory, where he designed the ACE, among the first designs for a stored-program computer.'
p313
aS"In 1948 Turing joined Max Newman's Computing Laboratory at the University of Manchester, where he helped develop the Manchester computers and became interested in mathematical biology."
p314
aS'He wrote a paper on the chemical basis of morphogenesis, and predicted oscillating chemical reactions such as the Belousov-Zhabotinsky reaction, first observed in the 1960s.Turing was prosecuted in 1952 for homosexual acts, when such behaviour was still a criminal act in the UK.'
p315
aS'He accepted treatment with oestrogen injections (chemical castration) as an alternative to prison.'
p316
aS'Alaska is the largest state in the United_States by area, the 4th least populous and the least densely populated of the 50 United_States.'
p317
aS"Approximately half of Alaska's 735,132 residents live within the Anchorage metropolitan area."
p318
aS"Alaska's economy is dominated by the oil, natural gas, and fishing industries, resources which it has in abundance."
p319
aS'Tourism is also a significant part of the economy.Although it had been occupied for thousands of years by indigenous peoples, from the 18th century onward, European powers considered the territory of Alaska ripe for exploitation and trade.'
p320
aS'The United_States purchased Alaska from the Russian Empire on March 30, 1867, for 7.2 million U.S. dollars at approximately two cents per acre ($4.74/km2).'
p321
aS'The area went through several administrative changes before becoming organized as a territory on May 11, 1912.'
p322
aS'It was admitted as the 49th state of the U.S. on January 3, 1959. Etymology The name "Alaska" (Aliaska) was introduced in the Russian colonial period when it was used to refer to the peninsula.'
p323
aS'It has a coast on the Adriatic Sea to the west and on the Ionian Sea to the southwest.'
p324
aS'It is less than 72 km (45 mi) from Italy, across the Strait of Otranto which links the Adriatic Sea to the Ionian Sea.Albania is a member of the United Nations, NATO, the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe, the Council of Europe and the World Trade Organization.'
p325
aS'It is one of the founding members of the Energy Community and the Union for the Mediterranean.'
p326
aS'It is also an official candidate for membership in the European Union.The modern-day territory of Albania was at various points in history part of the Roman provinces of Dalmatia (southern Illyricum), Macedonia (particularly Epirus Nova), and Moesia Superior.'
p327
aS'The modern Republic became independent after the collapse of the Ottoman_Empire in Europe following the Balkan Wars.'
p328
aS'Albania declared independence in 1912 and was recognized the following year.'
p329
aS'It then became a Principality, Republic, and Kingdom until being invaded by Italy in 1939, which formed Greater Albania.'
p330
aS'He wrote in his essay The Rebel that his whole life was devoted to opposing the philosophy of nihilism while still delving deeply into individual freedom.Camus did not consider himself to be an existentialist despite usually being classified as one, even in his lifetime.'
p331
aS'In a 1945 interview, Camus rejected any ideological associations: "No, I am not an existentialist.'
p332
aS'Sartre and I are always surprised to see our names linked...".Camus was born in Algeria to a Pied-Noir family, and studied at the University of Algiers.'
p333
aS'In 1949, Camus founded the Group for International Liaisons to "denounce two ideologies found in both the USSR and the USA". Life  Early years Albert_Camus was born on 7 November 1913 in Drean (then known as Mondovi) in Algeria to a Pied-Noir family.'
p334
aS'His mother was of Spanish descent and could only hear out of her left ear.'
p335
aS'His father Lucien, a poor agricultural worker, was wounded in the Battle of the Marne in 1914 during World_War_I, while serving as a member of the Zouave infantry regiment.'
p336
aS'Lucien died in a makeshift army hospital from his wounds on October 11.'
p337
aS'He was in communication with the major Italian artists of his time, including Raphael, Giovanni Bellini and Leonardo da Vinci, and from 1512 he was patronized by emperor Maximilian I.His vast body of work includes engravings, his preferred technique in his later prints, altarpieces, portraits and self-portraits, watercolours and books.'
p338
aS'The woodcuts, such as the Apocalypse series (1498), retain a more Gothic flavour than the rest of his work.'
p339
aS'His well-known engravings include the Knight, Death, and the Devil (1513), Saint Jerome in his Study (1514) and Melencolia I (1514), which has been the subject of extensive analysis and interpretation.'
p340
aS"His watercolours also mark him as one of the first European landscape artists, while his ambitious woodcuts revolutionized the potential of that medium.Durer's introduction of classical motifs into Northern art, through his knowledge of Italian artists and German humanists, has secured his reputation as one of the most important figures of the Northern Renaissance."
p341
aS'This is reinforced by his theoretical treatises, which involve principles of mathematics, perspective and ideal proportions. Early life (1471-90) Durer was born on 21 May 1471, third child and second son of his parents, who had between fourteen and eighteen children.'
p342
aS'His father, Albrecht_Durer the Elder, was a successful goldsmith, originally Ajtosi, who in 1455 had moved to Nuremberg from Ajtos, near Gyula in Hungary.'
p343
aS'The German name "Durer" is a translation from the Hungarian, "Ajtosi".'
p344
aS'Aldol_condensations are also commonly discussed in university level organic chemistry classes as a good bond-forming reaction that demonstrates important reaction mechanisms.'
p345
aS'In its usual form, it involves the nucleophilic addition of a ketone enolate to an aldehyde to form a b-hydroxy ketone, or "aldol" (aldehyde + alcohol), a structural unit found in many naturally occurring molecules and pharmaceuticals.The name aldol condensation is also commonly used, especially in biochemistry, to refer to just the first (addition) stage of the process--the aldol reaction itself--as catalyzed by aldolases.'
p346
aS'However, the aldol reaction is not formally a condensation reaction because it does not involve the loss of a small molecule.The reaction between an aldehyde/ketone and a carbonyl compound lacking an alpha-hydrogen (cross aldol condensation) is called the Claisen-Schmidt condensation.'
p347
aS'This reaction is named after two of its pioneering investigators Rainer_Ludwig_Claisen and J. G. Schmidt, who independently published on this topic in 1880 and 1881.'
p348
aS'An example is the synthesis of dibenzylideneacetone. Mechanism The first part of this reaction is an aldol reaction, the second part a dehydration--an elimination reaction(Involves removal of a water molecule or an alcohol molecule).'
p349
aS'Dehydration may be accompanied by decarboxylation when an activated carboxyl group is present.'
p350
aS'The aldol addition product can be dehydrated via two mechanisms; a strong base like potassium t-butoxide, potassium hydroxide or sodium hydride in an enolate mechanism, or in an acid-catalyzed enol mechanism.'
p351
aS'When dysregulated, aldosterone is pathogenic and contributes to the development and progression of cardiovascular and renal disease.'
p352
aS'Aldosterone has exactly the opposite function of the atrial natriuretic hormone secreted by the heart.Aldosterone is part of the renin-angiotensin system.'
p353
aS'Drugs that interfere with the secretion or action of aldosterone are in use as antihypertensives, like lisinopril, which lowers blood pressure by blocking the angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE), leading to lower aldosterone secretion.'
p354
aS'The net effect of these drugs is to reduce sodium and water retention but increase retention of potassium.'
p355
aS'Another example is spironolactone, a potassium-sparing diuretic, which decreases blood pressure by releasing fluid from the body while retaining potassium.'
p356
aS'It was first isolated by Simpson and Tait in 1953. Synthesis The corticosteroids are synthesized from cholesterol within the zona glomerulosa of adrenal cortex.'
p357
aS'Most steroidogenic reactions are catalysed by enzymes of the cytochrome P450 family.'
p358
aS'Mid career and later, he published travel writing, film stories and scripts.'
p359
aS'He spent the later part of his life in the US, living in Los Angeles from 1937 until his death.'
p360
aS'In 1962, a year before his death, he was elected Companion of Literature by the Royal Society of Literature.Huxley was a humanist, pacifist, and satirist.'
p361
aS'Huxley later became interested in spiritual subjects such as parapsychology and philosophical mysticism, in particular, Universalism.'
p362
aS'By the end of his life, Huxley was widely acknowledged as one of the pre-eminent intellectuals of his time.'
p363
aS'He was nominated for the Nobel Prize in Literature in seven different years. Early lifeEdit Aldous_Huxley was born in Godalming, Surrey, England, in 1894.'
p364
aS"He was the third son of the writer and schoolmaster Leonard Huxley and his first wife, Julia Arnold, who founded Prior's Field School."
p365
aS'While his writings were long suppressed in the USSR, he wrote many books, most notably The Gulag Archipelago, One Day in the Life of Ivan Denisovich, August 1914 and Cancer Ward.'
p366
aS'Solzhenitsyn was awarded the Nobel Prize in Literature in 1970, "for the ethical force with which he has pursued the indispensable traditions of Russian literature".'
p367
aS'He was expelled from the Soviet Union in 1974 but returned to Russia in 1994 after the dissolution of the Soviet Union. Biography  Early years Aleksandr_Solzhenitsyn was born in Kislovodsk, RSFSR (now in Stavropol Krai, Russia).'
p368
aS'His mother, Taisiya Solzhenitsyn (born Shcherbak) was Ukrainian.'
p369
aS'Her father had risen from humble beginnings to become a wealthy landowner, acquiring a large estate in the Kuban region in the northern foothills of the Caucasus.'
p370
aS'During World_War_I, Taisiya went to Moscow to study.'
p371
aS'While there she met and married Isaakiy Solzhenitsyn, a young officer in the Imperial Russian Army of Cossack origins and fellow native of the Caucasus region.'
p372
aS"Hamilton took the lead in the funding of the states' debts by the Federal government, the establishment of a national bank, a system of tariffs, and friendly trade relations with Britain."
p373
aS"He led the Federalist Party, created largely in support of his views; he was opposed by the Democratic-Republican Party, led by Thomas Jefferson and James Madison, which despised Britain and feared that Hamilton's policies of a strong central government would weaken the American commitment to Republicanism.Born out of wedlock, raised in the West Indies, and orphaned as a child, Hamilton pursued a college education through the help of local wealthy men."
p374
aS"Recognized for his abilities and talent, he was sent to King's College (now Columbia University), in New_York_City."
p375
aS'Hamilton played a major role in the American Revolutionary War.'
p376
aS'At the start of the war in 1775, he organized an artillery company.'
p377
aS"He soon became the senior aide to General Washington, the American forces' commander-in-chief."
p378
aS'Washington sent him on numerous important missions to tell generals what Washington wanted.'
p379
aS'Famous for his use of the heroic couplet, he is the second-most frequently quoted writer in The Oxford Dictionary of Quotations, after Shakespeare. Life  Early life Alexander_Pope was born to Alexander_Pope Senior (1646-1717), a linen merchant of Plough Court, Lombard Street, London, and his wife Edith (nee Turner) (1643-1733), who were both Catholics.'
p380
aS"Edith's sister Christiana was the wife of the famous miniature painter Samuel Cooper."
p381
aS"Pope's education was affected by the recently enacted Test Acts, which upheld the status of the established Church of England and banned Catholics from teaching, attending a university, voting, or holding public office on pain of perpetual imprisonment."
p382
aS'Pope was taught to read by his aunt, and went to Twyford School in about 1698/99.'
p383
aS'He then went to two Catholic schools in London.'
p384
aS'Such schools, while illegal, were tolerated in some areas.In 1700, his family moved to a small estate at Popeswood in Binfield, Berkshire, close to the royal Windsor Forest.'
p385
aS'This was due to strong anti-Catholic sentiment and a statute preventing Catholics from living within 10 miles (16 km) of either London or Westminster.'
p386
aS'26 May] 1799 - 10 February [O.S.'
p387
aS'29 January] 1837) was a Russian author of the Romantic era who is considered by many to be the greatest Russian poet and the founder of modern Russian literature.Pushkin was born into Russian nobility in Moscow.'
p388
aS'His matrilineal great grandfather was Abram Gannibal, who was brought over as a slave from what is now Cameroon.'
p389
aS"Pushkin published his first poem at the age of fifteen, and was widely recognized by the literary establishment by the time of his graduation from the Tsarskoye Selo Lyceum.While under the strict surveillance of the Tsar's political police and unable to publish, Pushkin wrote his most famous play, the drama Boris Godunov."
p390
aS"His novel in verse, Eugene Onegin, was serialized between 1825 and 1832.Notoriously touchy about his honour, Pushkin fought as many as twenty-nine duels, and was fatally wounded in such an encounter with Georges-Charles de Heeckeren d'Anthes."
p391
aS"Pushkin had accused D'Anthes, a French officer serving with the Chevalier Guard Regiment of attempting to seduce the poet's wife, Natalya Pushkina. Life and career Pushkin's father, Sergei Lvovich Pushkin (1767-1848), was descended from a distinguished family of the Russian nobility that traced its ancestry back to the 12th century.Pushkin's mother Nadezhda (Nadya) Ossipovna Gannibal (1775-1836) was descended through her paternal grandmother from German and Scandinavian nobility."
p392
aS"She was the daughter of Ossip Abramovich Gannibal (1744-1807) and his wife, Maria Alekseyevna Pushkina (1745-1818).Ossip Abramovich Gannibal's father, Pushkin's great-grandfather, was Abram Petrovich Gannibal (1696-1781), an African page kidnapped and brought to Russia as a gift for Peter_the_Great."
p393
aS'He spent most of his ruling years on an unprecedented military campaign through Asia and northeast Africa, until by the age of thirty he had created one of the largest empires of the ancient world, stretching from Greece to Egypt and into northwest India.'
p394
aS"He was undefeated in battle and is considered one of history's most successful military commanders.During his youth, Alexander was tutored by the philosopher Aristotle until the age of 16."
p395
aS'After Philip was assassinated in 336 BC, Alexander succeeded his father to the throne and inherited a strong kingdom and an experienced army.'
p396
aS"He had been awarded the generalship of Greece and used this authority to launch his father's Panhellenic project to lead the Greeks in the conquest of Persia."
p397
aS'In 334 BC, he invaded the Achaemenid Empire, ruled Asia Minor, and began a series of campaigns that lasted ten years.'
p398
aS'Alexander broke the power of Persia in a series of decisive battles, most notably the battles of Issus and Gaugamela.'
p399
aS'He subsequently overthrew the Persian King Darius_III and conquered the Achaemenid Empire in its entirety.'
p400
aS"Democracy in America was published after Tocqueville's travels in the United_States, and is today considered an early work of sociology and political science.Tocqueville was active in French politics, first under the July Monarchy (1830-1848) and then during the Second Republic (1849-1851) which succeeded the February 1848 Revolution."
p401
aS"He retired from political life after Louis Napoleon Bonaparte's 2 December 1851 coup, and thereafter began work on The Old Regime and the Revolution.He argued that the importance of the French Revolution was to continue the process of modernizing and centralizing the French state which had begun under King Louis XIV."
p402
aS'The failure of the Revolution came from the inexperience of the deputies who were too wedded to abstract Enlightenment ideals.'
p403
aS'Tocqueville was a classical liberal who advocated parliamentary government, but was skeptical of the extremes of democracy. Life Alexis_de_Tocqueville came from an old Norman aristocratic family with ancestors who participated in the Battle_of_Hastings in 1066.'
p404
aS'His parents, Herve Louis Francois Jean Bonaventure Clerel, Comte de Tocqueville, an officer of the Constitutional Guard of King Louis XVI, and Louise Madeleine Le Peletier de Rosanbo, barely escaped the guillotine due to the fall of Robespierre in 1794.After an exile in England, they returned to France during the reign of Napoleon.'
p405
aS'Under the Bourbon Restoration, his father became a noble peer and prefect.'
p406
aS'Tocqueville attended the Lycee Fabert in Metz.Tocqueville, who despised the July Monarchy (1830-1848), began his political career in 1830.'
p407
aS'It brings the ideas of supply and demand, marginal utility, and costs of production into a coherent whole.'
p408
aS'He is known as one of the founders of economics. Life and career Marshall was born in Clapham, England, 26 July 1842.'
p409
aS'His father was a bank cashier and a devout Evangelical.'
p410
aS"Marshall grew up in the London suburb of Clapham and was educated at the Merchant Taylors' School and St John's College, Cambridge, where he demonstrated an aptitude in mathematics, achieving the rank of Second Wrangler in the 1865 Cambridge Mathematical Tripos."
p411
aS'Marshall experienced a mental crisis that led him to abandon physics and switch to philosophy.'
p412
aS'He began with metaphysics, specifically "the philosophical foundation of knowledge, especially in relation to theology.".'
p413
aS'Metaphysics led Marshall to ethics, specifically a Sidgwickian version of utilitarianism; ethics, in turn, led him to economics, because economics played an essential role in providing the preconditions for the improvement of the working class.'
p414
aS"He was married to painter Georgia O'Keeffe. Life  Early years (1864-1890) Stieglitz was born in Hoboken, New Jersey, the first son of German-Jewish immigrants Edward Stieglitz (1833-1909) and Hedwig Ann Werner (1845-1922)."
p415
aS"At that time his father was a lieutenant in the Union Army, but after three years of fighting and earning an officer's salary he was able to buy an exemption from future fighting."
p416
aS"This allowed him to stay near home during his first son's childhood, and he played an active role in seeing that he was well-educated."
p417
aS'Over the next fifteen years the Stieglitzes had five more children: Flora (1865-1890), twins Julius (1867-1937) and Leopold (1867-1956), Agnes (1869-1952) and Selma (1871-1957).'
p418
aS'Alfred_Stieglitz was said to have been very jealous of the closeness of the twins, and as a result he spent much of his youth wishing for a soul mate of his own.In 1871 Stieglitz was sent to the Charlier Institute, at that time the best private school in New York.'
p419
aS'He enjoyed his studies but rarely felt challenged by them.'
p420
aS'During the fetid, un-air conditioned summers in New York city, his family (like most upper-class families) would travel to Lake George in the Adirondack Mountains, where they could avoid the six to eight weeks of semi-tropical heat and humidity of the city.'
p421
aS'He was also the first King of the West Saxons to style himself "King of the Anglo-Saxons".'
p422
aS"Details of Alfred's life are described in a work by the 10th-century Welsh scholar and bishop Asser."
p423
aS"A devout Christian, Alfred had a reputation as a learned and merciful man of a gracious and level-headed nature who encouraged education and improved his kingdom's legal system, military structure and his people's quality of life. Childhood Alfred was born in the village of Wanating, now Wantage, Oxfordshire."
p424
aS'He was the youngest son of King AEthelwulf of Wessex, by his first wife, Osburh.In 853, at the age of four, Alfred is said to have been sent to Rome where, according to the Anglo-Saxon Chronicle, he was confirmed by Pope Leo IV who "anointed him as king".'
p425
aS'Victorian writers later interpreted this as an anticipatory coronation in preparation for his ultimate succession to the throne of Wessex.'
p426
aS'However, his succession could not have been foreseen at the time, as Alfred had three living elder brothers.'
p427
aS'A letter of Leo IV shows that Alfred was made a "consul"; a misinterpretation of this investiture, deliberate or accidental, could explain later confusion.'
p428
aS'was written to commemorate his friend Arthur Hallam, a fellow poet and student at Trinity College, Cambridge, after he died of a stroke aged just 22.'
p429
aS'Tennyson also wrote some notable blank verse including Idylls of the King, "Ulysses", and "Tithonus".'
p430
aS'During his career, Tennyson attempted drama, but his plays enjoyed little success.'
p431
aS'A number of phrases from Tennyson\'s work have become commonplaces of the English language, including "Nature, red in tooth and claw" (In Memoriam A.H.H.'
p432
aS'), "\'Tis better to have loved and lost / Than never to have loved at all", "Theirs not to reason why, / Theirs but to do and die", "My strength is as the strength of ten, / Because my heart is pure", "To strive, to seek, to find, and not to yield", "Knowledge comes, but Wisdom lingers", and "The old order changeth, yielding place to new".'
p433
aS'He is the ninth most frequently quoted writer in The Oxford Dictionary of Quotations. Early life Tennyson was born in Somersby, Lincolnshire, England.'
p434
aS'He was born into a middle-class line of Tennysons, but also had a noble and royal ancestry.His father, George Clayton Tennyson (1778-1831), was rector of Somersby (1807-1831), also rector of Benniworth (1802-1831) and Bag Enderby, and vicar of Grimsby (1815).'
p435
aS'With an area of 2,381,741 square kilometres (919,595 sq mi), 90% of which is desert, Algeria is the tenth-largest country in the world and the largest in the Arab world and Africa.'
p436
aS"It is bordered to the northeast by Tunisia, to the east by Libya, to the west by Morocco, to the southwest by Western Sahara, Mauritania, and Mali, to the southeast by Niger, and to the north by the Mediterranean Sea.The territory of today's Algeria was the home of many prehistoric cultures, including Aterian and Capsian and the Proto-Berber."
p437
aS'It has known many empires and dynasties, including ancient Numidians, Phoenicians, Carthaginians, Romans, Vandals, Byzantines, Umayyads, Abbasids, Idrisid, Aghlabid, Rustamid, Fatimids, Zirid, Hammadids, Almoravids, Almohads, Ottomans and the French colonial empire.'
p438
aS'Algeria is a semi-presidential republic of 48 provinces and 1,541 communes.'
p439
aS'Abdelaziz Bouteflika has been President since 1999.Algeria supplies large amounts of natural gas to Europe, and energy exports are the backbone of the economy.'
p440
aS'According to OPEC Algeria has the 17th largest reserves of oil in the world, and the second largest in Africa, while it has the 9th largest reserves of natural gas.'
p441
aS'Sonatrach, the national oil company, is the largest company in Africa.Algeria has the second largest military in North Africa, and the largest defence budget in Africa.'
p442
aS'Acyclic alkenes, with only one double bond and no other functional groups, known as mono-enes, form a homologous series of hydrocarbons with the general formula CnH2n.'
p443
aS'Alkenes have two hydrogen atoms less than the corresponding alkane (with the same number of carbon atoms).'
p444
aS'The simplest alkene, ethylene (C2H4), which has the International Union of Pure and Applied Chemistry (IUPAC) name ethene is the organic compound produced on the largest scale industrially.'
p445
aS'Aromatic compounds are often drawn as cyclic alkenes, but their structure and properties are different and they are not considered to be alkenes. Structure  Bonding Like a single covalent bond, double bonds can be described in terms of overlapping atomic orbitals, except that, unlike a single bond (which consists of a single sigma bond), a carbon-carbon double bond consists of one sigma bond and one pi bond.'
p446
aS'This double bond is stronger than a single covalent bond (611 kJ/mol for CC vs. 347 kJ/mol for C-C) and also shorter with an average bond length of 1.33 Angstroms (133 pm).Each carbon of the double bond uses its three sp2 hybrid orbitals to form sigma bonds to three atoms.'
p447
aS'The unhybridized 2p atomic orbitals, which lie perpendicular to the plane created by the axes of the three sp2 hybrid orbitals, combine to form the pi bond.'
p448
aS'This bond lies outside the main C-C axis, with half of the bond on one side and half on the other.Rotation about the carbon-carbon double bond is restricted because it involves an energetic cost to break the alignment of the p orbitals on the two carbon atoms.'
p449
aS'Alkynes are traditionally known as acetylenes, although the name acetylene also refers specifically to C2H2, known formally as ethyne using IUPAC nomenclature.'
p450
aS'Like other hydrocarbons, alkynes are generally hydrophobic but tend to be more reactive. Chemical properties Alkynes are characteristically more unsaturated than alkenes.'
p451
aS'Thus they add two equivalents of bromine whereas an alkene adds only one equivalent in the reaction.'
p452
aS'Other reactions are listed below.'
p453
aS'In some reactions, alkynes are less reactive than alkenes.'
p454
aS'For example, in a molecule with an -ene and an -yne group, addition occurs preferentially at the -ene.'
p455
aS'Possible explanations involve the two p-bonds in the alkyne delocalising, which would reduce the energy of the p-system or the stability of the intermediates during the reaction.'
p456
aS"The book describes the German soldiers' extreme physical and mental stress during the war, and the detachment from civilian life felt by many of these soldiers upon returning home from the front.The novel was first published in November and December 1928 in the German newspaper Vossische Zeitung and in book form in late January 1929."
p457
aS'The book and its sequel, The Road Back (1930), were among the books banned and burned in Nazi Germany.'
p458
aS'All_Quiet_on_the_Western_Front sold 2.5 million copies in 22 languages in its first 18 months in print.In 1930, the book was adapted as an Oscar-winning film of the same name, directed by Lewis Milestone. Title and translation The 1929 English translation by Arthur Wesley Wheen gives the title as All_Quiet_on_the_Western_Front.'
p459
aS'The literal translation of "Im Westen nichts Neues" is "In the West Nothing New," with "West" being the Western Front; the phrase refers to the content of an official communique at the end of the novel.Brian Murdoch\'s 1993 translation would render the phrase as "there was nothing new to report on the Western Front" within the narrative.'
p460
aS'Explaining his retention of the original book-title, he says:Although it does not match the German exactly, Wheen\'s title has justly become part of the English language and is retained here with gratitude.The phrase "all quiet on the Western Front" has become a colloquial expression meaning stagnation, or lack of visible change, in any context. Plot summary The book tells the story of Paul Baumer, a German soldier who--urged on by his school teacher--joins the German army shortly after the start of World_War_I.'
p461
aS'His class was "scattered over the platoons amongst Frisian fishermen, peasants, and labourers."'
p462
aS'Baumer arrives at the Western Front with his friends and schoolmates (Leer, Muller, Kropp and a number of other characters).'
p463
aS'Alpha_particles are named after the first letter in the Greek alphabet, a.'
p464
aS'The symbol for the alpha particle is a or a2+.'
p465
aS'Because they are identical to helium nuclei, they are also sometimes written as He2+ or 42He2+ indicating a helium ion with a +2 charge (missing its two electrons).'
p466
aS'If the ion gains electrons from its environment, the alpha particle can be written as a normal (electrically neutral) helium atom 42He.The nomenclature is not well defined, and thus not all high-velocity helium nuclei are considered by all authors to be alpha particles.'
p467
aS'As with beta and gamma rays/particles, the name used for the particle carries some mild connotations about its production process and energy, but these are not rigorously applied.'
p468
aS'Some science authors may use doubly ionized helium nuclei (He2+) and alpha particles as interchangeable terms.'
p469
aS'Thus, alpha particles may be loosely used as a term when referring to stellar helium nuclei reactions (for example the alpha processes), and even when they occur as components of cosmic rays.'
p470
aS'The most common early symptom is difficulty in remembering recent events (short-term memory loss).'
p471
aS'As the disease advances, symptoms can include problems with language, disorientation (including easily getting lost), mood swings, loss of motivation, not managing self care, and behavioural issues.'
p472
aS"As a person's condition declines, she or he often withdraws from family and society."
p473
aS'Gradually, bodily functions are lost, ultimately leading to death.'
p474
aS"Although the speed of progression can vary, the average life expectancy following diagnosis is three to nine years.The cause of Alzheimer's_disease is poorly understood."
p475
aS'About 70% of the risk is believed to be genetic with many genes usually involved.'
p476
aS'Other risk factors include a history of head injuries, depression, or hypertension.'
p477
aS'His vehemence as a critic, his motto "Nothing matters", and the sardonic view of human nature that informed his work, all earned him the nickname "Bitter Bierce".Despite his reputation as a searing critic, Bierce was known to encourage younger writers, including poet George Sterling and fiction writer W. C. Morrow.'
p478
aS'Bierce employed a distinctive style of writing, especially in his stories.'
p479
aS'His style often embraces an abrupt beginning, dark imagery, vague references to time, limited descriptions, impossible events, and the theme of war.In 1913, Bierce traveled to Mexico to gain first-hand experience of the Mexican Revolution.'
p480
aS'He was rumored to be traveling with rebel troops, but was not seen again. Early life Bierce was born in a log cabin at Horse Cave Creek in Meigs County, Ohio on June 24, 1842, to Marcus Aurelius Bierce (1799-1876) and Laura Sherwood Bierce.'
p481
aS'His mother was a descendant of William Bradford.'
p482
aS'He was the tenth of thirteen children whose father gave all names beginning with the letter "A": in order of birth, the Bierce siblings were Abigail, Amelia, Ann, Addison, Aurelius, Augustus, Almeda, Andrew, Albert, and Ambrose.His parents were a poor but literary couple who instilled in him a deep love for books and writing.'
p483
aS'The boy grew up in Kosciusko County, Indiana, attending high school at the county seat, Warsaw.He left home at 15 to become a "printer\'s devil" at a small Ohio newspaper. Military career At the outset of the American Civil War, Bierce enlisted in the Union Army\'s 9th Indiana Infantry Regiment.'
p484
aS'About 500 amino acids are known and can be classified in many ways.'
p485
aS"They can be classified according to the core structural functional groups' locations as alpha- (a-), beta- (b-), gamma- (g-) or delta- (d-) amino acids; other categories relate to polarity, pH level, and side-chain group type (aliphatic, acyclic, aromatic, containing hydroxyl or sulfur, etc.)."
p486
aS'In the form of proteins, amino acids comprise the second-largest component (water is the largest) of human muscles, cells and other tissues.'
p487
aS'Outside proteins, amino acids perform critical roles in processes such as neurotransmitter transport and biosynthesis.In biochemistry, amino acids having both the amine and the carboxylic acid groups attached to the first (alpha-) carbon atom have particular importance.'
p488
aS'They are known as 2-, alpha-, or a-amino acids (generic formula H2NCHRCOOH in most cases, where R is an organic substituent known as a "side-chain"); often the term "amino acid" is used to refer specifically to these.'
p489
aS'They include the 23 proteinogenic ("protein-building") amino acids, which combine into peptide chains ("polypeptides") to form the building-blocks of a vast array of proteins.'
p490
aS'These are all L-stereoisomers ("left-handed" isomers), although a few D-amino acids ("right-handed") occur in bacterial envelopes and some antibiotics.'
p491
aS'Ammonia contributes significantly to the nutritional needs of terrestrial organisms by serving as a precursor to food and fertilizers.'
p492
aS'Ammonia, either directly or indirectly, is also a building block for the synthesis of many pharmaceuticals and is used in many commercial cleaning products.'
p493
aS'Although in wide use, ammonia is both caustic and hazardous.The global industrial production of ammonia for 2012 was anticipated to be 198,000,000 tonnes (195,000,000 long tons; 218,000,000 short tons), a 35% increase over the estimated 2006 global output of 146,500,000 tonnes (144,200,000 long tons; 161,500,000 short tons).NH3 boils at -33.34 degC (-28.012 degF) at a pressure of one atmosphere, so the liquid must be stored under pressure or at low temperature.'
p494
aS'Household ammonia or ammonium hydroxide is a solution of NH3 in water.'
p495
aS'The concentration of such solutions is measured in units of the Baume scale (density), with 26 degrees baume (about 30% (by weight) ammonia at 15.5 degC or 59.9 degF) being the typical high-concentration commercial product. Natural occurrence Ammonia is found in trace quantities in the atmosphere, being produced from the putrefaction (decay process) of nitrogenous animal and vegetable matter.'
p496
aS'Ammonia and ammonium salts are also found in small quantities in rainwater, whereas ammonium chloride (sal ammoniac), and ammonium sulfate are found in volcanic districts; crystals of ammonium bicarbonate have been found in Patagonian guano.'
p497
aS'The kidneys secrete ammonia to neutralize excess acid.'
p498
aS'Clyde enjoys his new lifestyle and becomes infatuated with the mercenary Hortense Briggs, who exploits this characteristic of Clyde by compelling him to buy her an expensive jacket in exchange for love, even though she clearly does not want him to be her partner.'
p499
aS'Hortense instead wants another person named Sparser, and this is clear to Clyde who is immediately and extremely jealous, but Hortense repeatedly reassures Clyde that she loves him, though she really wants him just for the jacket.'
p500
aS"Later, Clyde's life changes dramatically when Sparser, driving a stolen vehicle with everybody inside (including Clyde's colleagues), runs over a little girl and kills her, and then, trying to flee from the police, crashes into an object, and everybody inside but Sparser and his partner are still conscious and flee."
p501
aS'This cycle of unfortunate events is bound to repeat later in the story with Clyde and another girl, later resulting in the novel being a tragedy.'
p502
aS'Clyde flees Kansas City, and while working as bellboy at an exclusive club in Chicago, he meets his wealthy uncle Samuel Griffiths, the owner of a shirt-collar factory in the fictional Lycurgus, New York.'
p503
aS'Samuel, feeling guilt for neglecting his poor relations, offers to help Clyde if he will come to Lycurgus.'
p504
aS"When Clyde does so he gives him first a menial, then a supervisory job at the collar factory, while not accepting him into the Griffiths' upper-class social circle.It is made clear to Clyde that as a Griffiths, he should not consort with the working people of Lycurgus, and specifically with the women under his supervision."
p505
aS'Ghosts had challenged the hypocrisy of Victorian morality and was deemed indecent for its veiled references to syphilis.'
p506
aS'{{citation needed|dateApril 2014Upon completion of the play, Ibsen wrote to his publisher in Copenhagen, Denmark : "I am still uncertain as to whether I should call it a comedy or a straight drama.'
p507
aS'It may [have] many traits of comedy, but it also is based on a serious idea.'
p508
aS'" Plot Overview  Act I The Play opens in Dr. Stockmann\'s household.'
p509
aS'Mrs. Stockmann is entertaining the dinner guests.'
p510
aS"As the evening progresses the Mayor (also Dr. Stockmann's brother) and Hovstad (the editor of the newspaper) have come to the house."
p511
aS'Dr. Stockmann and his two sons Ejlif and Morten have come home from a walk.'
p512
aS'He describes the mind at birth as a blank slate (tabula rasa, although he did not use those actual words) filled later through experience.'
p513
aS"The essay was one of the principal sources of empiricism in modern philosophy, and influenced many enlightenment philosophers, such as David Hume and George_Berkeley.Book I of the Essay is Locke's attempt to refute the rationalist notion of innate ideas."
p514
aS'Book II sets out Locke\'s theory of ideas, including his distinction between passively acquired simple ideas, such as "red," "sweet," "round," etc., and actively built complex ideas, such as numbers, causes and effects, abstract ideas, ideas of substances, identity, and diversity.'
p515
aS'Locke also distinguishes between the truly existing primary qualities of bodies, like shape, motion and the arrangement of minute particles, and the secondary qualities that are "powers to produce various sensations in us" such as "red" and "sweet."'
p516
aS'These secondary qualities, Locke claims, are dependent on the primary qualities.'
p517
aS'He also offers a theory of personal identity, offering a largely psychological criterion.'
p518
aS'Book III is concerned with language, and Book IV with knowledge, including intuition, mathematics, moral philosophy, natural philosophy ("science"), faith, and opinion. Book I The main thesis is that there are "No Innate Principles", by this reasoning:If we will attentively consider new born children, we shall have little reason to think that they bring many ideas into the world with themand that "by degrees afterward, ideas come into their minds."'
p519
aS'He is also one of the most important characters of West African and Caribbean folklore.He is also known as Ananse, Kwaku Ananse, and Anancy; and in the southern United_States he has evolved into Aunt Nancy.'
p520
aS'He is a spider, but often acts and appears as a man.The AnansI tales originated from the Ashanti people of present-day Ghana.'
p521
aS'The word Ananse is Akan and means "spider".'
p522
aS'They later spread to other Akan groups and then to the West Indies, Suriname, and the Netherlands Antilles.'
p523
aS'On Curacao, Aruba, and Bonaire he is known as Nanzi, and his wife as Shi Maria.Anansi is depicted in many different ways.'
p524
aS'Sometimes he looks like an ordinary spider, sometimes he is a spider wearing clothes or with a human face and sometimes he looks much more like a human with spider elements, such as eight legs. Stories Anansi tales are some of the best-known amongst the Asante people of Ghana.'
p525
aS'The stories made up an exclusively oral tradition, and indeed Anansi himself was synonymous with skill and wisdom in speech.'
p526
aS'He was a successful novelist, with several best-sellers.'
p527
aS'Ironic and skeptical, he was considered in his day the ideal French man of letters.'
p528
aS'He was a member of the Academie francaise, and won the 1921 Nobel Prize for Literature "in recognition of his brilliant literary achievements, characterized as they are by a nobility of style, a profound human sympathy, grace, and a true Gallic temperament".France is also widely believed to be the model for narrator Marcel\'s literary idol Bergotte in Marcel Proust\'s In Search of Lost Time. Early years The son of a bookseller, France spent most of his life around books.'
p529
aS'France was a bibliophile.'
p530
aS"His father's bookstore, called the Librairie France, specialized in books and papers on the French Revolution and was frequented by many notable writers and scholars of the day."
p531
aS'Anatole_France studied at the College Stanislas, a private Catholic school, and after graduation he helped his father by working in his bookstore.'
p532
aS'After several years he secured the position of cataloguer at Bacheline-Deflorenne and at Lemerre.'
p533
aS'Since 1896, systematic archaeological investigations of the Corinth Excavations by the American School of Classical Studies at Athens have revealed large parts of the ancient city, and recent excavations conducted by the Greek Ministry of Culture have brought important new facets of antiquity to light.For Christians, Corinth is known from the two books First Corinthians and Second Corinthians in the New Testament.'
p534
aS"The 2nd book of Pausanias' Description of Greece is devoted to Corinth.Ancient_Corinth was one of the largest and most important cities of Greece, with a population of 90,000 in 400 BC."
p535
aS"After the Romans built a new city in its place and made it the provincial capital of Greece in 44 BC, the city's population was between 50,000 to 700,000 according to different sources. History  Prehistory and founding myths Neolithic pottery suggests that the site of Corinth was occupied from at least as early as 6500 BC, and continually occupied into the Early Bronze Age, when, it has been suggested, the settlement acted as a centre of trade."
p536
aS'However, there is a dramatic drop in ceramic remains during the Early Helladic II phase, and only sparse ceramic remains in the EHIII and MH phases; thus it appears that the area was very sparsely inhabited in the period immediately before the Mycenaean period.'
p537
aS'While pottery dating to the Mycenaean period is negligible at the site of Corinth, there was a settlement on the coast near Lechaion which traded across the Corinthian Gulf; the site of Corinth itself was likely not heavily occupied again until around 900 BC, when it is believed the Dorians settled there.According to Hellenic myth, the city was founded by Corinthos, a descendant of the god Helios (the Sun), while other myths suggest that it was founded by the goddess Ephyra, a daughter of the Titan Oceanus, thus the ancient name of the city (also Ephyra).'
p538
aS'There is evidence that the city was destroyed around 2000 BC.Some ancient names for the place, such as Korinthos, derive from a pre-Greek, "Pelasgian" language; it seems likely that Corinth was also the site of a Bronze Age Mycenaean palace-city, like Mycenae, Tiryns or Pylos.'
p539
aS'According to myth, Sisyphus was the founder of a race of ancient kings at Corinth.'
p540
aS'Few paintings are attributed to him with certainty, but a number of important painters were trained at his workshop.'
p541
aS'His pupils included Leonardo da Vinci, Pietro Perugino and Lorenzo di Credi.'
p542
aS'His greatest importance was as a sculptor and his last work, the equestrian statue of Bartolomeo Colleoni in Venice, is generally accepted as a masterpiece. LifeEdit Verrocchio was born in Florence in or about 1435.'
p543
aS'His father was Michele di Francesco Cioni, who worked as a tile and brick maker and, later, as a tax collector.'
p544
aS'Verrocchio never married, and had to provide financial support for some members of his family.'
p545
aS'He was at first apprenticed to a goldsmith.'
p546
aS'It has been suggested that he was later apprenticed to Donatello, but there is no evidence of this and John Pope-Hennessy considered that it is contradicted by the style of his early works.'
p547
aS'His flinty, metallic landscapes and somewhat stony figures give evidence of a fundamentally sculptural approach to painting.'
p548
aS'He also led a workshop that was the leading producer of prints in Venice before 1500. Biography  Youth and education Mantegna was born in Isola di Carturo, Italy close to Padua (then part of the Republic of Venice), second son of a carpenter, Biagio.'
p549
aS'At the age of eleven he became the apprentice of Francesco Squarcione, Paduan painter.'
p550
aS'Squarcione, whose original vocation was tailoring, appears to have had a remarkable enthusiasm for ancient art, and a faculty for acting.'
p551
aS'Like his famous compatriot Petrarca, Squarcione was something of a fanatic for ancient Rome: he traveled in Italy, and perhaps Greece, amassing antique statues, reliefs, vases, etc., forming a collection of such works, then making drawings from them himself, and throwing open his stores for others to study.'
p552
aS"All the while, he continued undertaking works on commission for which his pupils no less than himself were made available.As many as 137 painters and pictorial students passed through Squarcione's school, which had been established towards 1440 and which became famous all over Italy."
p553
aS'Padua was attractive for artists coming not only from Veneto but also from Tuscany, such as Paolo Uccello, Filippo Lippi and Donatello.'
p554
aS'All of his buildings are located in what was the Venetian Republic, but his teachings, summarized in the architectural treatise, The Four Books of Architecture, gained him wide recognition.'
p555
aS'The city of Vicenza and the Palladian Villas of the Veneto are UNESCO World Heritage Sites. Biography Palladio was born on 30 November 1508 in Padua and was given the name, Andrea Di Pietro della Gondola.'
p556
aS'His father, Pietro, called "Della Gondola", was a miller.'
p557
aS'From early on, Andrea_Palladio was introduced into the work of building.'
p558
aS'In Padua he gained his first experiences as a stonecutter in the sculpture workshop of Bartolomeo Cavazza da Sossano, who is said to have imposed particularly hard working conditions.'
p559
aS'At the age of sixteen he moved to Vicenza where he would reside for most of his life.'
p560
aS'Here he became an assistant in the Pedemuro studio, a leading workshop of stonecutters and masons.'
p561
aS'During the American Revolutionary War Jackson, whose family supported the revolutionary cause, acted as a courier.'
p562
aS'He was captured, at age 13, and mistreated by his British captors.'
p563
aS'He later became a lawyer, and in 1796 he was in Nashville and helped found the state of Tennessee.'
p564
aS'He was elected to the U.S. House of Representatives, and then to the U.S. Senate.'
p565
aS'In 1801, Jackson was appointed colonel in the Tennessee militia, which became his political as well as military base.'
p566
aS'Jackson owned hundreds of slaves who worked on the Hermitage plantation which he acquired in 1804.'
p567
aS'Jackson killed a man in a duel in 1806, over a matter of honor regarding his wife Rachel.'
p568
aS'The Andromeda_Galaxy is the nearest major galaxy to the Milky Way.'
p569
aS'It gets its name from the area of the sky in which it appears, the constellation of Andromeda, which was named after the mythological princess Andromeda.'
p570
aS'The Andromeda_Galaxy is the largest galaxy of the Local Group, which also contains the Milky Way, the Triangulum Galaxy, and about 44 other smaller galaxies.The Andromeda_Galaxy is the most massive galaxy in the Local Group as well.'
p571
aS'Despite earlier findings that suggested that the Milky Way contains more dark matter and could be the most massive in the grouping, the 2006 observations by the Spitzer Space Telescope revealed that Andromeda contains one trillion (1012) stars: at least twice the number of stars in the Milky Way, which is estimated to be 200-400 billion.The Andromeda_Galaxy is estimated to be 1.5x1012 solar masses, while the mass of the Milky Way is estimated to be 8.5x1011 solar masses.'
p572
aS'In comparison, a 2009 study estimated that the Milky Way and M31 are about equal in mass, while a 2006 study put the mass of the Milky Way at ~80% of the mass of the Andromeda_Galaxy.'
p573
aS'The two galaxies are expected to collide in 3.75 billion years, eventually merging to form a giant elliptical galaxy  or perhaps a large disk galaxy.At 3.4, the apparent magnitude of the Andromeda_Galaxy is one of the brightest of any Messier objects, making it visible to the naked eye on moonless nights even when viewed from areas with moderate light pollution.'
p574
aS'Although it appears more than six times as wide as the full Moon when photographed through a larger telescope, only the brighter central region is visible to the naked eye or when viewed using binoculars or a small telescope. Observation history The Persian astronomer Abd al-Rahman al-Sufi wrote a line about the chained constellation in his Book of Fixed Stars around 964, describing the Andromeda_Galaxy as a "small cloud".'
p575
aS'After a successful career as a commercial illustrator, Warhol became a renowned and sometimes controversial artist.'
p576
aS'The Andy_Warhol Museum in his native city, Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, holds an extensive permanent collection of art and archives.'
p577
aS"It is the largest museum in the United_States dedicated to a single artist.Warhol's art used many types of media, including hand drawing, painting, printmaking, photography, silk screening, sculpture, film, and music."
p578
aS'He was also a pioneer in computer-generated art using Amiga computers that were introduced in 1984, two years before his death.'
p579
aS'He founded Interview Magazine and was the author of numerous books, including The Philosophy of Andy_Warhol and Popism: The Warhol Sixties.'
p580
aS'He managed and produced the Velvet Underground, a rock band which had a strong influence on the evolution of punk rock music.'
p581
aS'He is also notable as a gay man who lived openly as such before the gay liberation movement.'
p582
aS'Certain of the major and minor characters are supernatural beings (angels) or deceased persons (ghosts).'
p583
aS'The play contains multiple roles for several of the actors.'
p584
aS'Initially and primarily focusing on a gay couple in Manhattan, the play also has several other storylines, some of which occasionally intersect.The two parts of the play are separately presentable and entitled Millennium Approaches and Perestroika, respectively.'
p585
aS'The play has been made into a television miniseries, and an opera by Peter Eotvos. Plot Set in New_York_City in 1985, the play opens with Louis Ironson, a gay Jew, learning that his lover, WASP Prior Walter, has AIDS.'
p586
aS"As the play and Prior's illness progress, Louis becomes unable to cope with the emotional stress and moves out."
p587
aS"Meanwhile, closeted homosexual Mormon and Republican Joe Pitt, a law clerk in the same judge's office where Louis holds a clerical job, is offered a major job opportunity by his mentor, the McCarthyist lawyer Roy Cohn."
p588
aS"Joe doesn't immediately take the job because he feels he has to check with his Valium-addicted, agoraphobic wife, Harper, who is unwilling to move."
p589
aS'The exclave province of Cabinda has borders with the Republic of the Congo and the Democratic Republic of the Congo.'
p590
aS'The capital and largest city is Luanda, which is home to 3 to 5 million people (depending on the delimitation criteria).Although its territory has been inhabited since the Paleolithic Era, modern Angola originates in Portuguese colonization, which began with, and was for centuries limited to, coastal settlements and trading posts established from the 16th century onwards.'
p591
aS'In the 19th century, settlers slowly and hesitantly began to establish themselves in the interior.'
p592
aS'As a Portuguese colony, Angola did not encompass its present borders until the early 20th century, following resistance by groups such as the Cuamato, the Kwanyama and the Mbunda.'
p593
aS'Independence was achieved in 1975 after a protracted liberation war.'
p594
aS'That same year, Angola descended into an intense civil war that lasted until 2002.'
p595
aS'It has since remained relatively stable as a unitary presidential republic.Angola has vast mineral and petroleum reserves, and its economy is among the fastest growing in the world, especially since the end of the civil war.'
p596
aS'Her style, characterised by its economy and emotional restraint, was strikingly original and distinctive to her contemporaries.'
p597
aS'The strong and clear leading female voice struck a new chord in Russian poetry.'
p598
aS'Her writing can be said to fall into two periods - the early work (1912-25) and her later work (from around 1936 until her death), divided by a decade of reduced literary output.'
p599
aS'Her work was condemned and censored by Stalinist authorities and she is notable for choosing not to emigrate, and remaining in Russia, acting as witness to the atrocities around her.'
p600
aS"Her perennial themes include meditations on time and memory, and the difficulties of living and writing in the shadow of Stalinism.Primary sources of information about Akhmatova's life are relatively scant, as war, revolution and the totalitarian regime caused much of the written record to be destroyed."
p601
aS'For long periods she was in official disfavour and many of those who were close to her died in the aftermath of the revolution.'
p602
aS"Akhmatova's first husband, Nikolai Gumilev was executed by the Soviet secret police, and her son Lev Gumilev and her common-law husband Nikolay Punin spent many years in the Gulag, where Punin died. Early life and family Akhmatova was born at Bolshoy Fontan, near the Black_Sea port of Odessa."
p603
aS'His opinion was shared by Vladimir Nabokov, who especially admired "the flawless magic of Tolstoy\'s style," and by William_Faulkner, who described the novel as, "the best ever written."'
p604
aS'The novel continues to enjoy popularity, as demonstrated by a recent poll of 125 contemporary authors by J. Peder Zane, published in 2007 in "The Top Ten" in Time, which declared that Anna_Karenina is the "greatest novel ever written.'
p605
aS'" Main characters Princess Anna Arkadyevna Karenina (Anna Arkad\'evna Karenina): Stepan Oblonsky\'s sister, Karenin\'s wife and Vronsky\'s lover.Count Alexei Kirillovich Vronsky (Alekcei Kipillovich Bponckii): Lover of Anna, a cavalry officerPrince Stepan "Stiva" Arkadyevich Oblonsky (Ctepan "Ctiva" Arkad\'evich Oblonskii): a civil servant and Anna\'s brother, a man about town, 34.'
p606
aS'His nickname is a Russianized form of Steve.Princess Darya "Dolly" Alexandrovna Oblonskaya (Dar\'ia "Dolli" Aleksandrovna Oblonskaia): Stepan\'s wife, 33Count Alexei Alexandrovich Karenin: a senior statesman and Anna\'s husband, twenty years her senior.Konstantin "Kostya" Dmitrievich Levin/Lyovin (Konstantin Dmitrievich Liovin): Kitty\'s suitor, old friend of Stiva, a landowner, 32.Nikolai Dmitrievich Levin (Nikolai Dmitrievich Liovin): Konstantin\'s elder brother, an impoverished alcoholic.Sergej Ivanovich Koznyshev (Sergei Ivanovich Koznyshev): Konstantin\'s half-brother, a celebrated writer, 40.Princess Ekaterina "Kitty" Alexandrovna Shcherbatskaya (Ekaterina Aleksandrovna Shcherbatskaia): Dolly\'s younger sister and later Levin\'s wife, 18.Princess Elizaveta "Betsy" (Elizaveta "Betsi" Tverskaia): Anna\'s wealthy, morally loose society friend and Vronsky\'s cousinCountess Lidia Ivanovna (Lidiia Ivanovna): Leader of a high society circle that includes Karenin, and shuns Princess Betsy and her circle.'
p607
aS'She maintains an interest in the Russian Orthodox mystical and spiritualCountess Vronskaya: Vronsky\'s motherSergei "Seryozha" Alexeyich Karenin (Sergei "Seriozha" Karenin): Anna and Karenin\'s sonAnna "Annie": Anna and Vronsky\'s daughter Plot introduction Anna_Karenina is the tragic story of a married aristocrat/socialite and her affair with the affluent Count Vronsky.'
p608
aS"The story starts when she arrives in the midst of a family broken up by her brother's unbridled womanizing--something that prefigures her own later situation, though she would experience less tolerance by others.A bachelor, Vronsky is eager to marry her if she would agree to leave her husband Karenin, a senior government official, but she is vulnerable to the pressures of Russian social norms, the moral laws of the Russian Orthodox Church, her own insecurities, and Karenin's indecision."
p609
aS'Although Vronsky and Anna go to Italy, where they can be together, they have trouble making friends.'
p610
aS'if under unruly scenarios resulting in fragmentation of social identity and rejection of self-regulatory values.'
p611
aS'It was popularized by French sociologist Emile_Durkheim in his influential book Suicide (1897).'
p612
aS'Durkheim never uses the term normlessness; rather, he describes anomie as "derangement", and "an insatiable will".For Durkheim, anomie arises more generally from a mismatch between personal or group standards and wider social standards, or from the lack of a social ethic, which produces moral deregulation and an absence of legitimate aspirations.'
p613
aS"This is a nurtured condition:Most sociologists associate the term with Durkheim, who used the concept to speak of the ways in which an individual's actions are matched, or integrated, with a system of social norms and practices... anomie is a mismatch, not simply the absence of norms."
p614
aS'Thus, a society with too much rigidity and little individual discretion could also produce a kind of anomie...'
p615
aS'Thus, fatalistic suicide arises when a person is too rule-governed... History In 1893, Durkheim introduced the concept of anomie to describe the mismatch of collective guild labour to evolving societal needs when the guild was homogeneous in its constituency.'
p616
aS'He equated homogeneous (redundant) skills to mechanical solidarity whose inertia retarded adaptation.'
p617
aS'At 14.0 million square kilometres (5.4 million square miles), it is the fifth-largest continent in area after Asia, Africa, North America, and South America.'
p618
aS'For comparison, Antarctica is nearly twice the size of Australia.'
p619
aS'About 98% of Antarctica is covered by ice that averages 1.9 kilometres (1.2 mi) in thickness, which extends to all but the northernmost reaches of the Antarctic Peninsula.Antarctica, on average, is the coldest, driest, and windiest continent, and has the highest average elevation of all the continents.'
p620
aS'Antarctica is considered a desert, with annual precipitation of only 200 mm (8 in) along the coast and far less inland.'
p621
aS'The temperature in Antarctica has reached -89 degC (-129 degF).'
p622
aS'There are no permanent human residents, but anywhere from 1,000 to 5,000 people reside throughout the year at the research stations scattered across the continent.'
p623
aS'Organisms native to Antarctica include many types of algae, bacteria, fungi, plants, protista, and certain animals, such as mites, nematodes, penguins, seals and tardigrades.'
p624
aS'After the negative views of Freemasonry among a large segment of the public began to wane in the late 1830s, most members of the Anti-Masonic_Party joined the Whigs, the party most in line with its views on other issues.'
p625
aS'Although lasting only a decade, the Anti-Masonic_Party introduced important innovations to American politics, such as nominating conventions and the adoption of party platforms. Origins The Anti-Masonic_Party was formed in upstate New York in February of 1828.'
p626
aS'Anti-Masons were opponents of Freemasonry, believing that it was a corrupt and elitist secret society which was ruling much of the country in defiance of republican principles.'
p627
aS'During a period of social upheaval caused by the Industrial Revolution and westward migration, community and family relationships weakened, causing many people to become skeptical of government and other longstanding institutions.The opponents of Freemasonry formed a political party after the Morgan affair convinced them the Masons were murdering men who spoke out against them.'
p628
aS'This key episode was the mysterious 1826 disappearance of William Morgan, a Freemason in upstate New York who had turned against the Masons.Morgan claimed to have been made a member of the Masons while living in Canada, and he appears to have briefly attended a lodge in Rochester.'
p629
aS"In 1825 Morgan received the Royal Arch degree at Le Roy's Western Star Chapter #33, having declared under oath that he had previously received the six degrees which preceded it."
p630
aS"Whether he actually received these degrees and if so from where has not been determined for certain.Morgan then attempted unsuccessfully to help establish or visit lodges and chapters in Batavia, but was denied participation in Batavia's Masonic activities by members who were uncertain about Morgan's character and claims to Masonic membership."
p631
aS'Some of his best known subjects were drawn from the world of Italian comedy and ballet. Early life and training Watteau was born in the town of Valenciennes in October 1684, which had recently passed from the Spanish Netherlands to France.'
p632
aS'His father, Jean-Philippe Watteau (died 1720), was a tiler whose brawling is documented fact.'
p633
aS'Showing an early interest in painting, Jean-Antoine may have been apprenticed to Jacques-Albert Gerin, a local painter.'
p634
aS"Jean-Antoine's first artistic subjects were charlatans selling quack remedies on the streets of Valenciennes."
p635
aS'Watteau left for Paris in about 1702.'
p636
aS"There he found employment in a workshop at Pont Notre-Dame, making copies of popular genre paintings in the Flemish and Dutch tradition; it was in that period that he developed his characteristic sketchlike technique.In 1703 he was employed as an assistant by the painter Claude Gillot, whose work represented a reaction against the turgid official art of Louis XIV's reign."
p637
aS"In Gillot's studio Watteau became acquainted with the characters of the commedia dell'arte (its actors had been expelled from France several years before), a favorite subject of Gillot's that would become one of Watteau's lifelong passions."
p638
aS"Bruckner's compositions helped to define contemporary musical radicalism, owing to their dissonances, unprepared modulations, and roving harmonies.Unlike other musical radicals such as Richard Wagner or Hugo Wolf who fit the enfant terrible mould, Bruckner showed extreme humility before other musicians, Wagner in particular."
p639
aS"This apparent dichotomy between Bruckner the man and Bruckner the composer hampers efforts to describe his life in a way that gives a straightforward context for his music.His works, the symphonies in particular, had detractors, most notably the influential Austrian critic Eduard Hanslick, and other supporters of Johannes_Brahms who pointed to their large size and use of repetition, as well as to Bruckner's propensity to revise many of his works, often with the assistance of colleagues, and his apparent indecision about which versions he preferred."
p640
aS'On the other hand, Bruckner was greatly admired by subsequent composers including his friend Gustav_Mahler, who described him as "half simpleton, half God". Biography  Early life Anton_Bruckner was born in Ansfelden (then a village, now a suburb of Linz) on 4 September 1824.'
p641
aS"The ancestors of Bruckner's family were farmers and craftsmen; their history can be traced to as far back as the 16th century."
p642
aS'They lived near a bridge south of Sindelburg, which led to their being called "Pruckhner an der Pruckhen" (bridgers on the bridge).'
p643
aS"Bruckner's grandfather was appointed schoolmaster in Ansfelden in 1776; this position was inherited by Bruckner's father, Anton_Bruckner senior, in 1823."
p644
aS'It was a poorly paid but well-respected position in the rural environment.'
p645
aS'Chekhov practiced as a medical doctor throughout most of his literary career: "Medicine is my lawful wife", he once said, "and literature is my mistress."'
p646
aS"Along with Henrik Ibsen and August Strindberg, Chekhov is often referred to as one of the three seminal figures in the birth of early modernism in the theater.Chekhov renounced the theatre after the disastrous reception of The Seagull in 1896, but the play was revived to acclaim in 1898 by Constantin Stanislavski's Moscow Art Theatre, which subsequently also produced Chekhov's Uncle Vanya and premiered his last two plays, Three Sisters and The_Cherry_Orchard."
p647
aS'These four works present a challenge to the acting ensemble as well as to audiences, because in place of conventional action Chekhov offers a "theatre of mood" and a "submerged life in the text".Chekhov had at first written stories only for financial gain, but as his artistic ambition grew, he made formal innovations which have influenced the evolution of the modern short story.'
p648
aS'He made no apologies for the difficulties this posed to readers, insisting that the role of an artist was to ask questions, not to answer them. Biography  Childhood Anton_Chekhov was born on the feast day of St. Anthony the Great (17 January Old Style) 29 January 1860, the third of six surviving children, in Taganrog, a port on the Sea of Azov in southern Russia.'
p649
aS'His father, Pavel Yegorovich Chekhov, the son of a former serf, was from a village Vilkhovatka near Kobeliaky (Poltava Region in modern-day Ukraine) and ran a grocery store.'
p650
aS"A director of the parish choir, devout Orthodox Christian, and physically abusive father, Pavel Chekhov has been seen by some historians as the model for his son's many portraits of hypocrisy."
p651
aS"Chekhov's mother, Yevgeniya (Morozova), was an excellent storyteller who entertained the children with tales of her travels with her cloth-merchant father all over Russia."
p652
aS"Dvorak's own style has been described as 'the fullest recreation of a national idiom with that of the symphonic tradition, absorbing folk influences and finding effective ways of using them'.Dvorak displayed his musical gifts at an early age, being an apt student of violin playing from age 6."
p653
aS'The first public performances of his works were in Prague in 1872 and, with special success, in 1873, when he was age 31.'
p654
aS'Seeking recognition beyond the Prague area, he first submitted a score of his First Symphony to a prize competition in Germany, but he did not win, and the manuscript, not returned, was lost until rediscovered many years later.'
p655
aS'Then in 1874 he first made a submission for the Austrian State Prize for Composition, including scores of two further symphonies and other works.'
p656
aS'Brahms, unbeknownst to Dvorak, was the leading member of the jury and was highly impressed.'
p657
aS'The prize was awarded to Dvorak for 1874 and again in 1876 and in 1877, when Brahms and the prominent critic Eduard Hanslick, also a member of the jury, made themselves known to him.'
p658
aS'Brahms recommended Dvorak to his publisher, Simrock, who soon afterward commissioned what became the Slavonic Dances, Op.'
p659
aS'His date of birth is uncertain (around 1489).'
p660
aS'His father was a merchant.'
p661
aS"Otherwise little is known about Correggio's early life or training."
p662
aS"It is, however, often assumed that he had his first artistic education from his father's brother, the painter Lorenzo Allegri.In 1503-5 he was apprenticed to Francesco Bianchi Ferrara in Modena, where he probably became familiar with the classicism of artists like Lorenzo Costa and Francesco Francia, evidence of which can be found in his first works."
p663
aS'After a trip to Mantua in 1506, he returned to Correggio, where he stayed until 1510.'
p664
aS'To this period is assigned the Adoration of the Child with St. Elizabeth and John, which shows clear influences from Costa and Mantegna.'
p665
aS"In 1514 he probably finished three tondos for the entrance of the church of Sant'Andrea in Mantua, and then returned to Correggio, where, as an independent and increasingly renowned artist, he signed a contract for the Madonna altarpiece in the local monastery of St. Francis (now in the Dresden Gemaldegalerie). Works in Parma By 1516, Correggio was in Parma, where he spent most of the remainder of his career."
p666
aS'The aorta then continues downward as the abdominal aorta (or abdominal portion of the aorta) diaphragm to the aortic bifurcation.Another system divides the aorta with respect to its course and the direction of blood flow.'
p667
aS'In this system, the aorta starts as the ascending aorta then travels superiorly from the heart and then makes a hairpin turn known as the aortic arch.'
p668
aS'Following the aortic arch, the aorta then travels inferiorly as the descending aorta.'
p669
aS'The descending aorta has two parts.'
p670
aS'The aorta begins to descend in the thoracic cavity, and consequently is known as the thoracic aorta.'
p671
aS'After the aorta passes through the diaphragm, it is known as the abdominal aorta.'
p672
aS'The aorta ends by dividing into two major blood vessels, the common iliac arteries and a smaller midline vessel, the median sacral artery. Ascending aorta The ascending aorta begins at the opening of the aortic valve in the left ventricle of the heart.'
p673
aS'Apartheid was developed after World_War_II by the Afrikaner-dominated National Party and Broederbond organizations.'
p674
aS'The ideology was also enforced in South West Africa, which was administered by South Africa under a League of Nations mandate (revoked in 1966 via United Nations Resolution 2145), until it gained independence as Namibia in 1990.'
p675
aS'By extension, the term is currently used for forms of systematic segregation, established by the state authority in a country, against the social and civil rights of a certain group of citizens, due to ethnic prejudices.Racial segregation in South Africa began in colonial times under the Dutch Empire, until 1795 when the British took over the Cape of Good Hope.'
p676
aS'Apartheid as an officially structured policy was introduced after the general election of 1948.'
p677
aS'Legislation classified inhabitants into four racial groups--"black", "white", "coloured", and "Indian", the last two of which were divided into several sub-classifications--and residential areas were segregated.'
p678
aS'From 1960 to 1983, 3.5 million non-white South Africans were removed from their homes, and forced into segregated neighbourhoods, in one of the largest mass removals in modern history.'
p679
aS'Non-white political representation was abolished in 1970, and starting in that year black people were deprived of their citizenship, legally becoming citizens of one of ten tribally based self-governing homelands called bantustans, four of which became nominally independent states.'
p680
aS'She is identified with the planet Venus.As with many ancient Greek deities, there is more than one story about her origins.'
p681
aS"According to Hesiod's Theogony, she was born when Cronus cut off Uranus's genitals and threw them into the sea, and she arose from the sea foam (aphros)."
p682
aS"According to Homer's Iliad, she is the daughter of Zeus and Dione."
p683
aS'According to Plato (Symposium, 180e), these two origins were of entirely separate entities: Aphrodite Ourania and Aphrodite Pandemos.Because of her beauty, other gods feared that their rivalry over her would interrupt the peace among them and lead to war, so Zeus married her to Hephaestus, who, because of his ugliness and deformity, was not seen as a threat.'
p684
aS'Aphrodite had many lovers--both gods, such as Ares, and men, such as Anchises.'
p685
aS"She played a role in the Eros and Psyche legend, and later was both Adonis's lover and his surrogate mother."
p686
aS'Many lesser beings were said to be children of Aphrodite.Aphrodite is also known as Cytherea (Lady of Cythera) and Cypris (Lady of Cyprus) after the two cult sites, Cythera and Cyprus, which claimed to be her place of birth.'
p687
aS'Apollo is the son of Zeus and Leto, and has a twin sister, the chaste huntress Artemis.'
p688
aS'Apollo is known in Greek-influenced Etruscan mythology as Apulu.As the patron of Delphi (Pythian Apollo), Apollo was an oracular god--the prophetic deity of the Delphic Oracle.'
p689
aS'Medicine and healing are associated with Apollo, whether through the god himself or mediated through his son Asclepius, yet Apollo was also seen as a god who could bring ill-health and deadly plague.'
p690
aS"Amongst the god's custodial charges, Apollo became associated with dominion over colonists, and as the patron defender of herds and flocks."
p691
aS'As the leader of the Muses (Apollon Musegetes) and director of their choir, Apollo functioned as the patron god of music and poetry.'
p692
aS'Hermes created the lyre for him, and the instrument became a common attribute of Apollo.'
p693
aS'Hymns sung to Apollo were called paeans.In Hellenistic times, especially during the 3rd century BCE, as Apollo Helios he became identified among Greeks with Helios, Titan god of the sun, and his sister Artemis similarly equated with Selene, Titan goddess of the moon.'
p694
aS'The general term apology, in context to literature, defends a world from attack (opposite of satire-which attacks the world).'
p695
aS"The Apology, which depicts the death of Socrates, is among the four Plato dialogues to detail the philosopher's final days, along with Euthyphro, Phaedo, and Crito. The text Xenophon, who wrote his own Apology of Socrates, indicates that a number of writers had published accounts of Socrates' defense."
p696
aS'According to one prominent scholar, "Writing designed to clear Socrates\' name was doubtless a particular feature of the decade or so following 399 BC".'
p697
aS"Many scholars guess that Plato's Apology was one of the first, if not the very first, dialogues Plato wrote, though there is little if any evidence."
p698
aS"Plato's Apology is commonly regarded as the most reliable source of information about the historical Socrates.Except for two brief exchanges with Meletus (at 24d-25d and 26b-27d), where the monologue becomes a dialogue, the text is written in the first person from Socrates' point of view, as though it were Socrates' actual speech at the trial."
p699
aS'During the course of the speech, Socrates twice mentions Plato as being present (at 34a and 38b).'
p700
aS"There is, however, no real way of knowing how closely Socrates' words in the Apology match those of Socrates at the actual trial, even if it was Plato's intention to be accurate in this respect. Introduction The Apology begins with Socrates saying he does not know if the men of Athens (his jury) have been persuaded by his accusers."
p701
aS"These changes include blebbing, cell shrinkage, nuclear fragmentation, chromatin condensation, chromosomal DNA fragmentation, and global mRNA decay.In contrast to necrosis, which is a form of traumatic cell death that results from acute cellular injury, apoptosis is a highly regulated and controlled process that confers advantages during an organism's lifecycle."
p702
aS'For example, the separation of fingers and toes in a developing human embryo occurs because cells between the digits undergo apoptosis.'
p703
aS'Unlike necrosis, apoptosis produces cell fragments called apoptotic bodies that phagocytic cells are able to engulf and quickly remove before the contents of the cell can spill out onto surrounding cells and cause damage.Between 50 and 70 billion cells die each day due to apoptosis in the average human adult.'
p704
aS'For an average child between the ages of 8 and 14, approximately 20 billion to 30 billion cells die a day.Research in and around apoptosis has increased substantially since the early 1990s.'
p705
aS'In addition to its importance as a biological phenomenon, defective apoptotic processes have been implicated in a wide variety of diseases.'
p706
aS'Excessive apoptosis causes atrophy, whereas an insufficient amount results in uncontrolled cell proliferation, such as cancer.'
p707
aS'Some factors like fas, caspases (C-cysteine rich, asp- aspartic acid moiety containing, ase - proteases) etc.'
p708
aS'Related terms include aquitard, which is a bed of low permeability along an aquifer, and aquiclude (or aquifuge), which is a solid, impermeable area underlying or overlying an aquifer.'
p709
aS'If the impermeable area overlies the aquifer, pressure could cause it to become a confined aquifer. Depth Aquifers may occur at various depths.'
p710
aS'Those closer to the surface are not only more likely to be used for water supply and irrigation, but are also more likely to be topped up by the local rainfall.'
p711
aS'Many desert areas have limestone hills or mountains within them or close to them that can be exploited as groundwater resources.'
p712
aS"Parts of the Atlas Mountains in North Africa, the Lebanon and Anti-Lebanon ranges between Syria and Lebanon, the Jebel Akhdar (Oman) in Oman, parts of the Sierra Nevada and neighboring ranges in the United_States' Southwest, have shallow aquifers that are exploited for their water."
p713
aS'Overexploitation can lead to the exceeding of the practical sustained yield; i.e., more water is taken out than can be replenished.'
p714
aS'Along the coastlines of certain countries, such as Libya and Israel, increased water usage associated with population growth has caused a lowering of the water table and the subsequent contamination of the groundwater with saltwater from the sea.The beach provides a model to help visualize an aquifer.'
p715
aS'The name roughly translates as "Sea of Islands", referring to over 1,100 islands that once dotted its waters; in Mongolian aral means "island".'
p716
aS'The Aral_Sea drainage basin encompasses Uzbekistan and parts of Tajikistan, Turkmenistan, Kyrgyzstan and Kazakhstan.Formerly one of the four largest lakes in the world with an area of 68,000 km2 (26,300 sq mi), the Aral_Sea has been steadily shrinking since the 1960s after the rivers that fed it were diverted by Soviet irrigation projects.'
p717
aS'By 2007, it had declined to 10% of its original size, splitting into four lakes - the North Aral_Sea, the eastern and western basins of the once far larger South Aral_Sea, and one smaller lake between the North and South Aral_Seas.'
p718
aS'By 2009, the southeastern lake had disappeared and the southwestern lake had retreated to a thin strip at the extreme west of the former southern sea; in subsequent years, occasional water flows have led to the southeastern lake sometimes being replenished to a small degree.'
p719
aS'Satellite images taken by NASA in August 2014 revealed that for the first time in modern history the eastern basin of the Aral_Sea had completely dried up.'
p720
aS'The eastern basin is now called the Aralkum desert.In an ongoing effort in Kazakhstan to save and replenish the North Aral_Sea, a dam project was completed in 2005; in 2008, the water level in this lake had risen by 12 m (39 ft) compared to 2003.'
p721
aS'Salinity has dropped, and fish are again found in sufficient numbers for some fishing to be viable.'
p722
aS'Without prior music training, he enrolled in the Gnessin Musical Institute, subsequently studying at the Moscow Conservatory in the class of Nikolai Myaskovsky, among others.'
p723
aS'His first major work, the Piano Concerto (1936), popularized his name within and outside the Soviet Union.'
p724
aS'It was followed by the Violin Concerto (1940) and the Cello Concerto (1946).'
p725
aS'His other significant compositions include the Masquerade Suite (1941), the Anthem of the Armenian SSR (1944), three symphonies (1935, 1943, 1947), and around 25 film scores.'
p726
aS'Khachaturian is best known for his ballet music--Gayane (1942) and Spartacus (1954).'
p727
aS'His most popular piece, the "Sabre Dance" from Gayane, has been used extensively in popular culture and has been covered by a number of musicians worldwide.'
p728
aS'His style is "characterized by colorful harmonies, captivating rhythms, virtuosity, improvisations, and sensuous melodies.'
p729
aS'He received three Pulitzer Prizes for his work. Life and work  Early years MacLeish was born in Glencoe, Illinois.'
p730
aS'His father, Scottish-born Andrew MacLeish, worked as a dry goods merchant.'
p731
aS'His mother, Martha (nee Hillard), was a college professor and had served as president of Rockford College.'
p732
aS'He grew up on an estate bordering Lake Michigan.'
p733
aS'He attended the Hotchkiss School from 1907 to 1911 before entering Yale University, where he majored in English, was elected to Phi Beta Kappa, and was selected for the Skull and Bones society.'
p734
aS'He then enrolled in Harvard Law School, where he served as an editor of the Harvard Law Review.'
p735
aS'In 1916, he married Ada Hitchcock.'
p736
aS'Other mathematical achievements include deriving an accurate approximation of pi, defining and investigating the spiral bearing his name, and creating a system using exponentiation for expressing very large numbers.'
p737
aS'He was also one of the first to apply mathematics to physical phenomena, founding hydrostatics and statics, including an explanation of the principle of the lever.'
p738
aS'He is credited with designing innovative machines, such as his screw pump, compound pulleys, and defensive war machines to protect his native Syracuse from invasion.Archimedes died during the Siege of Syracuse when he was killed by a Roman soldier despite orders that he should not be harmed.'
p739
aS'Cicero describes visiting the tomb of Archimedes, which was surmounted by a sphere and a cylinder, which Archimedes had requested to be placed on his tomb, representing his mathematical discoveries.Unlike his inventions, the mathematical writings of Archimedes were little known in antiquity.'
p740
aS'Mathematicians from Alexandria read and quoted him, but the first comprehensive compilation was not made until c. 530 AD by Isidore of Miletus in Byzantine Constantinople, while commentaries on the works of Archimedes written by Eutocius in the sixth century AD opened them to wider readership for the first time.'
p741
aS"The relatively few copies of Archimedes' written work that survived through the Middle Ages were an influential source of ideas for scientists during the Renaissance, while the discovery in 1906 of previously unknown works by Archimedes in the Archimedes Palimpsest has provided new insights into how he obtained mathematical results. Biography Archimedes was born c. 287 BC in the seaport city of Syracuse, Sicily, at that time a self-governing colony in Magna Graecia, located along the coast of Southern Italy."
p742
aS'The date of birth is based on a statement by the Byzantine Greek historian John Tzetzes that Archimedes lived for 75 years.'
p743
aS'In Greek literature, he often represents the physical or violent and untamed aspect of war, in contrast to his sister the armored Athena, whose functions as a goddess of intelligence include military strategy and generalship.The Greeks were ambivalent toward Ares: although he embodied the physical valor necessary for success in war, he was a dangerous force, "overwhelming, insatiable in battle, destructive, and man-slaughtering."'
p744
aS'His sons Fear (Phobos) and Terror (Deimos) and his lover, or sister, Discord (Enyo) accompanied him on his war chariot.'
p745
aS'In the Iliad, his father Zeus tells him that he is the god most hateful to him.'
p746
aS'An association with Ares endows places and objects with a savage, dangerous, or militarized quality.'
p747
aS'His value as a war god is placed in doubt: during the Trojan War, Ares was on the losing side, while Athena, often depicted in Greek art as holding Nike (Victory) in her hand, favored the triumphant Greeks.Ares plays a relatively limited role in Greek mythology as represented in literary narratives, though his numerous love affairs and abundant offspring are often alluded to.'
p748
aS'When Ares does appear in myths, he typically faces humiliation.'
p749
aS'He is well known as the lover of Aphrodite, the goddess of love, who was married to Hephaestus, god of craftsmanship.'
p750
aS'Argentina claims sovereignty over part of Antarctica, the Falkland Islands (Spanish: Islas Malvinas), South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands.The earliest recorded human presence in the area of modern-day Argentina dates back to the Paleolithic period.'
p751
aS'The country has its roots in Spanish colonization of the region during the 15th century.'
p752
aS'Argentina rose as the successor state of the Viceroyalty of the Rio_de_la_Plata, a Spanish overseas colony founded in 1776.'
p753
aS"The declaration and fight for independence (1810-1818) was followed by an extended civil war that lasted until 1861, culminating in the country's reorganization as a federation of provinces with Buenos_Aires as its capital city."
p754
aS'The country thereafter enjoyed relative peace and stability, with massive waves of European immigration radically reshaping its cultural and demographic outlook.'
p755
aS'The almost-unparalleled increase in prosperity led to Argentina becoming the seventh wealthiest developed nation in the world by the early 20th century.After 1930 Argentina descended into political instability and periodic economic crisis that pushed it back into underdevelopment, though it nevertheless remained among the fifteen richest countries until the mid-20th century.'
p756
aS'Argentina retains its historic status as a middle power in international affairs, and is a prominent regional power in the Southern Cone and Latin America.Argentina has the third-largest economy in Latin America and is a member of the G-15 and G-20 major economies.'
p757
aS'These, together with fragments of some of his other plays, provide the only real examples of a genre of comic drama known as Old Comedy, and they are used to define the genre.'
p758
aS'Also known as the Father of Comedy and the Prince of Ancient Comedy, Aristophanes has been said to recreate the life of ancient Athens more convincingly than any other author.'
p759
aS"His powers of ridicule were feared and acknowledged by influential contemporaries; Plato singled out Aristophanes' play The Clouds as slander that contributed to the trial and subsequent condemning to death of Socrates although other satirical playwrights had also caricatured the philosopher."
p760
aS'His second play, The Babylonians (now lost), was denounced by the demagogue Cleon as a slander against the Athenian polis.'
p761
aS'It is possible that the case was argued in court but details of the trial are not recorded and Aristophanes caricatured Cleon mercilessly in his subsequent plays, especially The_Knights, the first of many plays that he directed himself.'
p762
aS'"In my opinion," he says through the Chorus in that play, "the author-director of comedies has the hardest job of all."'
p763
aS'(komododidaskalian einai khalepotaton ergon apanton) Biography Less is known about Aristophanes than about his plays.'
p764
aS'It is the sixth largest and the 15th most populous of the 50 states.'
p765
aS'Its capital and largest city is Phoenix.'
p766
aS'Arizona is one of the Four Corners states.'
p767
aS'It has borders with New_Mexico, Utah, Nevada, California, and Mexico, and one point in common with the southwestern corner of Colorado.'
p768
aS"Arizona's border with Mexico is 389 miles (626 km) long, on the northern border of the Mexican states of Sonora and Baja California.Arizona is the 48th state and last of the contiguous states to be admitted to the Union, achieving statehood on February 14, 1912."
p769
aS'It was previously part of the territory of Alta California in New Spain before being passed down to independent Mexico and later ceded to the United_States after the Mexican-American War.'
p770
aS'The southernmost portion of the state was acquired in 1853 through the Gadsden Purchase.Southern Arizona is known for its desert climate, with very hot summers and mild winters.'
p771
aS'As a result of their being so stable, such rings tend to form easily, and once formed, tend to be difficult to break in chemical reactions.Since one of the most commonly-encountered aromatic system of compounds in organic chemistry is based on derivatives of the prototypical aromatic compound benzene (common in petroleum), the word "aromatic" is occasionally used to refer informally to benzene derivatives, and this is how it was first defined.'
p772
aS'Nevertheless, many non-benzene aromatic compounds exist.'
p773
aS'In living organisms, for example, the most common aromatic rings are the double-ringed bases in RNA and DNA.The earliest use of the term "aromatic" was in an article by August Wilhelm Hofmann in 1855.'
p774
aS'Hofmann used the term for a class of benzene compounds, many of which do have odors (unlike pure saturated hydrocarbons).'
p775
aS'Today, there is no general relationship between aromaticity as a chemical property and the olfactory properties of such compounds, although in 1855, before the structure of benzene or organic compounds was understood, chemists like Hofmann were beginning to understand that odiferous molecules from plants, such as terpenes, had chemical properties we recognize today are similar to unsaturated petroleum hydrocarbons like benzene.In terms of the electronic nature of the molecule, aromaticity describes the way a conjugated ring of unsaturated bonds, lone pairs of electrons, or empty molecular orbitals exhibit a stabilization stronger than would be expected by the stabilization of conjugation alone.'
p776
aS'Aromaticity can be considered a manifestation of cyclic delocalization and of resonance.'
p777
aS'This is usually considered to be because electrons are free to cycle around circular arrangements of atoms that are alternately single- and double-bonded to one another.'
p778
aS'Arrhenius provided a physical justification and interpretation for the formula.'
p779
aS'Currently, it is best seen as an empirical relationship.'
p780
aS'It can be used to model the temperature variation of diffusion coefficients, population of crystal vacancies, creep rates, and many other thermally-induced processes/reactions.'
p781
aS"The Eyring equation, developed in 1935, also expresses the relationship between rate and energy.A historically useful generalization supported by Arrhenius' equation is that, for many common chemical reactions at room temperature, the reaction rate doubles for every 10 degree Celsius increase in temperature. Equation Arrhenius' equation gives the dependence of the rate constant  of a chemical reaction on the absolute temperature  (in kelvins), where  is the pre-exponential factor (or simply the prefactor),  is the activation energy, and  is the universal gas constant:Alternatively, the equation may be expressed asThe only difference is the energy units of : the former form uses energy per mole, which is common in chemistry, while the latter form uses energy per molecule directly, which is common in physics."
p782
aS'The different units are accounted for in using either   gas constant or the Boltzmann constant  as the multiplier of temperature .The units of the pre-exponential factor  are identical to those of the rate constant and will vary depending on the order of the reaction.'
p783
aS'If the reaction is first order it has the units s-1, and for that reason it is often called the frequency factor or attempt frequency of the reaction.'
p784
aS'Most simply,  is the number of collisions that result in a reaction per second,  is the total number of collisions (leading to a reaction or not) per second and  is the probability that any given collision will result in a reaction.'
p785
aS'The theorem is often cited in discussions of election theory as it is further interpreted by the Gibbard-Satterthwaite theorem.The theorem is named after economist Kenneth Arrow, who demonstrated the theorem in his doctoral thesis and popularized it in his 1951 book Social Choice and Individual Values.'
p786
aS'The original paper was titled "A Difficulty in the Concept of Social Welfare".In short, the theorem states that no rank-order voting system can be designed that always satisfies these three "fairness" criteria:If every voter prefers alternative X over alternative Y, then the group prefers X over Y.If every voter\'s preference between X and Y remains unchanged, then the group\'s preference between X and Y will also remain unchanged (even if voters\' preferences between other pairs like X and Z, Y and Z, or Z and W change).There is no "dictator": no single voter possesses the power to always determine the group\'s preference.Voting systems that use cardinal utility (which conveys more information than rank orders; see the subsection discussing the cardinal utility approach to overcoming the negative conclusion) are not covered by the theorem.'
p787
aS'The theorem can also be sidestepped by weakening the notion of independence.'
p788
aS'Arrow rejected cardinal utility as a meaningful tool for expressing social welfare, and so focused his theorem on preference rankings.The axiomatic approach Arrow adopted can treat all conceivable rules (that are based on preferences) within one unified framework.'
p789
aS'In that sense, the approach is qualitatively different from the earlier one in voting theory, in which rules were investigated one by one.'
p790
aS"One can therefore say that the contemporary paradigm of social choice theory started from this theorem. Statement of the theorem The need to aggregate preferences occurs in many disciplines: in welfare economics, where one attempts to find an economic outcome which would be acceptable and stable; in decision theory, where a person has to make a rational choice based on several criteria; and most naturally in voting systems, which are mechanisms for extracting a decision from a multitude of voters' preferences.The framework for Arrow's theorem assumes that we need to extract a preference order on a given set of options (outcomes)."
p791
aS'Each individual in the society (or equivalently, each decision criterion) gives a particular order of preferences on the set of outcomes.'
p792
aS'Some scholars believe that the name, and indeed the goddess herself, was originally pre-Greek.'
p793
aS'Homer refers to her as Artemis Agrotera, Potnia Theron: "Artemis of the wildland, Mistress of Animals".'
p794
aS'The Arcadians believed she was the daughter of Demeter.In the classical period of Greek mythology, Artemis (Ancient Greek: Artemis, pronounced [ar.te.mis] in Classical Attic) was often described as the daughter of Zeus and Leto, and the twin sister of Apollo.'
p795
aS'She was the Hellenic goddess of the hunt, wild animals, wilderness, childbirth, virginity and protector of young girls, bringing and relieving disease in women; she often was depicted as a huntress carrying a bow and arrows.'
p796
aS'The deer and the cypress were sacred to her.'
p797
aS'In later Hellenistic times, she even assumed the ancient role of Eileithyia in aiding childbirth. Etymology The name Artemis (noun, feminine) is of unknown or uncertain origin and etymology although various ones have been proposed.For example according to Jablonski, the name is also Phrygian and could be "compared with the royal appellation Artemas of Xenophon.'
p798
aS'According to Charles Anthon the primitive root of the name is probably of Persian origin from *arta, *art, *arte, all meaning "great, excellent, holy," thus Artemis "becomes identical with the great mother of Nature, even as she was worshipped at Ephesus".'
p799
aS'Arthropods are characterized by their jointed limbs and cuticle made of chitin, often mineralised with calcium carbonate.'
p800
aS'The arthropod body plan consists of segments, each with a pair of appendages.'
p801
aS'The rigid cuticle inhibits growth, so arthropods replace it periodically by moulting.'
p802
aS'Their versatility has enabled them to become the most species-rich members of all ecological guilds in most environments.'
p803
aS'They have over a million described species, making up more than 80% of all described living animal species, some of which, unlike most animals, are very successful in dry environments.'
p804
aS'They range in size from the microscopic crustacean Stygotantulus up to the Japanese spider crab.'
p805
aS"Arthropods' primary internal cavity is a hemocoel, which accommodates their internal organs, and through which their haemolymph - analogue of blood - circulates; they have open circulatory systems."
p806
aS'He also wrote several screenplays and was most noted for his work on The Misfits (1961).'
p807
aS"The drama Death_of_a_Salesman is often numbered on the short list of being among the finest American plays in the 20th century alongside Long Day's Journey into Night and A Streetcar Named Desire.Miller was often in the public eye, particularly during the late 1940s, 1950s and early 1960s."
p808
aS'During this time, he was awarded the Pulitzer Prize for Drama; testified before the House Un-American Activities Committee; and was married to Marilyn Monroe.'
p809
aS'He received the Prince of Asturias Award and the Praemium Imperiale prize in 2002 and the Jerusalem Prize in 2003, as well as the Dorothy and Lillian Gish Lifetime Achievement Award and the Pulitzer Prize. Biography  Early life Arthur Asher Miller was born on October 17, 1915, in Harlem, in the New_York_City borough of Manhattan, the second of three children of Augusta (Barnett) and Isidore Miller.'
p810
aS'His father was an Austrian Jewish immigrant, and his mother was born in New York, to Austrian Jewish parents.'
p811
aS"His father owned a women's clothing manufacturing business employing 400 people."
p812
aS'He became a wealthy and respected man in the community.'
p813
aS"Immanuel_Kant's transcendental idealism served as a formative basis for Schopenhauer's thought, and he considered himself the only true inheritor of Kant's philosophy, rejecting the contemporaneous post-Kantian philosophies of the German idealists."
p814
aS"Schopenhauer's philosophical doctrine was among the first in Western philosophy to share significant tenets with Oriental philosophy (e.g., asceticism, the world-as-appearance)."
p815
aS"His atheistic philosophy of the will has been described as an exemplary manifestation of philosophical pessimism.Though his work failed to garner substantial attention during his life, Schopenhauer's posthumous impact has proven profound across various disciplines, including philosophy, literature, and science."
p816
aS"Those who have cited Schopenhauer's influence include Friedrich_Nietzsche, Richard Wagner, Leo Tolstoy, Ludwig_Wittgenstein, Erwin Schrodinger, Sigmund_Freud, Albert Einstein, Otto Rank, Carl Jung, Joseph Campbell, Thomas Mann, Samuel_Beckett, and Jorge_Luis_Borges, among others. Life Schopenhauer was born on 22 February 1788, in the city of Danzig (Gdansk), Poland, on Heiligegeistgasse (known in the present day as Sw. Ducha 47), the son of Johanna Schopenhauer (nee Trosiener) and Heinrich Floris Schopenhauer, both descendants of wealthy German patrician families."
p817
aS'When Danzig became part of Prussia in 1793, Heinrich re-moved to Hamburg, although his firm continued trading in Danzig.'
p818
aS"In 1805, Schopenhauer's father may have committed suicide."
p819
aS"Shortly thereafter, Schopenhauer's mother Johanna moved with his sister Adele to Weimar, then the centre of German literature, to pursue her writing career."
p820
aS"In 2002 he was number 15 in the BBC's poll of the 100 Greatest Britons.Wellesley was commissioned as an ensign in the British Army in 1787."
p821
aS'Serving in Ireland as aide-de-camp to two successive Lords Lieutenant of Ireland, he was also elected as a Member of Parliament in the Irish House of Commons.'
p822
aS'A colonel by 1796, Wellesley saw action in the Netherlands and in India, where he fought in the Fourth Anglo-Mysore War at the Battle of Seringapatam.'
p823
aS'He was appointed governor of Seringapatam and Mysore in 1799 and as a newly appointed major-general won a decisive victory over the Maratha Confederacy at the Battle of Assaye in 1803.Wellesley rose to prominence as a general during the Peninsular campaign of the Napoleonic Wars, and was promoted to the rank of field marshal after leading the allied forces to victory against the French at the Battle of Vitoria in 1813.'
p824
aS"Following Napoleon's exile in 1814, he served as the ambassador to France and was granted a dukedom."
p825
aS'During the Hundred Days in 1815, he commanded the allied army which, together with a Prussian army under Blucher, defeated Napoleon at Waterloo.'
p826
aS"Wellesley's battle record is exemplary; he ultimately participated in some 60 battles during the course of his military career.Wellesley is famous for his adaptive defensive style of warfare, resulting in several victories against a numerically superior force while minimising his own losses."
p827
aS"As_You_Like_It follows its heroine Rosalind as she flees persecution in her uncle's court, accompanied by her cousin Celia to find safety and, eventually, love, in the Forest of Arden."
p828
aS'In the forest, they encounter a variety of memorable characters, notably the melancholy traveller Jaques who speaks many of Shakespeare\'s most famous speeches (such as "All the world\'s a stage" and "A fool!'
p829
aS'A fool!'
p830
aS'I met a fool in the forest").'
p831
aS'Jaques provides a sharp contrast to the other characters in the play, always observing and disputing the hardships of life in the country.'
p832
aS'Historically, critical response has varied, with some critics finding the work of lesser quality than other Shakespearean works and some finding the play a work of great merit.The play features one of Shakespeare\'s most famous and oft-quoted speeches, "All the world\'s a stage", and is the origin of the phrase "too much of a good thing".'
p833
aS'The play remains a favourite among audiences and has been adapted for radio, film, and musical theatre.'
p834
aS'They used their military power, which came from effective strategy and an early adoption of firearms, to create an empire that stretched from central Ghana to present-day Ivory Coast.'
p835
aS"Due to the empire's military prowess, wealth, architecture, sophisticated hierarchy and culture, the Ashanti empire was studied and had one of the largest historiographies by European, primarily British, sources of any indigenous Sub-Saharan African political entity.From the 17th century AD, the Ashanti king Osei Tutu (c. 1695 - 1717), along with Okomfo Anokye, established the Ashanti Kingdom, with the Golden Stool of Asante as a singular unifying symbol."
p836
aS'Osei Tutu engaged in a massive Asante territorial expansion.'
p837
aS'He built up the army based on introducing new organization and turning a disciplined royal and paramilitary army into an effective fighting machine.'
p838
aS'In 1701, the Ashanti army conquered Denkyira, giving the Ashanti access to the Gulf of Guinea and the Atlantic Ocean coastal trade with Europeans, notably the Dutch.'
p839
aS'King Opoku Ware I (1720-1745) engaged in further Akan territorial expansion, and king Kusi Obodom (1750-1764) succeeded Opoku Ware I. Asante king Osei Kwadwo (1764-1777) imposed administrative reforms that allowed the Ashanti Kingdom to be governed effectively.'
p840
aS"King Osei Kwame Panyin (1777-1803), and King Osei Tutu Kwame (1804-1824) continued the Ashanti Kingdom's territorial consolidation.The Ashanti Kingdom is the home to Lake Bosumtwi, Ghana's only natural lake."
p841
aS'Each was a member of the Ashikaga clan.This period is also known as the Muromachi period.'
p842
aS'It gets its name from the Muromachi district of Kyoto.'
p843
aS'The third shogun, Ashikaga Yoshimitsu, established his residence on Muromachi Street.'
p844
aS'This residence is nicknamed "Hana no Gosho" (Hua noYu Suo ) or "Flower Palace" (constructed in 1379) because of the abundance of flowers in its landscaping.This monopoly of power, as well as the Hojo vassals.'
p845
aS'Finally, in 1333, the Emperor Go-Daigo ordered local governing vassals to oppose Hojo rule in favor of Imperial restoration in the Kenmu Restoration.To counter this revolt, the Kamakura_shogunate ordered Ashikaga Takauji to quash the uprising.'
p846
aS'For reasons that are unclear, possibly because Ashikaga was the de facto leader of the powerless Minamoto clan, while the Hojo clan were from the Taira clan the Minamoto had previously defeated, Ashikaga turned against the Kamakura_shogunate and fought on behalf of the Imperial court.After the successful overthrow of the Kamakura bakufu in 1336, Ashikaga Takauji set up his own bakufu in Kyoto. North and South Court After Ashikaga Takauji established himself as the shogun, a dispute arose with Emperor Daigo II on the subject of how to govern the country.'
p847
aS'That dispute led Takauji to cause Prince Yutahito, the second son of Emperor Go-Fushimi, to be installed as Emperor Komyo.'
p848
aS'According to estimates the Atacama_Desert proper occupies 105,000 square kilometres (41,000 sq mi), or 128,000 square kilometres (49,000 sq mi) if the barren lower slopes of the Andes are included.'
p849
aS'Most of the desert is composed of stony terrain, salt lakes (salares), sand, and felsic lava that flows towards the Andes. Setting The World Wide Fund for Nature defines the Atacama_Desert ecoregion as extending from a few kilometers south of the Peru-Chile border to about 30deg south latitude.'
p850
aS'The National Geographic Society considers the coastal area of southern Peru to be part of the Atacama_Desert and also includes the deserts south of the Ica Region in Peru.Peru borders it on the north and the Chilean Matorral ecoregion borders it on the south.'
p851
aS'To the east lies the less arid Central Andean dry puna ecoregion.'
p852
aS'The drier portion of this ecoregion is located south of the Loa River between the parallel Sierra Vicuna Mackenna and Cordillera Domeyko.'
p853
aS'To the north of the Loa lies the Pampa del Tamarugal. Aridity The Atacama_Desert is commonly known as the driest place in the world, especially the surroundings of the abandoned Yungay town (in Antofagasta Region, Chile).'
p854
aS'The average rainfall is about 15 mm (0.6 in) per year, although some locations, such as Arica and Iquique, receive 1 to 3 mm (0.04 to 0.12 in) in a year.'
p855
aS'Eventually, the Spanish executed Atahualpa, effectively ending the empire.'
p856
aS'Although a succession of several emperors, who led the Inca resistance against the invading Spaniards, claimed the title of Sapa Inca ("unique"), the empire began to disintegrate after Atahualpa\'s death. Pre-conquest Atahualpa was the son of the Inca Huayna Capac from Tomebamba (Ecuador), and his mother was the Quito princess Paccha Duchicela, from Caranqui (Ecuador).'
p857
aS"The union was a politically expedient one, as the southern Ecuadorian Andes had been conquered by Huayna Capac's father, Tupac Inca Yupanqui some years earlier and Huayna Capac had recently conquered the northern Ecuadorian Andes, where Paccha Duchicela's royal family had some influence.Pedro Sarmiento de Gamboa states Atahualpa was the illegitimate son of Huayna CCapac and his cousin, Tocto Coca."
p858
aS"Atahualpa decided to stay behind in Quito after his father's death, which prompted Huascar to declare war.Most chroniclers suggest that Atahualpa was born in Quito, though other stories suggest various other birthplaces.His leading generals were Quizquiz, Chalkuchimac, and Ruminahui."
p859
aS'In April 1532, Quizquiz and his companions led the armies of Atahualpa to victory in the battles of Mullihambato, Chimborazo and Quipaipan.'
p860
aS'The Battle of Quipaipan was the final one between the warring brothers.'
p861
aS"Quizquiz and Chalkuchimac defeated Huascar's army, captured him, killed his family, and seized the capital, Cuzco."
p862
aS'She is the virgin patroness of Athens.'
p863
aS'The Athenians founded the Parthenon on the Acropolis of her namesake city, Athens (Athena Parthenos), in her honor.Veneration of Athena was so persistent that archaic myths about her were recast to adapt to cultural changes.'
p864
aS'In her role as a protector of the city (polis), many people throughout the Greek world worshiped Athena as Athena Polias (Athena Polias "Athena of the city").'
p865
aS'While the city of Athens and the goddess Athena essentially bear the same name (Athena the goddess, Athenai the city), it is not known which of the two words is derived from the other. Etymology of the name and origins of the cult Athena is associated with Athens, a plural name, because it was the place where she presided over her sisterhood, the Athenai, in earliest times.'
p866
aS'Mycenae was the city where the Goddess was called Mykene, and Mycenae is named in the plural for the sisterhood of females who tended her there.'
p867
aS"At Thebes she was called Thebe, and the city again a plural, Thebae (or Thebes, where the 's' is the plural formation)."
p868
aS'Similarly, at Athens she was called Athena, and the city Athenae (or Athens, again a plural).Athena had a special relationship with Athens, as is shown by the etymological connection of the names of the goddess and the city.'
p869
aS'Classical Athens was a powerful city-state that emerged in conjunction with the seagoing development of the port of Piraeus.'
p870
aS"A centre for the arts, learning and philosophy, home of Plato's Academy and Aristotle's Lyceum, it is widely referred to as the cradle of Western civilization and the birthplace of democracy, largely because of the impact of its cultural and political achievements during the 5th and 4th centuries BC on the rest of the then known European continent."
p871
aS'In modern times, Athens is a large cosmopolitan metropolis and central to economic, financial, industrial, maritime, political and cultural life in Greece.'
p872
aS"In 2012, Athens was ranked the world's 39th richest city by purchasing power and the 77th most expensive in a UBS study.Athens is recognised as a global city because of its geo-strategic location and its importance in finance, commerce, media, entertainment, arts, international trade, culture, education and tourism."
p873
aS'It is one of the biggest economic centres in southeastern Europe, with a large financial sector, and its port Piraeus is the largest passenger port in Europe, and the third largest in the world.'
p874
aS'The municipality (City) of Athens had a population of 664,046 (in 2011, 796,442 in 2004) within its administrative limits, and a land area of 39 km2 (15 sq mi).'
p875
aS'The urban area of Athens (Greater Athens and Greater Piraeus) extends beyond its administrative municipal city limits, with a population of 3,090,508 (in 2011) over an area of 412 km2 (159 sq mi).'
p876
aS'It is formed from adenosine diphosphate (ADP) and inorganic phosphate (Pi), and needs energy.The overall reaction sequence is: ADP + Pi - ATP, where ADP and Pi are joined together by ATP_synthaseEnergy is often released in the form of hydrogen ions (H+), moving down an electrochemical gradient, such as from the lumen into the stroma of chloroplasts or from the inter-membrane space into the matrix in mitochondria. Structure Located within the thylakoid membrane and inner mitochondrial membrane, ATP_synthase consists of 2 regionsthe FO portion is within the membrane.The F1 portion of the ATP_synthase is above the membrane, inside the matrix of the mitochondria.The nomenclature of the enzyme has a long history.'
p877
aS'The F1 fraction derives its name from the term "Fraction 1" and FO (written as a subscript letter "o", not "zero") derives its name from being the binding fraction for oligomycin, a type of naturally-derived antibiotic that is able to inhibit the FO unit of ATP_synthase.'
p878
aS'These functional regions consist of different protein subunits -- refer to tables. F1-ATP Synthase structure The F1 particle is large and can be seen in the transmission electron microscope by negative staining.'
p879
aS'These are particles of 9 nm diameter that pepper the inner mitochondrial membrane.'
p880
aS'They were originally called elementary particles and were thought to contain the entire respiratory apparatus of the mitochondrion, but, through a long series of experiments, Efraim Racker and his colleagues (who first isolated the F1 particle in 1961) were able to show that this particle is correlated with ATPase activity in uncoupled mitochondria and with the ATPase activity in submitochondrial particles created by exposing mitochondria to ultrasound.'
p881
aS'This ATPase activity was further associated with the creation of ATP by a long series of experiments in many laboratories. FO-ATP Synthase Structure The FO region of ATP_synthase is a proton pore that is embedded in the mitochondrial membrane.'
p882
aS'It consists of three main subunits A, B, and C, and (in humans) six additional subunits, d, e, f, g, F6, and 8 (or A6L). Binding-change model In the 1960s through the 1970s, Paul Boyer developed the binding change, or flip-flop, mechanism, which postulated that ATP synthesis is coupled with a conformational change in the ATP_synthase generated by rotation of the gamma subunit.'
p883
aS'He was a leading figure in the Aesthetic movement which also included Oscar Wilde and James A. McNeill Whistler.'
p884
aS"Beardsley's contribution to the development of the Art Nouveau and poster styles was significant, despite the brevity of his career before his early death from tuberculosis. Early life, education and early career Beardsley was born in Brighton, England, on 21 August 1872, and christened on 24 October 1872."
p885
aS'His father, Vincent Paul Beardsley (1839-1909), was the son of a tradesman; Vincent had no trade himself, however, and instead relied on a private income from an inheritance that he received from his maternal grandfather when he was twenty-one years of age.'
p886
aS"Vincent's wife, Ellen Agnus Pitt (1846-1932), was the daughter of Surgeon-Major William Pitt of the Indian Army."
p887
aS"The Pitts were a well-established and respected family in Brighton, and Beardsley's mother married a man of lesser social status than might have been expected."
p888
aS'Soon after their wedding, Vincent was obliged to sell some of his property in order to settle a claim for his "breach of promise" from another woman who claimed that he had promised to marry her.'
p889
aS"At the time of his birth, Beardsley's family, which included his sister Mabel who was one year older, were living in Ellen's familial home at 12 Buckingham Road."
p890
aS'Although most of the time this energy is released in the form of an emitted photon, the energy can also be transferred to another electron, which is ejected from the atom.'
p891
aS'This second ejected electron is called an Auger electron, after one of its discoverers, Pierre Victor Auger.Upon ejection the kinetic energy of the Auger electron corresponds to the difference between the energy of the initial electronic transition into the vacancy and the ionization energy for the electron shell from which the Auger electron was ejected.'
p892
aS'These energy levels depend on the type of atom and the chemical environment in which the atom was located.'
p893
aS'Auger electron spectroscopy involves the emission of Auger electrons by bombarding a sample with either X-rays or energetic electrons and measures the intensity of Auger electrons as a function of the Auger electron energy.'
p894
aS'The resulting spectra can be used to determine the identity of the emitting atoms and some information about their environment.'
p895
aS'Auger recombination is a similar Auger_effect which occurs in semiconductors.'
p896
aS'An electron and electron hole (electron-hole pair) can recombine giving up their energy to an electron in the conduction band, increasing its energy.'
p897
aS'Wilson was born Frederick August Kittel, Jr. in the Hill District of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, the fourth of six children, to Sudeten-German immigrant baker/pastry cook, Frederick August Kittel, Sr. and Daisy Wilson, an African-American cleaning woman, from North Carolina.'
p898
aS"Wilson's mother raised the children alone until he was five in a two-room apartment above a grocery store at 1727 Bedford Avenue; his father was mostly absent from his childhood."
p899
aS"Wilson would go on to write under his mother's surname."
p900
aS'The economically depressed neighborhood in which he was raised was inhabited predominantly by black Americans, and Jewish and Italian immigrants.'
p901
aS"Wilson's mother divorced and married David Bedford in the 1950s and the family moved from the Hill District to the then predominantly white working-class neighborhood of Hazelwood, where they encountered racial hostility; bricks were thrown through a window at their new home."
p902
aS'They were soon forced out of their house and on to their next home.In 1959 Wilson was the only African-American student at the Central Catholic High School, where he was soon driven away by threats and abuse.He then attended Connelley Vocational High School, but found the curriculum unchallenging.'
p903
aS'He dropped out of Gladstone High School in the 10th grade in 1960 after his teacher accused him of plagiarizing a 20-page paper he wrote on Napoleon I of France.'
p904
aS"He was schooled traditionally, took a craftsman-like approach to his work, and desired academic recognition, although he was never accepted into Paris's foremost school of art.Sculpturally, Rodin possessed a unique ability to model a complex, turbulent, deeply pocketed surface in clay."
p905
aS'Many of his most notable sculptures were roundly criticized during his lifetime.'
p906
aS'They clashed with the predominant figure sculpture tradition, in which works were decorative, formulaic, or highly thematic.'
p907
aS"Rodin's most original work departed from traditional themes of mythology and allegory, modeled the human body with realism, and celebrated individual character and physicality."
p908
aS'Rodin was sensitive to the controversy surrounding his work, but refused to change his style.'
p909
aS"Successive works brought increasing favor from the government and the artistic community.From the unexpected realism of his first major figure - inspired by his 1875 trip to Italy - to the unconventional memorials whose commissions he later sought, Rodin's reputation grew, such that he became the preeminent French sculptor of his time."
p910
aS'By 1900, he was a world-renowned artist.'
p911
aS'He is viewed as one of the most important Church Fathers in Western Christianity for his writings in the Patristic Era.'
p912
aS'Among his most important works are City of God and Confessions.According to his contemporary, Jerome, Augustine "established anew the ancient Faith."'
p913
aS'In his early years, he was heavily influenced by Manichaeism and afterward by the Neo-Platonism of Plotinus.'
p914
aS'After his baptism and conversion to Christianity in 387, Augustine developed his own approach to philosophy and theology, accommodating a variety of methods and perspectives.'
p915
aS'Believing that the grace of Christ was indispensable to human freedom, he helped formulate the doctrine of original sin and made seminal contributions to the development of just war theory.When the Western Roman Empire began to disintegrate, Augustine developed the concept of the Catholic Church as a spiritual City of God, distinct from the material Earthly City.'
p916
aS'His thoughts profoundly influenced the medieval worldview.'
p917
aS"The segment of the Church that adhered to the concept of the Trinity as defined by the Council of Nicaea and the Council of Constantinople closely identified with Augustine's City of God.In the Catholic Church and the Anglican Communion, he is a saint, a preeminent Doctor of the Church, and the patron of the Augustinians."
p918
aS"The novel is based on the author's real life experience.Mario, an aspiring writer, works at a radio station, Panamericana, writing news bulletins alongside the disaster-obsessed Pascual."
p919
aS'Mario has an aunt (married to a biological uncle) whose sister, Julia, has just been divorced and has come to live with some of his family members.'
p920
aS"He frequently sees her and though at first they don't get on, they start to go to movies together and gradually become romantically involved.Mario's bosses also run Panamericana's sister station, which broadcasts novelas (short-run soap operas)."
p921
aS"They're having problems buying the serials on bulk from Cuba, with batches of scripts being ruined and quality being poor, and hence they hire a highly eccentric Bolivian scriptwriter named Pedro Camacho to write the serials.The novel chronicles the scriptwriter's rise and fall in tandem with the protagonist's affair and includes episodes of Pedro's serials, in prose form."
p922
aS"These scripts tend to shed light on what the latter is like and has done, and change depending on what he's going through. Background It is based in part on the author's first marriage, to Julia Urquidi."
p923
aS"Urquidi later wrote a memoir, Lo que Varguitas no dijo (What little Vargas didn't say), in which she provided her own version of their relationship.Aunt_Julia_and_the_Scriptwriter combines a fictional account of a period in Vargas' own life with a picture of Lima in the 1950s, a satirical look at Peruvian radio soap operas, and an examination of both the practical and creative aspects of writing.Vargas Llosa's novel was later adapted as a Hollywood feature film, Tune in Tomorrow, in which the setting was moved from Lima to New_Orleans."
p924
aS'The film was released as Aunt_Julia_and_the_Scriptwriter in many countries. Footnotes  External links Mario_Vargas_Llosa discusses Aunt_Julia_and_the_Scriptwriter on the BBC World Book ClubA glossary of unusual words from the book'
p925
aS'The territory of Austria covers 83,879 square kilometres (32,386 sq mi) and has an alpine climate.'
p926
aS"Austria's terrain is highly mountainous, lying within the Alps; only 32% of the country is below 500 metres (1,640 ft), and its highest point is 3,798 metres (12,461 ft)."
p927
aS"The majority of the population speak local Bavarian dialects of German as their native language, and Austrian German in its standard form is the country's official language."
p928
aS'Other local official languages are Hungarian, Burgenland Croatian, and Slovene.The origins of modern-day Austria date back to the time of the Habsburg dynasty when the vast majority of the country was a part of the Holy Roman Empire.'
p929
aS'From the time of the Reformation, many Northern German princes, resenting the authority of the Emperor, used Protestantism as a flag of rebellion.'
p930
aS'The Thirty Years War, the influence of the Kingdom of Sweden and Kingdom of France, the rise of the Kingdom of Prussia, and the Napoleonic invasions all weakened the power of the Emperor in the North of Germany, but in the South, and in non-German areas of the Empire, the Emperor and Catholicism maintained control.'
p931
aS'During the 17th and 18th centuries, Austria was able to retain its position as one of the great powers of Europe and, in response to the coronation of Napoleon as the Emperor of the French, the Austrian Empire was officially proclaimed in 1804.'
p932
aS'Auxins and their role in plant growth were first described by the Dutch scientist Frits Warmolt Went.'
p933
aS'Kenneth V. Thimann isolated this phytohormone and determined its chemical structure as indole-3-acetic acid (IAA).'
p934
aS'Went and Thimann co-authored a book on plant hormones, Phytohormones, in 1937. Overview Auxins were the first of the major plant hormones to be discovered.'
p935
aS'They derive their name from the Greek word auxein (auxein - "to grow/increase").'
p936
aS'Auxin (namely IAA) is present in all parts of a plant, although in very different concentrations.'
p937
aS'The concentration in each position is crucial developmental information, so it is subject to tight regulation through both metabolism and transport.'
p938
aS'The result is the auxin creates "patterns" of auxin concentration maxima and minima in the plant body, which in turn guide further development of respective cells, and ultimately of the plant as a whole.The (dynamic and environment responsive) pattern of auxin distribution within the plant is a key factor for plant growth, its reaction to its environment, and specifically for development of plant organs (such as leaves or flowers).'
p939
aS"/'aksum/) is a city in northern Ethiopia."
p940
aS'The town has a population of 56,500 residents (2010), and is governed as an urban warada.The original capital of the Kingdom of Aksum, it is one of the oldest continuously inhabited places in Africa.'
p941
aS'Axum was a naval and trading power that ruled the region from about 400 BC into the 10th century.'
p942
aS"In 1980 UNESCO added Aksum's archaeological sites to its list of World Heritage Sites due to their historic value.Located in the Mehakelegnaw Zone of the Tigray Region near the base of the Adwa mountains, Axum has an elevation of 2,131 metres (6,991 ft)."
p943
aS"Axum is surrounded by La'ilay Maychew warada. History Axum was the center of the marine trading power known as the Aksumite Kingdom, which predated the earliest mentions in Roman era writings."
p944
aS'Around 356, its ruler was converted to Christianity by Frumentius.'
p945
aS'Later, under the reign of Kaleb, Axum was a quasi-ally of Byzantium against the Persian Empire.'
p946
aS'N3- is a linear anion that is isoelectronic with CO2 and N2O.'
p947
aS'Per valence bond theory, azide can be described by several resonance structures, an important one being N-N+N-.'
p948
aS'Azide is also a functional group in organic chemistry, RN3.'
p949
aS'The dominant application of azides is as a propellant in air bags. Preparation The principal source of the azide moiety is sodium azide.'
p950
aS'Sodium azide is made industrially by the reaction of nitrous oxide, N2O with sodium amide, NaNH2, in liquid ammonia as solvent.'
p951
aS'The overall stoichiometry is given by N2O + 2NaNH2 - NaN3 + NaOH + NH3Most inorganic and organic azides are prepared directly or indirectly from sodium azide.'
p952
aS'For example, lead azide, used in detonators, may be prepared from the metathesis reaction between lead nitrate and sodium azide.'
p953
aS'Despite the initial conception of the empire as an alliance of three self-governed city-states, Tenochtitlan quickly established itself as the dominant partner militarily.'
p954
aS'By the time the Spanish arrived in 1520, the lands of the Alliance were effectively ruled from Tenochtitlan, and the other partners in the alliance had assumed subsidiary roles.The alliance waged wars of conquest and expanded rapidly after its formation.'
p955
aS'At its height, the alliance controlled most of central Mexico as well as some more distant territories within Mesoamerica such as the Xoconochco province, an Aztec exclave near the present-day Guatemalan border.'
p956
aS'Aztec rule has been described by scholars as "hegemonic" or "indirect".'
p957
aS'Rulers of conquered cities were left in power so long as they agreed to pay semi-annual tribute to the alliance as well as supplying military support for the Aztec war efforts.'
p958
aS'In return, the imperial authority offered protection and political stability as well as facilitating an integrated economic network of diverse lands and peoples with significant local autonomy despite their tributary status. Etymology The word "Aztec" is a modern invention and would most likely not have been recognized by the people themselves.'
p959
aS'It has variously been used to refer to the Triple Alliance empire, the Nahuatl-speaking people of central Mexico prior to the Spanish conquest, or specifically the Mexica ethnicity of the Nahuatl-speaking peoples.'
p960
aS'Often the term "Aztec" refers exclusively to the Mexica people of Tenochtitlan (now the location of Mexico City), situated on an island in Lake Texcoco, who referred to themselves as Mexihcah Tenochcah /me:\'Si?ka?'
p961
aS"te'notSka?/ or Colhuah Mexihcah /'ko:lwa?"
p962
aS'me:\'Si?ka?/.Sometimes the term also includes the inhabitants of Tenochtitlan\'s two principal allied city-states, the Acolhuas of Texcoco and the Tepanecs of Tlacopan, who together with the Mexica formed the Aztec Triple Alliance which controlled what is often known as the "Aztec_Empire".'
p963
aS'In other contexts, Aztec may refer to all the various city states and their peoples, who shared large parts of their ethnic history and cultural traits with the Mexica, Acolhua and Tepanecs, and who often also used the Nahuatl language as a lingua franca.'
p964
aS'In this meaning it is possible to talk about an Aztec civilization including all the particular cultural patterns common for most of the peoples inhabiting Central Mexico in the late postclassic period.From the 13th century, the Valley of Mexico was the heart of Aztec civilization: here the capital of the Aztec Triple Alliance, the city of Tenochtitlan, was built upon raised islets in Lake Texcoco.'
p965
aS'The Triple Alliance formed a tributary empire expanding its political hegemony far beyond the Valley of Mexico, conquering other city states throughout Mesoamerica.'
p966
aS'At its pinnacle, Aztec culture had rich and complex mythological and religious traditions, as well as reaching remarkable architectural and artistic accomplishments.'
p967
aS'An immediate and controversial bestseller, Babbitt was influential in the decision to award Lewis the Nobel Prize in literature in 1930.The word "Babbitt" entered the English language as a "person and especially a business or professional man who conforms unthinkingly to prevailing middle-class standards". Sinclair Lewis\'s America If Lewis\'s first widely acclaimed novel, Main Street, sought to shatter early-20th-century romanticizations of small-town America, his next work, Babbitt, turned a critical eye towards the celebrated midsize industrial city, home to the enterprising American businessman.'
p968
aS'After the social instability and sharp economic depression that emerged in the wake of World_War_I, many Americans in the 1920s saw business and city growth as foundations for stability.'
p969
aS'The civic boosters and self-made men of the middle-class represented particularly American depictions of success, at a time when the promotion of the American identity was crucial in the face of rising fears of communism.'
p970
aS'At the same time, growing Midwestern cities, usually associated with mass production and the emergence of a consumer society, were also celebrated emblems of American progress.'
p971
aS'George F. Babbitt, the novel\'s main character, is described by the 1930 Nobel Prize committee as "the ideal of an American popular hero of the middle-class.'
p972
aS"The relativity of business morals as well as private rules of conduct is for him an accepted article of faith, and without hesitation he considers it God's purpose that man should work, increase his income, and enjoy modern improvements."
p973
aS'"Although many other popular novelists writing at the time of Babbitt\'s publication depict the "Roaring Twenties" as an era of social change and disillusionment with material culture, modern scholars argue that Lewis was not himself a member of the "lost generation" of younger writers like Hemingway or Fitzgerald.'
p974
aS'He was also influenced by the Persian culture and this affected both his own actions and those of his successors, giving rise to a significant expansion of the Persianate ethos in the Indian subcontinent.Though born as Zahiruddin Muhammad Babur, he was commonly known as Babur.'
p975
aS'He was the eldest son of Umar Sheikh Mirza.'
p976
aS'He ascended the throne of Fergana in 1495 at the age of twelve and faced rebellion from his own relatives.'
p977
aS'He conquered Samarkand two years later, only to lose the city of Fergana soon after.'
p978
aS'In his attempt to reconquer it, he lost control of Samarkand.'
p979
aS'In 1501, his attempt to recapture both cities went in vain as he was defeated by Muhammad Shaybani Khan.'
p980
aS'In 1504, he conquered Kabul, which was under the rule of the infant heir of Ulugh Begh.'
p981
aS"Compiled in Iceland in the 13th century, but based on much older Old Norse poetry, the Poetic Edda and the Prose Edda contain numerous references to the death of Baldr as both a great tragedy to the AEsir and a harbinger of Ragnarok.According to Gylfaginning, a book of Snorri Sturluson's Prose Edda, Baldr's wife is Nanna and their son is Forseti."
p982
aS'In Gylfaginning, Snorri relates that Baldr had the greatest ship ever built, named Hringhorni, and that there is no place more beautiful than his hall, Breidablik. Name Jacob Grimm in his Teutonic Mythology (ch.'
p983
aS'11) identifies Old Norse Baldr with the Old High German Baldere (2nd Merseburg Charm, Thuringia), Palter (theonym, Bavaria), Paltar (personal name) and with Old English bealdor, baldor "lord, prince, king" (used always with a genitive plural, as in gumena baldor "lord of men", wigena baldor "lord of warriors", et cetera).'
p984
aS'Old Norse shows this usage of the word as an honorific in a few cases, as in baldur i brynju (Saem.'
p985
aS'272b) and herbaldr (Saem.'
p986
aS'218b), both epithets of heroes in general.Grimm traces the etymology of the name to *balthaz, whence Gothic balths, Old English bald, Old High German pald, all meaning "white, good".But the interpretation of Baldr as "the brave god" may be secondary.'
p987
aS'Baltic (cf.'
p988
aS'Baptism has been called a sacrament and an ordinance of Jesus Christ.'
p989
aS'In some denominations, baptism is also called christening, but for others the word "christening" is reserved for the baptism of infants.The usual form of baptism among the earliest Christians was for the candidate to be immersed, either totally (submerged completely under the water) or partially (standing or kneeling in water while water was poured on him or her).'
p990
aS"While John the Baptist's use of a deep river for his baptism suggests immersion, pictorial and archaeological evidence of Christian baptism from the 3rd century onward indicates that a normal form was to have the candidate stand in water while water was poured over the upper body."
p991
aS'Other common forms of baptism now in use include pouring water three times on the forehead, a method called affusion.Martyrdom was identified early in Church history as "baptism by blood", enabling martyrs who had not been baptized by water to be saved.'
p992
aS'Later, the Catholic Church identified a baptism of desire, by which those preparing for baptism who die before actually receiving the sacrament are considered saved.'
p993
aS'As evidenced also in the common Christian practice of infant baptism, baptism was universally seen by Christians as in some sense necessary for salvation, until Huldrych_Zwingli in the 16th century denied its necessity.Today, some Christians, particularly Christian Scientists, Quakers, The Salvation Army, and Unitarians, do not see baptism as necessary, and do not practice the rite.'
p994
aS'Among those that do, differences can be found in the manner and mode of baptizing and in the understanding of the significance of the rite.'
p995
aS'At the start of his story the lawyer already employs two scriveners to copy legal documents by hand: Nippers and Turkey.'
p996
aS'An increase in business leads him to advertise for a third, and he hires the forlorn-looking Bartleby in the hope that his calmness will soothe the irascible temperaments of the other two.At first, Bartleby produces a large volume of high-quality work.'
p997
aS'But one day, when asked to help proofread a document, Bartleby answers with what soon becomes his perpetual response to every request--"I would prefer not to."'
p998
aS'To the dismay of the lawyer and to the irritation of the other employees, Bartleby performs fewer and fewer tasks, and eventually none.'
p999
aS'The narrator makes several futile attempts to reason with him and to learn something about him; and when he stops by the office unexpectedly, he discovers that Bartleby has started living there.Tension builds as business associates wonder why Bartleby is always there.'
p1000
aS'Sensing the threat to his reputation but emotionally unable to evict Bartleby, the narrator moves his business out.'
p1001
aS"Soon the new tenants come to ask for help: Bartleby still will not leave--he now sits on the stairs all day and sleeps in the building's doorway."
p1002
aS'It ended with an overwhelming victory for the Goths and the death of Emperor Valens.Part of the Gothic War (376-382), the battle is often considered the start of the process which led to the fall of the Western Roman Empire in the 5th century.'
p1003
aS'It was actually fought by the forces of the Eastern Roman Empire, which outlasted the Western by nearly 1,000 years (historians use the term Byzantine Empire to indicate the Eastern Empire after the fall of the West). Historiography We have a detailed account for the lead up to the battle from the Roman perspective from Ammianus Marcellinus, which forms the culminating high point at the end of his history.'
p1004
aS'The position in his histories and the lack of a detailed history for the following century has tended to exaggerate the significance of the battle for later historians.'
p1005
aS"Ammianus's account of the battle itself, as to be expected from a losing side, is far from clear."
p1006
aS'Heat, fire and dust seem to have been particularly significant.'
p1007
aS'Much of what follows about the battle itself is modern supposition. Background In 376 AD, displaced by the invasions of the Huns, the Goths, led by Alavivus and Fritigern, asked to be allowed to settle in the Roman Empire.'
p1008
aS'Hoping that they would become farmers and soldiers, the emperor Valens allowed them to establish themselves in the Empire as allies (foederati).'
p1009
aS"At dawn on September 17, Maj. Gen. Joseph Hooker's corps mounted a powerful assault on Lee's left flank."
p1010
aS"Attacks and counterattacks swept across Miller's Cornfield and fighting swirled around the Dunker Church."
p1011
aS'Union assaults against the Sunken Road eventually pierced the Confederate center, but the Federal advantage was not followed up.'
p1012
aS"In the afternoon, Union Maj. Gen. Ambrose Burnside's corps entered the action, capturing a stone bridge over Antietam Creek and advancing against the Confederate right."
p1013
aS"At a crucial moment, Confederate Maj. Gen. A. P. Hill's division arrived from Harpers Ferry and launched a surprise counterattack, driving back Burnside and ending the battle."
p1014
aS'Although outnumbered two-to-one, Lee committed his entire force, while McClellan sent in less than three-quarters of his army, enabling Lee to fight the Federals to a standstill.'
p1015
aS'During the night, both armies consolidated their lines.'
p1016
aS'The battle took place near the village of Austerlitz in the Austrian Empire (modern-day Slavkov u Brna in the Czech_Republic).'
p1017
aS'Because of the near-perfect execution of a calibrated but dangerous plan, the battle is often seen as a tactical masterpiece of the same stature as Cannae, the celebrated triumph by Hannibal some 2,000 years before.'
p1018
aS'The French victory brought the War of the Third Coalition to a rapid end, with the Treaty of Pressburg signed by the exhausted Austrians later that month.After eliminating an entire Austrian army during the Ulm Campaign, French forces managed to capture Vienna in November 1805.'
p1019
aS'The Austrians avoided further conflict until the arrival of the Russians bolstered Allied numbers.'
p1020
aS'Napoleon sent his army north in pursuit of the Allies, but then ordered his forces to retreat so he could feign a grave weakness.'
p1021
aS'Desperate to lure the Allies into battle, Napoleon gave every indication in the days preceding the engagement that the French army was in a fragile condition, even abandoning the dominant Pratzen Heights near Austerlitz.'
p1022
aS'He deployed the French army below the Pratzen Heights and deliberately weakened his right flank, enticing the Allies to launch a major assault there in the hopes of rolling up the whole French line.'
p1023
aS'This attempt failed, and his army was defeated in a pitched battle by a smaller army commanded by the King of Scots, Robert the Bruce. Background The Wars of Scottish Independence between England and Scotland began in 1296 and initially the English were successful under the command of Edward I, having won victories at the Battle of Dunbar (1296) and at the Capture of Berwick (1296).'
p1024
aS'The removal of John Balliol from the Scottish throne also contributed to the English success.'
p1025
aS"The Scots had been victorious in defeating the English at the Battle of Stirling Bridge in 1297, however this was countered by Edward I's victory at the Battle of Falkirk (1298)."
p1026
aS'By 1304 Scotland had been conquered, but in 1306 Robert the Bruce seized the Scottish throne and the war was reopened.Edward II of England came to the throne in 1307 but was incapable of providing the determined leadership that had been shown by his father, Edward I, and the English position soon became more difficult.'
p1027
aS'Stirling Castle was one of the most important castles that was held by the English as it commanded the route north into the Scottish Highlands.'
p1028
aS"It was besieged in 1314 by Robert the Bruce's brother, Edward Bruce, and an agreement was made that if the castle was not relieved by mid-summer then it would be surrendered to the Scots."
p1029
aS'The English could not ignore this challenge and military preparations were made for a substantial campaign in which the English army probably numbered 2,000 cavalry and 15,000 infantry, many of whom would have been longbowmen.'
p1030
aS'Their leader Henry Tudor, Earl of Richmond, by his victory became the first English monarch of the Tudor dynasty.'
p1031
aS'His opponent, Richard III, the last king of the House of York, was killed in the battle.'
p1032
aS"Historians consider Bosworth Field to mark the end of the Plantagenet dynasty, making it a defining moment of English and Welsh history.Richard's reign began in 1483 when he was handed the throne after his twelve-year-old nephew Edward V, for whom he was acting as Lord Protector, was declared illegitimate and ineligible for the throne."
p1033
aS"Richard lost popularity after the boy and his younger brother disappeared after Richard incarcerated them in the Tower of London, and Richard's support was further eroded by the popular belief he was implicated in the death of his wife."
p1034
aS"Across the English Channel in Brittany, Henry Tudor, a descendant of the greatly diminished House of Lancaster, seized on Richard's difficulties so that he could challenge Richard's claim to the throne."
p1035
aS"Henry's first attempt to invade England was frustrated by a storm in 1483, but at his second attempt he arrived unopposed on 7 August 1485 on the southwest coast of Wales."
p1036
aS'Marching inland, Henry gathered support as he made for London.'
p1037
aS'Even though heavily outnumbered, Alexander emerged victorious due to his superior tactics and army.'
p1038
aS'It was a decisive victory for the Hellenic League and led to the fall of the Achaemenid Empire. Background In November 333 BC, Darius_III had lost the Battle of Issus resulting in the capture of his wife, and his two daughters, Stateira II and Drypetis.'
p1039
aS'Darius had retreated to Babylon, where he regrouped the remaining army from the previous battle.'
p1040
aS'The victory at Issus had given Alexander control of southern Asia Minor.'
p1041
aS'Following a victory at the Siege of Tyre (332 BC) which lasted from January to July, Alexander controlled the Levant.'
p1042
aS'After his victory at Gaza, Persian troop counts were low and the Persian satrap of Egypt, Mazaces, peacefully surrendered to Alexander. Negotiations between Darius and Alexander Darius tried to dissuade Alexander from further attacks on his empire by diplomacy.'
p1043
aS'Ancient historians provide different accounts of his negotiations with Alexander, which can be separated in three negotiation attempts.Justin, Arrian and Curtius Rufus write that Darius sent a letter to Alexander after the Battle of Issus.'
p1044
aS"Union Maj. Gen. George_Meade's Army of the Potomac defeated attacks by Confederate Gen. Robert E. Lee's Army of Northern Virginia, ending Lee's attempt to invade the North.After his success at Chancellorsville in Virginia in May 1863, Lee led his army through the Shenandoah Valley to begin his second invasion of the North--the Gettysburg Campaign."
p1045
aS'With his army in high spirits, Lee intended to shift the focus of the summer campaign from war-ravaged northern Virginia and hoped to influence Northern politicians to give up their prosecution of the war by penetrating as far as Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, or even Philadelphia.'
p1046
aS'Prodded by President Abraham Lincoln, Maj. Gen. Joseph Hooker moved his army in pursuit, but was relieved of command just three days before the battle and replaced by Meade.Elements of the two armies initially collided at Gettysburg on July 1, 1863, as Lee urgently concentrated his forces there, his objective being to engage the Union army and destroy it.'
p1047
aS'Low ridges to the northwest of town were defended initially by a Union cavalry division under Brig.'
p1048
aS'Gen. John Buford, and soon reinforced with two corps of Union infantry.'
p1049
aS'However, two large Confederate corps assaulted them from the northwest and north, collapsing the hastily developed Union lines, sending the defenders retreating through the streets of town to the hills just to the south.On the second day of battle, most of both armies had assembled.'
p1050
aS'The Union line was laid out in a defensive formation resembling a fishhook.'
p1051
aS"Harold was crowned king shortly after Edward's death, but faced invasions by William, his own brother Tostig and the Norwegian King Harald Hardrada (Harold III of Norway)."
p1052
aS'Hardrada and Tostig defeated a hastily gathered army of Englishmen at the Battle of Fulford on 20 September 1066, and were in turn defeated by Harold at the Battle of Stamford Bridge five days later.'
p1053
aS"The deaths of Tostig and Hardrada at Stamford left William as Harold's only serious opponent."
p1054
aS'While Harold and his forces were recovering from Stamford, William landed his invasion forces in the south of England at Pevensey on 28 September 1066 and established a beachhead for his conquest of the kingdom.'
p1055
aS'Harold was forced to march south swiftly, gathering forces as he went.The exact numbers present at the battle are unknown; estimates are around 10,000 for William and about 7,000 for Harold.'
p1056
aS'The composition of the forces is clearer; the English army was composed almost entirely of infantry and had few archers, whereas only about half of the invading force was infantry, the rest split equally between cavalry and archers.'
p1057
aS'Harold appears to have tried to surprise William, but scouts found his army and reported its arrival to William, who marched from Hastings to the battlefield to confront Harold.'
p1058
aS"Napoleon's army also contained Polish and Italian troops, as well as Germans from the Confederation of the Rhine."
p1059
aS'The battle was the culmination of the 1813 German campaign and involved nearly 600,000 soldiers, making it the largest battle in Europe prior to World_War_I.Being decisively defeated for the first time in battle, Napoleon was compelled to return to France while the Coalition hurried to keep their momentum, invading France early the next year.'
p1060
aS'Napoleon was forced to abdicate and was exiled to Elba in May 1814. Background The French Emperor Napoleon I attempted to militarily coerce Tsar Alexander I of Russia into rejoining his unpopular Continental System by invading Russia with about 650,000 troops, collectively known as the Grande Armee, and eventually occupied Moscow in late 1812, after the bloody yet indecisive Battle of Borodino.'
p1061
aS'However, the Russian Tsar refused to surrender even as the French occupied the city, which was burnt by the time of its occupation.'
p1062
aS'The campaign ended in complete disaster as Napoleon and his remaining forces retreated during the bitterly cold Russian winter, with sickness, starvation, and the constant harrying of Russian Cossack marauders and partisan forces leaving the Grande Armee virtually destroyed by the time it exited Russian territory.'
p1063
aS"Making matters even worse for Napoleon, in June 1813 the combined armies of Great Britain, Portugal, and Spain, under the command of Britain's Arthur Wellesley, Marquess of Wellington, had decisively routed French forces at the Battle of Vitoria in the Peninsular War, and were now advancing towards the Pyrenees and the Franco-Spanish border."
p1064
aS'With this string of defeats, the armies of France were in retreat on all fronts across Europe.Anti-French forces joined Russia as its troops pursued the remnants of the virtually destroyed Grande Armee across central Europe.'
p1065
aS"The fallout from Manzikert was disastrous for the Byzantines, resulting in civil conflicts and an economic crisis that severely weakened the Byzantine Empire's ability to adequately defend its borders."
p1066
aS'This led to the mass movement of Turks into central Anatolia--by 1080, an area of 78,000 square kilometres (30,000 sq mi) had been gained by the Seljuk Turks.'
p1067
aS'It took three decades of internal strife before Alexius I (1081 to 1118) restored stability to Byzantium.'
p1068
aS'Historian Thomas Asbridge says: "In 1071, the Seljuqs crushed an imperial army at the Battle_of_Manzikert (in eastern Asia Minor), and though historians no longer consider this to have been an utterly cataclysmic reversal for the Greeks, it still was a stinging setback.'
p1069
aS'" Background Although the Byzantine Empire had remained strong and powerful in the Middle Ages, it began to decline under the reign of the militarily incompetent Constantine IX and again under Constantine X--a brief two-year period of reform under Isaac I merely delayed the decay of the Byzantine army.'
p1070
aS'Under Constantine IX the Byzantines first came into contact with the Seljuk Turks when these attempted to annex Ani, the Armenian capital.'
p1071
aS'Constantine made a truce with the Seljuks that lasted until 1064, but they then took Ani, and in  1067 the rest of Armenia, followed by Caesarea.In 1068 Romanus IV took power, and after some speedy military reforms entrusted Manuel Comnenus (nephew of Isaac I Comnenus) to lead an expedition against the Seljuks.'
p1072
aS'The battle was the culmination of the first attempt by Persia, under King Darius_I, to subjugate Greece.'
p1073
aS'The Greek army decisively defeated the more numerous Persians, marking a turning point in the Greco-Persian Wars.The first Persian invasion was a response to Greek involvement in the Ionian Revolt, when Athens and Eretria had sent a force to support the cities of Ionia in their attempt to overthrow Persian rule.'
p1074
aS'The Athenians and Eretrians had succeeded in capturing and burning Sardis, but they were then forced to retreat with heavy losses.'
p1075
aS'In response to this raid, Darius swore to burn down Athens and Eretria.'
p1076
aS'According to Herodotus, Darius asked for his bow, he placed an arrow upon the string and he discharged it upwards towards heaven, and as he shot into the air he said: "Zeus, grant me to take vengeance upon the Athenians!".'
p1077
aS'Also he charged one of his servants, to say to him, every day before dinner, three times: "Master, remember the Athenians.'
p1078
aS'"At the time of the battle, Sparta and Athens were the two largest city states.'
p1079
aS"After cutting Melas's line of communications by crossing the river Po and defeating Feldmarschallleutnant (FML) Peter Karl Ott von Batorkez at Montebello on 9 June, the French closed in on the Austrian army, which had massed in Alessandria."
p1080
aS'Deceived by a local double agent, Bonaparte dispatched large forces to the north and south, but the Austrians launched a surprise attack on 14 June against the main French army under General Louis Alexandre Berthier.Initially, their two assaults across the Fontanone stream near Marengo village were repelled, and General Jean Lannes reinforced the French right.'
p1081
aS'Bonaparte realised the true position and issued orders at 11:00 am to recall the detachment under General de Division (GdD) Louis Desaix, while moving his reserve forward.'
p1082
aS"On the Austrian left, Ott's column had taken Castel Ceriolo, and its advance guard moved south to attack Lannes's flank."
p1083
aS'Melas renewed the main assault and the Austrians broke the central French position.'
p1084
aS'By 2:30 pm the French were withdrawing and Austrian dragoons seized the Marengo farm.'
p1085
aS"Bonaparte had by then arrived with the reserve, but Berthier's troops began to fall back on the main vine belts."
p1086
aS'The belligerents were Nawab Siraj-ud-daulah, the last independent Nawab of Bengal, and the British East India Company.'
p1087
aS'When Alivardhi Khan died in 1756, Siraj-ud-daulah became the nawab of Bengal.'
p1088
aS'He ordered the English to stop the extension of their fortification.'
p1089
aS"Robert Clive bribed Mir Jafar, the commander in chief of the nawab's army, and also promised him to make him Nawab of Bengal and attacked Calcutta."
p1090
aS'He defeated the Nawab at Plassey in 1757 and captured Calcutta.'
p1091
aS'The battle was preceded by the attack on British-controlled Calcutta by Nawab Siraj-ud-daulah and the Black Hole incident.'
p1092
aS'The British sent reinforcements under Colonel Robert Clive and Admiral Charles Watson from Madras to Bengal and recaptured Calcutta.'
p1093
aS'In the resulting Battle of Thermopylae, the rearguard of the Greek force was annihilated, whilst in the Battle of Artemisium the Greeks had heavy losses and retreated after the loss at Thermopylae.'
p1094
aS'This allowed the Persians to conquer Boeotia and Attica.'
p1095
aS'The Allies prepared to defend the Isthmus of Corinth whilst the fleet was withdrawn to nearby Salamis Island.Although heavily outnumbered, the Greek Allies were persuaded by the Athenian general Themistocles to bring the Persian fleet to battle again, in the hope that a victory would prevent naval operations against the Peloponessus.'
p1096
aS'The Persian king Xerxes was also anxious for a decisive battle.'
p1097
aS'As a result of subterfuge on the part of Themistocles, the Persian navy sailed into the Straits of Salamis and tried to block both entrances.'
p1098
aS'In the cramped conditions of the Straits the great Persian numbers were an active hindrance, as ships struggled to maneuver and became disorganized.'
p1099
aS'Seizing the opportunity, the Greek fleet formed in line and scored a decisive victory.Xerxes then retreated to Asia with much of his army, leaving Mardonius to complete the conquest of Greece.'
p1100
aS"This turned the tide in James' failed attempt to regain the British crown and ultimately aided in ensuring the continued Protestant ascendancy in Ireland.The battle took place on 1 July 1690 in the old style (Julian) calendar."
p1101
aS'This was equivalent to 11 July in the new style (Gregorian) calendar, although today its commemoration is held on 12 July, on which the decisive Battle of Aughrim was fought a year later.'
p1102
aS"William's forces defeated James' army, which consisted mostly of raw recruits."
p1103
aS'The symbolic importance of this battle has made it one of the best-known battles in the history of the British Isles and a key part of the folklore of the Orange Order.'
p1104
aS"Its commemoration today is principally by the Protestant Orange Institution. The Background The battle was the decisive encounter in a war that was primarily about James' attempt to regain the thrones of England and Scotland, resulting from the Immortal Seven's invitation to James' daughter and William's wife, Mary, to take the throne."
p1105
aS'It is regarded as a crucial moment in the struggle between Irish Protestant and Catholic interests.The previous year William had sent the Duke of Schomberg to take charge of the Irish campaign.'
p1106
aS'He was a 75-year-old professional soldier who had accompanied the King during the glorious revolution.'
p1107
aS'United_States forces bore the brunt of the attack and incurred their highest casualties for any operation during the war.'
p1108
aS"The battle also severely depleted Germany's armored forces on the western front which Germany was largely unable to replace."
p1109
aS'German personnel and Luftwaffe aircraft also sustained heavy losses.Different forces referred to the battle by different names.'
p1110
aS'The Germans referred to it as Unternehmen Wacht am Rhein ("Operation Watch on the Rhine"), while the French named it the Bataille des Ardennes ("Battle of the Ardennes").'
p1111
aS'The Allies called it the Ardennes Counteroffensive.'
p1112
aS'The phrase "Battle_of_the_Bulge" was coined by contemporary press to describe the way the Allied front line bulged inward on wartime news maps and became the most widely used name for the battle.The German offensive was supported by several subordinate operations known as Unternehmen Bodenplatte, Greif, and Wahrung.'
p1113
aS"As well as stopping Allied transport over the channel to the harbor of Antwerp, these operations were intended to split the British and American Allied line in half, so the Germans could then proceed to encircle and destroy four Allied armies, forcing the Western Allies to negotiate a peace treaty in the Axis Powers' favor."
p1114
aS'Procter was forced to retreat north up the river Thames to Moraviantown, where his allies, the tribal confederacy under Shawnee leader Tecumseh, had no choice but to follow.'
p1115
aS"American infantry and cavalry under future president William Henry Harrison drove off the outnumbered British, demoralised by Tecumseh's death in action."
p1116
aS'American control over the Northwest frontier was re-established, the tribal confederacy collapsed, and Procter would later be court-martialled for his poor leadership. Background During the last months of 1812 and for much of 1813, the American Army of the Northwest under William Henry Harrison was attempting to recover Detroit and capture Fort Amherstburg at Amherstburg from the "Right Division" of the British Army in Upper Canada, which was commanded by Major General Henry Procter.The British position depended on maintaining command of Lake Erie.'
p1117
aS"The sparsely populated region produced insufficient crops and cattle to feed Procter's troops, the sailors of the British ships on the Lake, and above all the large numbers of Native warriors and their families gathered at Amherstburg under Tecumseh; supplies could effectively be brought to them only by ships on the lake."
p1118
aS'Also, if naval command of Lake Erie passed to the Americans, they would be able to land an army on the north shore at any point of their choosing, cutting off Procter from reinforcement from the east.From the start of the war to the end of July 1813, the British ships, which since May 5, 1813 were led by Commander Robert Heriot Barclay, had maintained control of the lake.'
p1119
aS'They contained the American squadron under Master Commandant Oliver Hazard Perry at Presque Isle harbour.'
p1120
aS'When Barclay lifted the blockade for two days in order to receive supplies, Perry was able to move his ships across the sandbar at the entrance to the harbour and into the lake.'
p1121
aS'After a brief battle, nearly the entire Hessian force was captured, with negligible losses to the Americans.'
p1122
aS"The battle significantly boosted the Continental Army's flagging morale, and inspired reenlistments.The Continental Army had previously suffered several defeats in New York and had been forced to retreat through New Jersey to Pennsylvania."
p1123
aS'Morale in the army was low; to end the year on a positive note, George_Washington--Commander-in-Chief of the Continental Army--devised a plan to cross the Delaware River on the night of December 25-26 and surround the Hessian garrison.Because the river was icy and the weather severe, the crossing proved dangerous.'
p1124
aS'Two detachments were unable to cross the river, leaving Washington with only 2,400 men under his command in the assault.'
p1125
aS'The army marched 9 miles (14 km) south to Trenton.'
p1126
aS'The Hessians had lowered their guard, thinking they were safe from the American army, and had no long-distance outposts or patrols.'
p1127
aS"Washington's forces caught them off guard and, after a short but fierce resistance, most of the Hessians surrendered."
p1128
aS'Despite Hannibal possessing numerical superiority, Scipio conceived a strategy to confuse and defeat his war elephants.'
p1129
aS"Scipio's troops then routed the Carthaginian infantry, thanks in part to superior Roman cavalry.Soon after this defeat on their home ground, the Carthaginian senate sued for peace, which was given to them by the Roman Republic on rather humiliating terms, ending the 17-year war. PreludeEdit Crossing the Alps, Hannibal reached the Italian peninsula in 218 BC and won several major victories against the Roman armies."
p1130
aS'Having failed to defeat Hannibal or drive him from Italy, the Romans changed strategy and decided to attack Carthage, forcing the Carthaginians to recall Hannibal.'
p1131
aS"He was still in Italy, although confined to the south of the peninsula, when Scipio landed in Africa in 203 BC.Following Scipio's decisive victory at the Battle of Ilipa in Spain in 206 BC, Iberia had been secured by the Romans."
p1132
aS'In 205 BC, Scipio returned to Rome, where he was elected consul with a unanimous vote.'
p1133
aS'Scipio, now powerful enough, proposed to end the war by directly invading the Carthaginian home land.The Senate initially opposed this ambitious design of Scipio, persuaded by Fabius Maximus that the enterprise was far too hazardous.'
p1134
aS'However, Scipio and his supporters eventually convinced the Senate to ratify the plan, and Scipio was given the requisite authority to attempt the invasion.'
p1135
aS'Burgoyne fought two small battles to break out.'
p1136
aS'They took place eighteen days apart on the same ground, 9 miles (14 km) south of Saratoga, New York.'
p1137
aS'They both failed.'
p1138
aS'Trapped by superior American forces, with no relief in sight, Burgoyne surrendered his entire army on October 17.'
p1139
aS'His surrender, says historian Edmund Morgan, "was a great turning point of the war, because it won for Americans the foreign assistance which was the last element needed for victory.Burgoyne\'s strategy to divide New England from the southern colonies had started well, but slowed due to logistical problems.'
p1140
aS"He won a small tactical victory over General Horatio Gates and the Continental Army in the September 19 Battle of Freeman's Farm at the cost of significant casualties."
p1141
aS'His gains were erased when he again attacked the Americans in the October 7 Battle of Bemis Heights and the Americans captured a portion of the British defenses.'
p1142
aS'Although only eight species of bears are extant, they are widespread, appearing in a wide variety of habitats throughout the Northern Hemisphere and partially in the Southern Hemisphere.'
p1143
aS'Bears are found on the continents of North America, South America, Europe, and Asia.Common characteristics of modern bears include large bodies with stocky legs, long snouts, shaggy hair, plantigrade paws with five nonretractile claws, and short tails.'
p1144
aS'While the polar bear is mostly carnivorous, and the giant panda feeds almost entirely on bamboo, the remaining six species are omnivorous with varied diets.With the exception of courting individuals and mothers with their young, bears are typically solitary animals.'
p1145
aS'They are generally diurnal, but may be active during the night (nocturnal) or twilight (crepuscular), particularly around humans.'
p1146
aS'Bears possess an excellent sense of smell and, despite their heavy build and awkward gait, are adept runners, climbers, and swimmers.'
p1147
aS'In autumn, some bear species forage large amounts of fermented fruits, which affects their behaviour.'
p1148
aS'Bears use shelters, such as caves and burrows, as their dens; most species occupy their dens during the winter for a long period (up to 100 days) of sleep similar to hibernation.Bears have been hunted since prehistoric times for their meat and fur.'
p1149
aS'Internationally he is best known for his opera The Bartered Bride; for the symphonic cycle Ma vlast ("My Homeland"), which portrays the history, legends and landscape of the composer\'s native land; and for his First String Quartet, From My Life.Smetana was naturally gifted as a pianist, and gave his first public performance at the age of six.'
p1150
aS'After his conventional schooling, he studied music under Josef Proksch in Prague.'
p1151
aS'His first nationalistic music was written during the 1848 Prague uprising, in which he briefly participated.'
p1152
aS'After failing to establish his career in Prague, he left for Sweden, where he set up as a teacher and choirmaster in Gothenburg, and began to write large-scale orchestral works.'
p1153
aS'During this period of his life Smetana was twice married; of six daughters, three died in infancy.In the early 1860s, a more liberal political climate in Bohemia encouraged Smetana to return permanently to Prague.'
p1154
aS'He threw himself into the musical life of the city, primarily as a champion of the new genre of Czech opera.'
p1155
aS"In 1866 his first two operas, The Brandenburgers in Bohemia and The Bartered Bride, were premiered at Prague's new Provisional Theatre, the latter achieving great popularity."
p1156
aS'There are nearly 20,000 known species of bees in seven to nine recognized families, though many are undescribed and the actual number is probably higher.'
p1157
aS'They are found on every continent except Antarctica, in every habitat on the planet that contains insect-pollinated flowering plants.Bees are adapted for feeding on nectar and pollen, the former primarily as an energy source and the latter primarily for protein and other nutrients.'
p1158
aS'Most pollen is used as food for larvae.'
p1159
aS'Bee pollination is important both ecologically and commercially; the decline in wild bees has increased the value of pollination by commercially-managed hives of honey bees.Bees range in size from tiny stingless bee species whose workers are less than 2 millimetres (0.08 in) long, to Megachile pluto, the largest species of leafcutter bee, whose females can attain a length of 39 millimetres (1.54 in).'
p1160
aS'The most common bees in the Northern Hemisphere are the Halictidae, or sweat bees, but they are small and often mistaken for wasps or flies.'
p1161
aS'Vertebrate predators of bees include birds such as bee-eaters; insect predators include beewolves and dragonflies.Human beekeeping or apiculture has been practised for millennia, since at least the times of Ancient Egypt and Ancient Greece.'
p1162
aS'Apart from honey and pollination, honey bees produce beeswax, royal jelly and propolis.'
p1163
aS'The city proper is the 3rd largest in the world.'
p1164
aS'The metropolis, located in northern China, is governed as a direct-controlled municipality under the national government, with 14 urban and suburban districts and two rural counties.'
p1165
aS"Beijing Municipality is surrounded by Hebei Province with the exception of neighboring Tianjin Municipality to the southeast.Beijing is the second largest Chinese city by urban population after Shanghai and is the nation's political, cultural, and educational center."
p1166
aS"It is home to the headquarters of most of China's largest state-owned companies, and is a major hub for the national highway, expressway, railway, and high-speed rail networks."
p1167
aS"The Beijing Capital International Airport is the second busiest in the world by passenger traffic.The city's history dates back three millennia."
p1168
aS'As the last of the Four Great Ancient Capitals of China, Beijing has been the political center of the country for much of the past eight centuries.'
p1169
aS'The city is renowned for its opulent palaces, temples, parks and gardens, tombs, walls and gates, and its art treasures and universities have made it a center of culture and art in China.'
p1170
aS'Through his collection and analytical study of folk music, he was one of the founders of comparative musicology, which later became ethnomusicology. Biography  Childhood and early years (1881-98) Bela_Bartok was born in the small Banatian town of Nagyszentmiklos in the Kingdom of Hungary, Austria-Hungary (since 1920 Sannicolau Mare, Romania) on March 25, 1881.'
p1171
aS"Bartok's family reflected some of the ethno-cultural diversities of the country."
p1172
aS'His father, Bela Sr., considered himself thoroughly Hungarian, because on his father\'s side the Bartok family was a Hungarian lower noble family, originating from Borsod county (Moser 2006a, 44; Bartok 1981, 13), though his mother, Paula (born Paula Voit), had German as a mother tongue, but was ethnically of "mixed Hungarian" ancestry (Bayley 2001, 16) of Danube Swabian origin.'
p1173
aS'Among her closest forefathers there were families with such names as Polereczky (Magyarized Polish or Slovak) and Fegyveres (Magyar).Bela displayed notable musical talent very early in life: according to his mother, he could distinguish between different dance rhythms that she played on the piano before he learned to speak in complete sentences (Gillies 1990, 6).'
p1174
aS'By the age of four he was able to play 40 pieces on the piano and his mother began formally teaching him the next year.Bela was a small and sickly child and suffered from severe eczema until the age of 5 (Gillies 1990, 5).'
p1175
aS'In 1888, when he was seven, his father (the director of an agricultural school) died suddenly.'
p1176
aS"Bela's mother then took him and his sister, Erzsebet, to live in Nagyszolos (today Vinogradiv, Ukraine) and then to Pozsony (German: Pressburg, today Bratislava, Slovakia)."
p1177
aS'Belgium covers an area of 30,528 square kilometres (11,787 sq mi) and has a population of about 11 million people.Straddling the cultural boundary between Germanic and Latin Europe, Belgium is home to two main linguistic groups: the Dutch-speaking, mostly Flemish community, which constitutes about 59% of the population, and the French-speaking, mostly Walloon population, which comprises 41% of all Belgians.'
p1178
aS'Additionally, there is a small group of German-speakers who are officially recognized.Belgium is a federal constitutional monarchy with a parliamentary system of governance.'
p1179
aS'Its two largest regions are the Dutch-speaking region of Flanders in the north and the French-speaking southern region of Wallonia.'
p1180
aS'The Brussels-Capital Region, officially bilingual, is a mostly French-speaking enclave within the Flemish Region.'
p1181
aS'A German-speaking Community exists in eastern Wallonia.'
p1182
aS"Belgium's linguistic diversity and related political conflicts are reflected in its political history and complex system of government.Historically, Belgium, the Netherlands, and Luxembourg were known as the Low Countries; it once covered a somewhat larger area than the current Benelux group of states."
p1183
aS'The region was called Belgica in Latin, after the Roman province of Gallia Belgica, which covered more or less the same area.'
p1184
aS'Bellerophon was the son of the mortal Eurynome by either her husband Glaucus, or Poseidon. Etymology One possible etymology that has been suggested is: Bellerophontes from belemnon, belone, belos ("projectile, dart, javelin, needle, arrow, bullet") and -phontes ("slayer") from phoneuo ("to slay").'
p1185
aS'However, Geoffrey Kirk says that "Bellerophontes means \'slayer of Belleros\'".'
p1186
aS'Belleros could have been a Lycian, a local daimon or a Corinthian nobleman--Bellerophon\'s name "clearly invited all sorts of speculation". Bellerophon\'s myth The Iliad vi.155-203 contains an embedded narrative told by Bellerophon\'s grandson Glaucus, named for his great-grandfather, which recounts Bellerophon\'s myth.'
p1187
aS"Bellerophon's father was Glaucus, who was the king of Corinth and the son of Sisyphus."
p1188
aS"Bellerophon's grandsons Sarpedon and the younger Glaucus fought in the Trojan War."
p1189
aS'In the Epitome of pseudo-Apollodorus, a genealogy is given for Chrysaor ("of the golden sword") that would make him a double of Bellerophon; he too is called the son of Glaucus the son of Sisyphus.'
p1190
aS'Chrysaor has no myth save that of his birth: from the severed neck of Medusa, who was with child by Poseidon, he and Pegasus both sprang at the moment of her death.'
p1191
aS'He is best known for the satirical plays Every Man in His Humour (1598), Volpone, or The Foxe (1605), The Alchemist (1610), and Bartholomew Fayre: A Comedy (1614), and for his lyric poetry; he is generally regarded as the second most important English dramatist, after William_Shakespeare, during the reign of James I.Jonson was a classically educated, well-read, and cultured man of the English Renaissance with an appetite for controversy (personal and political, artistic and intellectual) whose cultural influence was of unparalleled breadth upon the playwrights and the poets of the Jacobean era (1603-1625) and of the Caroline era (1625-1642). Early life Ben_Jonson said that his family originally came from the folk of the Anglo-Scottish border country, which genealogy is verified by the three spindles (rhombi) in the Jonson family coat of arms.'
p1192
aS'One spindle is a diamond-shaped heraldic device shared with the Border-country Johnstone family of Annandale.'
p1193
aS"Jonson's clergyman father died two months before his birth; his mother married a master bricklayer two years later."
p1194
aS"Jonson attended school in St. Martin's Lane."
p1195
aS'Later, a family friend paid for his studies at Westminster School, where the antiquarian, historian, topographer, and officer of arms, William Camden (1551-1623) was one of his masters.'
p1196
aS"In the event, the pupil and the master became friends, and the intellectual influence of Camden's broad-ranging scholarship upon Jonson's art and literary style remained notable, until Camden's death in 1623.On leaving Westminster School, Jonson was to have attended the University of Cambridge, to continue his book learning; but did not, because of his unwilled apprenticeship to his bricklayer stepfather."
p1197
aS"According to the churchman and historian Thomas Fuller (1608-61), Jonson at this time built a garden wall in Lincoln's Inn."
p1198
aS'While a general on the American side, he obtained command of the fortifications at West Point, New York (future site of the U.S. Military Academy after 1802), overlooking the cliffs at the Hudson River (upriver from British- occupied New_York_City), and planned to surrender it to the British forces.'
p1199
aS'After the plan was exposed in September 1780, he was commissioned into the British Army as a brigadier general.Born in Connecticut, Arnold was a merchant operating ships on the Atlantic Ocean when the war broke out in 1775.'
p1200
aS'After joining the growing army outside Boston, he distinguished himself through acts of intelligence and bravery.'
p1201
aS"His actions included the Capture of Fort Ticonderoga in 1775, defensive and delaying tactics despite losing the Battle of Valcour Island on Lake Champlain in 1776, the Battle of Ridgefield, Connecticut (after which he was promoted to major general), operations in relief of the Siege of Fort Stanwix, and key actions during the pivotal Battles_of_Saratoga in 1777, in which he suffered leg injuries that ended his combat career for several years.Despite Arnold's successes, he was passed over for promotion by the Continental Congress while other officers claimed credit for some of his accomplishments."
p1202
aS'Adversaries in military and political circles brought charges of corruption or other malfeasance, but most often he was acquitted in formal inquiries.'
p1203
aS'Congress investigated his accounts and found he was indebted to Congress after spending much of his own money on the war effort.'
p1204
aS"Frustrated and bitter at this, as well the alliance with France and failure of Congress to accept Britain's 1778 proposal to grant full self-governance in the colonies, Arnold decided to change sides and opened secret negotiations with the British."
p1205
aS'Delano recounts how in 1805, his vessel Perseverance encountered the Spanish Tryal (not to be confused with the 17th-century British Tryall), a ship whose slaves had overthrown the Spanish sailors.'
p1206
aS"The narrative of events in the novel closely follows the actual event. Plot The story follows a sea captain, Amasa Delano, (the fictionalized version of a real-life adventurer by the same name) and his crew on the Bachelor's Delight as it is approached by another, rather battered-looking ship, the San Dominick."
p1207
aS'Upon boarding the San Dominick, Delano is immediately greeted by white sailors and black slaves begging for supplies.'
p1208
aS'An inquisitive Delano ponders the mysterious social atmosphere aboard the badly bruised ship and notes the figurehead, which is mostly concealed by a tarpaulin revealing only the inscription: "Follow your leader."'
p1209
aS"Delano soon encounters the ship's noticeably timid but polite Spanish captain, Don Benito_Cereno."
p1210
aS'Cereno is constantly attended to by his personal slave, Babo, whom Cereno keeps in close company even when Delano suggests that Babo leave the two in private to discuss matters that are clearly being avoided.'
p1211
aS"Delano, however, does not bother Cereno to ask questions about the odd superficiality of their conversation; he believes Cereno's assertion that he and his crew have recently gone through a debilitating series of troubles, having been at sea now for an unsettingly long time."
p1212
aS"His best-known works include the opera Peter Grimes (1945), the War Requiem (1962) and the orchestral showpiece The Young Person's Guide to the Orchestra (1945).Born in Suffolk, the son of a dentist, Britten showed talent from an early age."
p1213
aS'He studied at the Royal College of Music in London and privately with the composer Frank Bridge.'
p1214
aS'Britten first came to public attention with the a cappella choral work A Boy Was Born in 1934.'
p1215
aS'With the premiere of Peter Grimes in 1945, he leapt to international fame.'
p1216
aS'Over the next 28 years, he wrote 14 more operas, establishing himself as one of the leading 20th-century composers in the genre.'
p1217
aS'In addition to large-scale operas for Sadler\'s Wells and Covent Garden, he wrote "chamber operas" for small forces, suitable for performance in venues of modest size.'
p1218
aS'Among the best known of these is The_Turn_of_the_Screw (1954).'
p1219
aS'Disraeli is remembered for his influential voice in world affairs, his political battles with the Liberal leader William Ewart Gladstone, and his one-nation conservatism or "Tory democracy".'
p1220
aS'He made the Conservatives the party most identified with the glory and power of the British Empire.'
p1221
aS'He is, at 2015, the only British Prime Minister of Jewish birth.Disraeli was born in London.'
p1222
aS'His father left Judaism after a dispute at his synagogue; young Benjamin became an Anglican at the age of 12.'
p1223
aS'After several unsuccessful attempts, Disraeli entered the House of Commons in 1837.'
p1224
aS'When the Conservatives gained power in 1841, Disraeli was given no office by the Prime Minister, Sir Robert_Peel.'
p1225
aS'In 1846, Peel split the party over his proposal to repeal the Corn Laws, which imposed a tariff on imported grain.'
p1226
aS'A renowned polymath, Franklin was a leading author, printer, political theorist, politician, postmaster, scientist, inventor, civic activist, statesman, and diplomat.'
p1227
aS'As a scientist, he was a major figure in the American Enlightenment and the history of physics for his discoveries and theories regarding electricity.'
p1228
aS'As an inventor, he is known for the lightning rod, bifocals, and the Franklin stove, among other inventions.'
p1229
aS'He facilitated many civic organizations, including Philadelphia\'s fire department and a university.Franklin earned the title of "The First American" for his early and indefatigable campaigning for colonial unity, first as an author and spokesman in London for several colonies.'
p1230
aS'As the first United_States Ambassador to France, he exemplified the emerging American nation.'
p1231
aS'Franklin was foundational in defining the American ethos as a marriage of the practical values of thrift, hard work, education, community spirit, self-governing institutions, and opposition to authoritarianism both political and religious, with the scientific and tolerant values of the Enlightenment.'
p1232
aS'In the words of historian Henry Steele Commager, "In a Franklin could be merged the virtues of Puritanism without its defects, the illumination of the Enlightenment without its heat."'
p1233
aS'They were married for eighteen years before the birth of their first child.'
p1234
aS'Benvenuto was the second child of the family.'
p1235
aS'The son of a musician and builder of musical instruments, Cellini was pushed towards music, but when he was fifteen, his father reluctantly agreed to apprentice him to a goldsmith, Antonio di Sandro, nicknamed Marcone.'
p1236
aS'At the age of sixteen, Benvenuto had already attracted attention in Florence by taking part in an affray with youthful companions.'
p1237
aS'He was banished for six months and lived in Siena, where he worked for a goldsmith named Fracastoro (unrelated to the Veronese polymath).'
p1238
aS'From Siena he moved to Bologna, where he became a more accomplished flute player and made progress as a goldsmith.'
p1239
aS'After a visit to Pisa and two periods of living in Florence (where he was visited by the sculptor Torrigiano), he moved to Rome, at the age of nineteen. Work in Rome His first works in Rome were a silver casket, silver candlesticks, and a vase for the bishop of Salamanca, which won him the approval of Pope Clement VII.'
p1240
aS'Because its molecules contain only carbon and hydrogen atoms, benzene is classed as a hydrocarbon.Benzene is a natural constituent of crude oil, and is one of the most elementary petrochemicals.'
p1241
aS'Benzene is an aromatic hydrocarbon and the second [n]-annulene ([6]-annulene), a cyclic hydrocarbon with a continuous pi bond.'
p1242
aS'It is sometimes abbreviated Ph-H. Benzene is a colorless and highly flammable liquid with a sweet smell.'
p1243
aS'It is mainly used as a precursor to heavy chemicals, such as ethylbenzene and cumene, which are produced on a billion kilogram scale.'
p1244
aS'Because it has a high octane number, it is an important component of gasoline, comprising a few percent of its mass.'
p1245
aS'Most non-industrial applications have been limited by benzene\'s carcinogenicity. History  Discovery The word "benzene" derives historically from "gum benzoin" (benzoin resin), an aromatic resin known to European pharmacists and perfumers since the 15th century as a product of southeast Asia.'
p1246
aS'An acidic material was derived from benzoin by sublimation, and named "flowers of benzoin", or benzoic acid.'
p1247
aS'It was written in England some time between the 8th and the early 11th century.'
p1248
aS'The author was an anonymous Anglo-Saxon poet, referred to by scholars as the "Beowulf poet".The poem is set in Scandinavia.'
p1249
aS'Beowulf, a hero of the Geats, comes to the aid of Hrodgar, the king of the Danes, whose mead hall in Heorot has been under attack by a monster known as Grendel.'
p1250
aS"After Beowulf slays him, Grendel's mother attacks the hall and is then also defeated."
p1251
aS'Victorious, Beowulf goes home to Geatland (Gotaland in modern Sweden) and later becomes king of the Geats.'
p1252
aS'After a period of fifty years has passed, Beowulf defeats a dragon, but is fatally wounded in the battle.'
p1253
aS'After his death, his attendants bury him in a tumulus, a burial mound, in Geatland.The full poem survives in the manuscript known as the Nowell Codex, located in the British Library.'
p1254
aS'His mother, Charlotte Ebell, died before her children had reached adulthood.'
p1255
aS'Riemann was the second of six children, shy and suffering from numerous nervous breakdowns.'
p1256
aS'Riemann exhibited exceptional mathematical skills, such as calculation abilities, from an early age but suffered from timidity and a fear of speaking in public. Education During 1840, Riemann went to Hanover to live with his grandmother and attend lyceum (middle school).'
p1257
aS'After the death of his grandmother in 1842, he attended high school at the Johanneum Luneburg.'
p1258
aS'In high school, Riemann studied the Bible intensively, but he was often distracted by mathematics.'
p1259
aS"His teachers were amazed by his adept ability to perform complicated mathematical operations, in which he often outstripped his instructor's knowledge."
p1260
aS"In 1846, at the age of 19, he started studying philology and theology in order to become a pastor and help with his family's finances.During the spring of 1846, his father, after gathering enough money, sent Riemann to the renowned University of Gottingen, where he planned to study towards a degree in Theology."
p1261
aS'In fact, there are different forms of the Bernoulli equation for different types of flow.'
p1262
aS"The simple form of Bernoulli's_principle is valid for incompressible flows (e.g."
p1263
aS'most liquid flows and gases moving at low Mach number).'
p1264
aS"More advanced forms may in some cases be applied to compressible flows at higher Mach numbers (see the derivations of the Bernoulli equation).Bernoulli's_principle can be derived from the principle of conservation of energy."
p1265
aS'This states that, in a steady flow, the sum of all forms of energy in a fluid along a streamline is the same at all points on that streamline.'
p1266
aS'This requires that the sum of kinetic energy, potential energy and internal energy remains constant.'
p1267
aS'Thus an increase in the speed of the fluid - implying an increase in both its dynamic pressure and kinetic energy - occurs with a simultaneous decrease in (the sum of) its static pressure, potential energy and internal energy.'
p1268
aS"Bessel_functions for integer a are also known as cylinder functions or the cylindrical harmonics because they appear in the solution to Laplace's equation in cylindrical coordinates."
p1269
aS"Spherical Bessel_functions with half-integer a are obtained when the Helmholtz equation is solved in spherical coordinates. Applications of Bessel_functions Bessel's equation arises when finding separable solutions to Laplace's equation and the Helmholtz equation in cylindrical or spherical coordinates."
p1270
aS'Bessel_functions are therefore especially important for many problems of wave propagation and static potentials.'
p1271
aS'In solving problems in cylindrical coordinate systems, one obtains Bessel_functions of integer order (a  n); in spherical problems, one obtains half-integer orders (a  n+).'
p1272
aS'For example:Electromagnetic waves in a cylindrical waveguidePressure amplitudes of inviscid rotational flowsHeat conduction in a cylindrical objectModes of vibration of a thin circular (or annular) artificial membrane (such as a drum or other membranophone)Diffusion problems on a latticeSolutions to the radial Schrodinger equation (in spherical and cylindrical coordinates) for a free particleSolving for patterns of acoustical radiationFrequency-dependent friction in circular pipelinesDynamics of floating bodiesAngular resolutionBessel_functions also appear in other problems, such as signal processing (e.g., see FM synthesis, Kaiser window, or Bessel filter). Definitions Because this is a second-order differential equation, there must be two linearly independent solutions.'
p1273
aS'Depending upon the circumstances, however, various formulations of these solutions are convenient.'
p1274
aS"Different variations are summarized in the table below, and described in the following sections. Bessel_functions of the first kind: Ja Bessel_functions of the first kind, denoted as Ja(x), are solutions of Bessel's differential equation that are finite at the origin (x  0) for integer or positive a, and diverge as x approaches zero for negative non-integer a."
p1275
aS'The work moves into the realm "beyond good and evil" in the sense of leaving behind the traditional morality which Nietzsche subjects to a destructive critique in favour of what he regards as an affirmative approach that fearlessly confronts the perspectival nature of knowledge and the perilous condition of the modern individual. Background and themes Of the four "late-period" writings of Nietzsche, Beyond_Good_and_Evil most closely resembles the aphoristic style of his middle period.'
p1276
aS'In it he exposes the deficiencies of those usually called "philosophers" and identifies the qualities of the "new philosophers": imagination, self-assertion, danger, originality, and the "creation of values".'
p1277
aS'He then contests some of the key presuppositions of the old philosophic tradition like "self-consciousness," "knowledge," "truth," and "free will", explaining them as inventions of the moral consciousness.'
p1278
aS'In their place, he offers the "will to power" as an explanation of all behavior; this ties into his "perspective of life", which he regards as "beyond good and evil", denying a universal morality for all human beings.'
p1279
aS'Religion and the master and slave moralities feature prominently as Nietzsche re-evaluates deeply held humanistic beliefs, portraying even domination, appropriation and injury to the weak as not universally objectionable. Structure of the work The work consists of 296 numbered sections and an "epode" (or "aftersong") entitled "From High Mountains".'
p1280
aS'The sections are organized into nine parts:Part One: On the Prejudices of PhilosophersPart Two: The Free SpiritPart Three: The Religious EssencePart Four: Maxims and InterludesPart Five: On the Natural History of MoralsPart Six: We ScholarsPart Seven: Our VirtuesPart Eight: Peoples and FatherlandsPart Nine: What is Noble? On philosophers, free spirits, and scholars In the opening two parts of the book, Nietzsche discusses in turn the philosophers of the past, whom he accuses of a blind dogmatism plagued by moral prejudice masquerading as a search for objective truth; and the "free spirits", like himself, who are to replace them.He casts doubt on the project of past philosophy by asking why we should want the "truth" rather than recognizing untruth "as a condition of life."'
p1281
aS'He offers an entirely psychological explanation of every past philosophy: each has been an "involuntary and unconscious memoir" on the part of its author (SS6) and exists to justify his moral prejudices, which he solemnly baptizes as "truths".In one passage (SS34), Nietzsche writes that "from every point of view the erroneousness of the world in which we believe we live is the surest and firmest thing we can get our eyes on".'
p1282
aS"Bigger's lawyer makes the case that there is no escape from this destiny for his client or any other black American, since they are the necessary product of the society that formed them and told them since birth who exactly they were supposed to be."
p1283
aS'"No American Negro exists", James_Baldwin once wrote, "who does not have his private Bigger_Thomas living in his skull."'
p1284
aS'Frantz_Fanon discusses this feeling in his 1952 essay "L\'Experience Vecue du Noir", or "The Fact of Blackness".'
p1285
aS'"In the end", writes Fanon, "Bigger_Thomas acts.'
p1286
aS"To put an end to his tension, he acts, he responds to the world's anticipation."
p1287
aS'" Plot summary  Book One: Fear Bigger_Thomas wakes up in a dark, small room at the sound of the alarm clock.'
p1288
aS'He lives in one room with his brother Buddy, his sister Vera, and their mother.'
p1289
aS'After eating, this stored bile is discharged into the duodenum.'
p1290
aS'The composition of gallbladder bile is 97% water, 0.7% bile salts, 0.2% bilirubin, 0.51% fats (cholesterol, fatty acids and lecithin), and 200 meq/l inorganic salts. Function Bile acts to some extent as a surfactant, helping to emulsify the lipids in food.'
p1291
aS'Bile salt anions are hydrophilic on one side and hydrophobic on the other side; consequently, they tend to aggregate around droplets of lipids (triglycerides and phospholipids) to form micelles, with the hydrophobic sides towards the fat and hydrophilic sides facing outwards.'
p1292
aS'The hydrophilic sides are negatively charged, and this charge prevents fat droplets coated with bile from re-aggregating into larger fat particles.'
p1293
aS'Ordinarily, the micelles in the duodenum have a diameter around 14-33 mm.The dispersion of food fat into micelles thus provides a greatly increased surface area for the action of the enzyme pancreatic lipase, which actually digests the triglycerides, and is able to reach the fatty core through gaps between the bile salts.'
p1294
aS'A triglyceride is broken down into two fatty acids and a monoglyceride, which are absorbed by the villi on the intestine walls.'
p1295
aS'After being transferred across the intestinal membrane, the fatty acids reform into triglycerides, before being absorbed into the lymphatic system through lacteals.'
p1296
aS"It was acclaimed by British critics as a masterpiece when published in London, and quickly took its place among the canon of significant works in the United_States.The novella was discovered in manuscript form in 1919 by Raymond M. Weaver, who was studying Melville's papers as his first biographer."
p1297
aS"Melville's widow had begun to edit the manuscript, but had not been able to decide her husband's intentions at several key points or even to see his intended title."
p1298
aS"Poor transcription and misinterpretation of Melville's notes marred the first published versions of the text."
p1299
aS'After several years of study, Harrison Hayford and Merton M. Sealts, Jr. published what is now considered the best transcription and critical reading text in 1962.The novella was adapted as a stage play in 1951 and produced on Broadway, where it won the Donaldson Awards and Outer Critics Circle Awards for best play.'
p1300
aS"Benjamin_Britten adapted it as an opera by the same name, first performed in December 1951.The play was adapted into a film in 1962, produced, directed, co-written, and starring Peter Ustinov with Terence Stamp receiving an Academy Award nomination in his film debut. Plot The plot follows Billy_Budd, a seaman impressed into service aboard HMS Bellipotent in the year 1797, when the British Royal Navy was reeling from two major mutinies and was threatened by the Revolutionary French Republic's military ambitions."
p1301
aS'He is impressed from another ship, The Rights of Man (named after the book by Thomas Paine).'
p1302
aS'As his former ship moves off, Budd shouts, "Good-by to you too, old Rights-of-Man.'
p1303
aS'The birefringence is often quantified as the maximum difference between refractive indices exhibited by the material.'
p1304
aS'Crystals with asymmetric crystal structures are often birefringent, as are plastics under mechanical stress.Birefringence is responsible for the phenomenon of double refraction whereby a ray of light, when incident upon a birefringent material, is split by polarization into two rays taking slightly different paths.'
p1305
aS'This effect was first described by the Danish scientist Rasmus Bartholin in 1669, who observed it in calcite, a crystal having one of the strongest birefringences.'
p1306
aS'However it was not until the 19th century that Augustin-Jean Fresnel described the phenomenon in terms of polarization, understanding light as a wave with field components in transverse polarizations (perpendicular to the direction of the wave vector). Explanation The simplest (and most common) type of birefringence is described as uniaxial, meaning that there is a single direction governing the optical anisotropy whereas all directions perpendicular to it (or at a given angle to it) are optically equivalent.'
p1307
aS'Thus rotating the material around this axis does not change its optical behavior.'
p1308
aS'This special direction is known as the optic axis of the material.'
p1309
aS'Light whose polarization is perpendicular to the optic axis is governed by a refractive index no (for "ordinary").'
p1310
aS'They were so named due to the central conflict between Charles I, who favoured an episcopal system of church government for Scotland (that is, with bishops), and the desire of much of the polity of Scotland for a presbyterian system of governance (without bishops). Origins James VI of Scotland had reintroduced episcopacy to the Church of Scotland in 1584.'
p1311
aS'After acceding to the English throne, he increased the numbers of bishops.'
p1312
aS'His son, Charles I continually tried to foster uniformity between the established churches of his realms following the Anglican model.'
p1313
aS'His regulation of liturgy in Scotland through the imposition of a Book of Common Prayer in 1637 sparked rioting and led to a formalised opposition in the National Covenant.'
p1314
aS'His attempts to control the situation from London were unsuccessful, and by July 1638 he decided in his English Privy Council that force would have to be used.'
p1315
aS'To gain time he agreed to a General Assembly of the Church of Scotland which met at Glasgow in November 1638, but the Assembly firmly decided that bishops were to be deposed and the prayer book abolished.'
p1316
aS"Support for the Covenant grew under the leadership of James Graham, 1st Marquess of Montrose and Archibald Campbell, 8th Earl of Argyll, while soldiers serving abroad returned to Scotland, including General Alexander Leslie. First Bishops' War (1639) Despite problems in raising funds, Charles gathered a poorly trained English force of around 20,000 men in the early summer of 1639 and marched to the vicinity of Berwick-upon-Tweed on the English side of the border."
p1317
aS'Wright is a curious child living in a household of strict, religious women and violent, irresponsible men.'
p1318
aS'He quickly chafes against his surroundings, reading instead of playing with other children, and rejecting the church in favor of atheism at a young age.'
p1319
aS'He feels even more out of place as he grows older and comes in contact with the rampant racism of the 1920s south.'
p1320
aS"Not only he finds it generally unjust but he is especially bothered by whites' and other blacks' desire to quash his intellectual curiosity and potential.After his father deserts the family, young Wright is shuffled back and forth among his sick mother, his fanatically religious grandmother, and various aunts and uncles."
p1321
aS'As he ventures into the white world to find jobs, he encounters extreme racism and brutal violence, which stays with him the rest of his life.'
p1322
aS'The family is starving.'
p1323
aS'They have always viewed the north as a place of opportunity, so as soon as they can scrape together enough money, Richard and his aunt go to Chicago, promising to send for his mother and brother.'
p1324
aS'The boundary of the region from which no escape is possible is called the event horizon.'
p1325
aS'Although crossing the event horizon has enormous effect on the fate of the object crossing it, it appears to have no locally detectable features.'
p1326
aS'In many ways a black hole acts like an ideal black body, as it reflects no light.'
p1327
aS'Moreover, quantum field theory in curved spacetime predicts that event horizons emit Hawking radiation, with the same spectrum as a black body of a temperature inversely proportional to its mass.'
p1328
aS'This temperature is on the order of billionths of a kelvin for black holes of stellar mass, making it essentially impossible to observe.Objects whose gravitational fields are too strong for light to escape were first considered in the 18th century by John Michell and Pierre-Simon Laplace.'
p1329
aS'The first modern solution of general relativity that would characterize a black hole was found by Karl Schwarzschild in 1916, although its interpretation as a region of space from which nothing can escape was first published by David Finkelstein in 1958.'
p1330
aS'Long considered a mathematical curiosity, it was during the 1960s that theoretical work showed black holes were a generic prediction of general relativity.'
p1331
aS'The Bosphorus Strait connects it to the Sea of Marmara, and the Strait of the Dardanelles connects that sea to the Aegean Sea region of the Mediterranean.'
p1332
aS'These waters separate eastern Europe and western Asia.'
p1333
aS'The Black_Sea is also connected to the Sea of Azov by the Strait of Kerch.The Black_Sea has an area of 436,400 km2 (168,500 sq mi) (not including the Sea of Azov), a maximum depth of 2,212 m (7,257 ft), and a volume of 547,000 km3 (131,000 cu mi).'
p1334
aS'The Black_Sea forms in an east-west trending elliptical depression which lies between Bulgaria, Georgia, Romania, Russia, Turkey, and Ukraine.'
p1335
aS'It is constrained by the Pontic Mountains to the south and by the Caucasus Mountains to the east, and features a wide shelf to the northwest.'
p1336
aS'The longest east-west extent is about 1,175 km (730 mi).Important cities along the coast include Batumi, Burgas, Constanta, Giresun, Hopa, Istanbul, Kerch, Mangalia, Navodari, Novorossiysk, Odessa, Ordu, Poti, Rize, Sinop, Samsun, Sevastopol, Sochi, Sozopol, Sukhumi, Trabzon, Varna, Yalta and Zonguldak.The Black_Sea has a positive water balance; that is, a net outflow of water 300 km3 (72 cu mi) per year through the Bosphorus and the Dardanelles into the Aegean Sea.'
p1337
aS'Mediterranean water flows into the Black_Sea as part of a two-way hydrological exchange.'
p1338
aS'The novel follows the misfortunes of a handful of characters who are among the first to be stricken and centers on "the doctor\'s wife," her husband, several of his patients, and assorted others, thrown together by chance.'
p1339
aS"This group bands together in a family-like unit to survive by their wits and by the unexplained good fortune that the doctor's wife has escaped the blindness."
p1340
aS'The sudden onset and unexplained origin and nature of the blindness cause widespread panic, and the social order rapidly unravels as the government attempts to contain the apparent contagion and keep order via increasingly repressive and inept measures.The first part of the novel follows the experiences of the central characters in the filthy, overcrowded asylum where they and other blind people have been quarantined.'
p1341
aS'Hygiene, living conditions, and morale degrade horrifically in a very short period, mirroring the society outside.Anxiety over the availability of food, caused by delivery irregularities, acts to undermine solidarity; and lack of organization prevents the internees from fairly distributing food or chores.'
p1342
aS'Soldiers assigned to guard the asylum and look after the well-being of the internees become increasingly antipathetic as one soldier after another becomes infected.'
p1343
aS'The military refuse to allow in basic medicines, so that a simple infection becomes deadly.'
p1344
aS'Fearing a break out, soldiers shoot down a crowd of internees waiting upon food delivery.Conditions degenerate further, as an armed clique gains control over food deliveries, subjugating their fellow internees and exposing them to rape and deprivation.'
p1345
aS'Blues with a higher frequency and thus a shorter wavelength gradually look more violet, while those with a lower frequency and a longer wavelength gradually appear more green.'
p1346
aS'Pure blue, in the middle, has a wavelength of 470 nanometres.'
p1347
aS'In painting and traditional colour theory, blue is one of the three primary colours of pigments, along with red and yellow, which can be mixed to form a wide gamut of colours.'
p1348
aS'Red and blue mixed together form violet, blue and yellow together form green.'
p1349
aS'Blue is also a primary colour in the RGB color model, used to create all the colors on the screen of a television or computer monitor.The modern English word blue comes from Middle English bleu or blewe, from the Old French bleu, a word of Germanic origin, related to the Old High German word blao.'
p1350
aS'The clear sky and the deep sea appear blue because of an optical effect known as Rayleigh scattering.'
p1351
aS'When sunlight passes through the atmosphere, the blue wavelengths are scattered more widely by the oxygen and nitrogen molecules, and more blue comes to our eyes.'
p1352
aS'However, boats such as the whaleboat were designed for operation from a ship in an offshore environment.'
p1353
aS'In naval terms, a boat is a vessel small enough to be carried aboard another vessel (a ship).'
p1354
aS'Another less restrictive definition is a vessel that can be lifted out of the water.'
p1355
aS'Some definitions do not make a distinction in size, as bulk freighters 1,000 feet (300 m) long on the Great Lakes are called oreboats.'
p1356
aS"For reasons of naval tradition, submarines are usually referred to as 'boats' rather than 'ships', regardless of their size and shape.Boats have a wide variety of shapes and sizes and construction methods due to their intended purpose, available materials or local traditions."
p1357
aS'Canoe type boats have a long history and various versions are used throughout the world for transportation, fishing or sport.'
p1358
aS'Fishing boats vary widely in style partly to match local conditions.'
p1359
aS'Traditionally, a bodhisattva is anyone who, motivated by great compassion, has generated bodhicitta, which is a spontaneous wish to attain Buddhahood for the benefit of all sentient beings.'
p1360
aS'According to Tibetan Buddhism, a Bodhisattva is one of the four sublime states a human can achieve in life (the others being an Arhat, Buddha, or Pratyekabuddha).Usage of the term bodhisattva has evolved over time.'
p1361
aS'In early Indian Buddhism, for example, the term bodhisattva was primarily used to refer specifically to the Buddha in his former lives.'
p1362
aS'The Jatakas, which are the stories of his lives, depict the various attempts of the bodhisattva to embrace qualities like self-sacrifice and morality.'
p1363
aS'The bodhisattva is a popular subject in Buddhist art. In Theravada Buddhism The term "bodhisatta" (Pali language) was used by the Buddha in the Pali canon to refer to himself both in his previous lives and as a young man in his current life, prior to his enlightenment, in the period during which he was working towards his own liberation.'
p1364
aS'When, during his discourses, he recounts his experiences as a young aspirant, he regularly uses the phrase "When I was an unenlightened bodhisatta..." The term therefore connotes a being who is "bound for enlightenment", in other words, a person whose aim is to become fully enlightened.'
p1365
aS'In the Pali canon, the bodhisatta is also described as someone who is still subject to birth, illness, death, sorrow, defilement, and delusion.'
p1366
aS"This helped the movement spread quickly in the Balkans, gradually expanding throughout the Byzantine Empire and later reaching Kievan Rus', Bosnia, Dalmatia, Rascia, Italy, France.The Bogomils were dualists in that they believed the world was created not by the Abrahamic God, but by an evil demiurge--the Devil."
p1367
aS'They did not use the cross nor build churches, preferring to perform rituals outdoors. Etymology The term Bogomil in free translation means "dear to God", and is a compound of the Slavic words for "god" (Common Slavic: *bog\') and "dear" (Common Slavic: *mil\').'
p1368
aS'It may be also a translation of the Greek name Theophilos, literally "dear to God; loved by the gods," from theos "god" + philos "loved, beloved".'
p1369
aS'It is difficult to ascertain whether the name was taken from the reputed founder of that movement, the priest Bogomil (Bulgarian: Bogomil), or whether he assumed that name after it had been given to the sect itself.'
p1370
aS'The word is an Old Church Slavonic calque of Massaliani, the Syriac name of the sect corresponding to the Greek Euchites.'
p1371
aS'The Bogomils are identified with the Messalians in Slavonic documents from the 13th century.The members are referred to as Babuni in Church Slavonic documents, which originally meant "superstition; superstitious person" (Common Slavic *babon\', *babun\' *babona).'
p1372
aS'Toponyms which retain the name include the river Babuna, the mountain Babuna, the Bogomila Waterfall and village Bogomila, all in the region of Azot today in central Republic of Macedonia, suggests that the movement was very active in the region. Sources Much of their literature has been lost or destroyed by the contemporary Christian Churches.'
p1373
aS'Although only one-third of the country is located in the Andean mountain range, its largest city and principal economic centers are in the highlands.Prior to Spanish colonization, the Andean region of Bolivia was a part of the Inca_Empire, while the northern and eastern lowlands were inhabited by independent tribes.'
p1374
aS'Spanish conquistadors arriving from Cuzco and Asuncion took control of the region in the 16th century.'
p1375
aS'During most of the Spanish colonial period, Bolivia was known as Upper Peru and administered by the Royal Court of Charcas.'
p1376
aS"Spain built its empire in great part upon the silver that was extracted from Bolivia's mines."
p1377
aS'After the first call for independence in 1809, 16 years of war followed before the establishment of the Republic, named for Simon_Bolivar, on 6 August 1825.'
p1378
aS'Since independence, Bolivia has endured periods of political and economic instability, including the loss of various peripheral territories to its neighbors, such as Acre and parts of the Gran Chaco.'
p1379
aS"It has been landlocked since it lost its Pacific coast territory to Chile in the War of the Pacific (1879-84), but agreements with neighbouring countries have granted it indirect access to the Pacific and Atlantic oceans.The country's population, estimated at 10 million, is multiethnic, including Amerindians, Mestizos, Europeans, Asians and Africans."
p1380
aS'The first sermon recapitulates the forty years of wilderness wanderings which have led to this moment, and ends with an exhortation to observe the law (or teachings), later referred to as the Law of Moses; the second reminds the Israelites of the need for exclusive allegiance to one God and observance of the laws (or teachings) he has given them, on which their possession of the land depends; and the third offers the comfort that even should Israel prove unfaithful and so lose the land, with repentance all can be restored.Traditionally seen as the words of Moses delivered before the conquest of Canaan, modern scholarship sees its origins in traditions from Israel (the northern kingdom) brought south to the Kingdom of Judah in the wake of the Assyrian destruction of Samaria (8th century BC) and then adapted to a program of nationalist reform in the time of King Josiah (late 7th century), with the final form of the modern book emerging in the milieu of the return from the Babylonian exile during the late 6th century.One of its most significant verses is Deuteronomy 6:4, the Shema, which has become the definitive statement of Jewish identity: "Hear, O Israel: the LORD our God, the LORD is one."'
p1381
aS'Verses 6:4-5 were also quoted by Jesus in Mark 12:28-34 as part of the Great Commandment. Contents  Structure Patrick D. Miller in his commentary on Deuteronomy suggests that different views of the structure of the book will lead to different views on what it is about.'
p1382
aS'The structure is often described as a series of three speeches or sermons (chapters 1:1-4:43, 4:44-29:1, 29:2-30:20) followed by a number of short appendices - Miller refers to this as the "literary" structure; alternatively, it is sometimes seen as a ring-structure with a central core (chapters 12-26, the Deuteronomic code) and an inner and an outer frame (chapters 4-17-30 and 1-3/31-34) - Miller calls this the covenantal substructure; and finally the theological structure revealed in the theme of the exclusive worship of Yahweh established in the first of the Ten Commandments ("Thou shalt have no other god before me") and the shema ("Hear O Israel, the LORD our God is One!'
p1383
aS'") Summary (The following "literary" outline of Deuteronomy is from John Van Seters; it can be contrasted with Alexander Rofe\'s "covenantal" analysis in his Deuteronomy: Issues and Interpretation.'
p1384
aS')Chapters 1-4: The journey through the wilderness from Horeb (Sinai) to Kadesh and then to Moab is recalled.Chapters 4-11: After a second introduction at 4:44-49 the events at Mount Horeb (Mt.'
p1385
aS'Sinai) are recalled, with the giving of the Ten Commandments.'
p1386
aS"Heads of families are urged to instruct those under their care in the law, warnings are made against serving gods other than Yahweh, the land promised to Israel is praised, and the people are urged to obedience.Chapters 12-26, the Deuteronomic code: Laws governing Israel's worship (chapters 12-16a), the appointment and regulation of community and religious leaders (16b-18), social regulation (19-25), and confession of identity and loyalty (26).Chapters 27-28: Blessings and curses for those who keep and break the law.Chapters 29-30: Concluding discourse on the covenant in the land of Moab, including all the laws in the Deuteronomic code (chapters 12-26) after those given at Horeb; Israel is again exhorted to obedience.Chapters 31-34: Joshua is installed as Moses' successor, Moses delivers the law to the Levites (priests), and ascends Mount Nebo/Pisgah, where he dies and is buried by God."
p1387
aS"At God's command Abraham descends from his home into the land of Canaan, given to him by God, where he dwells as a sojourner, as does his son Isaac and his grandson Jacob."
p1388
aS"Jacob's name is changed to Israel, and through the agency of his son Joseph, the children of Israel descend into Egypt, 70 people in all with their households, and God promises them a future of greatness."
p1389
aS'Genesis ends with Israel in Egypt, ready for the coming of Moses and the Exodus.'
p1390
aS'The narrative is punctuated by a series of covenants with God, successively narrowing in scope from all mankind (the covenant with Noah) to a special relationship with one people alone (Abraham and his descendants through Isaac and Jacob).The book\'s author or authors appear to have structured it around ten "toledot" sections (the "these are the generations of..." phrases), but modern commentators see it in terms of a "primeval history" (chapters 1-11) followed by the cycle of Patriarchal stories (chapters 12-50).'
p1391
aS'In Judaism, the theological importance of Genesis centers on the covenants linking God to his chosen people and the people to the Promised Land.'
p1392
aS'Christianity has interpreted Genesis as the prefiguration of certain cardinal Christian beliefs, primarily the need for salvation (the hope or assurance of all Christians) and the redemptive act of Christ on the Cross as the fulfillment of covenant promises as the Son of God.Tradition credits Moses as the author of Genesis, as well as Exodus, Leviticus, Numbers and most of Deuteronomy, but modern scholars increasingly see them as a product of the 6th and 5th centuries BC. Structure Genesis appears to be structured around the recurring phrase elleh toledot, meaning "these are the generations," with the first use of the phrase referring to the "generations of heaven and earth" and the remainder marking individuals--Noah, the "sons of Noah", Shem, etc., down to Jacob.'
p1393
aS'It is not clear, however, what this meant to the original authors, and most modern commentators divide it into two parts based on subject matter, a "primeval history" (chapters 1-11) and a "patriarchal history" (chapters 12-50).'
p1394
aS'The scholarly consensus which held sway through most of the 20th century saw it as three separate collections of oracles: Proto-Isaiah (chapters 1-39), containing the words of Isaiah; Deutero-Isaiah (chapters 40-55), the work of an anonymous 6th-century author writing during the Exile; and Trito-Isaiah (chapters 56-66), composed after the return from exile.'
p1395
aS"While virtually no-one today maintains that the entire book, or even most of it, was written by one person, a great deal of current research concentrates on the book's essential unity, with Isaiah 1-33 projecting judgement and restoration for Judah, Jerusalem and the nations, and chapters 34-66 presupposing that judgement has already taken place and restoration is at hand."
p1396
aS"It can thus be read as an extended meditation on the destiny of Jerusalem into and after the Exile.The book tells how God will make Jerusalem the centre of his worldwide rule through a royal saviour (a messiah) who will destroy her oppressor (Babylon); this messiah is the Persian king Cyrus_the_Great, but he will be no more than the agent who brings about Yahweh's kingship."
p1397
aS"Isaiah speaks for the poor and the oppressed and against corrupt princes and judges, but unlike the prophets Amos and Micah he roots righteousness not in Israel's covenant with God but in God's holiness."
p1398
aS'Isaiah 44:6 contains the first clear statement of monotheism: "I am the first and I am the last; besides me there is no god".'
p1399
aS'This model of monotheism became the defining characteristic of post-Exilic Judaism, and the basis for Christianity and Islam.Isaiah was one of the most popular works among Jews in the period between the foundation of the Second Temple c. 515 BCE and its destruction by the Romans in 70 CE.'
p1400
aS'In Christian circles it was held in such high regard as to be called "the Fifth Gospel", and its influence extends beyond the Church and Christianity to English literature and to Western culture in general, from the libretto of Handel\'s Messiah to a host of such everyday phrases as "swords into ploughshares" and "voice in the wilderness". Structure The scholarly consensus which held sway through most of the 20th century saw three separate collections of oracles in the book of Isaiah.'
p1401
aS'The English name is from the Latin Leviticus, taken in turn from Greek and a reference to the Levites, the tribe of Aaron, from whom the priests descended.'
p1402
aS'The book, however, addresses all the people of Israel (1:2) though some passages address the priests specifically (6:8).'
p1403
aS"Most of its chapters (1-7, 11-27) consist of God's speeches to Moses which he is commanded to repeat to the Israelites."
p1404
aS"This takes place within the story of the Israelites' Exodus after they escaped Egypt and reached Mt."
p1405
aS'Sinai (Exodus 19:1).'
p1406
aS"The book of Exodus narrates how Moses led the Israelites in building the Tabernacle (Exodus 35-40) based on God's instructions (Exodus 25-31)."
p1407
aS'Then in Leviticus, God tells the Israelites and their priests how to make offerings in the Tabernacle and how to conduct themselves while camped around the holy tent sanctuary.'
p1408
aS"Smith said that the last prophet to contribute to the book, a man named Moroni, buried it in a hill in present-day New York, then returned to earth in 1827 as an angel, revealing the location of the book to Smith, and instructing him to translate it into English for use in the restoration of Christ's true church in the latter days."
p1409
aS'Critics claim that it was fabricated by Smith, drawing on material and ideas from contemporary 19th-century works rather than translating an ancient record.The Book_of_Mormon has a number of original and distinctive doctrinal discussions on subjects such as the fall of Adam and Eve, the nature of the Atonement, eschatology, redemption from physical and spiritual death, and the organization of the latter-day church.'
p1410
aS"The pivotal event of the book is an appearance of Jesus Christ in the Americas shortly after his resurrection.The Book_of_Mormon is the earliest of the unique writings of the Latter Day Saint movement, the denominations of which typically regard the text primarily as scripture, and secondarily as a historical record of God's dealings with the ancient inhabitants of the Americas."
p1411
aS'The Book_of_Mormon is divided into smaller books, titled after the individuals named as primary authors and, in most versions, divided into chapters and verses.'
p1412
aS'It is written in English very similar to the Early Modern English linguistic style of the King James Version of the Bible, and has since been fully or partially translated into 108 languages.'
p1413
aS'As of 2011, more than 150 million copies of the Book_of_Mormon have been published. OriginEdit According to Joseph Smith, when he was seventeen years of age an angel of God named Moroni appeared to him and said that a collection of ancient writings, engraved on golden plates by ancient prophets, was buried in a nearby hill in present-day Wayne County, New York.'
p1414
aS"The writings were said to describe a people whom God had led from Jerusalem to the Western hemisphere 600 years before Jesus' birth."
p1415
aS'Approximately 73% of the island is Indonesian territory.'
p1416
aS'In the north, the East Malaysian states of Sabah and Sarawak make up about 26% of the island.'
p1417
aS'Additionally, the Malaysian federal territory of Labuan is situated on a small island just off the coast of Borneo.'
p1418
aS"The sovereign state of Brunei, located on the north coast, comprises about 1% of Borneo's land area."
p1419
aS'Borneo is home to one of the oldest rainforests in the world. Etymology The island is known by many names; internationally it is known as Borneo, after Brunei, derived from European historical contact with the kingdom in the 16th century during the Age of Exploration.'
p1420
aS'The name Brunei possibly was initially derived from the Sanskrit word "varun" (vrunn), meaning either "ocean" or the mythological Varuna, the "god of the ocean."'
p1421
aS'Indonesian natives called it Kalimantan, which was derived from the Sanskrit word Kalamanthana, meaning "burning weather island" (to describe its hot and humid tropical weather).Prior to that the island was also known by other names.'
p1422
aS'Einstein was impressed, translated the paper himself from English to German and submitted it for Bose to the Zeitschrift fur Physik, which published it.'
p1423
aS'(The Einstein manuscript, once believed to be lost, was found in a library at Leiden University in 2005.).'
p1424
aS"Einstein then extended Bose's ideas to matter in two other papers."
p1425
aS'The result of their efforts is the concept of a Bose gas, governed by Bose-Einstein statistics, which describes the statistical distribution of identical particles with integer spin, now called bosons.'
p1426
aS'Bosons, which include the photon as well as atoms such as helium-4 (4He), are allowed to share a quantum state.'
p1427
aS'Einstein proposed that cooling bosonic atoms to a very low temperature would cause them to fall (or "condense") into the lowest accessible quantum state, resulting in a new form of matter.In 1938 Fritz London proposed BEC as a mechanism for superfluidity in 4He and superconductivity.On June 5, 1995 the first gaseous condensate was produced by Eric Cornell and Carl Wieman at the University of Colorado at Boulder NIST-JILA lab, in a gas of rubidium atoms cooled to 170 nanokelvin (nK).'
p1428
aS'Shortly thereafter, Wolfgang Ketterle at MIT demonstrated important BEC properties.'
p1429
aS'British troops had been stationed in Boston, capital of the Province of Massachusetts Bay, since 1768 in order to protect and support crown-appointed colonial officials attempting to enforce unpopular Parliamentary legislation.'
p1430
aS'Amid ongoing tense relations between the population and the soldiers, a mob formed around a British sentry, who was subjected to verbal abuse and harassment.'
p1431
aS'He was eventually supported by eight additional soldiers, who were subjected to verbal threats and thrown objects.'
p1432
aS'They fired into the crowd, without orders, instantly killing three people and wounding others.'
p1433
aS'Two more people died later of wounds sustained in the incident.The crowd eventually dispersed after Acting Governor Thomas Hutchinson promised an inquiry, but reformed the next day, prompting the withdrawal of the troops to Castle Island.'
p1434
aS'Eight soldiers, one officer, and four civilians were arrested and charged with murder.'
p1435
aS'Defended by the lawyer and future American president, John_Adams, six of the soldiers were acquitted, while the other two were convicted of manslaughter and given reduced sentences.'
p1436
aS'The city proper covers 48 square miles (124 km2) with an estimated population of 655,884 in 2014, making it the largest city in New England and the 24th largest city in the United_States.'
p1437
aS'The city is the anchor of a substantially larger metropolitan area called Greater Boston, home to 4.5 million people and the tenth-largest metropolitan area in the country.'
p1438
aS'Greater Boston as a commuting region is home to 7.6 million people, making it the sixth-largest Combined Statistical Area in the United_States.One of the oldest cities in the United_States, Boston was founded on the Shawmut Peninsula in 1630 by Puritan settlers from England.'
p1439
aS'It was the scene of several key events of the American Revolution, such as the Boston_Massacre, the Boston Tea Party, the Battle of Bunker Hill, and the Siege of Boston.'
p1440
aS'Upon American independence from Great Britain, the city continued to be an important port and manufacturing hub, as well as a center for education and culture.'
p1441
aS'Through land reclamation and municipal annexation, Boston has expanded beyond the original peninsula.'
p1442
aS'Its rich history helps attract many tourists, with Faneuil Hall alone attracting over 20 million visitors per year.'
p1443
aS'Formerly the British protectorate of Bechuanaland, Botswana adopted its new name after becoming independent within the Commonwealth on 30 September 1966.'
p1444
aS'Since then, it has maintained a strong tradition of stable representative democracy, with a consistent record of uninterrupted democratic elections.Botswana is topographically flat, with up to 70 percent of its territory being the Kalahari Desert.'
p1445
aS'It is bordered by South Africa to the south and southeast, Namibia to the west and north, and Zimbabwe to the northeast.'
p1446
aS'Its border with Zambia to the north near Kazungula is poorly defined but at most is a few hundred metres long.A mid-sized country of just over 2 million people, Botswana is one of the most sparsely populated nations in the world.'
p1447
aS'Around 10 percent of the population lives in the capital and largest city, Gaborone.'
p1448
aS'Formerly one of the poorest countries in the world--with a GDP per capita of about US$70 per year in the late 1960s--Botswana has since transformed itself into one of the fastest-growing economies in the world, now boasting a GDP (purchasing power parity) per capita of about $18,825 per year as of 2015, which is one of the highest in Africa.'
p1449
aS'Its high gross national income (by some estimates the fourth-largest in Africa) gives the country a modest standard of living and the highest Human Development Index of continental Sub-Saharan Africa.Botswana is a member of the African Union, the Southern African Development Community, the Commonwealth of Nations, and the United Nations.'
p1450
aS'In the Ramayana and the Mahabharata, he is often referred to as the progenitor or great grandsire of all human beings.'
p1451
aS'He is not to be confused with the Supreme Cosmic Spirit in Hindu Vedanta philosophy known as Brahman, which is genderless.'
p1452
aS"Brahma's wife is Saraswati."
p1453
aS'Saraswati is also known by names such as Savitri and Gayatri, and has taken different forms throughout history.'
p1454
aS'Brahma is often identified with Prajapati, a Vedic deity.'
p1455
aS'Being the husband of Saraswati or Vaac Devi (the Goddess of Speech), Brahma is also known as "Vaagish," meaning "Lord of Speech and Sound". Etymology In Sanskrit grammar, the noun stem brahman forms two distinct nouns; one is a neuter noun brahman, whose nominative singular form is brahma brhm; this noun has a generalized and abstract meaning.Contrasted to the neuter noun is the masculine noun brahman, whose nominative singular form is brahma brhmaa.'
p1456
aS"This noun is used to refer to a person, and as the proper name of a deity Brahma it is the subject matter of the present article.Some of his other names are-Chaturmukha (cturmukh) - four facedKamalasana (kmlaasn) - having a lotus as his seatVedhas (vedhs) - creator Origin According to Shri Madha Bhagawata Mahapurana, Brahma was born through Vishnu's navel, Vishnu is the main source of whatsoever exists in the world; what is created is part of his own body.According to the Puranas, Brahma is self-born in the lotus flower."
p1457
aS'Huxley answered this book with a reassessment in an essay, Brave_New_World Revisited (1958), and with Island (1962), his final novel.In 1999, the Modern Library ranked Brave_New_World fifth on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century.'
p1458
aS'In 2003, Robert McCrum writing for The Observer included Brave_New_World chronologically at number 53 in "the top 100 greatest novels of all time", and the novel was listed at number 87 on the BBC\'s survey The Big Read. Title Brave_New_World\'s title derives from Miranda\'s speech in William_Shakespeare\'s The_Tempest, Act V, Scene I:O wonder!How many godly creatures are there here!How beauteous mankind is!'
p1459
aS"O brave new world,That has such people in't.This line itself is ironic; Miranda was raised for most of her life on an isolated island, and the only people she ever knew were her father and his servants, an enslaved savage, and spirits, notably Ariel."
p1460
aS'When she sees other people for the first time, she is overcome with excitement, and utters, among other praise, the famous line above.'
p1461
aS'However, what she is actually observing is not men acting in a refined or civilized manner, but rather representatives of the worst of humanity, who betrayed or tried to betray their brothers or leaders to get ahead.'
p1462
aS'Huxley employs the same irony when the "savage" John refers to what he sees as a "brave new world.'
p1463
aS'"Translations of the title often allude to similar expressions used in domestic works of literature in an attempt to capture the same irony: the French edition of the work is entitled Le Meilleur des mondes (The Best of All Worlds), an allusion to an expression used by the philosopher Gottfried Leibniz and satirised in Candide, Ou l\'Optimisme by Voltaire (1759). History Huxley wrote Brave_New_World in 1931 while he was living in England.'
p1464
aS'It is the largest Portuguese-speaking country in the world, and the only one in the Americas.Bounded by the Atlantic Ocean on the east, Brazil has a coastline of 7,491 km (4,655 mi).'
p1465
aS'It borders all other South American countries except Ecuador and Chile and occupies 47.3 percent of the continent of South America.'
p1466
aS'Its Amazon River basin includes a vast tropical forest, home to diverse wildlife, a variety of ecological systems, and extensive natural resources spanning numerous protected habitats.'
p1467
aS'This unique environmental heritage makes Brazil one of 17 megadiverse countries, and is the subject of significant global interest and debate regarding deforestation and environmental protection.Brazil was inhabited by numerous tribal nations prior to the landing of traveler Pedro Alvares Cabral in 1500, who claimed the area for the Portuguese Empire.'
p1468
aS'Brazil remained a Portuguese colony until 1808, when the capital of the empire was transferred from Lisbon to Rio_de_Janeiro after French forces invaded Portugal.'
p1469
aS'In 1815, it was elevated to the rank of kingdom upon the formation of the United Kingdom of Portugal, Brazil and the Algarves.'
p1470
aS'Its independence was achieved in 1822 with the creation of the Empire of Brazil, a unitary state governed under a constitutional monarchy and a parliamentary system.'
p1471
aS'Prior to his political career, he was a prominent lawyer and businessman in Montreal. Early life Mulroney was born on March 20, 1939, in Baie-Comeau, Quebec, a remote and isolated town in the eastern part of the province.'
p1472
aS"He is the son of Irish Canadian Catholic parents, Mary Irene (nee O'Shea) and Benedict Martin Mulroney, who was a paper mill electrician."
p1473
aS"Six of the couple's children survived infancy."
p1474
aS'As there was no English-language Catholic high school in Baie-Comeau, Mulroney completed his high school education at a Roman Catholic boarding school in Chatham, New Brunswick operated by St. Thomas University (in 2001, St. Thomas University named its newest academic building in his honour).'
p1475
aS"Benedict Mulroney worked overtime and ran a repair business to earn extra money for his children's education, and he encouraged his oldest son to attend university.Mulroney would frequently tell stories about newspaper publisher Robert R. McCormick, whose company had founded Baie-Comeau."
p1476
aS'Mulroney would sing Irish songs for McCormick, and the publisher would slip him $50.'
p1477
aS'He grew up speaking English and French fluently. Family On May 26, 1973, he married Mila Pivnicki, the daughter of a Serbian doctor, Dimitrije "Mita" Pivnicki, from Sarajevo.'
p1478
aS'This is achieved by an examination of the Roman Catholic, aristocratic Marchmain family, as seen by the narrator, Charles Ryder.In various letters, Waugh himself refers to the novel a number of times as his magnum opus; however, in 1950 he wrote to Graham_Greene stating "I re-read Brideshead_Revisited and was appalled."'
p1479
aS"In Waugh's preface to his revised edition of Brideshead (1959) the author explained the circumstances in which the novel was written, following a minor parachute accident in the six months between December 1943 and June 1944."
p1480
aS'He was mildly disparaging of the novel, stating; "It was a bleak period of present privation and threatening disaster - the period of soya beans and Basic English -- and in consequence the book is infused with a kind of gluttony, for food and wine, for the splendours of the recent past, and for rhetorical and ornamental language which now, with a full stomach, I find distasteful.'
p1481
aS'"In the United_States, Brideshead_Revisited was the Book of the Month Club selection for January 1946.'
p1482
aS'In 1998, the Modern Library ranked Brideshead_Revisited No.'
p1483
aS'80 on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century.'
p1484
aS'In 2003, the novel was listed at number 45 on the BBC survey The Big Read.'
p1485
aS'Designs of bridges vary depending on the function of the bridge, the nature of the terrain where the bridge is constructed and anchored, the material used to make it, and the funds available to build it. Etymology The Oxford English Dictionary traces the origin of the word bridge to an Old English word brycg, of the same meaning, derived from the hypothetical Proto-Germanic root brugjo.'
p1486
aS'There are cognates in other Germanic languages. History The first bridges made by humans were probably spans of cut wooden logs or planks and eventually stones, using a simple support and crossbeam arrangement.'
p1487
aS'Some early Americans used trees or bamboo poles to cross small caverns or wells to get from one place to another.'
p1488
aS'A common form of lashing sticks, logs, and deciduous branches together involved the use of long reeds or other harvested fibers woven together to form a connective rope capable of binding and holding together the materials used in early bridges.The Arkadiko Bridge is one of four Mycenaean corbel arch bridges part of a former network of roads, designed to accommodate chariots, between Tiryns and Epidauros in the Peloponnese, in Greece.'
p1489
aS'Dating to the Greek Bronze Age (13th century BC), it is one of the oldest arch bridges still in existence and use.'
p1490
aS'Several intact arched stone bridges from the Hellenistic era can be found in the Peloponnese in southern GreeceThe greatest bridge builders of antiquity were the ancient Romans.'
p1491
aS'The Romans built arch bridges and aqueducts that could stand in conditions that would damage or destroy earlier designs.'
p1492
aS'In 1914 he was given a chance to travel to New_Guinea accompanying anthropologist R.R.'
p1493
aS'Marett, but as World_War_I broke out and Malinowski was an Austrian subject, and thereby an enemy of the British commonwealth, he was unable to travel back to England.'
p1494
aS'The Australian government nonetheless provided him with permission and funds to undertake ethnographic work within their territories and Malinowski chose to go to the Trobriand Islands, in Melanesia where he stayed for several years, studying the indigenous culture.'
p1495
aS'Upon his return to England after the war he published his main work Argonauts of the Western Pacific (1922) which established him as one of the most important anthropologists in Europe of that time.'
p1496
aS'He took posts as lecturer and later as a chair in Anthropology at the LSE, attracting large numbers of students and exerting great influence on the development of British Social Anthropology.'
p1497
aS'Among his students in this period were such prominent anthropologists as Raymond Firth, E.E.'
p1498
aS'Evans-Pritchard, Hortense Powdermaker, Edmund Leach, Audrey Richards and Meyer Fortes.'
p1499
aS'Brown_dwarfs heavier than about 13 MJ are thought to fuse deuterium and those above ~65 MJ, fuse lithium as well.'
p1500
aS'Brown_dwarfs may be fully convective, with no layers or chemical differentiation by depth.The defining differences between a very-low-mass brown dwarf and a giant planet (~13 MJ) are debated.'
p1501
aS'One school of thought is based on formation; the other, on the physics of the interior.Part of the debate concerns whether "brown dwarfs" must, by definition, have experienced fusion at some point in their history.Stars are categorized by spectral class, with brown dwarfs being designated as types M, L, T, and Y.'
p1502
aS'Despite their name, brown dwarfs are of different colors.'
p1503
aS'Many brown dwarfs would likely appear magenta to the human eye, or possibly orange/red.'
p1504
aS'Brown_dwarfs are not very luminous at visible wavelengths.Some planets are known to orbit brown dwarfs: 2M1207b, MOA-2007-BLG-192Lb, and 2MASS J044144bAt a distance of about 6.5 light years, the nearest known brown dwarf is Luhman 16, a binary system of brown dwarfs discovered in 2013.'
p1505
aS'One brown dwarf, DENIS-P J082303.1-491201 b, from an ultracool binary system, has a mass of about 28 MJ, making it the largest known exoplanet (as of March 2014). History The objects now called "brown dwarfs" were theorized to exist in the 1960s.'
p1506
aS'In 1827, while looking through a microscope at particles trapped in cavities inside pollen grains in water, he noted that the particles moved through the water but was not able to determine the mechanisms that caused this motion.'
p1507
aS'Atoms and molecules had long been theorized as the constituents of matter, and many decades later, Albert Einstein published a paper in 1905 that explained in precise detail how the motion that Brown had observed was a result of the pollen being moved by individual water molecules.'
p1508
aS'This explanation of Brownian_motion served as definitive confirmation that atoms and molecules actually exist, and was further verified experimentally by Jean Perrin in 1908.'
p1509
aS'Perrin was awarded the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1926 "for his work on the discontinuous structure of matter" (Einstein had received the award five years earlier "for his services to theoretical physics" with specific citation of different research).'
p1510
aS'The direction of the force of atomic bombardment is constantly changing, and at different times the particle is hit more on one side than another, leading to the seemingly random nature of the motion.The mathematical model of Brownian_motion has numerous real-world applications.'
p1511
aS"For instance, Stock market fluctuations are often cited, although Benoit Mandelbrot rejected its applicability to stock price movements in part because these are discontinuous.Brownian_motion is among the simplest of the continuous-time stochastic (or probabilistic) processes, and it is a limit of both simpler and more complicated stochastic processes (see random walk and Donsker's theorem)."
p1512
aS'This universality is closely related to the universality of the normal distribution.'
p1513
aS'However, as Michael Rutter has observed, "Many people made a mistake in going from a statement which is undoubtedly true--that there is no evidence that autism has been caused by poor parenting--to the statement that it has been disproven.'
p1514
aS'It has not actually been disproven.'
p1515
aS'It has faded away simply because, on the one hand, of a lack of convincing evidence and on the other hand, an awareness that autism was a neurodevelopmental disorder of some kind.'
p1516
aS'"Bettelheim implied in several of his writings that he had written a PhD dissertation in the philosophy of education.'
p1517
aS'His actual PhD was in art history, and he had only taken three introductory courses in psychology.'
p1518
aS'A 2002 book on autism spectrum stated, "At the time, few people knew that Bettelheim had faked his credentials and was using fictional data to support his research.'
p1519
aS'" Background When his father died, Bettelheim left his studies at the University of Vienna to look after his family\'s sawmill.'
p1520
aS"The Greater Buenos_Aires conurbation, which also includes several Buenos_Aires Province districts, constitutes the third-largest conurbation in Latin America, with a population of around fifteen and a half million.The city of Buenos_Aires is neither part of Buenos_Aires Province nor the Province's capital; rather, it is an autonomous district."
p1521
aS'In 1880, after decades of political infighting, Buenos_Aires was federalized and removed from Buenos_Aires Province.'
p1522
aS'The city limits were enlarged to include the towns of Belgrano and Flores; both are now neighborhoods of the city.'
p1523
aS'The 1994 constitutional amendment granted the city autonomy, hence its formal name: Ciudad Autonoma de Buenos_Aires (Autonomous City of Buenos_Aires).'
p1524
aS'Its citizens first elected a Chief of Government (i.e.'
p1525
aS"Mayor) in 1996; before, the Mayor was directly appointed by the President of the Republic.Buenos_Aires is, along with Mexico City and Sao Paulo, one of the three Latin American cities considered an 'alpha city' by the study GaWC5."
p1526
aS"Buenos_Aires' quality of life was ranked 81st in the world and one of the best in Latin America in 2012, with its per capita income among the three highest in the region."
p1527
aS'Republika Balgarija), is a country in southeastern Europe.'
p1528
aS'It is bordered by Romania to the north, Serbia and Macedonia to the west, Greece and Turkey to the south, and the Black_Sea to the east.'
p1529
aS"With a territory of 110,994 square kilometres (42,855 sq mi), Bulgaria is Europe's 16th-largest country.Organised prehistoric cultures began developing on Bulgarian lands during the Neolithic period."
p1530
aS'Its ancient history saw the presence of the Thracians and later the Persians, Greeks and Romans.'
p1531
aS'The emergence of a unified Bulgarian state dates back to the establishment of the First Bulgarian Empire in 681 AD, which dominated most of the Balkans and functioned as a cultural hub for Slavs during the Middle Ages.'
p1532
aS'With the downfall of the Second Bulgarian Empire in 1396, its territories came under Ottoman rule for nearly five centuries.'
p1533
aS'The Russo-Turkish War (1877-78) led to the formation of the Third Bulgarian State.'
p1534
aS"Burma's recent census revealed a much lower population than expected, with 51 million people recorded."
p1535
aS'Burma is 676,578 square kilometres (261,227 sq mi) in size.'
p1536
aS"Burma's capital city is Naypyidaw and its largest city is Yangon (Rangoon).Early civilizations in Burma included the Tibeto-Burman-speaking Pyu in Upper Burma and the Mon in Lower Burma."
p1537
aS'In the 9th century, the Burmans of the Kingdom of Nanzhao entered the upper Irrawaddy valley and, following the establishment of the Pagan Empire in the 1050s, the Burmese language, culture and Theravada Buddhism slowly became dominant in the country.'
p1538
aS'The Pagan Empire fell due to the Mongol invasions and several warring states emerged.'
p1539
aS'In the 16th century, reunified by the Taungoo Dynasty, the country was for a brief period the largest empire in the history of Southeast Asia.'
p1540
aS'The early 19th century Konbaung Dynasty ruled over an area that included modern Burma and briefly controlled Manipur and Assam as well.'
p1541
aS'Cache hits are served by reading data from the cache, which is faster than recomputing a result or reading from a slower data store; thus, the more requests can be served from the cache, the faster the system performs.To be cost-effective and to enable efficient use of data, caches are relatively small.'
p1542
aS'Nevertheless, caches have proven themselves in many areas of computing because access patterns in typical computer applications exhibit the locality of reference.'
p1543
aS'Moreover, access patterns exhibit temporal locality if data is requested again that has been recently requested already, while spatial locality refers to requests for data physically stored close to data that has been already requested. Operation Hardware implements cache as a block of memory for temporary storage of data likely to be used again.'
p1544
aS'Central processing units (CPUs) and hard disk drives (HDDs) frequently use a cache, as do web browsers and web servers.A cache is made up of a pool of entries.'
p1545
aS'Each entry has associated data, which is a copy of the same data in some backing store.'
p1546
aS'Each entry also has a tag, which specifies the identity of the data in the backing store of which the entry is a copy.When the cache client (a CPU, web browser, operating system) needs to access data presumed to exist in the backing store, it first checks the cache.'
p1547
aS'If an entry can be found with a tag matching that of the desired data, the data in the entry is used instead.'
p1548
aS'He was originally sent by his royal parents to seek out and escort his sister Europa back to Tyre after she was abducted from the shores of Phoenicia by Zeus.'
p1549
aS'Cadmus founded the Greek city of Thebes, the acropolis of which was originally named Cadmeia in his honour.Cadmus was credited by the ancient Greeks (Herodotus is an example) with introducing the original Alphabet or Phoenician alphabet--Phoinikon grammata Phoinikon grammata, "Phoenician letters"--to the Greeks, who adapted it to form their Greek alphabet.'
p1550
aS'Herodotus estimates that Cadmus lived sixteen hundred years before his time, or around 2000 BC.'
p1551
aS'Herodotus had seen and described the Cadmean writing in the temple of Apollo at Thebes engraved on certain tripods.'
p1552
aS'He estimated those tripods to date back to the time of Laius the great-grandson of Cadmus.'
p1553
aS'On one of the tripods there was this inscription in Cadmean writing, which, as he attested, resembled Ionian letters: Amphitruon m\' anethek\' enaron apo Teleboaon ("Amphitryon dedicated me [don\'t forget] the spoils of [the battle of] Teleboae.'
p1554
aS'").Though later Greeks like Herodotus dated Cadmus\'s role in the founding myth of Thebes to well before the Trojan War (or, in modern terms, during the Aegean Bronze Age), this chronology conflicts with most of what is now known or thought to be known about the origins and spread of both the Phoenician and Greek alphabets.'
p1555
aS'In 1900, Maupas initially named it Rhabditides elegans, Osche placed it in the subgenus Caenorhabditis in 1952, and in 1955, Dougherty raised it to the status of genus.C.'
p1556
aS'elegans is an unsegmented pseudocoelomate, and lacks a respiratory and a circulatory system.'
p1557
aS'The majority of these nematodes are female hermaphrodites.'
p1558
aS'Males have specialised tails for mating that include spicules.'
p1559
aS"They possess gut granules which emit a brilliant blue fluorescence, a wave of which is seen at death in a 'death fluorescence'.In 1963, Sydney Brenner proposed research into C. elegans primarily in the area of neuronal development."
p1560
aS'In 1974, he began research into the molecular and developmental biology of C. elegans, which has since been extensively used as a model organism.C.'
p1561
aS'elegans was the first multicellular organism to have its whole genome sequenced, and as of 2012, the only organism to have its connectome (neuronal "wiring diagram") completed. Anatomy C.'
p1562
aS'Cain was the first human born and Abel was the first human to die.'
p1563
aS'Cain committed the first murder by killing his brother.'
p1564
aS'Interpretations of Genesis 4 by ancient and modern commentators have typically assumed that the motives were jealousy and anger.'
p1565
aS'In the Cain and Abel story found in the Quran, the text refers to them simply as the sons of Adam (Arabic: bny adm). Genesis narrative Hebrew Bible version:1Adam knew his wife Eve intimately, and she conceived and bore Cain.'
p1566
aS'She said, "I have had a male child with the LORD\'s help.'
p1567
aS'"2Then she also gave birth to his brother Abel.'
p1568
aS'Now Abel became a shepherd of a flock, but Cain cultivated the land.'
p1569
aS'Located near the Nile Delta, it was founded in 969 CE.'
p1570
aS'Nicknamed "the city of a thousand minarets" for its preponderance of Islamic architecture, Cairo has long been a center of the region\'s political and cultural life.'
p1571
aS'Cairo was founded by Jawhar al-Siqilli "The Sicilian", of the Fatimid dynasty, in the 10th century CE, but the land composing the present-day city was the site of national capitals whose remnants remain visible in parts of Old Cairo.'
p1572
aS"Cairo is also associated with Ancient Egypt as it is close to the ancient cities of Memphis, Giza and Fustat which are near the Great Sphinx and the pyramids of Giza.Egyptians today often refer to Cairo as Masr ([mas?r], mSr), the Egyptian Arabic pronunciation of the name for Egypt itself, emphasizing the city's continued role in Egyptian influence."
p1573
aS'Its official name is lqhr@ al-Qahirah , means literally: "the Defeater", in reference to the fact that the planet Mars ("Al Najm Al Qahir") was rising at the time when the city was founded as well as, "the Vanquisher"; "the Conqueror"; Egyptian Arabic pronunciation: [elqa(:)\'hera], "the Defeater" or, " "the Victorious" (al-Qahira) in reference to the much awaited Caliph al-Mu\'izz li Din Allah who arrived from the old Fatimid capital of Mahdia in 973 to the city.'
p1574
aS'The Egyptian name for Cairo is said to be: Khere-Ohe, meaning: "The Place of Combat", supposedly, in reference to a battle which took place between the Gods Seth and Horus.'
p1575
aS"Sometimes the city is informally also referred to as kyrw Kayro ['kaejro]."
p1576
aS'California is bordered by Oregon to the north, Nevada to the east, Arizona to the southeast, and the Mexican state of Baja California to the south.'
p1577
aS"It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San_Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San_Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland)."
p1578
aS'Sacramento has been state capital since 1854.What is now California was first settled by various Native American tribes before being explored by a number of European expeditions during the 16th and 17th centuries.'
p1579
aS'It was then claimed by the Spanish Empire as part of Alta California in the larger territory of New Spain.'
p1580
aS'Alta California became a part of Mexico in 1821 following its successful war for independence, but was ceded to the United_States in 1848 after the Mexican-American War.'
p1581
aS'The western portion of Alta California was organized as the State of California, which was admitted as the 31st state on September 9, 1850.'
p1582
aS"The California Gold Rush starting in 1848 led to dramatic social and demographic change, with large-scale immigration from the east and abroad with an accompanying economic boom.California's diverse geography ranges from the Sierra Nevada in the east to the Pacific Coast in the west, from the Redwood-Douglas fir forests of the northwest, to the Mojave Desert areas in the southeast."
p1583
aS'The official religion is Theravada Buddhism, practiced by approximately 95 percent of the population.'
p1584
aS"The country's minority groups include Vietnamese, Chinese, Chams, and 30 hill tribes."
p1585
aS'The capital and largest city is Phnom Penh, the political, economic, and cultural center of Cambodia.'
p1586
aS'The kingdom is a constitutional monarchy with Norodom Sihamoni, a monarch chosen by the Royal Throne Council, as head of state.'
p1587
aS'The head of government is Hun Sen, who is currently the longest serving non-royal leader in South East Asia and has ruled Cambodia for over 25 years.Cambodia\'s ancient name is "Kambuja" (Sanskrit: kNbuj).'
p1588
aS'In 802 AD, Jayavarman II declared himself "King" and marked the beginning of the Khmer Empire which flourished for over 600 years, allowing successive kings to dominate much of Southeast Asia and accumulate immense power and wealth.'
p1589
aS'The Indianized kingdom built monumental temples including Angkor Wat, now a World Heritage Site, and facilitated the spread of first Hinduism, then Buddhism to much of Southeast Asia.'
p1590
aS'It begins with a young man, Candide, who is living a sheltered life in an Edenic paradise and being indoctrinated with Leibnizian optimism (or simply "optimism") by his mentor, Professor Pangloss.'
p1591
aS"The work describes the abrupt cessation of this lifestyle, followed by Candide's slow, painful disillusionment as he witnesses and experiences great hardships in the world."
p1592
aS'Voltaire concludes with Candide, if not rejecting optimism outright, advocating a deeply practical precept, "we must cultivate our garden", in lieu of the Leibnizian mantra of Pangloss, "all is for the best" in the "best of all possible worlds".Candide is characterised by its sarcastic tone as well as by its erratic, fantastical and fast-moving plot.'
p1593
aS'A picaresque novel with a story similar to that of a more serious Bildungsroman, it parodies many adventure and romance cliches, the struggles of which are caricatured in a tone that is mordantly matter-of-fact.'
p1594
aS"Still, the events discussed are often based on historical happenings, such as the Seven Years' War and the 1755 Lisbon earthquake."
p1595
aS"As philosophers of Voltaire's day contended with the problem of evil, so too does Candide in this short novel, albeit more directly and humorously."
p1596
aS'Voltaire ridicules religion, theologians, governments, armies, philosophies, and philosophers through allegory; most conspicuously, he assaults Leibniz and his optimism.As expected by Voltaire, Candide has enjoyed both great success and great scandal.'
p1597
aS'The vignettes alternate in structure between narrative prose, poetry, and play-like passages of dialogue.'
p1598
aS'As a result, the novel has been classified as a composite novel or as a short story cycle.'
p1599
aS'Though some characters and situations recur between vignettes, the vignettes are mostly freestanding, tied to the other vignettes thematically and contextually more than through specific plot details.The ambitious, nontraditional structure of the novel - and its later influence on future generations of writers - have helped Cane gain status as a classic of High Modernism.'
p1600
aS'Several of the vignettes have been excerpted or anthologized in literary collections, perhaps most famously the poetic passage "Harvest Song", included in several Norton poetry anthologies.'
p1601
aS'The poem opens with the line: "I am a reaper whose muscles set at sundown.'
p1602
aS'"In 2000 Arion Press published an edition of Cane with woodblock prints by the artist Martin Puryear and an afterword by Leon Litwack. Writing Cane Jean Toomer began writing sketches that would become the first section of Cane in November 1921 on a train from Georgia to Washington D.C. By Christmas of 1921, the first draft of those sketches and the short story "Kabnis" were complete.'
p1603
aS"Waldo Frank, Toomer's close friend, suggested that Toomer combine the sketches into a book."
p1604
aS'Neruda began to compose it in 1938.'
p1605
aS'"Canto_General" ("General Song") consists of 15 sections, 231 poems, and more than 15,000 lines.'
p1606
aS'This work attempts to be a history or encyclopedia of the entire American Western Hemisphere, or New World, from a Hispanic American perspective. The XV Cantos First Canto.'
p1607
aS'A Lamp on Earth.Second Canto.'
p1608
aS'The Heights of Macchu PicchuThird Canto.'
p1609
aS'The ConquistadorsFourth Canto.'
p1610
aS'The LiberatorsFifth Canto.'
p1611
aS'Although he is often portrayed as a cruel and merciless tyrant, Cao_Cao has also been praised as a brilliant ruler and military genius who treated his subordinates like his family.'
p1612
aS'He was also skilled in poetry and martial arts and wrote many war journals. Early life Cao_Cao was born in Qiao (present-day Bozhou, Anhui) in 155.'
p1613
aS'His father Cao Song was a foster son of Cao Teng, who in turn was one of the favourite eunuchs of Emperor Huan.'
p1614
aS"Some historical records, including the Biography of Cao Man, claim that Cao Song's original family name was Xiahou.Cao was known for his craftiness as an adolescent."
p1615
aS"According to the Biography of Cao Man, Cao_Cao's uncle complained to Cao Song about Cao_Cao's indulgence in hunting and music with Yuan Shao."
p1616
aS'In retaliation, Cao_Cao feigned a fit before his uncle, who immediately rushed to inform Cao Song.'
p1617
aS'When Cao Song went to see his son, Cao_Cao behaved normally.'
p1618
aS'an insulator that can store energy by becoming polarized).'
p1619
aS'The conductors can be thin films, foils or sintered beads of metal or conductive electrolyte, etc.'
p1620
aS"The nonconducting dielectric acts to increase the capacitor's charge capacity."
p1621
aS'A dielectric can be glass, ceramic, plastic film, air, vacuum, paper, mica, oxide layer etc.'
p1622
aS'Capacitors are widely used as parts of electrical circuits in many common electrical devices.'
p1623
aS'Unlike a resistor, an ideal capacitor does not dissipate energy.'
p1624
aS'Instead, a capacitor stores energy in the form of an electrostatic field between its plates.When there is a potential difference across the conductors (e.g., when a capacitor is attached across a battery), an electric field develops across the dielectric, causing positive charge +Q to collect on one plate and negative charge -Q to collect on the other plate.'
p1625
aS'and 1610.'
p1626
aS'His paintings, which combine a realistic observation of the human state, both physical and emotional, with a dramatic use of lighting, had a formative influence on Baroque painting.Caravaggio trained as a painter in Milan under Simone Peterzano who had himself trained under Titian.'
p1627
aS'In his twenties Caravaggio moved to Rome where there was a demand for paintings to fill the many huge new churches and palazzos being built at the time.'
p1628
aS'It was also a period when the Church was searching for a stylistic alternative to Mannerism in religious art that was tasked to counter the threat of Protestantism.'
p1629
aS"Caravaggio's innovation was a radical naturalism that combined close physical observation with a dramatic, even theatrical, use of chiaroscuro which came to be known as tenebrism (the shift from light to dark with little intermediate value).He burst upon the Rome art scene in 1600 with the success of his first public commissions, the Martyrdom of Saint Matthew and Calling of Saint Matthew."
p1630
aS'Thereafter he never lacked commissions or patrons, yet he handled his success poorly.'
p1631
aS'He was jailed on several occasions, vandalized his own apartment, and ultimately had a death warrant issued for him by the Pope after killing a young man, possibly unintentionally, on May 29, 1606.An early published notice on him, dating from 1604 and describing his lifestyle three years previously, recounts that "after a fortnight\'s work he will swagger about for a month or two with a sword at his side and a servant following him, from one ball-court to the next, ever ready to engage in a fight or an argument, so that it is most awkward to get along with him."'
p1632
aS"Based on a study of the British rock succession, it was the first of the modern 'system' names to be employed, and reflects the fact that many coal beds were formed globally during this time."
p1633
aS'The Carboniferous is often treated in North America as two geological periods, the earlier Mississippian and the later Pennsylvanian.Terrestrial life was well established by the Carboniferous period.'
p1634
aS'Amphibians were the dominant land vertebrates, of which one branch would eventually evolve into reptiles, the first fully terrestrial vertebrates.'
p1635
aS'Arthropods were also very common, and many (such as Meganeura), were much larger than those of today.'
p1636
aS'Vast swaths of forest covered the land, which would eventually be laid down and become the coal beds characteristic of the Carboniferous system.'
p1637
aS'The atmospheric content of oxygen also reached their highest levels in history during the period, 35% compared with 21% today.'
p1638
aS"This increased the atmospheric density by a third over today's value."
p1639
aS'His personal library was the origin of the Bibliotheque Mazarine in Paris. Biography Giulio Raimondo Mazzarino was born in Pescina, then part of the Kingdom of Naples, but was raised in Rome.'
p1640
aS'His father was Pietro Mazzarini from a noble family of Sicily, and his mother was Ortensia Buffalini, a woman of a noble family of Citta di Castello in Umbria, and goddaughter of Filippo I Colonna, the grand Constable of Naples.'
p1641
aS'Giulio was the older brother of Michele Mazzarino, Master of the Sacred Palace under Pope Urban VIII, and later Archbishop of Aix-en-Provence and a cardinal.Contemporary John Bargrave suggested that his father Pietro Mazzarini had lost a significant amount of money during a business transaction and was forced to flee to Rome.'
p1642
aS'Regardless, Pietro was a notary who made use of his connections to the Colonna once he arrived in Rome and became chamberlain to the Constable Filippo I Colonna.'
p1643
aS'Mazarin never forgot that the basis of his fortune in life was the patronage of the Colonna, who had provided his father with a wife, Ortensia Buffalini, of a noble family of Citta di Castello in Umbria with an ample dowry.'
p1644
aS'He had a younger sister, Laura Margherita Mazzarini.Mazarin studied at the Jesuit College in Rome, though he declined to join their order.'
p1645
aS'At seventeen he accompanied Girolamo Colonna, one of the sons of Filippo I Colonna, to the university of Alcala de Henares in Spain, to serve as his chamberlain.'
p1646
aS'Gauss later solved this puzzle about his birthdate in the context of finding the date of Easter, deriving methods to compute the date in both past and future years.'
p1647
aS'He was christened and confirmed in a church near the school he attended as a child.Gauss was a child prodigy.'
p1648
aS'There are many anecdotes about his precocity while a toddler, and he made his first ground-breaking mathematical discoveries while still a teenager.'
p1649
aS'He completed Disquisitiones Arithmeticae, his magnum opus, in 1798 at the age of 21, though it was not published until 1801.'
p1650
aS"This work was fundamental in consolidating number theory as a discipline and has shaped the field to the present day.Gauss's intellectual abilities attracted the attention of the Duke of Brunswick, who sent him to the Collegium Carolinum (now Braunschweig University of Technology), which he attended from 1792 to 1795, and to the University of Gottingen from 1795 to 1798."
p1651
aS'While at university, Gauss independently rediscovered several important theorems; his breakthrough occurred in 1796 when he showed that any regular polygon with a number of sides which is a Fermat prime (and, consequently, those polygons with any number of sides which is the product of distinct Fermat primes and a power of 2) can be constructed by compass and straightedge.'
p1652
aS'This was a major discovery in an important field of mathematics; construction problems had occupied mathematicians since the days of the Ancient Greeks, and the discovery ultimately led Gauss to choose mathematics instead of philology as a career.'
p1653
aS'He initially played in a military band before attending the Royal Conservatory in Copenhagen from 1884 until December 1886.'
p1654
aS'He premiered his Op 1, Suite for Strings, in 1888, at the age of 23.'
p1655
aS"The following year, Nielsen began a 16-year stint as a second violinist in the prestigious Royal Danish Orchestra under the conductor Johan Svendsen, during which he played in Giuseppe_Verdi's Falstaff and Otello at their Danish premieres."
p1656
aS"In 1916, he took a post teaching at the Royal Danish Academy of Music and continued to work there until his death.Although his symphonies, concertos and choral music are now internationally acclaimed, Nielsen's career and personal life were marked by many difficulties, often reflected in his music."
p1657
aS'The works he composed between 1897 and 1904 are sometimes ascribed to his "psychological" period, resulting mainly from a turbulent marriage with the sculptor Anne Marie Brodersen.'
p1658
aS'Nielsen is especially noted for his six symphonies, his Wind Quintet and his concertos for violin, flute and clarinet.'
p1659
aS'In Denmark, his opera Maskarade and many of his songs have become an integral part of the national heritage.'
p1660
aS'For his professional work he was bestowed the Award for Distinguished Professional Contributions to Psychology by the APA in 1972.'
p1661
aS'In a study by Haggbloom et al.'
p1662
aS'(2002) using six criteria such as citations and recognition, Rogers was found to be the sixth most eminent psychologist of the 20th century and second, among clinicians, only to Sigmund_Freud. Biography Rogers was born on January 8, 1902, in Oak Park, Illinois, a suburb of Chicago.'
p1663
aS'His father, Walter A. Rogers, was a civil engineer and his mother, Julia M. Cushing, was a homemaker and devout Pentecostal Christian.'
p1664
aS'Carl was the fourth of their six children.Rogers was intelligent and could read well before kindergarten.'
p1665
aS'Following an education in a strict religious and ethical environment as an altar boy at the vicarage of Jimpley, he became a rather isolated, independent and disciplined person, and acquired a knowledge and an appreciation for the scientific method in a practical world.'
p1666
aS'His first career choice was agriculture, at the University of Wisconsin-Madison, where he was a part of the fraternity of Alpha Kappa Lambda, followed by history and then religion.'
p1667
aS'American sympathizers supplied them with money, provisions, and arms via the steamboat SS Caroline.On December 29, 1837, Canadian loyalist Colonel Sir Allan MacNab and Captain Andrew Drew of the Royal Navy commanding a party of militia, acting on information and guidance from Alexander McLeod that the vessel belonged to Mackenzie, crossed the international boundary and seized the Caroline, chased off the crew, towed her into the current, set her afire, and cast her adrift over Niagara Falls, after killing one black American named Amos Durfee in the process.'
p1668
aS'His body was later exhibited in front of a recruiting tavern in Buffalo, New York.US newspapers falsely reported "the death of twenty-two of her crew" when in fact, only Durfee was killed.'
p1669
aS'Public opinion across the United_States was outraged against the British.'
p1670
aS'President Martin Van Buren protested strongly to London, but was ignored.On May 29, 1838, 13 raiders, mostly Canadian and American refugees from the 1837 rebellion, led by American William "Pirate Bill" Johnston, retaliated by capturing, looting, and burning the British steamer Sir Robert_Peel while she was in U.S. waters.'
p1671
aS'President Martin Van Buren sent General Winfield Scott to prevent further incursions into Canada.'
p1672
aS'However, there were several other attacks, the biggest being the Battle of the Windmill in November 1838.Later that year, Irish-Canadian rebel Benjamin Lett murdered a loyalist, Captain Edgeworth Ussher, who had been involved in the incident.The case was finally disposed of by U.S. Secretary of State Daniel_Webster and Alexander Baring, 1st Baron Ashburton, in the course of their negotiations leading to the Webster-Ashburton Treaty of 1842.'
p1673
aS'Secretary Webster admitted that the employment of force might have been justified by the necessity of self-defence, but denied that such necessity existed, while Lord Ashburton, although he maintained that the circumstances afforded excuse for what was done, apologized for the invasion of United_States territory. Anticipatory self-defense This incident has been used to establish the principle of "anticipatory self-defense" in international politics, which holds that it may be justified only in cases in which the "necessity of that self-defense is instant, overwhelming, and leaving no choice of means, and no moment for deliberation".'
p1674
aS"The area of Carthage was inhabited by Berber people who also became the bulk of Carthage's population and constituted a significant part of its army, economy and administration."
p1675
aS'Native Berbers and settling Phoenicians in Carthage mixed in different ways including religion and language, creating the Punic language and culture.The name of Carthage, Latin: Carthago or Karthago, Ancient Greek: Karkhedon Karkhedon, Etruscan: *Carthaza, is derived from the Phoenician   Qart-hadast meaning "New City" (Aramaic: qrt khdt Qarta Hdatha; Hebrew: qrt khdshh Qeret Hadasah), implying it was a \'new Tyre\'.The first civilization that developed within the city\'s sphere of influence is referred to as Punic (a form of the word "Phoenician") or Carthaginian.'
p1676
aS'The city of Carthage is located on the eastern side of Lake Tunis across from the centre of Tunis.'
p1677
aS'According to Greek historians, Carthage was founded by Canaanite-speaking Phoenician colonists from Tyre (in modern Lebanon) under the leadership of Queen Elissa or Dido.'
p1678
aS'It became a large and rich city and thus a major power in the Mediterranean.'
p1679
aS"The resulting rivalry with Syracuse, Numidia, and Rome was accompanied by several wars with respective invasions of each other's homeland.Hannibal's invasion of Italy in the Second Punic War culminated in the Carthaginian victory at Cannae and led to a serious threat to the continuation of Roman rule over Italy; however, the Romans gained the upper hand by invading Africa and defeating Carthage at the Battle_of_Zama in 202 BC."
p1680
aS'Following the Third Punic War, the city was destroyed by the Romans in 146 BC.'
p1681
aS'Examples include the rings of the trachea, such as the cricoid cartilage and carina, the torus tubarius at the opening of the pharyngotympanic/auditory tube, the ala of the nostrils, and the auricle/pinna of the ear.Cartilage is composed of specialized cells called chondrocytes that produce a large amount of collagenous extracellular matrix, abundant ground substance that is rich in proteoglycan and elastin fibers.'
p1682
aS'Cartilage is classified in three types, elastic cartilage, hyaline cartilage and fibrocartilage, which differ in relative amounts of cartilage.'
p1683
aS'Chondroblasts that get caught in the matrix are called chondrocytes.Cartilage does not contain blood vessels (avascular) or nerves (aneural).'
p1684
aS'The chondrocytes are supplied by diffusion.'
p1685
aS'The compression of the articular cartilage or flexion of the elastic cartilage generates the pumping action, which assists the diffusion to the chondrocytes.'
p1686
aS'Compared to other connective tissues, cartilage has a very slow turnover and does not easily repair. Structure  Development In embryogenesis, the skeletal system is derived from the mesoderm germ layer.'
p1687
aS'Chondrification (also known as chondrogenesis) is the process by which cartilage is formed from condensed mesenchyme tissue, which differentiates into chondroblasts and begins secreting the molecules (aggrecan and collagen type II) that form the extracellular matrix.Following the initial chondrification that occurs during embryogenesis, cartilage growth consists mostly of the maturing of immature cartilage to a more mature state.'
p1688
aS'In a classical description, the lack of an external field means that there is no field between the plates, and no force would be measured between them.'
p1689
aS'When this field is instead studied using the QED vacuum of quantum electrodynamics, it is seen that the plates do affect the virtual photons which constitute the field, and generate a net force--either an attraction or a repulsion depending on the specific arrangement of the two plates.'
p1690
aS'Although the Casimir_effect can be expressed in terms of virtual particles interacting with the objects, it is best described and more easily calculated in terms of the zero-point energy of a quantized field in the intervening space between the objects.'
p1691
aS'This force has been measured and is a striking example of an effect captured formally by second quantization.'
p1692
aS'However, the treatment of boundary conditions in these calculations has led to some controversy.'
p1693
aS'In fact, "Casimir\'s original goal was to compute the van der Waals force between polarizable molecules" of the metallic plates.'
p1694
aS'Thus it can be interpreted without any reference to the zero-point energy (vacuum energy) of quantum fields.Dutch physicists Hendrik B. G. Casimir and Dirk Polder at Philips Research Labs proposed the existence of a force between two polarizable atoms and between such an atom and a conducting plate in 1947, and, after a conversation with Niels_Bohr who suggested it had something to do with zero-point energy, Casimir alone formulated the theory predicting a force between neutral conducting plates in 1948; the former is called the Casimir-Polder force while the latter is the Casimir_effect in the narrow sense.'
p1695
aS"One of Williams's best-known works and his personal favorite, the play won the Pulitzer Prize for Drama in 1955."
p1696
aS'Set in the "plantation home in the Mississippi Delta" of Big Daddy Pollitt, a wealthy cotton tycoon, the play examines the relationships among members of Big Daddy\'s family, primarily between his son Brick and Maggie the "Cat", Brick\'s wife.Cat_on_a_Hot_Tin_Roof features several recurring motifs, such as social mores, greed, superficiality, mendacity, decay, sexual desire, repression, and death.'
p1697
aS'Dialogue throughout is often rendered phonetically to represent accents of the Southern United_States.'
p1698
aS'The original production starred Barbara Bel Geddes, Burl Ives, and Ben Gazzara.'
p1699
aS'The play was adapted as a motion picture of the same name in 1958, starring Elizabeth Taylor and Paul Newman as Maggie and Brick, with Burl Ives and Madeleine Sherwood recreating their stage roles.'
p1700
aS'Williams made substantial excisions and alterations to the play for a revival in 1974.'
p1701
aS'This has been the version used for most subsequent revivals, which have been numerous. Plot Cat_on_a_Hot_Tin_Roof is the story of a Southern family in crisis, especially the husband Brick and wife Margaret (usually called Maggie or "Maggie the Cat"), and their interaction with Brick\'s family over the course of one evening gathering at the family estate in Mississippi.'
p1702
aS'After turning down his original thesis in 1947, the University of Chicago awarded Vonnegut his Master\'s degree in anthropology in 1971 for Cat\'s_Cradle.The title of the book derives from the string game "cat\'s cradle".'
p1703
aS"Early in the book, the character Felix Hoenikker (a fictional co-inventor of the atom bomb) was playing cat's cradle when the bomb was dropped, and the game is later referenced by his son, Newton Hoenikker. Background After World_War_II, Kurt_Vonnegut worked in the public relations department for the General Electric research company."
p1704
aS'GE hired scientists and let them do pure research, and his job was to interview these scientists and find good stories about their research.'
p1705
aS'Vonnegut felt that the older scientists were indifferent about the ways their discoveries might be used.'
p1706
aS"The Nobel Prize-winning chemist Irving Langmuir, who worked with Vonnegut's older brother Bernard at GE, became the model for Dr. Felix Hoenikker."
p1707
aS'Vonnegut said in an interview with The Nation that "Langmuir was absolutely indifferent to the uses that might be made of the truths he dug out of the rock and handed out to whoever was around, but any truth he found was beautiful in its own right, and he didn\'t give a damn who got it next.'
p1708
aS'" Plot At the opening of the book, the narrator, an everyman named John (but calling himself Jonah), describes a time when he was planning to write a book about what important Americans did on the day Hiroshima was bombed.'
p1709
aS'Because catalysts are not consumed, they are recycled.'
p1710
aS'Often only tiny amounts are required. Technical perspective In the presence of a catalyst, less free energy is required to reach the transition state, but the total free energy from reactants to products does not change.'
p1711
aS'A catalyst may participate in multiple chemical transformations.'
p1712
aS'The effect of a catalyst may vary due to the presence of other substances known as inhibitors or poisons (which reduce the catalytic activity) or promoters (which increase the activity).'
p1713
aS'The opposite of a catalyst, a substance that reduces the rate of a reaction, is an inhibitor.Catalyzed reactions have a lower activation energy (rate-limiting free energy of activation) than the corresponding uncatalyzed reaction, resulting in a higher reaction rate at the same temperature and for the same reactant concentrations.'
p1714
aS'However, the detailed mechanics of catalysis is complex.'
p1715
aS'Catalysts may affect the reaction environment favorably, or bind to the reagents to polarize bonds, e.g.'
p1716
aS'The police had an informer and the plotters fell into a police trap and 13 were arrested, while one policemanwas killed.'
p1717
aS'Five conspirators were executed, and five others were transported to Australia.How widespread the Cato Street conspiracy was is uncertain.'
p1718
aS'It was a time of unrest; rumours abounded.'
p1719
aS'Chase notes that, "the London-Irish community and a number of trade societies, notably shoemakers, were prepared to lend support, while unrest and awareness of a planned rising were widespread in the industrial north and on Clydeside.'
p1720
aS'" Origins The conspirators were called the Spencean Philanthropists, a group taking their name from the British radical speaker Thomas Spence.'
p1721
aS'The group was known for being a revolutionary organization, involved in unrest and propaganda and plotting the overthrow of the government.Some of them, particularly Arthur Thistlewood, had been involved with the Spa Fields riots in 1816.'
p1722
aS'Thistlewood came to dominate the group with George Edwards as his second in command.'
p1723
aS'Thousands of years later, the peoples in what would later be Upper and Lower Egypt had a religion centering around the worship of animals, including cats.Praised for controlling vermin and its ability to kill snakes such as cobras, the domesticated cat became a symbol of grace and poise.'
p1724
aS'The goddess Mafdet, the deification of justice and execution, was a lion-headed goddess.'
p1725
aS"The cat goddess Bast (also known as Bastet) eventually replaced Mafdet, and Bast's image softened over time and she became the deity representing protection, fertility, and motherhood.As a revered animal and one important to Egyptian society and religion, some cats received the same mummification after death as humans."
p1726
aS'Mummified cats were given in offering to Bast.'
p1727
aS'In 1888, an Egyptian farmer uncovered a large tomb with mummified cats and kittens.'
p1728
aS'This discovery outside the town of Beni Hasan had eighty thousand cat mummies, dated after 1000 BC. Cats in everyday life in Ancient Egypt Cats were one of the most recognizable species in Egyptian culture and were domesticated much later than dogs.'
p1729
aS'Two types of smaller cats appeared in ancient Egypt: the jungle cat (Felis chaus) and the African wild cat (Felis silvestris libyca).'
p1730
aS'He greatly influenced poets such as Ovid, Horace, and Virgil.'
p1731
aS'After his rediscovery in the late Middle Ages, Catullus again found admirers.'
p1732
aS'His explicit writing style has shocked many readers.'
p1733
aS"Indeed, Catullus was never considered one of the canonical school authors, although his body of work is still frequently read from secondary school to graduate programs across the world. Life Gaius Valerius Catullus (Classical Latin: ['ga:.i.Us wa'le.ri.Us ka'tUl.lUs]) was born to a leading equestrian family of Verona, in Cisalpine Gaul."
p1734
aS'The social prominence of the Catullus family allowed the father of Gaius Valerius to entertain Julius Caesar when he was the Promagistrate (proconsul) of both Gallic provinces.'
p1735
aS'In a poem, Catullus describes his happy homecoming to the family villa at Sirmio, on Lake Garda, near Verona; he also owned a villa near the resort of Tibur (Tivoli).Catullus appears to have spent most of his young adult years in Rome.'
p1736
aS'His friends there included the poets Licinius Calvus, and Helvius Cinna, Quintus Hortensius (son of the orator and rival of Cicero) and the biographer Cornelius Nepos, to whom Catullus dedicated a libellus of poems, the relation of which to the extant collection remains a matter of debate.'
p1737
aS"Eukaryotes usually have a single nucleus, but a few cell types have no nuclei, and a few others have many.Cell nuclei contain most of the cell's genetic material, organized as multiple long linear DNA molecules in complex with a large variety of proteins, such as histones, to form chromosomes."
p1738
aS"The genes within these chromosomes are the cell's nuclear genome."
p1739
aS'The function of the nucleus is to maintain the integrity of these genes and to control the activities of the cell by regulating gene expression--the nucleus is, therefore, the control center of the cell.'
p1740
aS'The main structures making up the nucleus are the nuclear envelope, a double membrane that encloses the entire organelle and isolates its contents from the cellular cytoplasm, and the nucleoskeleton (which includes nuclear lamina), a network within the nucleus that adds mechanical support, much like the cytoskeleton, which supports the cell as a whole.Because the nuclear membrane is impermeable to large molecules, nuclear pores are required that regulate nuclear transport of molecules across the envelope.'
p1741
aS'The pores cross both nuclear membranes, providing a channel through which larger molecules must be actively transported by carrier proteins while allowing free movement of small molecules and ions.'
p1742
aS'Movement of large molecules such as proteins and RNA through the pores is required for both gene expression and the maintenance of chromosomes.'
p1743
aS'The interior of the nucleus does not contain any membrane-bound sub compartments, its contents are not uniform, and a number of sub-nuclear bodies exist, made up of unique proteins, RNA molecules, and particular parts of the chromosomes.'
p1744
aS'It is the second-largest bowed string instrument in the modern symphony orchestra, the double bass being the largest.Cellos were derived from other mid- to large-sized bowed instruments in the 16th century, such as the viola da gamba, and the generally smaller and squarer viola da braccio, and such instruments made by members of the Amati family of luthiers.'
p1745
aS'The invention of wire-wrapped strings in Bologna gave the cello greater versatility.'
p1746
aS'By the 18th century, the cello had largely replaced other mid-sized bowed instruments.Cello parts are generally written in the bass clef, but both tenor and treble clefs are used for higher-range parts.A person who plays the cello is called a cellist. Etymology The name cello is a contraction of the Italian violoncello, which means "little violone".'
p1747
aS'The violone ("big viol") was the lowest-pitched instrument of the viol family, the group of stringed instruments that went out of fashion around the end of the 17th century in most countries except France, where they survived another half-century before the louder violin family came into greater favour in that country as well.'
p1748
aS'In modern symphony orchestras, it is the second largest stringed instrument (the double bass is the largest).'
p1749
aS'Thus, the name "violoncello" contained both the augmentative "-one" ("big") and the diminutive "-cello" ("little").'
p1750
aS"By the turn of the 20th century, it had become customary to shorten the name to 'cello, with the apostrophe indicating the missing prefix."
p1751
aS'If this procedure is performed many times, the central limit theorem says that the computed values of the average will be distributed according to the normal distribution (commonly known as a "bell curve").The central limit theorem has a number of variants.'
p1752
aS'In its common form, the random variables must be identically distributed.'
p1753
aS'In variants, convergence of the mean to the normal distribution also occurs for non-identical distributions or for non-independent observations, given that they comply with certain conditions.In more general probability theory, a central limit theorem is any of a set of weak-convergence theorems.'
p1754
aS'They all express the fact that a sum of many independent and identically distributed (i.i.d.)'
p1755
aS'random variables, or alternatively, random variables with specific types of dependence, will tend to be distributed according to one of a small set of attractor distributions.'
p1756
aS'When the variance of the i.i.d.'
p1757
aS'variables is finite, the attractor distribution is the normal distribution.'
p1758
aS'Delta Scuti variables are A class stars on or near the main sequence at the lower end of the instability strip and were originally referred to as dwarf Cepheids.'
p1759
aS'RR Lyrae variables have short periods and lie on the instability strip where it crosses the horizontal branch.'
p1760
aS'Delta Scuti variables and RR Lyrae variables are not generally treated with Cepheid_variables although their pulsations originate with the same helium ionisation kappa mechanism. Classical Cepheids Classical Cepheids (also known as Population I Cepheids, type I Cepheids, or Delta Cepheid_variables) undergo pulsations with very regular periods on the order of days to months.'
p1761
aS'Classical Cepheids are Population I variable stars which are 4-20 times more massive than the Sun, and up to 100,000 times more luminous.'
p1762
aS'These Cepheids are yellow supergiants of spectral class F6 - K2 and their radii change by (~25% for the longer-period I Carinae) millions of kilometers during a pulsation cycle.Classical Cepheids are used to determine distances to galaxies within the Local Group and beyond, and are a means by which the Hubble constant can be established.'
p1763
aS"Classical Cepheids have also been used to clarify many characteristics of our galaxy, such as the Sun's height above the galactic plane and the Galaxy's local spiral structure. Type II Cepheids Type II Cepheids (also termed Population II Cepheids) are population II variable stars which pulsate with periods typically between 1 and 50 days."
p1764
aS'Type II Cepheids are typically metal-poor, old (~10 Gyr), low mass objects (~half the mass of the Sun).'
p1765
aS'The cerebellum does not initiate movement, but it contributes to coordination, precision, and accurate timing.'
p1766
aS'It receives input from sensory systems of the spinal cord and from other parts of the brain, and integrates these inputs to fine-tune motor activity.'
p1767
aS'Cerebellar damage produces disorders in fine movement, equilibrium, posture, and motor learning.Anatomically, the cerebellum has the appearance of a separate structure attached to the bottom of the brain, tucked underneath the cerebral hemispheres.'
p1768
aS'Its cortical surface is covered with finely spaced parallel grooves, in striking contrast to the broad irregular convolutions of the cerebral cortex.'
p1769
aS'These parallel grooves conceal the fact that the cerebellar cortex is actually a continuous thin layer of tissue tightly folded in the style of an accordion.'
p1770
aS'Within this thin layer are several types of neurons with a highly regular arrangement, the most important being Purkinje cells and granule cells.'
p1771
aS'This complex neural organization gives rise to a massive signal-processing capability, but almost all of its output passes through a set of small deep cerebellar nuclei lying in the interior of the cerebellum.In addition to its direct role in motor control, the cerebellum is necessary for several types of motor learning, most notably learning to adjust to changes in sensorimotor relationships.'
p1772
aS'He studied privately in Paris from 1835, where his teachers included Anton Reicha.'
p1773
aS'After a brief return to Belgium, and a disastrous reception to an early oratorio Ruth, he moved to Paris, where he married and embarked on a career as teacher and organist.'
p1774
aS'He gained a reputation as a formidable improviser, and travelled widely in France to demonstrate new instruments built by Aristide Cavaille-Coll.In 1858 he became organist at Sainte-Clotilde, a position he retained for the rest of his life.'
p1775
aS'He became professor at the Paris Conservatoire in 1872; he took French nationality, a requirement of the appointment.'
p1776
aS"His pupils included Vincent d'Indy, Ernest Chausson, Louis Vierne, Charles Tournemire, Guillaume Lekeu and Henri Duparc."
p1777
aS'After acquiring the professorship Franck wrote several pieces that have entered the standard classical repertoire, including symphonic, chamber, and keyboard works. Biography  Child and student (1822-1842) Franck was born in Liege, then part of the United Kingdom of the Netherlands (from 1830 part of Walloon-speaking Belgium) to Nicolas-Joseph Franck, a bank clerk whose family came from the German-Belgian border, and Marie-Catherine-Barbe Franck (nee Frings), who was from Germany.'
p1778
aS'Although young Cesar-Auguste, as he was known in his early years, showed both drawing and musical skills, Nicolas-Joseph envisioned him as a young prodigy pianist-composer, after the manner of Franz_Liszt or Sigismond Thalberg, who would bring fame and fortune to his family.'
p1779
aS'It was the bloodiest military conflict fought in South America during the 20th century, between two of its poorest countries, both having previously lost territory to neighbors in 19th century wars.During the war, both landlocked countries faced difficulties shipping arms and supplies through neighboring countries.'
p1780
aS'Bolivia faced particular external trade problems, coupled with poor internal communications.'
p1781
aS"Although Bolivia had lucrative mining income, and a larger better equipped army, a series of factors turned the tide, and Paraguay came to control most of the disputed zone by war's end.The ultimate peace treaties granted two-thirds of the disputed territories to Paraguay. Origins The origin of the war is commonly attributed to a conflict between the oil companies Royal Dutch Shell backing Paraguay and Standard Oil supporting Bolivia."
p1782
aS'The discovery of oil in the Andean foothills sparked speculation that the Chaco might be a rich source of petroleum, and foreign oil companies were involved in the exploration.'
p1783
aS'Standard Oil was already producing oil from wells in the high hills of eastern Bolivia, around Villa Montes.'
p1784
aS'However, it is uncertain if the war would have been caused solely by the interests of these companies, and not by aims of Argentina to import oil from the Chaco.Both countries were landlocked.'
p1785
aS'Though the 600,000 km2 Chaco was sparsely populated, control of the Paraguay River running through it provided access to the Atlantic Ocean.'
p1786
aS'Prior to his consolidation of power, most of the Indian Subcontinent was divided into small states, while the Nanda Empire dominated the Indus-Gangetic Plain.'
p1787
aS'Chandragupta succeeded in conquering and subjugating almost all of the Indian subcontinent by the end of his reign, except the Tamil regions (Chera, Chola and Pandya) and modern day state Odisha (Kalinga).'
p1788
aS'His empire extended from Bengal in the east, to Afghanistan and Balochistan in the west, to the Himalayas and Kashmir in the north, and to the Deccan Plateau in the south.'
p1789
aS'It was the largest empire yet seen in Indian history.After unifying much of India, Chandragupta and his chief advisor Chanakya passed a series of major economic and political reforms.'
p1790
aS'He established a strong central administration patterned after Chanakya\'s text on politics, the Arthashastra (English: "Economics and political science").'
p1791
aS"Maurya's India was characterised by an efficient and highly organised bureaucratic structure with a large civil service."
p1792
aS'Due to its unified structure, the empire developed a strong economy, with internal and external trade thriving and agriculture flourishing.'
p1793
aS'This limit was initially ignored by the community of scientists because such a limit would logically require the existence of black holes, which were considered a scientific impossibility at the time.'
p1794
aS'White dwarfs resist gravitational collapse primarily through electron degeneracy pressure.'
p1795
aS'(By comparison, main sequence stars resist collapse through thermal pressure.)'
p1796
aS"The Chandrasekhar_limit is the mass above which electron degeneracy pressure in the star's core is insufficient to balance the star's own gravitational self-attraction."
p1797
aS'Consequently, white dwarfs with masses greater than the limit would be subject to further gravitational collapse, evolving into a different type of stellar remnant, such as a neutron star or black hole.'
p1798
aS'(However, white dwarfs generally avoid this fate by exploding before they undergo collapse.)'
p1799
aS'Those with masses under the limit remain stable as white dwarfs.The currently accepted value of the limit is about 1.39  ( 2.765 x 1030 kg). Physics Electron degeneracy pressure is a quantum-mechanical effect arising from the Pauli_exclusion_principle.'
p1800
aS'From 800 he became the first Holy Roman Emperor -- the first recognized emperor in Western Europe since the collapse of the Western Roman Empire three centuries earlier.'
p1801
aS'The expanded Frankish state he founded is called the Carolingian Empire.The oldest son of Pepin the Short and Bertrada of Laon, Charlemagne became king in 768 following the death of his father.'
p1802
aS"He was initially co-ruler with his brother Carloman I. Carloman's sudden death in 771 under unexplained circumstances left Charlemagne as the undisputed ruler of the Frankish Kingdom."
p1803
aS"Charlemagne continued his father's policy towards the papacy and became its protector, removing the Lombards from power in northern Italy, and leading an incursion into Muslim Spain."
p1804
aS'He also campaigned against the Saxons to his east, Christianizing them upon penalty of death, leading to events such as the Massacre of Verden.'
p1805
aS'Charlemagne reached the height of his power in 800 when he was crowned Emperor of the Romans by Pope Leo III on Christmas Day at Old St. Peter\'s Basilica.Called the "Father of Europe" (pater Europae), Charlemagne united most of Western Europe for the first time since the Roman Empire.'
p1806
aS'His rule spurred the Carolingian Renaissance, a period of energetic cultural and intellectual activity within the Church.'
p1807
aS"He was the Republican nominee in the 1916 U.S. Presidential election, losing narrowly to incumbent President Woodrow_Wilson.Hughes was a professor in the 1890s, a staunch supporter of Britain's New Liberalism, an important leader of the progressive movement of the 20th century, a leading diplomat and New York lawyer in the days of Harding and Coolidge, and was known for being a swing voter when dealing with cases related to the New Deal in the 1930s."
p1808
aS'Historian Clinton Rossiter has hailed him as a leading American conservative. Early life Charles_Evans_Hughes was born in Glens Falls, New York, the son of Rev.'
p1809
aS'David C. Hughes and Mary C. (Connelly) Hughes, a sister of State Senator Henry C. Connelly (1832-1912).'
p1810
aS'He was active in the Northern Baptist church, a Mainline Protestant denomination. Education Hughes was educated in a private school.'
p1811
aS'At the age of 14, he enrolled at Madison University (now Colgate University), where he became a member of Delta Upsilon fraternity.'
p1812
aS'He then transferred to Brown University, continuing as a member of Delta Upsilon.'
p1813
aS'He graduated third in his class at the age of 19, having been elected to Phi Beta Kappa in his junior year.'
p1814
aS'An unsuccessful and unpopular attempt to marry him to a Spanish Habsburg princess culminated in an eight-month visit to Spain in 1623 that demonstrated the futility of the marriage negotiations.'
p1815
aS'Two years later he married the Bourbon princess Henrietta Maria of France instead.After his succession, Charles quarrelled with the Parliament of England, which sought to curb his royal prerogative.'
p1816
aS'Charles believed in the divine right of kings and thought he could govern according to his own conscience.'
p1817
aS'Many of his subjects opposed his policies, in particular the levying of taxes without parliamentary consent, and perceived his actions as those of a tyrannical absolute monarch.'
p1818
aS'His religious policies, coupled with his marriage to a Roman Catholic, generated the antipathy and mistrust of reformed groups such as the Puritans and Calvinists, who thought his views too Catholic.'
p1819
aS"He supported high church ecclesiastics, such as Richard Montagu and William Laud, and failed to successfully aid Protestant forces during the Thirty_Years'_War."
p1820
aS"His attempts to force the Church of Scotland to adopt high Anglican practices led to the Bishops'_Wars, strengthened the position of the English and Scottish parliaments and helped precipitate his own downfall.From 1642, Charles fought the armies of the English and Scottish parliaments in the English Civil War."
p1821
aS'Cromwell defeated Charles II at the Battle of Worcester on 3 September 1651, and Charles fled to mainland Europe.'
p1822
aS'Cromwell became virtual dictator of England, Scotland and Ireland, and Charles spent the next nine years in exile in France, the Dutch Republic, and the Spanish Netherlands.A political crisis that followed the death of Cromwell in 1658 resulted in the restoration of the monarchy, and Charles was invited to return to Britain.'
p1823
aS'On 29 May 1660, his 30th birthday, he was received in London to public acclaim.'
p1824
aS"After 1660, all legal documents were dated as if he had succeeded his father as king in 1649.Charles's English parliament enacted laws known as the Clarendon Code, designed to shore up the position of the re-established Church of England."
p1825
aS'Charles acquiesced to the Clarendon Code even though he favoured a policy of religious tolerance.'
p1826
aS'The major foreign policy issue of his early reign was the Second Anglo-Dutch War.'
p1827
aS'In 1670, he entered into the secret treaty of Dover, an alliance with his first cousin King Louis_XIV_of_France.'
p1828
aS'Over time, he came to be regarded as an "American original".'
p1829
aS"Ives combined the American popular and church-music traditions of his youth with European art music, and was among the first composers to engage in a systematic program of experimental music, with musical techniques including polytonality, polyrhythm, tone clusters, aleatoric elements, and quarter tones, foreshadowing many musical innovations of the 20th century.Sources of Ives' tonal imagery are hymn tunes and traditional songs, the town band at holiday parade, the fiddlers at Saturday night dances, patriotic songs, sentimental parlor ballads, and the melodies of Stephen Foster. Biography Charles_Ives was born in Danbury, Connecticut in 1874, the son of George Ives, a U.S. Army bandleader in the American Civil War, and his wife Mary Parmelee."
p1830
aS"A strong influence of Charles's may have been sitting in the Danbury town square, listening to his father's marching band and other bands on other sides of the square simultaneously."
p1831
aS"George Ives' unique music lessons were also a strong influence on Charles; George Ives took an open-minded approach to musical theory, encouraging his son to experiment in bitonal and polytonal harmonizations."
p1832
aS'It was from his father that Charles_Ives also learned the music of Stephen Foster.'
p1833
aS"Ives became a church organist at the age of 14 and wrote various hymns and songs for church services, including his Variations on 'America' , which Ives wrote for a Fourth of July concert in Brewster, New York."
p1834
aS'The work is considered challenging even by modern concert organists, but Ives famously spoke of it as being "as much fun as playing baseball", a commentary on his own organ technique at that age.Ives moved to New Haven in 1893, enrolling in the Hopkins School, where he captained the baseball team.'
p1835
aS'Instead he studied theology.'
p1836
aS'In 1780, he became Agent-General of the Clergy and represented the Catholic Church to the French Crown.'
p1837
aS'He worked at the highest levels of successive French governments, most commonly as foreign minister or in some other diplomatic capacity.'
p1838
aS'His career spanned the regimes of Louis XVI, the years of the French Revolution, Napoleon, Louis XVIII, and Louis-Philippe.'
p1839
aS'Those he served often distrusted Talleyrand but, like Napoleon, found him extremely useful.'
p1840
aS'The name "Talleyrand" has become a byword for crafty, cynical diplomacy.He was Napoleon\'s chief diplomat in years when French military victories were bringing one European state after another under French hegemony.'
p1841
aS"Most of the time, though, Talleyrand worked for peace so as to consolidate France's gains."
p1842
aS'Today he is appreciated largely for his contributions to logic, mathematics, philosophy, scientific methodology, and semiotics, and for his founding of pragmatism.An innovator in mathematics, statistics, philosophy, research methodology, and various sciences, Peirce considered himself, first and foremost, a logician.'
p1843
aS'He made major contributions to logic, but logic for him encompassed much of that which is now called epistemology and philosophy of science.'
p1844
aS'He saw logic as the formal branch of semiotics, of which he is a founder, and which foreshadowed the debate among logical positivists and proponents of philosophy of language that dominated 20th century Western philosophy; additionally, he defined the concept of abductive reasoning, as well as rigorously formulated mathematical induction and deductive reasoning.'
p1845
aS'As early as 1886 he saw that logical operations could be carried out by electrical switching circuits; the same idea was used decades later to produce digital computers.In 1934, the philosopher Paul Weiss called Peirce "the most original and versatile of American philosophers and America\'s greatest logician".'
p1846
aS'Webster\'s Biographical Dictionary said in 1943 that Peirce was "now regarded as the most original thinker and greatest logician of his time."'
p1847
aS'Keith Devlin similarly referred to Peirce as one of the greatest philosophers ever. Life Peirce was born at 3 Phillips Place in Cambridge, Massachusetts.'
p1848
aS'He was the son of Sarah Hunt Mills and Benjamin Peirce, himself a professor of astronomy and mathematics at Harvard University and perhaps the first serious research mathematician in America.'
p1849
aS'He entered the House of Commons in 1875, became the leader of the Home Rule League in 1880, and founded the Irish Parliamentary Party in 1882.'
p1850
aS'He led that party until 1891, when he died.'
p1851
aS'Future Liberal Prime Minister H. H. Asquith described him as one of the three or four greatest men of the 19th century, while Lord Haldane described him as the strongest man the House of Commons had seen in 150 years.'
p1852
aS"The Irish Parliamentary Party split during 1890, following revelations of Parnell's private life intruding into his political career."
p1853
aS"He has nevertheless been revered by subsequent Irish parliamentary republicans and nationalists. Family background and early life Charles_Stewart_Parnell was born in County Wicklow, the third son and seventh child of John Henry Parnell (1811-1859), a wealthy Anglo-Irish landowner, and his American wife Delia Tudor Stewart (1816-1898) of Bordentown, New Jersey, daughter of the American naval hero, Admiral Charles Stewart (the stepson of one of George_Washington's bodyguards)."
p1854
aS'There were eleven children in all: five boys and six girls.'
p1855
aS"Admiral Stewart's mother, Parnell's great-grandmother, belonged to the Tudor family, so Parnell had a distant relationship with the British Royal Family."
p1856
aS'As Charles was the first king to rule Castile, Leon, and Aragon simultaneously in his own right, he became the first King of Spain.'
p1857
aS'In 1519, Charles became Holy Roman Emperor and Archduke of Austria.'
p1858
aS'From that point forward, his empire spanned nearly four million square kilometers across Europe, the Far East, and the Americas.'
p1859
aS"Much of Charles's reign was devoted to the Italian Wars against France which, although enormously expensive, were militarily successful, and which led to the development of the first modern professional army in Europe, the Tercios."
p1860
aS"Charles's forces re-captured both Milan and Franche-Comte from France after the decisive Habsburg victory at the Battle of Pavia in 1525, which pushed Francis I of France to form the Franco-Ottoman alliance."
p1861
aS"Charles's rival Suleiman_the_Magnificent conquered the central part of the Hungarian Kingdom in 1526 after defeating the Hungarians at the Battle of Mohacs."
p1862
aS'However, the Ottoman advance was halted after they failed to capture Vienna in 1529.Aside from his military endeavors, Charles is best known for his role in opposing the Protestant Reformation.'
p1863
aS'Charles was the only surviving son of Charles XI and Ulrika Eleonora the Elder.'
p1864
aS'He assumed power, after a seven-month caretaker government, at the age of fifteen.In 1700, a triple alliance of Denmark-Norway, Saxony-Poland-Lithuania and Russia launched a threefold attack on the Swedish protectorate of Swedish Holstein-Gottorp and provinces of Livonia and Ingria, aiming to draw advantage as Sweden was unaligned and ruled by a young and inexperienced king, thus initiating the Great Northern War.'
p1865
aS"Leading the formidable Swedish army against the alliance, by 1706 Charles had forced all of his foes into submission except Russia.Charles' subsequent march on Moscow ended with the dismemberment of the Swedish army at Poltava and Perevolochna, and he spent the following years in exile in the Ottoman_Empire before returning to lead an assault on Norway, trying to evict the Danish king from the war once more in order to aim all his forces at the Russians."
p1866
aS'Two failed campaigns concluded with his death at the Siege of Fredriksten in 1718.'
p1867
aS'At the time, most of the Swedish Empire was under foreign military occupation, though Sweden itself was still free.'
p1868
aS'This situation was later formalized, albeit moderated in the subsequent Treaty of Nystad.'
p1869
aS'The close would see not only the end of the Swedish Empire but also of its effectively organized absolute monarchy and war machine, commencing a parliamentarian government unique for continental Europe, which would last for half a century until royal autocracy was restored by Gustav III.Charles was an exceptionally skilled military leader and tactician as well as an able politician, credited with introducing important tax and legal reforms.'
p1870
aS'His tone ranged from clean and penetrating to sweet and somber.'
p1871
aS'Parker acquired the nickname "Yardbird" early in his career; this and its shortened form, "Bird", which continued to be used for the rest of his life, inspired the titles of a number of Parker compositions, such as "Yardbird Suite", "Ornithology", "Bird Gets the Worm", and "Bird of Paradise".'
p1872
aS'Parker was an icon for the hipster subculture and later the Beat Generation, personifying the jazz musician as an uncompromising artist and intellectual rather than just an entertainer. Biography  Childhood Charles Parker, Jr. was born in Kansas City, Kansas, and raised in Kansas City, Missouri, the only child of Adelaide "Addie" (Bailey) and Charles Parker.'
p1873
aS"He attended Lincoln High School in September 1934, but withdrew in December 1935, just before joining the local musicians' union.Parker began playing the saxophone at age 11, and at age 14 he joined his school's band using a rented school instrument."
p1874
aS'His father, Charles, was often absent but provided some musical influence; he was a pianist, dancer and singer on the T.O.B.A.'
p1875
aS'circuit.'
p1876
aS'He later became a Pullman waiter or chef on the railways.'
p1877
aS'The chemical potential of a species in a mixture can be defined as the slope of the free energy of the system with respect to a change in the number of moles of just that species.'
p1878
aS"Thus, it is the partial derivative of the free energy with respect to the amount of the species, all other species' concentrations in the mixture remaining constant, and at constant temperature."
p1879
aS'When pressure is constant, chemical potential is the partial molar Gibbs free energy.'
p1880
aS'At chemical equilibrium or in phase equilibrium the total sum of chemical potentials is zero, as the free energy is at a minimum.In semiconductor physics, the chemical potential of a system of electrons at a temperature of zero Kelvin is known as the Fermi energy. Overview Particles tend to move from higher chemical potential to lower chemical potential.'
p1881
aS'In this way, chemical potential is a generalization of "potentials" in physics such as gravitational potential.'
p1882
aS'When a ball rolls down a hill, it is moving from a higher gravitational potential (higher elevation) to a lower gravitational potential (lower elevation).'
p1883
aS'In the same way, as molecules move, react, dissolve, melt, etc., they will always tend naturally to go from a higher chemical potential to a lower one, changing the particle number, which is conjugate variable to chemical potential.A simple example is a system of dilute molecules diffusing in a homogeneous environment.'
p1884
aS'It is named after Soviet scientist Pavel Alekseyevich Cherenkov, the 1958 Nobel Prize winner who was the first to detect it experimentally.'
p1885
aS"A theory of this effect was later developed within the framework of Einstein's special relativity theory by Igor Tamm and Ilya Frank, who also shared the Nobel Prize."
p1886
aS'Cherenkov_radiation had been theoretically predicted by the English polymath Oliver Heaviside in papers published in 1888-89. Physical origin While electrodynamics holds that the speed of light in a vacuum is a universal constant (c), the speed at which light propagates in a material may be significantly less than c. For example, the speed of the propagation of light in water is only 0.75c.'
p1887
aS'Matter can be accelerated beyond this speed (although still to less than c) during nuclear reactions and in particle accelerators.'
p1888
aS'Cherenkov_radiation results when a charged particle, most commonly an electron, travels through a dielectric (electrically polarizable) medium with a speed greater than that at which light would otherwise propagate in the same medium.Moreover, the velocity that must be exceeded is the phase velocity of light rather than the group velocity of light.'
p1889
aS'The phase velocity can be altered dramatically by employing a periodic medium, and in that case one can even achieve Cherenkov_radiation with no minimum particle velocity, a phenomenon known as the Smith-Purcell effect.'
p1890
aS'In a more complex periodic medium, such as a photonic crystal, one can also obtain a variety of other anomalous Cherenkov effects, such as radiation in a backwards direction (whereas ordinary Cherenkov_radiation forms an acute angle with the particle velocity).As a charged particle travels, it disrupts the local electromagnetic field in its medium.'
p1891
aS'In the 19th century, historians and ethnographers recorded their oral tradition that told of the tribe having migrated south in ancient times from the Great Lakes region, where other Iroquoian-speaking peoples were.By the 19th century, European settlers in the United_States called the Cherokee one of the "Five Civilized Tribes", because they had adopted numerous cultural and technological practices of the European American settlers.'
p1892
aS'The Cherokee were one of the first, if not the first, major non-European ethnic group to become U.S. citizens.'
p1893
aS'Article 8 in the 1817 treaty with the Cherokee stated Cherokees may wish to become citizens of the United_States.'
p1894
aS'According to the 2010 U.S. Census, the Cherokee Nation has more than 314,000 members, the largest of the 566 federally recognized Native American tribes in the United_States.'
p1895
aS'In addition, numerous groups claiming Cherokee lineage, some of which are state-recognized, have members who are among those 819,000-plus people claiming Cherokee ancestry on the US census.Of the three federally recognized Cherokee tribes, the Cherokee Nation and the United Keetoowah Band of Cherokee Indians (UKB) have headquarters in Tahlequah, Oklahoma.'
p1896
aS'The UKB are mostly descendants of "Old Settlers," Cherokee who migrated to Arkansas and Oklahoma about 1817.'
p1897
aS'They are related to the Cherokee who were forcibly relocated there in the 1830s under the Indian Removal Act.'
p1898
aS'He succeeded by embracing the cause of civil service reform.'
p1899
aS'His advocacy for, and subsequent enforcement of, the Pendleton Civil Service Reform Act was the centerpiece of his administration.Arthur was born in Fairfield, Vermont, but he grew up in upstate New York and practiced law in New_York_City.'
p1900
aS'He served as quartermaster general in the New York Militia during the American Civil War.'
p1901
aS'Following the war, he devoted more time to Republican politics and quickly rose in the political machine run by New York Senator Roscoe Conkling.'
p1902
aS'Appointed by President Ulysses S. Grant to the lucrative and politically powerful post of Collector of the Port of New York in 1871, Arthur was an important supporter of Conkling and the Stalwart faction of the Republican Party.'
p1903
aS'In 1878 the new president, Rutherford B. Hayes, fired Arthur as part of a plan to reform the federal patronage system in New York.'
p1904
aS'When Garfield won the Republican nomination for president in 1880, Arthur, an eastern Stalwart, was nominated for vice president to balance the ticket.After just half a year as vice president, Arthur found himself in the executive mansion due to the assassination of his predecessor.'
p1905
aS'The Chicago metropolitan area is home to nearly 10 million people and is the third-largest in the United_States.'
p1906
aS'Chicago is the seat of Cook County.Chicago was incorporated as a city in 1837, near a portage between the Great Lakes and the Mississippi River watershed, and experienced rapid growth in the mid-nineteenth century.'
p1907
aS"Today, the city is an international hub for finance, commerce, industry, technology, telecommunications, and transportation, with O'Hare International Airport being the busiest airport in the world; it also has the largest number of U.S. highways and railroad freight."
p1908
aS'In 2012, Chicago was listed as an alpha global city by the Globalization and World Cities Research Network, and ranks seventh in the world in the 2014 Global Cities Index.'
p1909
aS'As of 2012, Chicago had the third largest gross metropolitan product in the United_States at US$571 billion.In 2014, Chicago hosted 50.2 million international and domestic visitors.'
p1910
aS"Chicago's culture includes contributions to the visual arts, novels, film, theater, especially improvisational comedy, and music, particularly jazz, blues, soul, and house music."
p1911
aS'The city has many nicknames, which reflect the impressions and opinions about historical and contemporary Chicago.'
p1912
aS'Chilean territory includes the Pacific islands of Juan Fernandez, Salas y Gomez, Desventuradas, and Easter Island in Oceania.'
p1913
aS'Chile also claims about 1,250,000 square kilometres (480,000 sq mi) of Antarctica, although all claims are suspended under the Antarctic Treaty.The arid Atacama_Desert in northern Chile contains great mineral wealth, principally copper.'
p1914
aS'The relatively small central area dominates in terms of population and agricultural resources, and is the cultural and political center from which Chile expanded in the late 19th century when it incorporated its northern and southern regions.'
p1915
aS'Southern Chile is rich in forests and grazing lands, and features a string of volcanoes and lakes.'
p1916
aS'The southern coast is a labyrinth of fjords, inlets, canals, twisting peninsulas, and islands.Spain conquered and colonised Chile in the mid-16th century, replacing Inca rule in northern and central Chile, but failing to conquer the independent Mapuche that inhabited south-central Chile.'
p1917
aS'After declaring its independence from Spain in 1818, Chile emerged in the 1830s as a relatively stable authoritarian republic.'
p1918
aS'In the 19th century, Chile saw significant economic and territorial growth, ending Mapuche resistance in the 1880s and gaining its current northern territory in the War of the Pacific (1879-83) after defeating Peru and Bolivia.'
p1919
aS'The PRC is a single-party state governed by the Chinese Communist Party, with its seat of government in the capital city of Beijing.'
p1920
aS'It exercises jurisdiction over 22 provinces, five autonomous regions, four direct-controlled municipalities (Beijing, Tianjin, Shanghai and Chongqing), and two mostly self-governing special administrative regions (Hong Kong and Macau).'
p1921
aS'The PRC also claims the territories governed by the Republic of China (ROC), a separate political entity today commonly known as Taiwan, as a part of its territory, which includes the island of Taiwan as Taiwan Province, Kinmen and Matsu as a part of Fujian Province and islands the ROC controls in the South China Sea as a part of Hainan Province.'
p1922
aS"These claims are controversial because of the complex political status of Taiwan.Covering approximately 9.6 million square kilometers, China is the world's second-largest country by land area, and either the third or fourth-largest by total area, depending on the method of measurement."
p1923
aS"China's landscape is vast and diverse, ranging from forest steppes and the Gobi and Taklamakan deserts in the arid north to subtropical forests in the wetter south."
p1924
aS'The Himalaya, Karakoram, Pamir and Tian Shan mountain ranges separate China from South and Central Asia.'
p1925
aS'The Yangtze and Yellow Rivers, the third- and sixth-longest in the world, run from the Tibetan Plateau to the densely populated eastern seaboard.'
p1926
aS'The act followed revisions made in 1880 to the US-China Burlingame Treaty of 1868, revisions that allowed the US to suspend Chinese immigration.'
p1927
aS'The act was initially intended to last for 10 years, but was renewed in 1892 and made permanent in 1902.'
p1928
aS'The Chinese_Exclusion_Act was the first law implemented to prevent a specific ethnic group from immigrating to the United_States.'
p1929
aS'It was finally repealed by the Magnuson Act on December 17, 1943. Background The first significant Chinese immigration to North America began with the California Gold Rush of 1848-1855 and continued with subsequent large labor projects, such as the building of the First Transcontinental Railroad.'
p1930
aS'During the early stages of the gold rush, when surface gold was plentiful, the Chinese were tolerated, if not well received.'
p1931
aS'As gold became harder to find and competition increased, animosity toward the Chinese and other foreigners increased.'
p1932
aS'After being forcibly driven from the mines, most Chinese settled in enclaves in cities, mainly San_Francisco, and took up low end wage labor such as restaurant and laundry work.'
p1933
aS'The term chirality is derived from the Greek word for hand, kheir (kheir).'
p1934
aS'It is a mathematical approach to the concept of "handedness".Conversely, an achiral object, such as an atom, is symmetric; its mirror image is not truly opposite, but rather is indistinguishable from the original.In chemistry, chirality usually refers to molecules.'
p1935
aS'Two mirror images of a chiral molecule are called enantiomers or optical isomers.'
p1936
aS'Pairs of enantiomers are often designated as "right-" and "left-handed".Molecular chirality is of interest because of its application to stereochemistry in inorganic chemistry, organic chemistry, physical chemistry, biochemistry, and supramolecular chemistry. History The term optical activity is derived from the interaction of chiral materials with polarized light.'
p1937
aS'In a solution, the (-)-form, or levorotary form, of an optical isomer rotates the plane of a beam of linearly polarized light counterclockwise.'
p1938
aS'The (+)-form, or dextrorotatory form, of an optical isomer does the opposite.'
p1939
aS'The property was first observed by Jean-Baptiste Biot in 1815, and gained considerable importance in the sugar industry, analytical chemistry, and pharmaceuticals.'
p1940
aS'Chlorophyll is an extremely important biomolecule, critical in photosynthesis, which allows plants to absorb energy from light.'
p1941
aS'Chlorophyll absorbs light most strongly in the blue portion of the electromagnetic spectrum, followed by the red portion.'
p1942
aS'Conversely, it is a poor absorber of green and near-green portions of the spectrum, hence the green color of chlorophyll-containing tissues.'
p1943
aS'Chlorophyll was first isolated and named by Joseph Bienaime Caventou and Pierre Joseph Pelletier in 1817. Gallery  Chlorophyll and photosynthesis Chlorophyll is vital for photosynthesis, which allows plants to absorb energy from light.Chlorophyll molecules are specifically arranged in and around photosystems that are embedded in the thylakoid membranes of chloroplasts.'
p1944
aS'In these complexes, chlorophyll serves two primary functions.'
p1945
aS'The function of the vast majority of chlorophyll (up to several hundred molecules per photosystem) is to absorb light and transfer that light energy by resonance energy transfer to a specific chlorophyll pair in the reaction center of the photosystems.The two currently accepted photosystem units are Photosystem II and Photosystem I, which have their own distinct reaction centres, named P680 and P700, respectively.'
p1946
aS'These centres are named after the wavelength (in nanometers) of their red-peak absorption maximum.'
p1947
aS'The classic symptom is large amounts of watery diarrhea that lasts a few days.'
p1948
aS'Vomiting and muscle cramps may also occur.'
p1949
aS'Diarrhea can be so severe that it leads within hours to severe dehydration and electrolyte imbalance.'
p1950
aS'This may result in sunken eyes, cold skin, decreased skin elasticity, and wrinkling of the hands and feet.'
p1951
aS'The dehydration may result in the skin turning bluish.'
p1952
aS'Symptoms start two hours to five days after exposure.Cholera is caused by a number of types of Vibrio cholerae, with some types producing more severe disease than others.'
p1953
aS'It is spread mostly by water and food that has been contaminated with human feces containing the bacteria.'
p1954
aS'Cholesterol enables animal cells to (a) not need a cell wall (like plants and bacteria) to protect membrane integrity/cell-viability, thus are able to (b) change shape and (c) move about (unlike bacteria and plant cells which are restricted by their cell walls).In addition to its importance within cells, cholesterol also serves as a precursor for the biosynthesis of steroid hormones, bile acids, and vitamin D. Cholesterol is the principal sterol synthesized by animals.'
p1955
aS'All kinds of cells in animals can produce it.'
p1956
aS'In vertebrates the hepatic cells typically produce greater amounts than other cells.'
p1957
aS'It is almost completely absent among prokaryotes (bacteria and archaea), although there are some exceptions such as Mycoplasma, which require cholesterol for growth.Francois Poulletier de la Salle first identified cholesterol in solid form in gallstones in 1769.'
p1958
aS'However, it was not until 1815 that chemist Michel Eugene Chevreul named the compound "cholesterine". Physiology Since cholesterol is essential for all animal life, each cell synthesizes it from simpler molecules, a complex 37-step process that starts with the intracellular protein enzyme HMG-CoA reductase.'
p1959
aS'However, normal and particularly high levels of fats (including cholesterol) in the blood circulation, depending on how they are transported within lipoproteins, are strongly associated with the progression of atherosclerosis.For a man of about 68 kg (150 lb), typical total body-cholesterol synthesis is approximately 1 g (1,000 mg) per day, and total body content is approximately 35 g, primarily located within the membranes of all the cells of the body.'
p1960
aS'Typical daily dietary intake of additional cholesterol for a man in the United_States is 307 mg, which is above the upper limit recommended by the Dietary Guidelines Advisory Committee.Most ingested cholesterol is esterified, and esterified cholesterol is poorly absorbed.'
p1961
aS'With a series of radical new works in the 1760s, among them Orfeo ed Euridice and Alceste, he broke the stranglehold that Metastasian opera seria had enjoyed for much of the century.The strong influence of French opera in these works encouraged Gluck to move to Paris, which he did in November 1773.'
p1962
aS'Fusing the traditions of Italian opera and the French national genre into a new synthesis, Gluck wrote eight operas for the Parisian stages.'
p1963
aS'One of the last of these, Iphigenie en Tauride, was a great success and is generally acknowledged to be his finest work.'
p1964
aS"Though he was extremely popular and widely credited with bringing about a revolution in French opera, Gluck's mastery of the Parisian operatic scene was never absolute, and after the poor reception of his Echo et Narcisse he left Paris in disgust and returned to Vienna to live out the remainder of his life. Early years Gluck was born on 2 July 1714 in Erasbach near Neumarkt (now a district of Berching, Bavaria)."
p1965
aS'His father Alexander was a forester in Erasbach, and after 1717 head forester in Reichstadt (today Zakupy), Kreibitz (today Chribska) and Eisenberg (today Jezeri), all in North Bohemia.'
p1966
aS'It was here, in the middle of Lusatian Mountains, where eight-year Christoph Willibald got probably the first musical education during his studies at the Jesuit gymnasium in Komotau (today Chomutov).'
p1967
aS'A year later family moved to Eisenberg, where his father was admitted to the service of Prince Philip Hyazinth von Lobkowitz.'
p1968
aS"He greatly influenced William_Shakespeare, who was born in the same year as Marlowe and who rose to become the pre-eminent Elizabethan playwright after Marlowe's mysterious early death."
p1969
aS"Marlowe's plays are known for the use of blank verse and their overreaching protagonists.A warrant was issued for Marlowe's arrest on 18 May 1593."
p1970
aS'No reason was given for it, though it was thought to be connected to allegations of blasphemy--a manuscript believed to have been written by Marlowe was said to contain "vile heretical conceipts".'
p1971
aS'On 20 May he was brought to the court to attend upon the Privy Council for questioning.'
p1972
aS'There is no record of their having met that day, however, and he was commanded to attend upon them each day thereafter until "licensed to the contrary."'
p1973
aS'Ten days later, he was stabbed to death by Ingram Frizer.'
p1974
aS'Whether the stabbing was connected to his arrest has never been resolved. Early life Marlowe was born in Canterbury to shoemaker John Marlowe and his wife Catherine.'
p1975
aS'The various constituents of the mixture travel at different speeds, causing them to separate.'
p1976
aS'The separation is based on differential partitioning between the mobile and stationary phases.'
p1977
aS"Subtle differences in a compound's partition coefficient result in differential retention on the stationary phase and thus changing the separation.Chromatography may be preparative or analytical."
p1978
aS'The purpose of preparative chromatography is to separate the components of a mixture for more advanced use (and is thus a form of purification).'
p1979
aS'Analytical chromatography is done normally with smaller amounts of material and is for measuring the relative proportions of analytes in a mixture.'
p1980
aS'The two are not mutually exclusive. History Chromatography was first employed in Russia by the Italian-born scientist Mikhail Tsvet in 1900.'
p1981
aS'He continued to work with chromatography in the first decade of the 20th century, primarily for the separation of plant pigments such as chlorophyll, carotenes, and xanthophylls.'
p1982
aS'He wakes up from an ostensibly meaningless dream of trees.'
p1983
aS"The reader learns that Santiago lives with his mother, Placida Linero; the cook, Victoria Guzman; and the cook's daughter, Divina Flor."
p1984
aS"Santiago took over the successful family ranch after the death of his father Ibrahim.The day of Santiago Nasar's death also happens to be the day the Bishop plans to come by boat to bless the marriage of Angela Vicario and Bayardo San Roman."
p1985
aS'His blessings, as the reader learns later, will be of no use.'
p1986
aS"As the town prepares for the Bishop's arrival, Angela's twin brothers Pedro and Pablo sit in the local milk shop watching for Santiago so that they may carry out their plans to murder him.The reader gradually learns of Angela Vicario's story: her groom, Bayardo San Roman, was a foreigner who had come to town to find a bride."
p1987
aS"After finding Angela, Bayardo decided to marry her; his wealthy status compared with the relative poverty of the Vicarios left no choice for Angela's freedom, and thus they were planned to wed.The night before the wedding day, festivities in preparation for the wedding took place at a local whorehouse run by Maria Alejandrina Cervantes, where the narrator partied with Santiago and the Vicario twins until the early morning."
p1988
aS'The Vicario twins left and returned home to find that their sister had been quietly returned by Bayardo San Roman, who had found out that she was not a virgin as he had expected.'
p1989
aS'According to Michael Grant, "the influence of Cicero upon the history of European literature and ideas greatly exceeds that of any other prose writer in any language".'
p1990
aS"Cicero introduced the Romans to the chief schools of Greek philosophy and created a Latin philosophical vocabulary (with neologisms such as humanitas, qualitas, quantitas, and essentia) distinguishing himself as a linguist, translator, and philosopher.Petrarch's rediscovery of Cicero's letters is often credited for initiating the 14th-century Renaissance in public affairs, humanism, and classical Roman culture."
p1991
aS'According to Polish historian Tadeusz Zielinski, "Renaissance was above all things a revival of Cicero, and only after him and through him of the rest of Classical antiquity."'
p1992
aS"The peak of Cicero's authority and prestige came during the eighteenth-century Enlightenment, and his impact on leading Enlightenment thinkers such as John Locke, David Hume, and Montesquieu was substantial."
p1993
aS'His works rank among the most influential in European culture, and today still constitute one of the most important bodies of primary material for the writing and revision of Roman history, especially the last days of the Roman Republic.Though he was an accomplished orator and successful lawyer, Cicero believed his political career was his most important achievement.'
p1994
aS'It was during his consulship that the Second Catilinarian Conspiracy attempted to overthrow the government through an attack on the city by outside forces, and Cicero suppressed the revolt by executing five conspirators without due process.'
p1995
aS'During the chaotic latter half of the 1st century BC marked by civil wars and the dictatorship of Gaius Julius Caesar, Cicero championed a return to the traditional republican government.'
p1996
aS'By most accounts, Circe was the daughter of Helios, the god of the sun, and Perse, an Oceanid.'
p1997
aS'Her brothers were Aeetes, the keeper of the Golden Fleece, and Perses.'
p1998
aS'Her sister was Pasiphae, the wife of King Minos and mother of the Minotaur.'
p1999
aS'Other accounts make her the daughter of Hecate, the goddess of witchcraft herself.Circe was renowned for her vast knowledge of potions and herbs.'
p2000
aS'Through the use of magical potions and a wand or a staff, she transformed her enemies, or those who offended her, into animals.'
p2001
aS'She herself was thought to be a hawk, whence the name (kirke is the feminine form of kirkos, hawk).'
p2002
aS'Some say she was exiled to the solitary island of Aeaea by her subjects and her father for ending the life of her husband, the prince of Colchis.'
p2003
aS'The circumcision device (if used) is placed, and then the foreskin is removed.'
p2004
aS'Topical or locally injected anesthesia is occasionally used to reduce pain and physiologic stress.'
p2005
aS'For adults, general anesthesia is an option, and the procedure may be performed without a specialized circumcision device.'
p2006
aS'The procedure is most often an elective surgery performed on neonates and children for religious and cultural reasons, but in other cases may be indicated for both therapeutic and prophylactic reasons.'
p2007
aS"It is a treatment option for pathological phimosis, refractory balanoposthitis and chronic urinary tract infections (UTIs); it is contraindicated in cases of certain genital structure abnormalities or poor general health.The positions of the world's major medical organizations range from considering neonatal circumcision as having no benefit and significant risks to having a modest health benefit that outweighs small risks."
p2008
aS'No major medical organization recommends either universal circumcision for all infant males (aside from the recommendations of the World Health Organization for parts of Africa), or banning the procedure.'
p2009
aS'Ethical and legal questions regarding informed consent and autonomy have been raised over non-therapeutic neonatal circumcision.Evidence supports that male circumcision reduces the risk of HIV infection among heterosexual men in sub-Saharan Africa.'
p2010
aS'Its central importance to many biochemical pathways suggests that it was one of the earliest established components of cellular metabolism and may have originated abiogenically.The name of this metabolic pathway is derived from citric acid (a type of tricarboxylic acid) that is consumed and then regenerated by this sequence of reactions to complete the cycle.'
p2011
aS'In addition, the cycle consumes acetate (in the form of acetyl-CoA) and water, reduces NAD+ to NADH, and produces carbon dioxide as a waste byproduct.'
p2012
aS'The NADH generated by the TCA cycle is fed into the oxidative phosphorylation (electron transport) pathway.'
p2013
aS'The net result of these two closely linked pathways is the oxidation of nutrients to produce usable chemical energy in the form of ATP.In eukaryotic cells, the citric acid cycle occurs in the matrix of the mitochondrion.'
p2014
aS"In prokaryotic cells, such as bacteria which lack mitochondria, the TCA reaction sequence is performed in the cytosol with the proton gradient for ATP production being across the cell's surface (plasma membrane) rather than the inner membrane of the mitochondrion. DiscoveryEdit Several of the components and reactions of the citric acid cycle were established in the 1930s by the research of the Nobel laureate Albert Szent-Gyorgyi, for which he received the Nobel Prize in 1937 for his discoveries pertaining to fumaric acid, a key component of the cycle."
p2015
aS'The citric acid cycle itself was finally identified in 1937 by Hans Adolf Krebs while at the University of Sheffield, for which he received the Nobel Prize for Physiology or Medicine in 1953. EvolutionEdit Components of the TCA cycle were derived from anaerobic bacteria, and the TCA cycle itself may have evolved more than once.'
p2016
aS'Theoretically there are several alternatives to the TCA cycle; however, the TCA cycle appears to be the most efficient.'
p2017
aS'There are a number of different combinations of enolizable and nonenolizable carbonyl compounds that form a few different types of Claisen_condensations.The base used must not interfere with the reaction by undergoing nucleophilic substitution or addition with a carbonyl carbon.'
p2018
aS'For this reason, the conjugate sodium alkoxide base of the alcohol formed (e.g.'
p2019
aS'sodium ethoxide if ethanol is formed) is often used, since the alkoxide is regenerated.'
p2020
aS'In mixed Claisen_condensations, a non-nucleophilic base such as lithium diisopropylamide, or LDA, may be used, since only one compound is enolizable.'
p2021
aS'LDA is not commonly used in the classic Claisen or Dieckmann condensations due to enolization of the electrophilic ester.The alkoxy portion of the ester must be a relatively good leaving group.'
p2022
aS'Methyl and ethyl esters, which yields methoxide and ethoxide, respectively, are commonly used. Types The classic Claisen_condensation, a self-condensation between two molecules of a compound containing an enolizable ester.The mixed (or "crossed") Claisen_condensation, where one enolizable ester or ketone and one nonenolizable ester are used.The Dieckmann condensation, where a molecule with two ester groups reacts intramolecularly, forming a cyclic b-keto ester.'
p2023
aS'In this case, the ring formed must not be strained, usually a 5- or 6-membered chain or ring. Mechanism In the first step of the mechanism, an a-proton is removed by a strong base, resulting in the formation of an enolate anion, which is made relatively stable by the delocalization of electrons.'
p2024
aS'Crossover experiments eliminate the possibility of the rearrangement occurring via an intermolecular reaction mechanism and are consistent with an intramolecular process, now understood as a [3,3]-electrocyclic reaction.There are substantial solvent effects in the Claisen reactions.'
p2025
aS'More polar solvents tend to accelerate the reaction to a greater extent.'
p2026
aS'Hydrogen-bonding solvents gave the highest rate constants.'
p2027
aS'For example, ethanol/water solvent mixtures give rate constants 10-fold higher than sulfolane.Trivalent organoaluminium reagents, such as trimethylaluminium, have been shown to accelerate this reaction. Variations  Aromatic Claisen_rearrangement The aromatic variation of the Claisen_rearrangement is the [3,3]-sigmatropic rearrangement of an allyl phenyl ether to an intermediate which quickly tautomerizes to an ortho-substituted phenol.Meta-substitution affects the regioselectivity of the ortho rearrangement.'
p2028
aS'With the meta constituent in the 3rd position, electron withdrawing functional groups, such as bromide, move the side-chain to the 2nd position (71% of products) while electron donating groups, such as methoxy, shift it to the 6th position (69% of products).'
p2029
aS'If ortho-position is substituted then reaction goes to para position with retention in configuration.Additionally if an aldehyde or carboxylic acid occupies the substituted position the allyl side-chain displaces the group, releasing it quantitatively as carbon monoxide or carbon dioxide respectively. Bellus-Claisen_rearrangement The Bellus-Claisen_rearrangement is the reaction of allylic ethers, amines, and thioethers with ketenes to give g,d-unsaturated esters, amides, and thioesters. Eschenmoser-Claisen_rearrangement The Eschenmoser-Claisen_rearrangement proceeds from an allylic alcohol to a g,d-unsaturated amide, and was developed by Albert Eschenmoser in 1964.Mechanism: Ireland-Claisen_rearrangement The Ireland-Claisen_rearrangement is the reaction of an allylic acetate with strong base (such as Lithium diisopropylamide) to give a g,d-unsaturated carboxylic acid.'
p2030
aS'The actual rearrangement occurs from the enolate of the ester--this is the structural analog of the simple alkene in the original Claisen_rearrangement.Mechanism: Johnson-Claisen_rearrangement The Johnson-Claisen_rearrangement is the reaction of an allylic alcohol with an orthoester containing a deprotonatable alpha carbon (e.g.'
p2031
aS'It "is plainly a diminutive of clarino, the Italian for trumpet", and the Italian clarinetto is the source of the name in many other languages.'
p2032
aS'According to Johann Gottfried Walther, writing in 1732, the reason for the name is that "it sounded from far off not unlike a trumpet".'
p2033
aS'The English form clarinet is found as early as 1733, and the now-archaic clarionet appears from 1784 until the early years of the 20th century.'
p2034
aS'Johann Christoph Denner invented the clarinet in Germany around the turn of the 18th century by adding a register key to the earlier chalumeau.'
p2035
aS'Over time, additional keywork and airtight pads were added to improve the tone and playability.The term clarinet now normally refers to the B clarinet (also B soprano clarinet).'
p2036
aS'However, the clarinet in A, just a semitone lower, is commonly used in orchestral music.'
p2037
aS'Since the middle of the 19th century the bass clarinet (nowadays invariably in B but with extra keys to extend the register down a few notes) has become an essential addition to the orchestra.'
p2038
aS"It is generally regarded as Richardson's masterpiece. Plot summary Clarissa Harlowe, the tragic heroine of Clarissa, is a beautiful and virtuous young lady whose family has become wealthy only recently and now desires to become part of the aristocracy."
p2039
aS"Their original plan was to concentrate the wealth and lands of the Harlowes into the possession of Clarissa's brother James Harlowe, whose wealth and political power will lead to his being granted a title."
p2040
aS"Clarissa's grandfather leaves her a substantial piece of property upon his death, and a new route to the nobility opens through Clarissa marrying Robert Lovelace, heir to an earldom."
p2041
aS"James's response is to provoke a duel with Lovelace, who is seen thereafter as the family's enemy."
p2042
aS"James also proposes that Clarissa marry Roger Solmes, who is willing to trade properties with James to concentrate James's holdings and speed his becoming Lord Harlowe."
p2043
aS'The family agrees and attempts to force Clarissa to marry Solmes, whom she finds physically disgusting as well as boorish.Desperate to remain free, she begins a correspondence with Lovelace.'
p2044
aS"When her family's campaign to force her marriage reaches its height, Lovelace tricks her into eloping with him."
p2045
aS'He was made Chevalier of the Legion of Honour in his native France in 1903.'
p2046
aS"Debussy was among the most influential composers of the late 19th and early 20th centuries, and his use of non-traditional scales and chromaticism influenced many composers who followed.Debussy's music is noted for its sensory content and frequent usage of atonality."
p2047
aS'The prominent French literary style of his period was known as Symbolism, and this movement directly inspired Debussy both as a composer and as an active cultural participant. Early life Debussy was born Achille-Claude_Debussy (he later reversed his forenames) on 22 August 1862 in Saint-Germain-en-Laye, France, the oldest of five children.'
p2048
aS'His father, Manuel-Achille Debussy, owned a china shop there; his mother, Victorine Manoury Debussy, was a seamstress.'
p2049
aS"The family moved to Paris in 1867, but in 1870 Debussy's pregnant mother fled with Claude to his paternal aunt's home in Cannes to escape the Franco-Prussian_War."
p2050
aS'Debussy began piano lessons there at the age of seven with an Italian violinist in his early 40s named Cerutti; his aunt paid for his lessons.'
p2051
aS'In 1871 he drew the attention of Marie Maute de Fleurville, who claimed to have been a pupil of Frederic_Chopin.'
p2052
aS"Monteverdi wrote one of the earliest operas, L'Orfeo, a novel work that is the earliest surviving opera still regularly performed."
p2053
aS'He is widely recognized as an inventive composer who enjoyed considerable fame in his lifetime. Life Claudio_Monteverdi was born in 1567 in Cremona, Lombardy.'
p2054
aS'His father was Baldassare Monteverdi, a doctor, apothecary and amateur surgeon.'
p2055
aS'He was the oldest of five children.'
p2056
aS"During his childhood, he was taught by Marc'Antonio Ingegneri, the maestro di cappella at the Cathedral of Cremona."
p2057
aS"The Maestro's job was to conduct important worship services in accordance with the liturgy of the Catholic Church."
p2058
aS'Monteverdi learned about music as a member of the cathedral choir.'
p2059
aS'730, enacted October 15, 1914, codified at 15 U.S.C.'
p2060
aS'SSSS 12-27, 29 U.S.C.'
p2061
aS'SSSS 52-53), was a part of United_States antitrust law with the goal of adding further substance to the U.S. antitrust law regime; the Clayton Act sought to prevent anticompetitive practices in their incipiency.'
p2062
aS'That regime started with the Sherman_Antitrust_Act of 1890, the first Federal law outlawing practices considered harmful to consumers (monopolies, cartels, and trusts).'
p2063
aS'The Clayton Act specified particular prohibited conduct, the three-level enforcement scheme, the exemptions, and the remedial measures.Like the Sherman Act, much of the substance of the Clayton Act has been developed and animated by the U.S. courts, particularly the Supreme Court. Background Since the Sherman_Antitrust_Act of 1890, courts in the United_States had interpreted the law on cartels as applying against trade unions.'
p2064
aS'This had created an impossible situation for workers, who needed to organize so as to rebalance the equal bargaining power against their employers.'
p2065
aS'The Sherman Act had also triggered the largest wave of mergers in US history, as businesses realized that instead of creating a cartel they could simply fuse into a single corporation, and have all the benefits of market power that a cartel could bring.'
p2066
aS'For these accomplishments, historians refer to him as "the father of Athenian democracy."'
p2067
aS"He was the maternal grandson of the tyrant Cleisthenes of Sicyon, as the younger son of the latter's daughter Agariste and her husband Megacles."
p2068
aS"Also, he was credited with increasing the power of the Athenian citizens' assembly and for reducing the power of the nobility over Athenian politics."
p2069
aS' Biography Historians estimate that Cleisthenes was born around 570 BC.'
p2070
aS'Cleisthenes was the uncle of Pericles\' mother Agariste and of Alcibiades\' maternal grandfather Megacles. Rise to power With help from the Alcmaeonidae (Cleisthenes\' genos, "clan"), he was responsible for overthrowing Hippias, the tyrant son of Pisistratus.'
p2071
aS"After the collapse of Hippias' tyranny, Isagoras and Cleisthenes were rivals for power, but Isagoras won the upper hand by appealing to the Spartan king Cleomenes I to help him expel Cleisthenes."
p2072
aS'He did so on the pretext of the Alcmaeonid curse.'
p2073
aS'With aliphatic or cyclic ketones, zinc metal reduction is much more effective.The substrate must be unreactive to the strongly acidic conditions of the Clemmensen_reduction.'
p2074
aS'Acid sensitive substrates should be reacted in the Wolff-Kishner reduction, which utilizes strongly basic conditions; a further, milder method is the Mozingo reduction.'
p2075
aS'The oxygen atom is lost in the form of one molecule of water. References  Reviews Martin, E. L. (1942).'
p2076
aS'Org.'
p2077
aS'React.'
p2078
aS'1: 155.'
p2079
aS'Buchanan, J. G. St. C.; Woodgate, P. D. (1969).'
p2080
aS'With sufficient saturation in the troposphere, precipitation will fall to the surface; an exception is virga, which evaporates before reaching the surface.'
p2081
aS"Clouds that form at very high altitudes in the stratosphere and mesosphere do not contain sufficient moisture to generate any outfall of droplets or crystals.Clouds in the troposphere, the atmospheric layer closest to Earth's surface, have Latin names due to the universal adaptation of Luke Howard's nomenclature."
p2082
aS"It was introduced in December 1802 and became the basis of a modern international system that classifies these tropospheric aerosols into several physical forms, then cross-classifies them as low, middle and high-etage according to cloud-base altitude range above Earth's surface."
p2083
aS'Clouds with significant vertical extent occupying more than one etage are often considered a distinct group or sub-group.One physical form shows free-convective upward growth into low or vertical cumuliform heaps.'
p2084
aS'Other more layered types appear as non-convective stratiform sheets, and as limited-convective stratocumuliform rolls or ripples.'
p2085
aS'Both these layered forms have low, middle, and high-etage variants with the latter two identified respectively by the prefixes alto- and cirro-.'
p2086
aS'Thin cirriform wisps are found only at high altitudes of the troposphere.'
p2087
aS'The free element, produced by reductive smelting, is a hard, lustrous, silver-gray metal.Cobalt-based blue pigments (cobalt blue) have been used since ancient times for jewelry and paints, and to impart a distinctive blue tint to glass, but the color was later thought by alchemists to be due to the known metal bismuth.'
p2088
aS'Miners had long used the name kobold ore (German for goblin ore) for some of the blue-pigment producing minerals; they were so named because they were poor in known metals, and gave poisonous arsenic-containing fumes upon smelting.'
p2089
aS'In 1735, such ores were found to be reducible to a new metal (the first discovered since ancient times), and this was ultimately named for the kobold.Today, some cobalt is produced specifically from various metallic-lustered ores, for example cobaltite (CoAsS), but the main source of the element is as a by-product of copper and nickel mining.'
p2090
aS'The copper belt in the Democratic Republic of the Congo and Zambia yields most of the cobalt mined worldwide.Cobalt is primarily used as the metal, in the preparation of magnetic, wear-resistant and high-strength alloys.'
p2091
aS'Its compounds cobalt silicate and cobalt(II) aluminate (CoAl2O4, cobalt blue) give a distinctive deep blue color to glass, ceramics, inks, paints and varnishes.'
p2092
aS'Cobalt occurs naturally as only one stable isotope, cobalt-59.'
p2093
aS'Cobalt-60 is a commercially important radioisotope, used as a radioactive tracer and for the production of high energy gamma rays.Cobalt is the active center of coenzymes called cobalamins, the most common example of which is vitamin B12.'
p2094
aS'Adjustments result in one of three relationships between two cognitions or between a cognition and a behavior.Consonant relationship - Two cognitions/actions that are consistent with one another (e.g., not wanting to get intoxicated while out, then ordering water instead of alcohol)Irrelevant relationship - Two cognitions/actions that are unrelated to one another (e.g., not wanting to get intoxicated while out, then tying your shoes)Dissonant relationship - Two cognitions/actions that are inconsistent with one another (e.g., not wanting to get intoxicated while out, then consuming a large quantity of alcohol) Magnitude of dissonance The amount of dissonance produced by two conflicting cognitions or actions (as well as the subsequent psychological distress) depends on two factors:The importance of cognitions: The more elements that are personally valued, the greater the magnitude of the dissonant relationship.Ratio of cognitions: The proportion of dissonant to consonant elementsThe pressure to reduce cognitive dissonance is a function of the magnitude of said dissonance. Reducing Cognitive_dissonance theory is founded on the assumption that individuals seek consistency between their expectations and their reality.'
p2095
aS'Because of this, people engage in a process called dissonance reduction to bring their cognitions and actions in line with one another.'
p2096
aS'This creation of uniformity allows for a lessening of psychological tension and distress.'
p2097
aS'According to Festinger, dissonance reduction can be achieved in four ways.'
p2098
aS'In an example case where a person has adopted the attitude that they will no longer eat high fat food, but eats a high-fat doughnut, the four methods of reduction are:Change behavior or cognition ("I will not eat any more of this doughnut")Justify behavior or cognition by changing the conflicting cognition ("I\'m allowed to cheat every once in a while")Justify behavior or cognition by adding new cognitions ("I\'ll spend 30 extra minutes at the gym to work this off")Ignore or deny any information that conflicts with existing beliefs ("This doughnut is not high in fat") Theory and research Most of the research on cognitive dissonance takes the form of one of four major paradigms.'
p2099
aS'Important research generated by the theory has been concerned with the consequences of exposure to information inconsistent with a prior belief, what happens after individuals act in ways that are inconsistent with their prior attitudes, what happens after individuals make decisions, and the effects of effort expenditure.'
p2100
aS'A key tenet of cognitive dissonance theory is that those who have heavily invested in a position may, when confronted with disconfirming evidence, go to greater lengths to justify their position. Belief disconfirmation paradigm Dissonance is felt when people are confronted with information that is inconsistent with their beliefs.'
p2101
aS'It is also abundant in corneas, cartilage, bones, blood vessels, the gut, intervertebral discs and the dentin in teeth.'
p2102
aS'In muscle tissue, it serves as a major component of the endomysium.'
p2103
aS'Collagen constitutes one to two percent of muscle tissue, and accounts for 6% of the weight of strong, tendinous muscles.'
p2104
aS'The fibroblast is the most common cell that creates collagen.Gelatin, which is used in food and industry, is collagen that has been irreversibly hydrolyzed.'
p2105
aS'Collagen also has many medical uses in treating complications of the bones and skin.The name collagen comes from the Greek kolla (kolla), meaning "glue", and suffix -gen, -gen, denoting "producing".'
p2106
aS"This refers to the compound's early use in the process of boiling the skin and sinews of horses and other animals to obtain glue. Types of collagenEdit Collagen occurs in many places throughout the body."
p2107
aS'Over 90% of the collagen in the body, however, is type I.So far, 28 types of collagen have been identified and described.'
p2108
aS'Unlike a solution, whose solute and solvent constitute only one phase, a colloid has a dispersed phase (the suspended particles) and a continuous phase (the medium of suspension).'
p2109
aS'To qualify as a colloid, the mixture must be one that does not settle or would take a very long time to settle appreciably.The dispersed-phase particles have a diameter of between approximately 1 and 1000 nanometers.'
p2110
aS'Such particles are normally easily visible in an optical microscope, although at the smaller size range (r<250 nm), an ultramicroscope or an electron microscope may be required.'
p2111
aS'Homogeneous mixtures with a dispersed phase in this size range may be called colloidal aerosols, colloidal emulsions, colloidal foams, colloidal dispersions, or hydrosols.'
p2112
aS'The dispersed-phase particles or droplets are affected largely by the surface chemistry present in the colloid.Some colloids are translucent because of the Tyndall effect, which is the scattering of light by particles in the colloid.'
p2113
aS'Other colloids may be opaque or have a slight color.Colloidal suspensions are the subject of interface and colloid science.'
p2114
aS'This field of study was introduced in 1861 by Scottish scientist Thomas Graham. Classification Because the size of the dispersed phase may be difficult to measure, and because colloids have the appearance of solutions, colloids are sometimes identified and characterized by their physico-chemical and transport properties.'
p2115
aS'The Spanish arrived in 1499 and initiated a period of conquest and colonization ultimately creating the Viceroyalty of New Granada, with its capital at Bogota.'
p2116
aS'Independence from Spain was won in 1819, but by 1830 "Gran Colombia" had collapsed with the secession of Venezuela and Ecuador.'
p2117
aS'What is now Colombia and Panama emerged as the Republic of New Granada.'
p2118
aS'The new nation experimented with federalism as the Granadine Confederation (1858), and then the United_States of Colombia (1863), before the Republic of Colombia was finally declared in 1886.'
p2119
aS'Panama seceded in 1903.Since the 1960s, the country has suffered from an asymmetric low-intensity armed conflict, which escalated in the 1990s, but then decreased from 2000 onward.Colombia is ethnically diverse, its people descending from the original native inhabitants, Spanish colonists, Africans originally brought to the country as slaves, and 20th-century immigrants from Europe and the Middle East, all contributing to a diverse cultural heritage.'
p2120
aS"This has also been influenced by Colombia's varied geography, and the imposing landscape of the country has resulted in the development of very strong regional identities."
p2121
aS"The majority of the urban centres are located in the highlands of the Andes mountains, but Colombian territory also encompasses Amazon rainforest, tropical grassland and both Caribbean and Pacific coastlines.Ecologically, Colombia is considered one of the world's 17 megadiverse countries, and of these, the most biodiverse per square kilometer."
p2122
aS'Colorado is the 8th most extensive and the 22nd most populous of the 50 United_States.'
p2123
aS'The United_States Census Bureau estimates that the population of Colorado was 5,355,866 on July 1, 2014, an increase of 6.50% since the 2010 United_States Census.The state was named for the Colorado River, which Spanish travelers named the Rio Colorado for the ruddy (Spanish: colorado) silt the river carried from the mountains.'
p2124
aS'The Territory of Colorado was organized on February 28, 1861, and on August 1, 1876, U.S. President Ulysses S. Grant signed a proclamation admitting Colorado to the Union as the 38th state.'
p2125
aS'Colorado is nicknamed the "Centennial State" because it became a state 28 days after the centennial of the United_States Declaration of Independence.Colorado is bordered by Wyoming to the north, Nebraska to the northeast, Kansas to the east, Oklahoma to the southeast, New_Mexico to the south, Utah to the west, and Arizona to the southwest, at the Four Corners.'
p2126
aS'Colorado is noted for its vivid landscape of mountains, forests, high plains, mesas, canyons, plateaus, rivers, and desert lands.Denver is the capital and the most populous city of Colorado.'
p2127
aS'Residents of the state are properly known as "Coloradans", although the archaic term "Coloradoan" is still in use. Geography Colorado is notable for its diverse geography, ranging from alpine mountains, arid plains and deserts with huge sand dunes, deep canyons, sandstone and granite rock formations, rivers, lakes, and lush forests.'
p2128
aS"The borders of Colorado were originally defined to be lines of latitude and longitude, making its shape a latitude-longitude* quadrangle which stretches from 37degN to 41degN latitude and from 102deg03'W to 109deg03'W longitude (25degW to 32degW from the Washington Meridian)."
p2129
aS'at a lower relative marginal cost prior to trade.'
p2130
aS'One does not compare the monetary costs of production or even the resource costs (labor needed per unit of output) of production.'
p2131
aS'Instead, one must compare the opportunity costs of producing goods across countries.'
p2132
aS"The closely related law or principle of comparative advantage holds that under free trade, an agent will produce more of and consume less of a good for which he has a comparative advantage.David_Ricardo developed the classical theory of comparative advantage in 1817 to explain why countries engage in international trade even when one country's workers are more efficient at producing every single good than workers in other countries."
p2133
aS'He demonstrated that if two countries capable of producing two commodities engage in the free market, then each country will increase its overall consumption by exporting the good for which it has a comparative advantage while importing the other good, provided that there exist differences in labor productivity between both countries.'
p2134
aS'Widely regarded as one of the most powerful yet counter-intuitive insights in economics, Ricardo\'s theory implies that comparative advantage rather than absolute advantage is responsible for much of international trade. The classical theory Adam_Smith first alluded to the concept of absolute advantage as the basis for international trade in The Wealth of Nations:"If a foreign country can supply us with a commodity cheaper than we ourselves can make it, better buy it of them with some part of the produce of our own industry employed in a way in which we have some advantage.'
p2135
aS'The general industry of the country, being always in proportion to the capital which employs it, will not thereby be diminished ... but only left to find out the way in which it can be employed with the greatest advantage.'
p2136
aS'If the compiled program can run on a computer whose CPU or operating system is different from the one on which the compiler runs, the compiler is known as a cross-compiler.'
p2137
aS'More generally, compilers are a specific type of translators.A program that translates from a low level language to a higher level one is a decompiler.'
p2138
aS'A program that translates between high-level languages is usually called a source-to-source compiler or transpiler.'
p2139
aS'A language rewriter is usually a program that translates the form of expressions without a change of language.'
p2140
aS'The term compiler-compiler is sometimes used to refer to a parser generator, a tool often used to help create the lexer and parser.A compiler is likely to perform many or all of the following operations: lexical analysis, preprocessing, parsing, semantic analysis (syntax-directed translation), code generation, and code optimization.'
p2141
aS'Program faults caused by incorrect compiler behavior can be very difficult to track down and work around; therefore, compiler implementors invest significant effort to ensure compiler correctness. History Software for early computers was primarily written in assembly language.'
p2142
aS'Although the first high level language is nearly as old as the first computer, the limited memory capacity of early computers led to substantial technical challenges when the first compilers were designed.The first high-level programming language (Plankalkul) was proposed by Konrad Zuse in 1943.'
p2143
aS'Controversy arose over the Fugitive Slave provision.'
p2144
aS'The Compromise was greeted with relief, although each side disliked specific provisions.Texas surrendered its claim to New_Mexico, over which it had threatened war, as well as its claims north of the Missouri Compromise Line.'
p2145
aS"It retained the Texas Panhandle and the federal government took over the state's public debt.California was admitted as a free state with its current boundaries.The South prevented adoption of the Wilmot Proviso that would have outlawed slavery in the new territories, and the new Utah Territory and New_Mexico Territory were allowed, under the principle of popular sovereignty, to decide whether to allow slavery within their borders."
p2146
aS'In practice, these lands were generally unsuited to plantation agriculture and their settlers were uninterested in slavery.The slave trade (but not slavery altogether) was banned in Washington D.C.The Compromise became possible after the sudden death of President Zachary Taylor, who, although a slaveowner, had favored excluding slavery from the Southwest.'
p2147
aS'Whig leader Henry_Clay designed a compromise, which failed to pass in early 1850, due to opposition by both pro-slavery southern Democrats, led by John C. Calhoun, and anti-slavery northern Whigs.'
p2148
aS"Upon Clay's instruction, Douglas then divided Clay's bill into several smaller pieces and narrowly won their passage over the opposition of those with stronger views on both sides. Background Soon after the start of the Mexican War, when the extent of the territories to be acquired was still unclear, the question of whether to allow slavery in those territories polarized the Northern and Southern United_States in the most bitter sectional conflict up to this time."
p2149
aS'Since Texas was a slave state, not only the residents of that State, but the pro- and anti-slavery camps on a national scale had an interest in the size of the state of Texas.'
p2150
aS'The King was recognized as having the right to invest bishops with secular authority ("by the lance") in the territories they governed, but not with sacred authority ("by ring and staff"); the result was that bishops owed allegiance in worldly matters both to the pope and to the king, for they were obligated to affirm the right of the sovereign to call upon them for military support, under his oath of fealty.'
p2151
aS'Previous Holy Roman Emperors had thought it their right, granted by God, to name Church officials within their territories (such as bishops) and to confirm the Papal election (and, at times of extraordinary urgency, actually name popes).'
p2152
aS'In fact, the Emperors had been heavily relying on bishops for their secular administration, as they were not hereditary or quasi-hereditary nobility with family interests, thus adding further suspense to the struggle.'
p2153
aS'A more immediate result of the Investiture struggle identified a proprietary right that adhered to sovereign territory, recognizing the right of kings to income from the territory of a vacant diocese and a basis for justifiable taxation.'
p2154
aS'These rights lay outside feudalism, which defined authority in a hierarchy of personal relations, with only a loose relation to territory.'
p2155
aS'The pope emerged as a figure above and out of the direct control of the Holy Roman Emperor.Following efforts by Lamberto Scannabecchi (later Pope Honorius II) and the Diet of Wurzburg (1121) in 1122, Pope Calixtus II and Holy Roman Emperor Henry V entered into an agreement that effectively ended the Investiture Controversy.'
p2156
aS"By the terms of the agreement, the election of bishops and abbots in Germany was to take place in the emperor's presence as judge between potentially disputing parties, free of bribes, thus retaining to the emperor a crucial role in choosing these great territorial magnates of the Empire."
p2157
aS'As a result, Ottoman holdings in Europe declined sharply; Bulgaria was established as an independent principality inside the Ottoman_Empire; Eastern Rumelia was restored to the Turks under a special administration; and the region of Macedonia was returned outright to the Turks, who promised reform.'
p2158
aS'Romania achieved full independence, turning over part of Bessarabia to Russia and gaining Northern Dobruja in return.'
p2159
aS'Serbia and Montenegro finally gained complete independence, but with smaller territories, with Austria-Hungary occupying the Sandzak (Raska) region.'
p2160
aS'Austria-Hungary also took over Bosnia and Herzegovina, whereas Britain took over Cyprus.The results were first hailed as a great achievement in peacemaking and stabilization.'
p2161
aS'However, most of the participants were not fully satisfied, and grievances regarding the results festered until they exploded in world war in 1914.'
p2162
aS'Serbia, Bulgaria, and Greece made gains, but far less than they thought they deserved.'
p2163
aS'The Ottoman_Empire, called at the time the "sick man of Europe," was humiliated and significantly weakened, rendering it more liable to domestic unrest and more vulnerable to attack.'
p2164
aS'The goal was not simply to restore old boundaries, but to resize the main powers so they could balance each other off and remain at peace.'
p2165
aS'The leaders were conservatives with little use for republicanism or revolution.'
p2166
aS'France lost all its recent conquests, while Prussia, Austria and Russia made major territorial gains.'
p2167
aS'Prussia added smaller German states in the west and 40% of the Kingdom of Saxony; Austria gained Venice and much of northern Italy.'
p2168
aS'Russia gained parts of Poland.'
p2169
aS'The new Kingdom of the Netherlands had been created just months before, and included formerly Austrian territory that in 1830 became Belgium.Historian Paul Schroeder argues that the old formulas for "balance of power" were in fact highly destabilizing and predatory.'
p2170
aS'He says the Congress_of_Vienna avoided them and instead set up rules that produced a stable and benign equilibrium.'
p2171
aS'Despite the difficulty in definition, many philosophers believe that there is a broadly shared underlying intuition about what consciousness is.'
p2172
aS'As Max Velmans and Susan Schneider wrote in The Blackwell Companion to Consciousness: "Anything that we are aware of at a given moment forms part of our consciousness, making conscious experience at once the most familiar and most mysterious aspect of our lives.'
p2173
aS'"Western philosophers since the time of Descartes and Locke have struggled to comprehend the nature of consciousness and pin down its essential properties.'
p2174
aS'Issues of concern in the philosophy of consciousness include whether the concept is fundamentally coherent; whether consciousness can ever be explained mechanistically; whether non-human consciousness exists and if so how can it be recognized; how consciousness relates to language; whether consciousness can be understood in a way that does not require a dualistic distinction between mental and physical states or properties; and whether it may ever be possible for computing machines like computers or robots to be conscious, a topic studied in the field of artificial intelligence.At one time consciousness was viewed with skepticism by many scientists, but in recent years it has become a significant topic of research in psychology, neuropsychology and neuroscience.'
p2175
aS'The primary focus is on understanding what it means biologically and psychologically for information to be present in consciousness--that is, on determining the neural and psychological correlates of consciousness.'
p2176
aS'The majority of experimental studies assess consciousness by asking human subjects for a verbal report of their experiences (e.g., "tell me if you notice anything when I do this").'
p2177
aS"Issues of interest include phenomena such as subliminal perception, blindsight, denial of impairment, and altered states of consciousness produced by drugs and alcohol, or spiritual or meditative techniques.In medicine, consciousness is assessed by observing a patient's arousal and responsiveness, and can be seen as a continuum of states ranging from full alertness and comprehension, through disorientation, delirium, loss of meaningful communication, and finally loss of movement in response to painful stimuli."
p2178
aS'As a child he displayed an aptitude for carving wooden farm tools.'
p2179
aS'Formal studies took him first to Bucharest, then to Munich, then to the Ecole des Beaux-Arts in Paris from 1905 to 1907.'
p2180
aS'His art emphasizes clean geometrical lines that balance forms inherent in his materials with the symbolic allusions of representational art.'
p2181
aS'Brancusi sought inspiration in non-European cultures as a source of primitive exoticism, as did Paul Gauguin, Pablo_Picasso, Andre Derain and others.'
p2182
aS"But other influences emerge from Romanian folk art traceable through Byzantine and Dionysian traditions. Early years Brancusi grew up in the village of Hobita, Gorj, near Targu Jiu, close to Romania's Carpathian Mountains, an area known for its rich tradition of folk crafts, particularly woodcarving."
p2183
aS"Geometric patterns of the region are seen in his later works.His parents Nicolae and Maria Brancusi were poor peasants who earned a meager living through back-breaking labor; from the age of seven, Constantin herded the family's flock of sheep."
p2184
aS'He showed talent for carving objects out of wood, and often ran away from home to escape the bullying of his father and older brothers.At the age of nine, Brancusi left the village to work in the nearest large town.'
p2185
aS'His father became Caesar, the deputy emperor in the west in 293 AD.'
p2186
aS'Constantine was sent east, where he rose through the ranks to become a military tribune under the emperors Diocletian and Galerius.'
p2187
aS'In 305, Constantius was raised to the rank of Augustus, senior western emperor, and Constantine was recalled west to campaign under his father in Britannia.'
p2188
aS"Acclaimed as emperor by the army at Eboracum (Modern-day York) after his father's death in 306 AD, Constantine emerged victorious in a series of civil wars against the emperors Maxentius and Licinius to become sole ruler of both west and east by 324 AD.As emperor, Constantine enacted many administrative, financial, social, and military reforms to strengthen the empire."
p2189
aS'The government was restructured and civil and military authority separated.'
p2190
aS'A new gold coin, the solidus, was introduced to combat inflation.'
p2191
aS'It would become the standard for Byzantine and European currencies for more than a thousand years.'
p2192
aS'Diffusion of heat can take place in solids, but that is called heat conduction.'
p2193
aS'Convection can be demonstrated by placing a heat source (e.g.'
p2194
aS'a Bunsen burner) at the side of a glass full of a liquid, and observing the changes in temperature in the glass caused by the warmer fluid moving into cooler areas.Convective heat transfer is one of the major types of heat transfer, and convection is also a major mode of mass transfer in fluids.'
p2195
aS'Convective heat and mass transfer take place both by diffusion - the random Brownian_motion of individual particles in the fluid - and by advection, in which matter or heat is transported by the larger-scale motion of currents in the fluid.'
p2196
aS'In the context of heat and mass transfer, the term "convection" is used to refer to the sum of advective and diffusive transfer.'
p2197
aS'In common use the term "convection" may refer loosely to heat transfer by convection, as opposed to mass transfer by convection, or the convection process in general.'
p2198
aS'Sometimes "convection" is even used to refer specifically to "free heat convection" (natural heat convection) as opposed to forced heat convection.'
p2199
aS'Here "lim" indicates limit, and the fact that function f(n) approaches the limit L as n approaches c is represented by the right arrow (-), as in Limit of a function Suppose f is a real-valued function and c is a real number.'
p2200
aS'The expressionmeans that f(x) can be made to be as close to L as desired by making x sufficiently close to c. In that case, the above equation can be read as "the limit of f of x, as x approaches c, is L".Augustin-Louis Cauchy in 1821, followed by Karl Weierstrass, formalized the definition of the limit of a function as the above definition, which became known as the (e, d)-definition of limit in the 19th century.'
p2201
aS'The definition uses e (the lowercase Greek letter epsilon) to represent any small positive number, so that "f(x) becomes arbitrarily close to L" means that f(x) eventually lies in the interval (L - e, L + e), which can also be written using the absolute value sign as |f(x) - L| < e. The phrase "as x approaches c" then indicates that we refer to values of x whose distance from c is less than some positive number d (the lower case Greek letter delta)--that is, values of x within either (c - d, c) or (c, c + d), which can be expressed with 0 < |x - c| < d. The first inequality means that the distance between x and c is greater than 0 and that x [?]'
p2202
aS'c, while the second indicates that x is within distance d of c.Note that the above definition of a limit is true even if f(c) [?]'
p2203
aS'L. Indeed, the function f need not even be defined at c.For example, ifthen f(1) is not defined (see division by zero), yet as x moves arbitrarily close to 1, f(x) correspondingly approaches 2:Thus, f(x) can be made arbitrarily close to the limit of 2 just by making x sufficiently close to 1.In other words, This can also be calculated algebraically, as  for all real numbers x [?]'
p2204
aS'1.Now since x + 1 is continuous in x at 1, we can now plug in 1 for x, thus .In addition to limits at finite values, functions can also have limits at infinity.'
p2205
aS'For example, considerf(100)  1.9900f(1000)  1.9990f(10000)  1.99990As x becomes extremely large, the value of f(x) approaches 2, and the value of f(x) can be made as close to 2 as one could wish just by picking x sufficiently large.'
p2206
aS'In conventional superconductors, this attraction is due to the electron-phonon interaction.'
p2207
aS'The Cooper_pair state is responsible for superconductivity, as described in the BCS theory developed by John Bardeen, Leon Cooper, and John Schrieffer for which they shared the 1972 Nobel Prize.Although Cooper_pairing is a quantum effect, the reason for the pairing can be seen from a simplified classical explanation.'
p2208
aS'An electron in a metal normally behaves as a free particle.'
p2209
aS'The electron is repelled from other electrons due to their negative charge, but it also attracts the positive ions that make up the rigid lattice of the metal.'
p2210
aS'This attraction distorts the ion lattice, moving the ions slightly toward the electron, increasing the positive charge density of the lattice in the vicinity.'
p2211
aS'This positive charge can attract other electrons.'
p2212
aS"At long distances this attraction between electrons due to the displaced ions can overcome the electrons' repulsion due to their negative charge, and cause them to pair up."
p2213
aS'Pure copper is soft and malleable; a freshly exposed surface has a reddish-orange color.'
p2214
aS'It is used as a conductor of heat and electricity, a building material, and a constituent of various metal alloys.The metal and its alloys have been used for thousands of years.'
p2215
aS'In the Roman era, copper was principally mined on Cyprus, hence the origin of the name of the metal as aes syprium (metal of Cyprus), later corrupted to suprum, from which the words copper (English), cuivre (French), and Kupfer (German) are all derived.'
p2216
aS'Its compounds are commonly encountered as copper(II) salts, which often impart blue or green colors to minerals such as azurite and turquoise and have been widely used historically as pigments.'
p2217
aS'Architectural structures built with copper corrode to give green verdigris (or patina).'
p2218
aS'Decorative art prominently features copper, both by itself and as part of pigments.Copper is essential to all living organisms as a trace dietary mineral because it is a key constituent of the respiratory enzyme complex cytochrome c oxidase.'
p2219
aS'In molluscs and crustacea copper is a constituent of the blood pigment hemocyanin, which is replaced by the iron-complexed hemoglobin in fish and other vertebrates.'
p2220
aS'He won the Pulitzer Prize and the James Tait Black Memorial Prize for Fiction for The Road (2006).'
p2221
aS'His 2005 novel No Country for Old Men was adapted as a 2007 film of the same name, which won four Academy Awards, including Best Picture.'
p2222
aS'For All the Pretty Horses (1992), he won both the U.S. National Book Award and National Book Critics Circle Award.'
p2223
aS"All the Pretty Horses, The Road, and Child of God have also been adapted as motion pictures.Blood Meridian (1985) was among Time magazine's list of 100 best English-language books published between 1923 and 2005 and placed joint runner-up in a poll taken in 2006 by The New York Times of the best American fiction published in the last 25 years."
p2224
aS'Literary critic Harold Bloom named him as one of the four major American novelists of his time, alongside Don DeLillo, Thomas_Pynchon and Philip_Roth, and called Blood Meridian "the greatest single book since Faulkner\'s As I Lay Dying".'
p2225
aS"In 2010, The Times ranked The Road first on its list of the 100 best fiction and non-fiction books of the past 10 years. Writing careerEdit Random House published McCarthy's first novel, The Orchard Keeper, in 1965."
p2226
aS'McCarthy decided to send the manuscript to Random House because "it was the only publisher [he] had heard of".'
p2227
aS'Trigonometric functions are important in the study of triangles and modeling periodic phenomena, among many other applications.The most familiar trigonometric functions are the sine, cosine, and tangent.'
p2228
aS'In the context of the standard unit circle (a circle with radius 1 unit), where a triangle is formed by a ray originating at the origin and making some angle with the x-axis, the sine of the angle gives the length of the y-component (the opposite to the angle or the rise) of the triangle, the cosine gives the length of the x-component (the adjacent of the angle or the run), and the tangent function gives the slope (y-component divided by the x-component).'
p2229
aS'More precise definitions are detailed below.'
p2230
aS'Trigonometric functions are commonly defined as ratios of two sides of a right triangle containing the angle, and can equivalently be defined as the lengths of various line segments from a unit circle.'
p2231
aS'More modern definitions express them as infinite series or as solutions of certain differential equations, allowing their extension to arbitrary positive and negative values and even to complex numbers.Trigonometric functions have a wide range of uses including computing unknown lengths and angles in triangles (often right triangles).'
p2232
aS'In this use, trigonometric functions are used, for instance, in navigation, engineering, and physics.'
p2233
aS'A common use in elementary physics is resolving a vector into Cartesian coordinates.'
p2234
aS'The CMB is a cosmic background radiation that is fundamental to observational cosmology because it is the oldest light in the universe, dating to the epoch of recombination.'
p2235
aS'With a traditional optical telescope, the space between stars and galaxies (the background) is completely dark.'
p2236
aS'However, a sufficiently sensitive radio telescope shows a faint background glow, almost exactly the same in all directions, that is not associated with any star, galaxy, or other object.'
p2237
aS'This glow is strongest in the microwave region of the radio spectrum.'
p2238
aS'The accidental discovery of CMB in 1964 by American radio astronomers Arno Penzias and Robert Wilson was the culmination of work initiated in the 1940s, and earned the discoverers the 1978 Nobel Prize.The CMB is a snapshot of the oldest light in our Universe, imprinted on the sky when the Universe was just 380,000 years old.'
p2239
aS'It shows tiny temperature fluctuations that correspond to regions of slightly different densities, representing the seeds of all future structure: the stars and galaxies of today.The CMB is well explained as radiation left over from an early stage in the development of the universe, and its discovery is considered a landmark test of the Big Bang model of the universe.'
p2240
aS'When the universe was young, before the formation of stars and planets, it was denser, much hotter, and filled with a uniform glow from a white-hot fog of hydrogen plasma.'
p2241
aS'Composed primarily of high-energy protons and atomic nuclei, they are of mysterious origin.'
p2242
aS'Data from the Fermi space telescope (2013) have been interpreted as evidence that a significant fraction of primary cosmic rays originate from the supernovae of massive stars.'
p2243
aS'However, this is not thought to be their only source.'
p2244
aS'Active galactic nuclei probably also produce cosmic rays.The term ray is a historical accident, as cosmic rays were at first, and wrongly, thought to be mostly electromagnetic radiation.'
p2245
aS'In common scientific usage high-energy particles with intrinsic mass are known as "cosmic" rays, and photons, which are quanta of electromagnetic radiation (and so have no intrinsic mass) are known by their common names, such as "gamma rays" or "X-rays", depending on their origin.Cosmic_rays attract great interest practically, due to the damage they inflict on microelectronics and life outside the protection of an atmosphere and magnetic field, and scientifically, because the energies of the most energetic ultra-high-energy cosmic rays (UHECRs) have been observed to approach 3 x 1020 eV, about 40 million times the energy of particles accelerated by the Large Hadron Collider.'
p2246
aS'One can show that such enormous energies might be achieved by means of the Centrifugal mechanism of acceleration in Active galactic nuclei.'
p2247
aS'At 50 J, the highest-energy ultra-high-energy cosmic rays have energies comparable to the kinetic energy of a 90-kilometre-per-hour (56 mph) baseball.'
p2248
aS"Einstein abandoned the concept after Hubble's 1929 discovery that all galaxies outside the Local Group (the group that contains the Milky Way Galaxy) are moving away from each other, implying an overall expanding universe."
p2249
aS'From 1929 until the early 1990s, most cosmology researchers assumed the cosmological constant to be zero.Since the 1990s, several developments in observational cosmology, especially the discovery of the accelerating universe from distant supernovae in 1998 (in addition to independent evidence from the cosmic microwave background and large galaxy redshift surveys), have shown that around 70% of the mass-energy density of the universe can be attributed to dark energy.'
p2250
aS'While dark energy is poorly understood at a fundamental level, the main required properties of dark energy are that it functions as a type of anti-gravity, it dilutes much more slowly than matter as the universe expands, and it clusters much more weakly than matter, or perhaps not at all.'
p2251
aS"The cosmological constant is the simplest possible form of dark energy since it is constant in both space and time, and this leads to the current standard model of cosmology known as the Lambda-CDM model, which provides a good fit to many cosmological observations as of 2014. Equation The cosmological constant L appears in Einstein's field equation in the form ofwhere R and g describe the structure of spacetime, T pertains to matter and energy affecting that structure, and G and c are conversion factors that arise from using traditional units of measurement."
p2252
aS'When L is zero, this reduces to the original field equation of general relativity.'
p2253
aS'When T is zero, the field equation describes empty space (the vacuum).The cosmological constant has the same effect as an intrinsic energy density of the vacuum, rvac (and an associated pressure).'
p2254
aS'In this context, it is commonly moved onto the right-hand side of the equation, and defined with a proportionality factor of 8p: L  8prvac, where unit conventions of general relativity are used (otherwise factors of G and c would also appear, i.e.'
p2255
aS'Four hundred years later, when Saint Pope John XXIII initiated preparations for the Second Vatican Council (Vatican II), he affirmed the decrees it had issued: "What was, still is.'
p2256
aS'"As well as decrees, the Council issued condemnations of what it defined to be heresies committed by Protestantism and, in response to them, key statements and clarifications of the Church\'s doctrine and teachings.'
p2257
aS'These addressed a wide range of subjects, including scripture, the Biblical canon, sacred tradition, original sin, justification, salvation, the sacraments, the Mass and the veneration of saints.'
p2258
aS'The Council met for twenty-five sessions between 13 December 1545 and 4 December 1563, all in Trento (then the capital of the Prince-Bishopric of Trent in the Holy Roman Empire), apart from the ninth to eleventh sessions held in Bologna during 1547.'
p2259
aS"Pope Paul III, who convoked the Council, presided over these and the first eight sessions (1545-47), while the twelfth to sixteenth sessions (1551-52) were overseen by Pope_Julius_III and the seventeenth to twenty-fifth sessions (1562-63) by Pope Pius IV.The consequences of the Council were also significant as regards the Church's liturgy and practices."
p2260
aS'During its deliberations, the Council made the Vulgate the official example of the Biblical canon and commissioned the creation of a standard version, although this was not achieved until the 1590s.'
p2261
aS"In 1565, however, a year or so after the Council finished its work, Pius IV issued the Tridentine Creed (after Tridentum, Trento's Latin name) and his successor Pius V then issued the Roman Catechism and revisions of the Breviary and Missal in, respectively, 1566, 1568 and 1570."
p2262
aS'The now-current name is due to William Parsons, 3rd Earl of Rosse who observed the object in 1840 using a 36-inch telescope and produced a drawing that looked somewhat like a crab.'
p2263
aS'Corresponding to a bright supernova recorded by Chinese astronomers in 1054, the nebula was observed later by English astronomer John Bevis in 1731.'
p2264
aS"The nebula was the first astronomical object identified with a historical supernova explosion.At an apparent magnitude of 8.4, comparable to that of Saturn's moon Titan, it is not visible to the naked eye but can be made out using binoculars under favourable conditions."
p2265
aS'The nebula lies in the Perseus Arm of the Milky Way galaxy, at a distance of about 2.0 kiloparsecs (6,500 ly) from Earth.'
p2266
aS'It has a diameter of 3.4 parsecs (11 ly), corresponding to an apparent diameter of some 7 arcminutes, and is expanding at a rate of about 1,500 kilometres per second (930 mi/s), or 0.5% c.At the center of the nebula lies the Crab Pulsar, a neutron star 28-30 kilometres (17-19 mi) across with a spin rate of 30.2 times per second, which emits pulses of radiation from gamma rays to radio waves.'
p2267
aS'At X-ray and gamma ray energies above 30 keV, the Crab is generally the strongest persistent source in the sky, with measured flux extending to above 10 TeV.'
p2268
aS"The nebula's radiation allows for the detailed studying of celestial bodies that occult it."
p2269
aS"It is also usually considered part of the War_of_1812 because of its connection to Tecumseh's War in the Old Northwest, because it is concurrent with the American-British war and involves many of the same actors, and because the Red Sticks sought support from the British and later aided Admiral Cochrane's advance towards New_Orleans.The Creek_War began as a conflict within the Creek Confederation, but United_States armies quickly became involved."
p2270
aS'British traders and the Spanish government provided supplies to the Red Stick majority due to their shared interest in preventing the expansion of United_States territory.The war effectively ended with the Treaty of Fort Jackson (August 1814), where General Andrew_Jackson insisted that the Creek confederacy cede more than 21 million acres of land from southern Georgia and central Alabama.'
p2271
aS"These lands were taken from allied Creek as well as Red Sticks. Background The Red Stick chiefs' and warriors' militancy was a response to the United_States' cultural and territorial encroachment."
p2272
aS"The conflict's designation as the Creek Civil War comes from divisions along cultural, political, economic, and geographic boundaries."
p2273
aS'At the time of the Creek_War, the Upper Creek controlled the Coosa, Tallapoosa, and Alabama Rivers that led to Mobile, while the Lower Creek controlled the Chattahoochee River, flowing into Apalachicola Bay.'
p2274
aS'The Lower Creek were closer trading partners with the United_States, and had adopted more of the cultural practices of their neighbors than the Upper Creek. Territorial conflict The Provinces of East and West Florida were governed by the Spanish, and British firms like Panton, Leslie, and Co. provided most of the trade goods into Creek country.'
p2275
aS"Pensacola and Mobile in Spanish Florida controlled the outlets of the US Mississippi Territory's (est."
p2276
aS'The capital and the largest city is Heraklion.'
p2277
aS'As of 2011, the region had a population of 623,065.Crete forms a significant part of the economy and cultural heritage of Greece, while retaining its own local cultural traits (such as its own poetry and music).'
p2278
aS'It was once the center of the Minoan civilization (c. 2700-1420 BC), which is currently regarded as the earliest recorded civilization in Europe.Crete lies 95 km away from Europe, 179 km away from Asia and 284 km away from Africa. Name The island is first referred to as Kaptara in texts from the Syrian city of Mari dating from the 18th century BC, repeated later in Neo-Assyrian records and the Bible (Caphtor).'
p2279
aS'It was also known in ancient Egyptian as Keftiu, strongly suggesting some form similar to both was the Minoan name for the island.The current name of Crete is thought to be first attested in Mycenaean Greek texts written in Linear B, through the words , ke-re-te (*Kretes; later Greek: Kretes, plural of Kres), and , ke-re-si-jo (*Kresijos; later Greek: Kresios), "Cretan".'
p2280
aS"In Ancient Greek, the name Crete (Krete) first appears in Homer's Odyssey."
p2281
aS'Its etymology is unknown.'
p2282
aS'One proposal derives it from a hypothetical Luvian word *kursatta (cf.'
p2283
aS'It was first published in the literary journal The Russian Messenger in twelve monthly installments during 1866.'
p2284
aS'It was later published in a single volume.'
p2285
aS"It is the second of Dostoyevsky's full-length novels following his return from ten years of exile in Siberia."
p2286
aS'Crime_and_Punishment is considered the first great novel of his "mature" period of writing.Crime_and_Punishment focuses on the mental anguish and moral dilemmas of Rodion Raskolnikov, an impoverished ex-student in St. Petersburg who formulates and executes a plan to kill an unscrupulous pawnbroker for her cash.'
p2287
aS"Raskolnikov argues that with the pawnbroker's money he can perform good deeds to counterbalance the crime, while ridding the world of a worthless vermin."
p2288
aS'He also commits this murder to test his own hypothesis that some people are naturally capable of such things, and even have the right to do them.'
p2289
aS'Several times throughout the novel, Raskolnikov justifies his actions by comparing himself with Napoleon Bonaparte, believing that murder is permissible in pursuit of a higher purpose. Creation Dostoyevsky conceived the idea of Crime_and_Punishment in the summer of 1865, having gambled away much of his fortune, unable to pay his bills or afford proper meals.'
p2290
aS'The most popular view is that crime is a category created by law; in other words, something is a crime if declared as such by the relevant and applicable law.'
p2291
aS'One proposed definition is that a crime or offence (or criminal offence) is an act harmful not only to some individual or individuals but also to a community, society or the state ("a public wrong").'
p2292
aS'Such acts are forbidden and punishable by law.The notion that acts such as murder, rape and theft are to be prohibited exists worldwide.'
p2293
aS'What precisely is a criminal offence is defined by criminal law of each country.'
p2294
aS"While many have a catalogue of crimes called the criminal code, in some common law countries no such comprehensive statute exists.The state (government) has the power to severely restrict one's liberty for committing a crime."
p2295
aS'In modern societies, there are procedures to which investigations and trials must adhere.'
p2296
aS'If found guilty, an offender may be sentenced to a form of reparation such as a community sentence, or, depending on the nature of their offence, to undergo imprisonment, life imprisonment or, in some jurisdictions, execution.Usually, to be classified as a crime, the "act of doing something criminal" (actus reus) must - with certain exceptions - be accompanied by the "intention to do something criminal" (mens rea).While every crime violates the law, not every violation of the law counts as a crime.'
p2297
aS'In the preface to the first edition Kant explains what he means by a critique of pure reason: "I do not mean by this a critique of books and systems, but of the faculty of reason in general, in respect of all knowledge after which it may strive independently of all experience.'
p2298
aS'"Before Kant, it was generally held that truths of reason must be analytic, meaning that what is stated in the predicate must already be present in the subject (for example, "An intelligent man is intelligent" or "An intelligent man is a man").'
p2299
aS'In either case, the judgment is analytic because it is ascertained by analyzing the subject.'
p2300
aS'It was thought that all truths of reason, or necessary truths, are of this kind: that in all of them there is a predicate that is only part of the subject of which it is asserted.'
p2301
aS'If this were so, attempting to deny anything that could be known a priori (for example, "An intelligent man is not intelligent" or "An intelligent man is not a man") would involve a contradiction.'
p2302
aS"It was therefore thought that the law of contradiction is sufficient to establish all a priori knowledge. Kant's rejection of Hume's empiricism Before Kant (1724-1804), David Hume (1711-1776) accepted the general view of rationalism about a priori knowledge."
p2303
aS'However, upon closer examination of the subject, Hume discovered that some judgments thought to be analytic, especially those related to cause and effect, were actually synthetic (i.e., no analysis of the subject will reveal the predicate).'
p2304
aS"Socrates thinks that injustice may not be answered with injustice, and refuses Crito's offer to finance his escape from prison."
p2305
aS"This dialogue contains an ancient statement of the social contract theory of government. Summary The dialogue takes place in Socrates' prison cell, where he awaits execution."
p2306
aS'He is visited before dawn by his old friend Crito, who has made arrangements to smuggle Socrates out of prison to the safety of exile.'
p2307
aS'Socrates seems quite willing to await his imminent execution, and so Crito presents as many arguments as he can to persuade Socrates to escape.'
p2308
aS"On a practical level, Socrates' death will reflect badly on his friends--people will think they did nothing to try to save him."
p2309
aS'Also, Socrates should not worry about the risk or the financial cost to his friends; these they are willing to pay, and they have also arranged to find Socrates a pleasant life in exile.'
p2310
aS'On a more ethical level, Crito presents two more pressing arguments: first, if he stayed, he would be aiding his enemies in wronging him unjustly, and would thus be acting unjustly himself; and second, that he would be abandoning his sons and leaving them without a father.Socrates answers first that one should not worry about public opinion, but only listen to wise and expert advice.'
p2311
aS'Important members of this series are the tetramer (n  4), the pentamer (n  5), and the hexamer (n  6).'
p2312
aS'The term "crown" refers to the resemblance between the structure of a crown ether bound to a cation, and a crown sitting on a person\'s head.'
p2313
aS"The first number in a crown ether's name refers to the number of atoms in the cycle, and the second number refers to the number of those atoms that are oxygen."
p2314
aS'Crown_ethers are much broader than the oligomers of ethylene oxide; an important group are derived from catechol.Crown_ethers strongly bind certain cations, forming complexes.'
p2315
aS'The oxygen atoms are well situated to coordinate with a cation located at the interior of the ring, whereas the exterior of the ring is hydrophobic.'
p2316
aS'The resulting cations often form salts that are soluble in nonpolar solvents, and for this reason crown ethers are useful in phase transfer catalysis.'
p2317
aS'The denticity of the polyether influences the affinity of the crown ether for various cations.'
p2318
aS'The United_States is to the north of Cuba 150 km (93 mi) away, the Bahamas and the Turks and Caicos Islands to the northeast, Mexico to the west 210 km (130 mi) away, the Cayman Islands and Jamaica to the south and Haiti to the southeast.Cuba was inhabited by Amerindian tribes before the landing of explorer Christopher Columbus in 1492, who claimed it for the Kingdom of Spain.'
p2319
aS'Cuba remained a colony of Spain until the Spanish-American War of 1898, after which it gained nominal independence as a de facto U.S. protectorate in 1902.'
p2320
aS'The fragile republic endured increasingly radical politics and social strife, and despite efforts to strengthen its democratic system, Cuba came under the dictatorship of Fulgencio Batista in 1952.'
p2321
aS"Growing unrest and instability led to Batista's ousting in January 1959 by the July 26 movement, which afterwards established a government under the leadership of Fidel Castro."
p2322
aS'Since 1965 the country has been governed by the Communist Party of Cuba.Cuba is the largest island in the Caribbean and, with over 11 million inhabitants, the second-most populous after Hispaniola.'
p2323
aS'It is a multiethnic country whose people, culture and customs derive from diverse origins, including the aboriginal Taino and Ciboney peoples, the long period of Spanish colonialism, the introduction of African slaves, and a close relationship with the Soviet Union in the Cold War.Cuba is ranked very high for human development by the United Nations, and high for health and education.'
p2324
aS'In 2015, it became the first country to eradicate mother-to-child transmission of HIV and syphilis, a milestone hailed by the WHO as an "one of the greatest public health achievements possible.'
p2325
aS'The term is broadly used in association with a wide variety of art produced in Paris (Montmartre, Montparnasse and Puteaux) during the 1910s and extending through the 1920s.The movement was pioneered by Georges Braque and Pablo_Picasso, joined by Jean Metzinger, Albert Gleizes, Robert Delaunay, Henri Le Fauconnier, Fernand Leger and Juan Gris.'
p2326
aS'A primary influence that led to Cubism was the representation of three-dimensional form in the late works of Paul_Cezanne.'
p2327
aS"A retrospective of Cezanne's paintings had been held at the Salon d'Automne of 1904, current works were displayed at the 1905 and 1906 Salon d'Automne, followed by two commemorative retrospectives after his death in 1907.In Cubist artwork, objects are analyzed, broken up and reassembled in an abstracted form--instead of depicting objects from one viewpoint, the artist depicts the subject from a multitude of viewpoints to represent the subject in a greater context.The impact of Cubism was far-reaching and wide-ranging."
p2328
aS'Cubism spread rapidly across the globe and in doing so evolved to greater or lesser extent.'
p2329
aS'In essence, Cubism was the starting point of an evolutionary process that produced diversity; it was the antecedent of diverse art movements.In France, offshoots of Cubism developed, including Orphism, Abstract art and later Purism.'
p2330
aS'In other countries Futurism, Suprematism, Dada, Constructivism and De_Stijl developed in response to Cubism.'
p2331
aS"Early Futurist paintings hold in common with Cubism the fusing of the past and the present, the representation of different views of the subject pictured at the same time, also called multiple perspective, simultaneity or multiplicity, while Constructivism was influenced by Picasso's technique of constructing sculpture from separate elements."
p2332
aS'Adenylyl Cyclase is activated by a range of signaling molecules through the activation of adenylyl cyclase stimulatory G (Gs)-protein-coupled receptors.'
p2333
aS'Adenylyl Cyclase is inhibited by agonists of adenylyl cyclase inhibitory G (Gi)-protein-coupled receptors.'
p2334
aS'Liver adenylyl cyclase responds more strongly to glucagon, and muscle adenylyl cyclase responds more strongly to adrenaline.cAMP decomposition into AMP is catalyzed by the enzyme phosphodiesterase. Functions cAMP is a second messenger, used for intracellular signal transduction, such as transferring into cells the effects of hormones like glucagon and adrenaline, which cannot pass through the plasma membrane.'
p2335
aS'It is involved in the activation of protein kinases and regulates the effects of adrenaline and glucagon.'
p2336
aS'cAMP also binds to and regulates the function of ion channels such as the HCN channels and a few other cyclic nucleotide-binding proteins such as Epac1 and RAPGEF2. Role of cAMP in eukaryotic cells cAMP and its associated kinases function in several biochemical processes, including the regulation of glycogen, sugar, and lipid metabolism.In eukaryotes, cyclic AMP works by activating protein kinase A (PKA, or cAMP-dependent protein kinase).'
p2337
aS'PKA is normally inactive as a tetrameric holoenzyme, consisting of two catalytic and two regulatory units (C2R2), with the regulatory units blocking the catalytic centers of the catalytic units.Cyclic AMP binds to specific locations on the regulatory units of the protein kinase, and causes dissociation between the regulatory and catalytic subunits, thus enabling those catalytic units to phosphorylate substrate proteins.The active subunits catalyze the transfer of phosphate from ATP to specific serine or threonine residues of protein substrates.'
p2338
aS"The phosphorylated proteins may act directly on the cell's ion channels, or may become activated or inhibited enzymes."
p2339
aS'Cyclohexane is a colourless, flammable liquid with a distinctive detergent-like odor, reminiscent of cleaning products (in which it is sometimes used). Production  Modern production On an industrial scale, cyclohexane is produced by hydrogenation of benzene.'
p2340
aS'Producers of cyclohexane accounts for approximately 11.4% of global demand for benzene.'
p2341
aS'The reaction is highly exothermic, with DH(500 K)  216.37 kJ/mol).'
p2342
aS'Dehydrogenation commenced noticeably above 300 degC, reflecting the favorable entropy for dehydrogenation. Historical methods Unlike benzene, cyclohexane is not easily obtained from natural resources such as coal.'
p2343
aS'For this reason, early investigators synthesized their cyclohexane samples. Early failures In 1867 Marcellin Berthelot reduced benzene with hydroiodic acid at elevated temperatures.In 1870, Adolf von Baeyer repeated the reaction and pronounced the same reaction product "hexahydrobenzene"in 1890 Vladimir Markovnikov believed he was able to distill the same compound from Caucasus petroleum, calling his concoction "hexanaphtene".Surprisingly their cyclohexanes boiled higher by 10degC than either hexahydrobenzene or hexanaphtene but this riddle was solved in 1895 by Markovnikov, N.M. Kishner, and Nikolay Zelinsky when they reassigned "hexahydrobenzene" and "hexanaphtene" as methylcyclopentane, the result of an unexpected rearrangement reaction. Success In 1894 Baeyer synthesized cyclohexane starting with a Dieckmann condensation of pimelic acid followed by multiple reductions:In the same year E. Haworth and W.H.'
p2344
aS'Perkin Jr. (1860-1929) prepared it via a Wurtz reaction of 1,6-dibromohexane. Reactions Cyclohexane is rather unreactive, being a non-polar, hydrophobic hydrocarbon.'
p2345
aS'It reacts with superacids, such as HF + SbF5, which will lead to cracking.'
p2346
aS'Mathematical historian Paul Tannery cited similar work by the Syrian philosopher Iamblichus as evidence that the curve was likely known in antiquity.'
p2347
aS'English mathematician John Wallis writing in 1679 attributed the discovery to Nicholas of Cusa, but subsequent scholarship indicates Wallis was either mistaken or the evidence used by Wallis is now lost.'
p2348
aS"Galileo Galilei's name was put forward at the end of the 19th century and at least one author reports credit being given to Marin Mersenne."
p2349
aS'Beginning with the work of Moritz Cantor and Siegmund Gunther, scholars now assign priority to French mathematician Charles de Bovelles based on his description of the cycloid in his Introductio in geometriam, published in 1503.'
p2350
aS'In this work, Bovelles mistakes the arch traced by a rolling wheel as part of a larger circle with a radius 120% larger than the smaller wheel.Galileo originated the term cycloid and was the first to make a serious study of the curve.'
p2351
aS'According to his student Evangelista Torricelli, in 1599 Galileo attempted the quadrature of the cycloid (constructing a square with area equal to the area under the cycloid) with an unusually empirical approach that involved tracing both the generating circle and the resulting cycloid on sheet metal, cutting them out and weighing them.'
p2352
aS'He discovered the ratio was roughly 3:1 but incorrectly concluded the ratio was an irrational fraction, which would have made quadrature impossible.'
p2353
aS"Like Othello and The Winter's Tale, it deals with the themes of innocence and jealousy."
p2354
aS"While the precise date of composition remains unknown, the play was certainly produced as early as 1611. Characters  Synopsis Imogen (or Innogen), daughter of the British king Cymbeline, is in love with Posthumus Leonatus, a man raised in her father's court who is described as possessing exceeding personal merit and martial skill."
p2355
aS'The two have secretly married, exchanging jewellery as tokens: a ring from Imogen, a bracelet from Posthumus.'
p2356
aS"Cymbeline has discovered the affair and banishes Posthumus for his presumption, for Imogen is currently Cymbeline's only child and so her husband is heir to the British throne."
p2357
aS'Cymbeline did have two sons before Imogen, Guiderius and Arvirargus, but they were stolen twenty years before as infants by Belarius, a courtier banished as a traitor for supposedly conspiring with the Romans.'
p2358
aS'Cymbeline is a vassal king of Caesar Augustus.'
p2359
aS'Caius Lucius, a Roman ambassador, is on his way to demand the tribute that Cymbeline, under the influence of his wife the Queen, has stopped paying.'
p2360
aS'It is located south of Turkey, west of Syria and Lebanon, northwest of Israel and the Gaza Strip, north of Egypt and east of Greece.The earliest known human activity on the island dates to around the 10th millennium BC.'
p2361
aS'Archaeological remains from this period include the well-preserved Neolithic village of Khirokitia, and Cyprus is home to some of the oldest water wells in the world.'
p2362
aS'Cyprus was settled by Mycenaean Greeks in two waves in the 2nd millennium BC.'
p2363
aS'At a strategic location in the Middle East, it was subsequently occupied by several major powers, including the empires of the Assyrians, Egyptians and Persians, from whom the island was seized in 333 BC by Alexander_the_Great.'
p2364
aS'Subsequent rule by Ptolemaic Egypt, the Classical and Eastern Roman Empire, Arab caliphates for a short period, the French Lusignan dynasty and the Venetians, was followed by over three centuries of Ottoman rule between 1571 and 1878 (de jure until 1914).Cyprus was placed under British administration in 1878 and formally annexed by Britain in 1914.'
p2365
aS'The partition of Cyprus and creation of a Turkish state in the north became a policy of Turkish Cypriot leaders and Turkey in the 1950s.'
p2366
aS'Turkish leaders for a period advocated the annexation of Cyprus to Turkey as Cyprus was considered an "extension of Anatolia" by them; while since the 19th century, the majority Greek Cypriot population and its Orthodox church had been pursuing union with Greece, which became a Greek national policy in the 1950s.'
p2367
aS'Certain significant chapters of his life are only known from the Preface to the Histoire Comique par Monsieur de Cyrano Bergerac, Contenant les Estats & Empires de la Lune (Comical History of the States and Empires of the Moon) published in 1657, 20 months after his death.'
p2368
aS'Without Henri Le Bret, who wrote the biographical information, his country childhood, his military engagement, the injuries it caused, his prowess as a swordsman, the circumstances of his death and his supposed final conversion would remain unknown.Since 1862 when Auguste Jal revealed that the "Lord of Bergerac" was Parisian and not Gascon, research in parish registries and notarial records by a small number of researchers,           in particular Madeleine Alcover of Rice University, has allowed the public to know more about his genealogy, his family, his home in Paris and those of some of his friends, but has revealed no new documents that support or refute the essentials of Le Bret\'s account or fill the gaps in his narrative.'
p2369
aS' Family Savinien II de Cyrano was the son of Abel I de Cyrano, lord of Mauvieres, (156?-1648), counsel (avocat) of the Parliament of Paris, and of Esperance Bellanger (1586-164?'
p2370
aS'), "daughter of deceased nobleman Estienne Bellanger, Counsellor of the King and Treasurer of his Finances". Ancestors His paternal grandfather, Savinien I de Cyrano (15?'
p2371
aS'?-1590), was probably born into a notable family from Sens in Burgundy.'
p2372
aS'Documents describe him in turn as a "merchant and burgher of Paris" (<< marchand et bourgeois de Paris >> 20 May 1555), "(sea-)fish merchant to the King" (<< vendeur de poisson de mer pour le Roy >>) in several other documents in following years, and finally "Royal counsellor" (<< conseiller du Roi, maison et couronne de France >> 7 April 1573).'
p2373
aS'In Paris, on 9 April 1551, he married Anne Le Maire, daughter of Estienne Le Maire and Perrette Cardon, who died in 1616.'
p2374
aS'From the Mediterranean Sea and Hellespont in the west to the Indus River in the east, Cyrus_the_Great created the largest empire the world had yet seen.'
p2375
aS'Under his successors, the empire eventually stretched from parts of the Balkans (Bulgaria-Pannonia) and Thrace-Macedonia in the west, to the Indus Valley in the east.'
p2376
aS'His regal titles in full were The Great King, King of Persia, King of Anshan, King of Media, King of Babylon, King of Sumer and Akkad, and King of the Four Corners of the World.'
p2377
aS'In the 1970s, the Shah of Iran Mohammad Reza Pahlavi identified his famous proclamation inscribed onto Cyrus Cylinder as the oldest known declaration of human rights, and the Cylinder has since been popularized as such.'
p2378
aS"This view has been criticized by some historians as a misunderstanding of the Cylinder's generic nature as a traditional statement that new monarchs make at the beginning of their reign.The reign of Cyrus_the_Great lasted between 29 and 31 years."
p2379
aS'Cyrus built his empire by conquering first the Median Empire, then the Lydian Empire and eventually the Neo-Babylonian Empire.'
p2380
aS'Either before or after Babylon, he led an expedition into central Asia, which resulted in major campaigns that were described as having brought "into subjection every nation without exception".'
p2381
aS'Other symptoms include sinus infections, poor growth, fatty stool, clubbing of the finger and toes, and infertility in males among others.'
p2382
aS'Different people may have different degrees of symptoms.CF is an autosomal recessive disorder.'
p2383
aS'It is caused by the presence of mutations in both copies of the gene for the protein cystic fibrosis transmembrane conductance regulator (CFTR).'
p2384
aS'Those with a single working copy are carriers and otherwise mostly normal.'
p2385
aS'CFTR is involved in production of sweat, digestive fluids, and mucus.'
p2386
aS'When CFTR is not functional, secretions which are usually thin instead become thick.'
p2387
aS'The condition is diagnosed by a sweat test and genetic testing.'
p2388
aS'Cytokines can also be involved in autocrine signaling.'
p2389
aS'Cytokines include chemokines, interferons, interleukins, lymphokines, tumour necrosis factor but generally not hormones or growth factors (despite some terminologic overlap).'
p2390
aS'Cytokines are produced by a broad range of cells, including immune cells like macrophages, B lymphocytes, T lymphocytes and mast cells, as well as endothelial cells, fibroblasts, and various stromal cells; a given cytokine may be produced by more than one type of cell.They act through receptors, and are especially important in the immune system; cytokines modulate the balance between humoral and cell-based immune responses, and they regulate the maturation, growth, and responsiveness of particular cell populations.'
p2391
aS'Some cytokines enhance or inhibit the action of other cytokines in complex ways.They are different from hormones, which are also important cell signaling molecules, in that hormones circulate in much lower concentrations and hormones tend to be made by specific kinds of cells.They are important in health and disease, specifically in host responses to infection, immune responses, inflammation, trauma, sepsis, cancer, and reproduction. Discovery of cytokinesEdit Interferon-alpha, an interferon type I, was identified in 1957 as a protein that interfered with viral replication.'
p2392
aS'The activity of interferon-gamma (the sole member of the interferon type II class) was described in 1965; this was the first identified lymphocyte-derived mediator.'
p2393
aS'Macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) was identified simultaneously in 1966 by John David and Barry Bloom.In 1969 Dudley Dumonde proposed the term "lymphokine" to describe proteins secreted from lymphocytes and later, proteins derived from macrophages and monocytes in culture were called "monokines".'
p2394
aS'As scientists learned more, it was understood that these proteins and others were part of a broader class of proteins involved in self-defense, and should be called "cytokines". Difference from hormonesEdit Classic hormones circulate in nanomolar (10-9 M) concentrations that usually vary by less than one order of magnitude.'
p2395
aS'The Czech_Republic includes the historical territories of Bohemia, Moravia, and Czech Silesia.The Czech state was formed in the late 9th century as the Duchy of Bohemia under the Great Moravian Empire.'
p2396
aS'After the fall of the Empire in 907, the centre of power transferred from Moravia to Bohemia under the Premyslids.'
p2397
aS'In 1004, the duchy was formally recognized as part of the Holy Roman Empire, becoming the Kingdom of Bohemia in 1212, and reaching its greatest territorial extent in the 14th century.'
p2398
aS'The King of Bohemia ruled not only Bohemia itself, but also other lands, which together formed the so-called Crown of Bohemia, and he had a vote in the election of the Holy Roman Emperor.'
p2399
aS'In the Hussite wars of the 15th century driven by the Bohemian Reformation, the kingdom faced economic embargoes and defeated five crusades proclaimed by the leaders of the Roman Catholic Church and organized mainly by the emperor and princes of the Holy Roman Empire.Following the Battle of Mohacs in 1526, the whole Crown of Bohemia was gradually integrated into the Habsburg Monarchy alongside the Archduchy of Austria and the Kingdom of Hungary.'
p2400
aS"The Bohemian Revolt (1618-20) against the Catholic Habsburgs led to the Thirty_Years'_War, after which the monarchy consolidated its rule, reimposed Catholicism, and adopted a policy of gradual Germanization."
p2401
aS'With the dissolution of the Holy Roman Empire in 1806, the Bohemian Kingdom became part of the Austrian Empire and the Czech language experienced its revival as a consequence of widespread romantic nationalism.'
p2402
aS'In them, some of the issues Lawrence explores are emotional health, vitality, spontaneity and instinct.Lawrence\'s opinions earned him many enemies and he endured official persecution, censorship, and misrepresentation of his creative work throughout the second half of his life, much of which he spent in a voluntary exile which he called his "savage pilgrimage".'
p2403
aS'At the time of his death, his public reputation was that of a pornographer who had wasted his considerable talents.'
p2404
aS'E. M. Forster, in an obituary notice, challenged this widely held view, describing him as, "The greatest imaginative novelist of our generation."'
p2405
aS'Later, the influential Cambridge critic F. R. Leavis championed both his artistic integrity and his moral seriousness, placing much of Lawrence\'s fiction within the canonical "great tradition" of the English novel. Life and career  Early life The fourth child of Arthur John Lawrence, a barely literate miner at Brinsley Colliery, and Lydia (nee Beardsall), a former pupil teacher who, owing to her family\'s financial difficulties, had to do manual work in a lace factory, Lawrence spent his formative years in the coal mining town of Eastwood, Nottinghamshire.'
p2406
aS'The house in which he was born, in Eastwood, 8a Victoria Street, is now the D. H. Lawrence Birthplace Museum.'
p2407
aS'His working-class background and the tensions between his parents provided the raw material for a number of his early works.'
p2408
aS'Lawrence would return to this locality and often wrote about nearby Underwood, calling it; "the country of my heart," as a setting for much of his fiction.'
p2409
aS'For much of the 18th and 19th centuries, the Kingdom of Dahomey was a key regional state, eventually ending tributary status to the Oyo Empire.'
p2410
aS'The Kingdom of Dahomey was an important regional power that had an organized domestic economy built on conquest and slave labor, significant international trade with European powers, a centralized administration, taxation systems, and an organized military.'
p2411
aS'Notable in the kingdom were significant artwork, a curious all-female military unit known as the Dahomey Amazons, and elaborate superstitious practices of Vodun with the large festival of the Annual Customs of Dahomey. Name The Kingdom of Dahomey was referred to by many different names and has been written in a variety of ways, including Danxome, Danhome, and Fon.'
p2412
aS'The name Fon relates to the dominant ethnic and language group, the Fon people, of the royal families of the kingdom and is how the kingdom first became known to Europeans.'
p2413
aS'The names Dahomey, Danxome, and Danhome all have a similar origin story, which historian Edna Bay says may be a false etymology.'
p2414
aS'The story says that Dakodonu, considered the second king in modern kings lists, was granted permission by the Gedevi chiefs, the local rulers, to settle in the Abomey plateau.'
p2415
aS'Dakodonu requested additional land from a prominent chief named Dan (or Da) to which the chief responded sarcastically "Should I open up my belly and build you a house in it?"'
p2416
aS'Swoosie Kurtz, Mildred Natwick and Peter Capaldi appeared in supporting roles, as did young relatively unknown actors Keanu Reeves and Uma Thurman.The film was nominated for seven Academy Awards, including Best Picture; it won those for Best Adapted Screenplay, Best Costume Design, and Best Art Direction. Plot In 1781 pre-Revolution Paris, the amoral and sexually ravenous Marquise de Merteuil (Glenn Close) plots revenge against her ex-lover, the Comte de Gercourt, who has recently ended their relationship.'
p2417
aS'To soothe her wounded pride and embarrass Gercourt, she seeks to arrange the seduction and disgrace of his young virgin fiancee, Cecile de Volanges (Uma Thurman), who has only recently been presented to society after spending her formative years in the shelter of a convent.Merteuil calls on the similarly unprincipled Vicomte de Valmont (John Malkovich) to do the deed, offering him her own sexual favors as a reward.'
p2418
aS'Valmont declines, as he has a seduction of his own in progress: Madame de Tourvel (Michelle Pfeiffer), the virtuous wife of a member of Parliament.'
p2419
aS"Merteuil is amused and incredulous at Valmont's hubris; how can he ever hope to bed a chaste, devoutly religious woman like Madame Tourvel?"
p2420
aS'Never one to refuse a challenge, Valmont modifies the proposal: If he succeeds in sleeping with Tourvel, Merteuil must sleep with him as well.'
p2421
aS"Merteuil accepts, on the condition that he furnish written proof of the liaison.At the estate of Valmont's aunt, Madame de Rosemonde (Mildred Natwick), Valmont employs every trick in his considerable repertoire in a vain attempt to attract Tourvel's attention, but she rebuffs all of his advances."
p2422
aS"Searching for leverage, Valmont instructs his page Azolan (Peter Capaldi) to seduce Tourvel's maid Julie (Valerie Gogan) to gain access to Tourvel's private correspondence."
p2423
aS'A prolific and versatile writer, he wrote more than five hundred books, pamphlets and journals on various topics (including politics, crime, religion, marriage, psychology and the supernatural).'
p2424
aS'He was also a pioneer of economic journalism. Early lifeEdit Daniel Foe (his original name) was probably born in Fore Street, in the parish of St. Giles Cripplegate, London.'
p2425
aS'Defoe later added the aristocratic-sounding "De" to his name and on occasion claimed descent from the family of De Beau Faux.'
p2426
aS'His birthdate and birthplace are uncertain and sources offer dates from 1659-1662, with 1660 considered the most likely.'
p2427
aS'His father, James Foe, was a prosperous tallow chandler and a member of the Worshipful Company of Butchers.'
p2428
aS"In Defoe's early life, he experienced some of the most unusual occurrences in English history: in 1665, 70,000 were killed by the Great Plague of London and next year, the Great_Fire_of_London left standing only Defoe's and two other houses in his neighbourhood."
p2429
aS'In 1667, when he was probably about seven, a Dutch fleet sailed up the Medway via the River Thames and attacked the town of Chatham in the raid on the Medway.'
p2430
aS'He spoke for conservatives, and led the opposition to Democrat Andrew_Jackson and his Democratic Party.'
p2431
aS'He was a spokesman for modernization, banking, and industry, but not for the common people who composed the base of his opponents in Jacksonian Democracy.'
p2432
aS'"He was a thoroughgoing elitist, and he reveled in it," says biographer Robert Remini.'
p2433
aS'During his 40 years in national politics, Webster served in the House of Representatives for 10 years (representing New Hampshire), in the Senate for 19 years (representing Massachusetts), and was appointed the United_States Secretary of State under three presidents.One of the highest-regarded courtroom lawyers of the era, Webster shaped several key U.S. Supreme Court cases that established important constitutional precedents that bolstered the authority of the federal government.'
p2434
aS'As a diplomat he is best known for negotiating the Webster-Ashburton Treaty with Great Britain; it established the definitive eastern border between the United_States and Canada.'
p2435
aS'Chiefly recognized for his Senate tenure, Webster was a key figure in the institution\'s "Golden days".'
p2436
aS'Webster was the Northern member of the "Great Triumvirate", with his colleagues Henry_Clay from the West (Kentucky) and John C. Calhoun from the South (South Carolina).'
p2437
aS'It is a common given name for males, and is also used as a surname.'
p2438
aS'It is also the basis for various derived given names and surnames. Background The name evolved into over 100 different spellings in countries around the world.'
p2439
aS'Nicknames (Dan, Danny) are common in both English and Hebrew, although in some instances "Dan" may be a complete given name rather than a nickname.'
p2440
aS'The name "Daniil" (Daniil) is common in Russia.'
p2441
aS'Feminine versions (Danielle, Daniela, Daniella, Dani, Danitza) are prevalent as well.'
p2442
aS'The Dutch names "Daan" and "Daniel" are also variations of Daniel.'
p2443
aS'A related surname developed as a patronymic, Daniels.'
p2444
aS'In Rigvedic Sanskrit, danu means "fluid, drop", in Avestan, the same word means "river".'
p2445
aS'In the Rigveda, Danu once appears as the mother of Vrtra.'
p2446
aS'It is possible that danu in Scythian as in Avestan was a generic word for "river": Dniepr and Dniestr, from Danapris and Danastius, are presumed to continue Scythian *danu apara "far river" and *danu nazdya- "near river", respectively.The Greek name of the Danube was Istros (Istros), a borrowing from a Daco-Thracian name meaning "strong, swift" (akin to Sanskrit isiras "swift").'
p2447
aS'In Latin, the Danube was variously known as Danubius, Danuvius or as Ister.'
p2448
aS'The Dacian/Thracian name was Donaris/Donaris for the upper Danube and Istros for the lower Danube.'
p2449
aS'The Thraco-Phrygian name was Matoas, "the bringer of luck".The Latin name is masculine (as is the name of the Rhine).'
p2450
aS'German Donau (Early Modern German Donaw, Tonaw, Middle High German Tuonowe) is feminine, as it has been re-interpreted as containing the suffix -ouwe "wetland".The modern languages spoken in the Danube basin all use names derived from Danuvius: German: Donau ([\'do:naU]; Bavarian: Doana, Yiddish: Duney dvnyy [dUnej]); Silesian: Dunaj; Upper Sorbian: Dunaj; Slovak: Dunaj ([\'dunaj]) Hungarian: Duna ([\'duna]); Serbo-Croatian: Dunav / Dunav ([dunav] or [duna:v]); Romanian: Dunarea ([\'dun@rea]); Romani: Dunaja ([\'dunaja]); Bulgarian: Dunav Dunav ([\'dunaf]); Ukrainian: Dunai Dunai ([du\'naj]). Geography Classified as an international waterway, it originates in the town of Donaueschingen--which is in the Black Forest of Germany--at the confluence of the rivers Brigach and Breg.'
p2451
aS'The new king met with rebellions throughout his kingdom and quelled them each time.'
p2452
aS"A major event in Darius's life was his expedition to punish Athens and Eretria for their aid in the Ionian Revolt, and subjugate Greece."
p2453
aS'Although ultimately ending in failure at the Battle_of_Marathon, Darius succeeded in the re-subjugation of Thrace, expansion of the empire through the conquest of Macedon, the Cyclades, and the island of Naxos, and the sacking and enslavement of the city of Eretria.Darius organized the empire by dividing it into provinces and placing satraps to govern it.'
p2454
aS'He organized a new uniform monetary system, along with making Aramaic the official language of the empire.'
p2455
aS'Darius also worked on construction projects throughout the empire, focusing on Susa, Pasargadae, Persepolis, Babylon and Egypt.'
p2456
aS'He had the cliff-face Behistun Inscription carved to record his conquests, an important testimony of the Old Persian_language.Darius is mentioned in the Biblical books of Haggai, Zechariah, Ezra-Nehemiah and Daniel. Etymology Darius and Dareus are the Latin form of the Greek Dareios (Dareios), itself from Old Persian Daraya(h)us (; in Aramaic dryhws), which is a shortened form of Darayava(h)us ().'
p2457
aS'The longer form is also seen to have been reflected in the Elamite Da-ri-(y)a-ma-u-is, Babylonian Da-(a-)ri-ia-(a-)mus, Aramaic drywhws, and possibly the longer Greek form Dareiaios (Dareiaios).'
p2458
aS'Assuming that the standard model of cosmology is correct, the best current measurement of the distribution of mass-energy in the observable universe is 68.3% dark energy, 26.8% dark matter and 4.9% ordinary matter.'
p2459
aS'Again on a mass-energy equivalence basis, the density of dark energy (6.91 x 10-27 kg/m3) is very low, much less than the density of ordinary matter or dark matter within galaxies.'
p2460
aS'However, it comes to dominate the mass-energy of the universe because it is uniform across space.Two proposed forms for dark energy are the cosmological constant, a constant energy density filling space homogeneously, and scalar fields such as quintessence or moduli, dynamic quantities whose energy density can vary in time and space.'
p2461
aS'Contributions from scalar fields that are constant in space are usually also included in the cosmological constant.'
p2462
aS'The cosmological constant can be formulated to be equivalent to vacuum energy.'
p2463
aS'Scalar fields that do change in space can be difficult to distinguish from a cosmological constant because the change may be extremely slow.High-precision measurements of the expansion of the universe are required to understand how the expansion rate changes over time and space.'
p2464
aS'In general relativity, the evolution of the expansion rate is parameterized by the cosmological equation of state (the relationship between temperature, pressure, and combined matter, energy, and vacuum energy density for any region of space).'
p2465
aS'In producing capital (money) as well as commodities (goods and services), the workers continually reproduce the economic conditions by which they labour.'
p2466
aS'Capital proposes an explanation of the "laws of motion" of the capitalist economic system, from its origins throughout its future, by describing the dynamics of the accumulation of capital, the growth of wage labour, the transformation of the workplace, the concentration of capital, commercial competition, the banking system, the decline of the profit rate, land-rents, et cetera.The critique of the political economy of capitalism proposes that:The commodity is the basic "cell-form" (trade unit) of a capitalist society, but capitalism is distinguished from other forms of production based on commodities in that here labour power becomes a commodity like any other.'
p2467
aS'Moreover, because commerce, as a human activity, implied no morality beyond that required to buy and sell goods and services, the growth of the market system made discrete entities of the economic, the moral, and the legal spheres of human activity in society; hence, subjective moral value is separate from objective economic value.'
p2468
aS'Subsequently, political economy -- the just distribution of wealth and "political arithmetick" about taxes -- became three discrete fields of human activity: Economics, Law, and Ethics, politics and economics divorced.'
p2469
aS'"The economic formation of society [is] a process of natural history", thus it is possible for a political economist to objectively study the scientific laws of capitalism, given that its expansion of the market system of commerce had objectified human economic relations; the use of money (cash nexus) voided religious and political illusions about its economic value, and replaced them with commodity fetishism, the belief that an object (commodity) has inherent economic value.'
p2470
aS'Because societal economic formation is a historical process, no one person could control or direct it, thereby creating a global complex of social connections among capitalists; thus, the economic formation (individual commerce) of a society precedes the human administration of an economy (organised commerce).The structural contradictions of a capitalist economy, the gegensatzliche Bewegung, describe the contradictory movement originating from the two-fold character of labour, and so the class struggle between labour and capital, the wage labourer and the owner of the means of production.'
p2471
aS'These capitalist economic contradictions operate "behind the backs" of the capitalists and the workers, as a result of their activities, and yet remain beyond their immediate perceptions as men and women and as social classes.The economic crises (recession, depression, etc.)'
p2472
aS'Mahler specified the two singers should be a tenor and an alto, or else a tenor and a baritone if an alto is not available.'
p2473
aS"The work was composed following the most painful period in Mahler's life, and the songs address themes such as those of living, parting and salvation."
p2474
aS'On the centenary of Mahler\'s birth, the composer, conductor, and known Mahler conductor Leonard_Bernstein described Das_Lied_von_der_Erde as Mahler\'s "Greatest symphony". Origins Three personal disasters befell Mahler during the summer of 1907.'
p2475
aS'Political maneuvering and anti-semitism forced him to resign his post as Director of the Vienna Court Opera, his eldest daughter Maria died from scarlet fever and diphtheria, and Mahler himself was diagnosed with a congenital heart defect.'
p2476
aS'"With one stroke," he wrote to his friend Bruno Walter, "I have lost everything I have gained in terms of who I thought I was, and have to learn my first steps again like a newborn".The following year (1908) saw the publication of Hans Bethge\'s Die chinesische Flote, a volume of ancient Chinese poetry rendered into German.'
p2477
aS'Mahler was very taken by the vision of earthly beauty and transience expressed in these verses and chose seven of the poems to set to music as Das_Lied_von_der_Erde.'
p2478
aS"Mahler completed this work 1909. Text in Das_Lied_von_der_Erde The Universal Edition score of 1911 for Das_Lied_von_der_Erde shows Mahler's adapted text as follows. 1."
p2479
aS"Brubeck's style ranged from refined to bombastic, reflecting his mother's attempts at classical training and his improvisational skills."
p2480
aS'His music is known for employing unusual time signatures, and superimposing contrasting rhythms, meters, and tonalities.His long-time musical partner, alto saxophonist Paul Desmond, wrote the saxophone melody for the Dave_Brubeck Quartet\'s best remembered piece, "Take Five", which is in 5/4 time and has endured as a jazz classic on one of the top-selling jazz albums, Time Out.'
p2481
aS'Brubeck experimented with time signatures throughout his career, recording "Pick Up Sticks" in 6/4, "Unsquare Dance" in 7/4, "World\'s Fair" in 13/4, and "Blue Rondo a la Turk" in 9/8.'
p2482
aS'He was also a respected composer of orchestral and sacred music, and wrote soundtracks for television such as Mr. Broadway and the animated miniseries This Is America, Charlie Brown. Early life and career Brubeck was born in the San_Francisco Bay Area city of Concord, California, and grew up in Ione.'
p2483
aS'His father, Peter Howard "Pete" Brubeck, was a cattle rancher, and his mother, Elizabeth (nee Ivey), who had studied piano in England under Myra Hess and intended to become a concert pianist, taught piano for extra money.'
p2484
aS'His father had Swiss ancestry (the family surname was originally "Brodbeck") and possibly Native American Modoc lineage, while his maternal grandparents were English and German.'
p2485
aS'Brubeck originally did not intend to become a musician (his two older brothers, Henry and Howard, were already on that track), but took lessons from his mother.'
p2486
aS"He was a Stalinist and member of the Mexican Communist Party who participated in an unsuccessful attempt to assassinate Leon Trotsky in May 1940.His surname would normally be Alfaro by Spanish naming customs; like Picasso (Pablo Ruiz y Picasso) and Lorca (Federico_Garcia_Lorca), Siqueiros used his mother's surname."
p2487
aS'It was long believed that he was born in Camargo in Chihuahua state, but in 2003 it was proven that he had actually been born in the city of Chihuahua, but grew up in Irapuato, Guanajuato, at least from the age of six.'
p2488
aS'The discovery of his birth certificate in 2003 by a Mexican art curator was announced the following year by art critic Raquel Tibol, who was renowned as the leading authority on Mexican Muralism and who had been a close acquaintance of Siqueiros.'
p2489
aS'Siqueiros changed his given name to "David" after his first wife called him by it in allusion to Michelangelo\'s, David.'
p2490
aS'Another factual confusion is the year of his birth: he was born in 1896, but many sources state 1898 or 1899. Youth Many details of his childhood, including birth date, birthplace, first name, and where he grew up, were misstated during his life and long after his death, in some cases by himself.'
p2491
aS'Often, he is reported to have been born and raised in 1898 in a town in the state of Chihuahua, and his personal names are reported to be "Jose David".Siqueiros was born in Chihuahua in 1896, the second of three children.'
p2492
aS'He was baptized Jose de Jesus Alfaro Siqueiros.'
p2493
aS'As a screenwriter, he has received Oscar nominations for The Verdict (1982) and Wag the Dog (1997).'
p2494
aS'Mamet\'s books include: The Old Religion (1997), a novel about the lynching of Leo Frank; Five Cities of Refuge: Weekly Reflections on Genesis, Exodus, Leviticus, Numbers and Deuteronomy (2004), a Torah commentary with Rabbi Lawrence Kushner; The Wicked Son (2006), a study of Jewish self-hatred and antisemitism; Bambi vs. Godzilla, a commentary on the movie business; The Secret Knowledge: On the Dismantling of American Culture (2011), a commentary on cultural and political issues; and Three War Stories (2013), a trio of novellas about the physical and psychological effects of war.Feature films which Mamet both wrote and directed include Redbelt (2008), The Spanish Prisoner (1997), House of Games (1987) (which won Best Film and Best Screenplay awards at the 1987 Venice Film Festival and "Film of the Year" for the 1989 London Critics Circle Film Awards), Spartan (2004), Heist (2001), State and Main (2000) (Winner of a Best Acting - Ensemble award from the National Board of Review), The Winslow Boy (1999), and Oleanna (1994).'
p2495
aS'This was accompanied by Homicide (1991) (nominated for the Palme d\'Or at 1991 Cannes Film Festival and won a "Screenwriter of the Year" award for Mamet from the London Critics Circle Film Awards and Best Cinematography for Roger Deakins from the Los Angeles Film Critics Association Awards), Things Change (1988) (which won the Volpi Cup for Best Actor at 1988 Venice Film Festival for Don Ameche and Joe Mantegna), and most recently the 2013 HBO film Phil Spector, starring Al Pacino as Spector with Helen Mirren and Jeffrey Tambor.'
p2496
aS'His drama Glengarry_Glen_Ross, in 1992, was adapted by Mamet into a film version which also received an Academy Award nomination.Mamet has also written the screenplays for such films as The Verdict (1982), directed by Sidney Lumet, The Postman Always Rings Twice (1981), directed by Bob Rafelson, The Untouchables (1987) directed by Brian De Palma, Hoffa (1992), Ronin (1998), Wag The Dog (1997), The Edge (1997), and Hannibal (2001).'
p2497
aS'Mamet was also the executive producer and frequent writer for the TV show The Unit. Early life Mamet was born in 1947 in Chicago to Jewish parents, Lenore June (nee Silver), a teacher, and Bernard Morris Mamet, an attorney.'
p2498
aS"One of his first jobs was as a busboy at Chicago's The Second City."
p2499
aS'He was educated at the progressive Francis W. Parker School and at Goddard College in Plainfield, Vermont.'
p2500
aS'Perhaps his most important legacy is his theory of comparative advantage, which suggests that a nation should concentrate its resources solely in industries where it is most internationally competitive and trade with other countries to obtain products no longer produced nationally.'
p2501
aS'In essence, Ricardo promoted the idea of extreme industry specialization by nations, to the point of dismantling internationally competitive and otherwise profitable industries.'
p2502
aS'Ricardo took as a given the existence of a national industry policy aimed at promoting some industries to the detriment of others.'
p2503
aS'For Ricardo some form of central economic planning was a necessity.'
p2504
aS"Ricardo's theory of comparative advantage has been challenged by, among others, Joan Robinson and Piero Sraffa, but remains the cornerstone of the argument in favour of international free trade."
p2505
aS'Comparative_advantage was the theoretical forerunner of the push towards globalization via increased international trade which is the guiding theme in the economic policy programme currently promoted by the OECD and the World Trade Organization, where it is assumed that increased international trade will lead to economic prosperity.'
p2506
aS'The results of the implementation of this type of policy agenda are increasingly controversial.'
p2507
aS"Next to van Doesburg, the group's principal members were the painters Piet_Mondrian (1872-1944), Vilmos Huszar (1884-1960), and Bart van der Leck (1876-1958), and the architects Gerrit Rietveld (1888-1964), Robert van 't Hoff (1887-1979), and J. J. P. Oud (1890-1963)."
p2508
aS"The artistic philosophy that formed a basis for the group's work is known as neoplasticism--the new plastic art (or Nieuwe Beelding in Dutch).Proponents of De_Stijl advocated pure abstraction and universality by a reduction to the essentials of form and colour; they simplified visual compositions to the vertical and horizontal directions, and used only primary colors along with black and white."
p2509
aS'Indeed, according to the Tate Gallery\'s online article on neoplasticism, Mondrian himself sets forth these delimitations in his essay "Neo-Plasticism in Pictorial Art".'
p2510
aS'He writes, "this new plastic idea will ignore the particulars of appearance, that is to say, natural form and colour.'
p2511
aS'On the contrary, it should find its expression in the abstraction of form and colour, that is to say, in the straight line and the clearly defined primary colour".'
p2512
aS'The Tate article further summarizes that this art allows "only primary colours and non-colours, only squares and rectangles, only straight and horizontal or vertical line."'
p2513
aS'The Guggenheim Museum\'s online article on De_Stijl summarizes these traits in similar terms: "It [De_Stijl] was posited on the fundamental principle of the geometry of the straight line, the square, and the rectangle, combined with a strong asymmetricality; the predominant use of pure primary colors with black and white; and the relationship between positive and negative elements in an arrangement of non-objective forms and lines". Principles and influences The name De_Stijl is supposedly derived from Gottfried Semper\'s Der Stil in den technischen und tektonischen Kunsten oder Praktische Asthetik (1861-3), which Curl suggests was mistakenly believed to advocate materialism and functionalism.'
p2514
aS'Gogol masterfully portrayed those defects through Pavel Ivanovich Chichikov (the main character) and the people whom he encounters in his endeavours.'
p2515
aS'These people are typical of the Russian middle-class of the time.'
p2516
aS'Gogol himself saw it as an "epic poem in prose", and within the book as a "novel in verse".'
p2517
aS"Despite supposedly completing the trilogy's second part, Gogol destroyed it shortly before his death."
p2518
aS'Although the novel ends in mid-sentence (like Sterne\'s Sentimental Journey), it is usually regarded as complete in the extant form. Title The original title, as shown on the illustration (cover page), was "The Wanderings of Chichikov, or Dead_Souls.'
p2519
aS'Poema", which contracted to merely "Dead_Souls".'
p2520
aS'In the Russian Empire, before the emancipation of the serfs in 1861, landowners had the right to own serfs to farm their land.'
p2521
aS'It was also included on Time\'s 100 Best English-language Novels from 1923 to 2005 and Modern Library\'s list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century and was chosen by the Western Writers of America to be the 7th-best "Western Novel" of the 20th century. Plot summary The primary character is a bishop, Jean Marie Latour, who travels with his friend and vicar Joseph Vaillant from Sandusky, Ohio to New_Mexico to take charge of the newly established diocese of New_Mexico, which has only just become a territory of the United_States.'
p2522
aS'The names given to the main proponents reflect their characters.'
p2523
aS'Vaillant, valiant, is fearless in his promulgation of the faith, whereas Latour, the tower, is more intellectual and reserved than his comrade.At the time of his departure, Cincinnati is the end of the railway line west, so Latour must travel by riverboat to the Gulf of Mexico, and thence overland to New_Mexico, a journey which takes an entire year.'
p2524
aS'He spends the rest of his life establishing the Roman Catholic church in New_Mexico, where he dies in old age.The novel portrays two well-meaning and devout French priests who encounter a well-entrenched Spanish-Mexican clergy that they are sent to supplant after the United_States has acquired New_Mexico in the Mexican-American War.'
p2525
aS'As a result of the U.S. victory, the dioceses of the new state have been remapped by the Vatican to reflect the new national borders.Several of these entrenched priests are depicted as examples of greed, avarice, and gluttony, while others live simple, abstemious lives among the Native Americans.'
p2526
aS'Cather portrays the Hopi and Navajo sympathetically, and her characters express the near futility of overlaying their religion on a millennia-old native culture. Historical background The novel is based on the life of Jean-Baptiste Lamy (1814-1888), and partially chronicles the construction of the Cathedral Basilica of St. Francis of Assisi.'
p2527
aS'The capture of the Southwest by the United_States in the Mexican-American War is the catalyst for the plot.'
p2528
aS'Though he never speaks to the boy, much less touches him, the writer finds himself drawn deep into ruinous inward passion; meanwhile, Venice, and finally, the writer himself, succumb to a cholera plague.'
p2529
aS'The novella is powerfully intertextual, with the chief sources being first the connection of erotic love to philosophical wisdom traced in Plato\'s Symposium and Phaedrus, and second the Nietzschean contrast between the god of restraint and shaping form, Apollo, and the god of excess and passion, Dionysus.The boy in the story (Tadzio) is based on a boy (Wladzio or Tadzio, nicknames for the Polish name Wladyslaw or Tadeusz respectively) Mann had seen during a visit to Venice in 1911. Plot summary The main character is Gustav von Aschenbach, a famous author in his early fifties who has recently been ennobled in honor of his artistic achievement (thus acquiring the aristocratic "von" in his name).'
p2530
aS'He is a man dedicated to his art, disciplined and ascetic to the point of severity, who was widowed at a young age.'
p2531
aS'As the story opens, he is strolling outside a cemetery and sees a coarse-looking red-haired foreigner who stares back at him belligerently.'
p2532
aS'Aschenbach walks away, embarrassed but curiously stimulated.'
p2533
aS'He has a vision of a primordial swamp-wilderness, fertile, exotic and full of lurking danger.'
p2534
aS'Soon afterwards, he resolves to take a holiday.After a false start in traveling to Pula on the Austro-Hungarian coast, Aschenbach realizes he "was meant" to go to Venice and takes a suite in the Grand Hotel des Bains on the Lido island.'
p2535
aS'The play premiered on Broadway in February 1949, running for 742 performances, and has been revived on Broadway four times, winning three Tony Awards for Best Revival.'
p2536
aS"Death_of_a_Salesman is often numbered on the short list of being among the finest American plays in the 20th century alongside Long Day's Journey into Night and A Streetcar Named Desire. Plot Willy Loman returns home exhausted after a cancelled business trip."
p2537
aS"Worried over Willy's state of mind and recent car accident, his wife Linda suggests that he ask his boss Howard Wagner to allow him to work in his home city so he will not have to travel."
p2538
aS'Willy complains to Linda that their son, Biff, has yet to make good on his life.'
p2539
aS"Despite Biff's promising showing as an athlete in high school, he flunked senior-year math and never went to college.Biff and his brother Happy, who is temporarily staying with Willy and Linda after Biff's unexpected return from the West, reminisce about their childhood together."
p2540
aS"They discuss their father's mental degeneration, which they have witnessed in the form of his constant indecisiveness and recurrent instances of talking to himself when he thinks he is alone."
p2541
aS'Willy walks in, angry that the two boys have never amounted to anything.'
p2542
aS'Bodies of living organisms begin to decompose shortly after death.'
p2543
aS'Death has commonly been considered a sad or unpleasant occasion, due to the termination of bonds with or affection for the being that has died, or having fear of death, necrophobia, anxiety, sorrow, grief, emotional pain, depression, sympathy, compassion, solitude, or saudade. Etymology The word death comes from Old English dead, which in turn comes from Proto-Germanic *dauthuz (reconstructed by etymological analysis).'
p2544
aS'This comes from the Proto-Indo-European stem *dheu- meaning the "Process, act, condition of dying". Associated terms The concept and symptoms of death, and varying degrees of delicacy used in discussion in public forums, have generated numerous scientific, legal, and socially acceptable terms or euphemisms for death.'
p2545
aS'When a person has died, it is also said they have passed away, passed on, expired, or are gone, among numerous other socially accepted, religiously specific, slang, and irreverent terms.'
p2546
aS'Bereft of life, the dead person is then a corpse, cadaver, a body, a set of remains, and when all flesh has rotted away, a skeleton.'
p2547
aS'The terms carrion and carcass can also be used, though these more often connote the remains of non-human animals.'
p2548
aS'As a polite reference to a dead person, it has become common practice to use the participle form of "decease", as in the deceased; the noun form is decedent.'
p2549
aS"Russian army officers led about 3,000 soldiers in a protest against Nicholas I's assumption of the throne after his elder brother Constantine removed himself from the line of succession."
p2550
aS'Because these events occurred in December, the rebels were called the Decembrists (Dekabristy, Russian: Dekabristy).'
p2551
aS'This uprising, which was suppressed by Nicholas I, took place in the Senate Square in Saint_Petersburg.'
p2552
aS'In 1925, to mark the centenary of the event, the square was renamed as Decembrist Square, but in 2008 it reverted to its original name. The Union of Salvation In 1816, several officers of the Imperial Russian Guard founded a society known as the Union of Salvation, or of the Faithful and True Sons of the Fatherland.'
p2553
aS'The society acquired a more Liberal cast after it was joined by the idealistic Pavel Pestel.'
p2554
aS'After a mutiny in the Semenovsky Regiment in 1820, the society decided to suspend activity in 1821.'
p2555
aS'Two groups, however, continued to function secretly: a Southern Society, based at Tulchin, a small garrison town in Ukraine, in which Pestel was the outstanding figure, and a Northern Society, based at St Petersburg, led by Guard officers Nikita Muraviev, Prince S. P. Trubetskoy and Prince Eugene Obolensky.'
p2556
aS'Her story is part of the Ulster Cycle, the best-known stories of pre-Christian Ireland. In legend Deirdre was the daughter of the royal storyteller Fedlimid mac Daill.'
p2557
aS"Before she was born, Cathbad the chief druid at the court of Conchobar mac Nessa, king of Ulster, prophesied that Fedlimid's daughter would grow up to be very beautiful, but that kings and lords would go to war over her, much blood would be shed because of her, and Ulster's three greatest warriors would be forced into exile for her sake."
p2558
aS'Hearing this, many urged Fedlimid to kill the baby at birth, but Conchobar, aroused by the description of her future beauty, decided to keep the child for himself.'
p2559
aS'He took Deirdre away from her family and had her brought up in seclusion by Leabharcham, an old woman, and planned to marry her when she was old enough.'
p2560
aS'Deirdre grew up, and one day told Leabharcham that she would love a man with hair the color of the raven, skin as white as snow, and lips as red as blood.'
p2561
aS"Leabharcham told her she knew of such a man -- Naoise, a handsome young warrior, hunter and singer at Conchobar's court."
p2562
aS'With the collusion of Leabharcham, Deirdre met Naoise.'
p2563
aS'In contrast to demand, quantity demanded is the exact quantity demanded at a certain price.'
p2564
aS'Changing the actual price will change the quantity demanded, but it will not change the demand, because demand is a listing of quantities that would be bought at various prices, not just the actual price.'
p2565
aS")Demand is a buyer's willingness and ability to pay a price for a specific quantity of a good or service."
p2566
aS'Demand refers to how much (quantity) of a product or service is desired by buyers at various prices.'
p2567
aS'The quantity demanded is the amount of a product people are willing or able to buy at a certain price; the relationship between price and quantity demanded is known as the demand.'
p2568
aS'(see also supply and demand).'
p2569
aS'The term demand signifies the ability or the willingness to buy a particular commodity at a given point of time, ceteris paribus.'
p2570
aS'She and her daughter Persephone were the central figures of the Eleusinian Mysteries that predated the Olympian pantheon.'
p2571
aS'In the Linear B Mycenean Greek tablets of circa 1400-1200 BC found at Pylos, the "two mistresses and the king" may be related with Demeter, Persephone and Poseidon.'
p2572
aS'Her Roman equivalent is Ceres. Etymology It is possible that Demeter appears in Linear A as da-ma-te on three documents (AR Zf 1 and 2, and KY Za 2), all three apparently dedicated in religious situations and all three bearing just the name (i-da-ma-te on AR Zf 1 and 2).'
p2573
aS'It is unlikely that Demeter appears as da-ma-te in a Linear B (Mycenean Greek) inscription (PY En 609); the word , da-ma-te, probably refers to "households".'
p2574
aS'On the other hand , si-to-po-ti-ni-ja, "Potnia of the Grain", is regarded to refer to her Bronze Age predecessor or to one of her epithets.Demeter\'s character as mother-goddess is identified in the second element of her name meter (meter) derived from Proto-Indo-European *meh2ter (mother).'
p2575
aS'In antiquity, different explanations were already proffered for the first element of her name.'
p2576
aS'It is possible that Da (Da), a word which became Ge (Ge) in Attic, is the Doric form of De (De), "earth", the old name of the chthonic earth-goddess, and that Demeter is "Mother-Earth".'
p2577
aS"After Mao Zedong's death, Deng led his country through far-reaching market-economy reforms."
p2578
aS'While Deng never held office as the head of state, head of government or General Secretary (that is, the leader of the Communist Party), he nonetheless was considered the "paramount leader" of the People\'s Republic of China from December 1978 to 1992.'
p2579
aS"As the core of the second-generation leaders, Deng shared his power with several powerful older politicians commonly known as the Eight Elders.Born into a peasant background in Guang'an, Sichuan province, Deng studied and worked in France in the 1920s, where he was influenced by Marxism-Leninism."
p2580
aS'He joined the Communist Party of China in 1923.'
p2581
aS'Upon his return to China he worked as a political commissar for the military in rural regions and was considered a "revolutionary veteran" of the Long March.'
p2582
aS"Following the founding of the People's Republic of China in 1949, Deng worked in Tibet and other southwestern regions to consolidate Communist control.Deng was a major supporter of Mao Zedong in the early 1950s."
p2583
aS"As the party's Secretary-General, Deng became instrumental in China's economic reconstruction following the Great Leap Forward in the early 1960s."
p2584
aS"Just one of many, Jacques le fataliste et son maitre (Jacques the Fatalist and his Master), influenced by Laurence_Sterne's novel Tristram Shandy, examines the question of free will."
p2585
aS"Diderot is also celebrated for the profound satirical dialogue Le Neveu de Rameau (Rameau's Nephew), which was first published posthumously in a German translation by the poet Johann Wolfgang von Goethe. Biography Denis_Diderot was born in Langres, Champagne, and began his formal education at a Jesuit college in Langres.His parents were Didier Diderot (1685-1759) a cutler, maitre coutelier, and his wife Angelique Vigneron (1677-1748)."
p2586
aS'Three of five siblings survived to adulthood, Denise Diderot (1715-97) and their youngest brother Pierre-Didier Diderot (1722-87), and finally their sister Angelique Diderot (1720-49).'
p2587
aS'According to Arthur McCandless Wilson, Denis_Diderot greatly admired his sister Denise, sometimes referring to her as "a female Socrates".In 1732 Denis_Diderot earned the Master of Arts degree in philosophy.'
p2588
aS"Then he entered the College d'Harcourt in Paris."
p2589
aS'He abandoned the idea of entering the clergy and decided instead to study law.'
p2590
aS'His study of law was short-lived however and in 1734 Diderot decided to become a writer.'
p2591
aS'He is currently Professor of Poetry at the University of Essex.'
p2592
aS'His works include the Homeric epic poem Omeros (1990), which many critics view "as Walcott\'s major achievement."'
p2593
aS'In addition to having won the Nobel, Walcott has won many literary awards over the course of his career, including an Obie Award in 1971 for his play Dream on Monkey Mountain, a MacArthur Foundation "genius" award, a Royal Society of Literature Award, the Queen\'s Medal for Poetry, the inaugural OCM Bocas Prize for Caribbean Literature and the 2011 T. S. Eliot Prize for his book of poetry White Egrets. Early life and education Walcott was born and raised in Castries, Saint Lucia, in the West Indies with a twin brother, the future playwright Roderick Walcott, and a sister, Pamela Walcott.'
p2594
aS'His family is of African and European descent, reflecting the complex colonial history of the island which he explores in his poetry.'
p2595
aS'His mother, a teacher, loved the arts and often recited poetry around the house.'
p2596
aS'His father, who painted and wrote poetry, died at age 31 from mastoiditis while his wife was pregnant with the twins Derek and Roderick, who were born after his death.'
p2597
aS"Walcott's family was part of a minority Methodist community, who felt overshadowed by the dominant Catholic culture of the island established during French colonial rule.As a young man Walcott trained as a painter, mentored by Harold Simmons, whose life as a professional artist provided an inspiring example for him."
p2598
aS'Using humanist techniques for working on texts, he prepared important new Latin and Greek editions of the New Testament, which raised questions that would be influential in the Protestant Reformation and Catholic Counter-Reformation.'
p2599
aS"He also wrote On Free Will, The Praise of Folly, Handbook of a Christian Knight, On Civility in Children, Copia: Foundations of the Abundant Style, Julius Exclusus, and many other works.Erasmus lived against the backdrop of the growing European religious Reformation, but while he was critical of the abuses within the Church and called for reform, he kept his distance from Luther and Melanchthon and continued to recognise the authority of the pope, emphasizing a middle way with a deep respect for traditional faith, piety and grace, rejecting Luther's emphasis on faith alone."
p2600
aS"Erasmus remained a member of the Roman Catholic Church all his life, remaining committed to reforming the Church and its clerics' abuses from within."
p2601
aS'He also held to the Catholic doctrine of free will, which some Reformers rejected in favor of the doctrine of predestination.'
p2602
aS'His middle road approach disappointed and even angered scholars in both camps.Erasmus died suddenly in Basel in 1536 while preparing to return to Brabant, and was buried in the Basel Minster, the former cathedral of the city.'
p2603
aS'A bronze statue of him was erected in his city of birth in 1622, replacing an earlier work in stone.'
p2604
aS'Erasmus was his baptismal name, given after St. Erasmus of Formiae.'
p2605
aS'In many other police systems, detectives are college graduates who join directly from civilian life without first serving as uniformed officers.'
p2606
aS'Some people argue that detectives do a completely different job and therefore require completely different training, qualifications, qualities and abilities than uniformed officers.'
p2607
aS'The opposing argument is that without previous service as a uniformed patrol officer, a detective cannot have a great enough command of standard police procedures and problems and will find it difficult to work with uniformed colleagues. Overview  Organization The detective branch in most large police agencies is organized into several squads or departments, each of which specializes in investigation into a particular type of crime or a particular type of undercover operation, which may include: homicide; robbery; burglary; auto theft; organized crimes; missing persons; juvenile crime; fraud; narcotics; vice; criminal intelligence; aggravated assault/battery; sexual assault; computer crime; domestic violence; surveillance; and arson, among others. Private detectives In some countries, the practice of a detective is not yet recognized in courts and judicial processes.'
p2608
aS'One of these countries is Portugal, where the proof presented loses all the significance when collected by a private detective.'
p2609
aS'Even under this circumstance, the practice of this activity is in demand and ruled by a code of conduct. Techniques  Street work Detectives have a wide variety of techniques available in conducting investigations.'
p2610
aS'However, the majority of cases are solved by the interrogation of suspects and the interviewing of witnesses, which takes time.'
p2611
aS'Besides interrogations, detectives may rely on a network of informants they have cultivated over the years.'
p2612
aS'Similarly, suppose we have a 3 x 3 matrix A, and we want the specific formula for its determinant |A|:  Each determinant of a 2 x 2 matrix in this equation is called a "minor" of the matrix A.'
p2613
aS'The same sort of procedure can be used to find the determinant of a 4 x 4 matrix, the determinant of a 5 x 5 matrix, and so forth.Determinants occur throughout mathematics.'
p2614
aS'For example, a matrix is often used to represent the coefficients in a system of linear equations, and the determinant is used to solve those equations.'
p2615
aS'The use of determinants in calculus includes the Jacobian determinant in the change of variables rule for integrals of functions of several variables.'
p2616
aS'Determinants are also used to define the characteristic polynomial of a matrix, which is essential for eigenvalue problems in linear algebra.'
p2617
aS'Sometimes, determinants are used merely as a compact notation for expressions that would otherwise be unwieldy to write down.It can be proven that any matrix has a unique inverse if its determinant is nonzero.'
p2618
aS'Various other theorems can be proved as well, including that the determinant of a product of matrices is always equal to the product of determinants; and, the determinant of a Hermitian matrix is always real. Definition There are various ways to define the determinant of a square matrix A, i.e.'
p2619
aS"The first known performance was at Josias Priest's girls' school in London no later than the summer of 1688."
p2620
aS"The story is based on Book IV of Virgil's Aeneid."
p2621
aS'It recounts the love of Dido, Queen of Carthage, for the Trojan hero Aeneas, and her despair when he abandons her.'
p2622
aS"A monumental work in Baroque opera, Dido_and_Aeneas is remembered as one of Purcell's foremost theatrical works."
p2623
aS"It was also Purcell's first opera, as well as his only all-sung dramatic work."
p2624
aS"One of the earliest English operas, it owes much to John Blow's Venus and Adonis, both in structure and in overall effect."
p2625
aS"The influence of Cavalli's opera Didone is also apparent. Background and context Before Dido_and_Aeneas, Purcell composed music for several stage works, including nine pieces for Nathaniel Lee's Theodosius, or The Force of Love (1680) and eight songs for Thomas d'Urfey's A Fool's Preferment (1688)."
p2626
aS'The Diels-Alder_reaction is particularly useful in synthetic organic chemistry as a reliable method for forming 6-membered systems with good control over regio- and stereochemical properties.'
p2627
aS'The underlying concept has also been applied to other p-systems, such as carbonyls and imines, to furnish the corresponding heterocycles, known as the hetero-Diels-Alder_reaction.'
p2628
aS'Diels-Alder_reactions can be reversible under certain conditions; the reverse reaction is known as the retro-Diels-Alder_reaction. Reaction mechanism The reaction is an example of a concerted pericyclic reaction.'
p2629
aS'It is believed to occur via a single, cyclic transition state, with no intermediates generated during the course of the reaction.'
p2630
aS"As such, the Diels-Alder_reaction is governed by orbital symmetry considerations: it is classified as a [4pS+2pS] cycloaddition, indicating that it proceeds through the suprafacial/suprafacial interaction of a 4p electron system with a 2p electron system, an interaction that is thermally allowed as a 4n+2 cycloaddition.A consideration of the reactants' frontier molecular orbitals (FMO) makes plain why this is so."
p2631
aS"We note that for a 'normal' electron demand Diels-Alder_reaction, the electron-rich diene's Ps2 is the highest occupied molecular orbital (HOMO) while the electron-deficient dienophile's p* is the lowest unoccupied molecular orbital (LUMO)."
p2632
aS'However, the HOMO-LUMO energy gap is such that the roles can be reversed by switching the substitution pattern: i.e.'
p2633
aS'Conjugated dienes are widely used as monomers in the polymer industry. Classes Dienes can be divided into three classes, depending on the relative location of the double bonds:Cumulated dienes have the double bonds sharing a common atom as in a group of compounds called allenes.Conjugated dienes have conjugated double bonds separated by one single bond.Unconjugated dienes have the double bonds separated by two or more single bonds.'
p2634
aS'They are usually less stable than isomeric conjugated dienes.'
p2635
aS'This can also be known as an isolated diene.Compounds that contain more than two double bonds are called polyenes.'
p2636
aS'Polyenes and dienes share many of their properties. Synthesis of dienes On an industrial scale, butadiene is prepared by thermal cracking of butanes.'
p2637
aS'In a similarly non-selective process, dicyclopentadiene is obtained from coal tars.In the laboratory, more directed and more delicate processes are employed such as dehydrohalogenations and condensations.'
p2638
aS'Myriad methods have been developed, such as the Whiting reaction.'
p2639
aS'Families of nonconjugated dienes are derived from the oligomerization and dimerization of conjugated dienes.'
p2640
aS'This one is most memorable for the Edict of Worms (Wormser Edikt), which addressed Martin Luther and the effects of the Protestant Reformation.'
p2641
aS'It was conducted from 28 January to 25 May 1521, with the Emperor Charles V presiding.Other imperial diets took place at Worms in the years 829, 926, 1076, 1122, 1495, and 1545, but unless plainly qualified, the term "Diet_of_Worms" usually refers to the assembly of 1521. Background In June of the previous year, 1520, Pope Leo X issued the Papal bull Exsurge Domine ("Arise, O Lord"), outlining forty-one purported errors found in Martin Luther\'s Ninety-five Theses and other writings related to or written by him.'
p2642
aS'Luther was summoned by the emperor.'
p2643
aS'Prince Frederick III, Elector of Saxony obtained an agreement that if Luther appeared he would be promised safe passage to and from the meeting.'
p2644
aS'This guarantee was essential after the treatment of Jan Hus, who was tried and executed at the Council of Constance in 1415 despite a promise of safe conduct.Emperor Charles V commenced the Imperial Diet_of_Worms on 28 January 1521.'
p2645
aS'Luther was summoned to renounce or reaffirm his views.'
p2646
aS'When he appeared before the assembly on 16 April, Johann Eck, an assistant of the Archbishop of Trier (Richard von Greiffenklau zu Vollrads at that time), acted as spokesman for the emperor. Martin Luther The main events of the Diet_of_Worms relating to Luther took place from 16 to 18 April 1521.On 16 April, Luther arrived in Worms.'
p2647
aS'A gradient is the change in the value of a quantity (e.g., concentration, pressure, temperature) with the change in another variable (e.g., distance).'
p2648
aS'For example, a change in concentration over a distance is called a concentration gradient, a change in pressure over a distance is called a pressure gradient, and a change in temperature over a distance is a called a temperature gradient.The word diffusion is derived from the Latin word, "diffundere", which means "to spread out" (if a substance is "spreading out", it is moving from an area of high concentration to an area of low concentration).'
p2649
aS'A distinguishing feature of diffusion is that it results in mixing or mass transport, without requiring bulk motion (bulk flow).'
p2650
aS'Thus, diffusion should not be confused with convection, or advection, which are other transport phenomena that utilize bulk motion to move particles from one place to another. Diffusion vs. bulk flow An example of a situation in which bulk flow and diffusion can be differentiated is the mechanism by which oxygen enters the body during external respiration (breathing).'
p2651
aS'The lungs are located in the thoracic cavity, which is expanded as the first step in external respiration.'
p2652
aS'This expansion leads to an increase in volume of the alveoli in the lungs, which causes a decrease in pressure in the alveoli.'
p2653
aS'This creates a pressure gradient between the air outside the body (relatively high pressure) and the alveoli (relatively low pressure).'
p2654
aS'After the deaths of Carus and his son Numerian on campaign in Persia, Diocletian was proclaimed emperor.'
p2655
aS"The title was also claimed by Carus' other surviving son, Carinus, but Diocletian defeated him in the Battle of the Margus."
p2656
aS"Diocletian's reign stabilized the empire and marks the end of the Crisis of the Third Century."
p2657
aS'He appointed fellow officer Maximian as Augustus, co-emperor, in 286.Diocletian delegated further on 1 March 293, appointing Galerius and Constantius as Caesars, junior co-emperors.'
p2658
aS'Under this \'tetrarchy\', or "rule of four", each emperor would rule over a quarter-division of the empire.'
p2659
aS"Diocletian secured the empire's borders and purged it of all threats to his power."
p2660
aS'He defeated the Sarmatians and Carpi during several campaigns between 285 and 299, the Alamanni in 288, and usurpers in Egypt between 297 and 298.'
p2661
aS'Alcohol, especially wine, played an important role in Greek culture with Dionysus being an important reason for this life style.'
p2662
aS'His name, thought to be a theonym in Linear B tablets as di-wo-nu-so (KH Gq 5 inscription), shows that he may have been worshipped as early as c. 1500-1100 BC by Mycenean Greeks; other traces of the Dionysian-type cult have been found in ancient Minoan Crete.'
p2663
aS'His origins are uncertain, and his cults took many forms; some are described by ancient sources as Thracian, others as Greek.'
p2664
aS'In some cults, he arrives from the east, as an Asiatic foreigner; in others, from Ethiopia in the South.'
p2665
aS'He is a god of epiphany, "the god that comes", and his "foreignness" as an arriving outsider-god may be inherent and essential to his cults.'
p2666
aS'He is a major, popular figure of Greek mythology and religion, and is included in some lists of the twelve Olympians.'
p2667
aS'Dionysus was the last god to be accepted into Mt.'
p2668
aS'The writer was also awarded the Nobel Prize in Literature four years after its publication. Plot summary David Lurie is a South African professor of English who loses everything: his reputation, his job, his peace of mind, his dreams of artistic success, and finally even his ability to protect his own daughter.'
p2669
aS"He is twice-divorced and dissatisfied with his job as a 'communications' lecturer, teaching one class in romantic literature at a technical university in Cape Town in post-apartheid South Africa."
p2670
aS"Lurie's sexual activities are all inherently risky."
p2671
aS'Before the sexual affair that will ruin him, he becomes attached to a prostitute and attempts to have a romantic relationship with her (despite her having a family), which she rebuffs.'
p2672
aS'He then seduces a secretary at his university, only to completely ignore her afterwards.'
p2673
aS'His "disgrace" comes when he seduces one of his more vulnerable students, a girl named Melanie Isaacs, plying her with alcohol and later, when she stops attending his class, falsifying her grades.'
p2674
aS"Lurie refuses to stop the affair, even after being threatened by Melanie's erstwhile boyfriend, who knocks all the papers off Lurie's desk, and her father, who confronts him but whom David runs from."
p2675
aS'Nevertheless, he received accolades and state awards and served in the Supreme Soviet of the RSFSR (1947-1962) and the Supreme Soviet of the Soviet Union (from 1962 until his death).A poly-stylist, Shostakovich developed a hybrid voice, combining a variety of different musical techniques into his music.'
p2676
aS"Shostakovich's music is characterized by sharp contrasts, elements of the grotesque, and ambivalent tonality; the composer was also heavily influenced by the neo-classical style pioneered by Igor Stravinsky, and (especially in his symphonies) by the post-Romanticism associated with Gustav_Mahler.Shostakovich's orchestral works include 15 symphonies and six concerti."
p2677
aS'His chamber output includes 15 string quartets, a piano quintet, two piano trios, and two pieces for string octet.'
p2678
aS'His piano works include two solo sonatas, an early set of preludes, and a later set of 24 preludes and fugues.'
p2679
aS'Other works include three operas, several song cycles, ballets, and a substantial quantity of film music; especially well known is The Second Waltz, Op.'
p2680
aS'99, music to the film The First Echelon (1955-1956), as well as the Suites composed for The Gadfly. Biography  Early life Born at Podolskaya Ulitsa in Saint_Petersburg, Russia, Shostakovich was the second of three children of Dmitri Boleslavovich Shostakovich and Sofiya Vasilievna Kokoulina.'
p2681
aS"Shostakovich's paternal grandfather, originally surnamed Szostakowicz, was of Polish Roman Catholic descent (his family roots trace to the region of the town of Vileyka in today's Belarus), but his immediate forebears came from Siberia."
p2682
aS'Most DNA molecules consist of two biopolymer strands coiled around each other to form a double helix.'
p2683
aS'The two DNA strands are known as polynucleotides since they are composed of simpler units called nucleotides.'
p2684
aS'Each nucleotide is composed of a nitrogen-containing nucleobase--either cytosine (C), guanine (G), adenine (A), or thymine (T)--as well as a monosaccharide sugar called deoxyribose and a phosphate group.'
p2685
aS'The nucleotides are joined to one another in a chain by covalent bonds between the sugar of one nucleotide and the phosphate of the next, resulting in an alternating sugar-phosphate backbone.'
p2686
aS'According to base pairing rules (A with T, and C with G), hydrogen bonds bind the nitrogenous bases of the two separate polynucleotide strands to make double-stranded DNA.'
p2687
aS'The total amount of related DNA base pairs on Earth is estimated at 5.0 x 1037, and weighs 50 billion tonnes.'
p2688
aS'In comparison, the total mass of the biosphere has been estimated to be as much as 4 TtC (trillion tons of carbon).DNA stores biological information.'
p2689
aS'This impact on human society has given them the nickname "man\'s best friend" in the Western world.'
p2690
aS'In some cultures, however, dogs are also a source of meat. EtymologyEdit The term "domestic dog" is generally used for both of the domesticated and feral varieties.'
p2691
aS'The English word dog comes from Middle English dogge, from Old English docga, a "powerful dog breed".'
p2692
aS'The term may possibly derive from Proto-Germanic *dukkon, represented in Old English finger-docce ("finger-muscle").'
p2693
aS'The word also shows the familiar petname diminutive -ga also seen in frogga "frog", picga "pig", stagga "stag", wicga "beetle, worm", among others.'
p2694
aS'The term dog may ultimately derive from the earliest layer of Proto-Indo-European vocabulary, reflecting the role of the dog as the earliest domesticated animal.In 14th-century England, hound (from Old English: hund) was the general word for all domestic canines, and dog referred to a subtype of hound, a group including the mastiff.'
p2695
aS'It is believed this "dog" type was so common, it eventually became the prototype of the category "hound".'
p2696
aS'Like his renowned father Alessandro Scarlatti, he composed in a variety of musical forms, although today he is known mainly for his 555 keyboard sonatas. Life and career Domenico_Scarlatti was born in Naples, Kingdom of Naples, in 1685, the same year as Johann_Sebastian_Bach and George_Frideric_Handel.'
p2697
aS'He was the sixth of ten children of the composer and teacher Alessandro Scarlatti.'
p2698
aS"Domenico's older brother Pietro Filippo was also a musician.He probably first studied music under his father."
p2699
aS'Other composers who may have been his early teachers include Gaetano Greco, Francesco Gasparini, and Bernardo Pasquini, all of whom may have influenced his musical style.'
p2700
aS'He was appointed a composer and organist at the royal chapel in Naples in 1701.'
p2701
aS"In 1704, he revised Carlo Francesco Pollarolo's opera Irene for performance at Naples."
p2702
aS'Soon afterwards, his father sent him to Venice.'
p2703
aS'This situation continued under the rule of his father Vespasian, who became emperor in 69 following the civil war known as the Year of the Four Emperors.'
p2704
aS'While Titus held a great many offices under the rule of his father, Domitian was left with honours but no responsibilities.'
p2705
aS'Vespasian died in 79 and was succeeded by Titus, whose own reign came to an unexpected end when he was struck by a fatal illness in 81.'
p2706
aS'The following day Domitian was declared Emperor by the Praetorian Guard, commencing a reign that lasted fifteen years - longer than any man who had ruled since Tiberius.As Emperor, Domitian strengthened the economy by revaluing the Roman coinage, expanded the border defenses of the Empire, and initiated a massive building program to restore the damaged city of Rome.'
p2707
aS'Significant wars were fought in Britain, where his general Agricola attempted to conquer Caledonia (Scotland), and in Dacia, where Domitian was unable to procure a decisive victory against king Decebalus.'
p2708
aS"Domitian's government exhibited totalitarian characteristics; he saw himself as the new Augustus, an enlightened despot destined to guide the Roman Empire into a new era of brilliance."
p2709
aS'Religious, military, and cultural propaganda fostered a cult of personality, and by nominating himself perpetual censor, he sought to control public and private morals.'
p2710
aS"He recruits a simple farmer, Sancho Panza, as his squire, who often employs a unique, earthy wit in dealing with Don_Quixote's rhetorical orations on antiquated knighthood."
p2711
aS'Don_Quixote, in the first part of the book, does not see the world for what it is, and prefers to imagine that he is living out a knightly story.'
p2712
aS'The story implements various themes, such as intertextuality, realism, metatheatre, and literary representation.Published in two volumes, in 1605 and 1615, Don_Quixote is considered one of the most influential works of literature from the Spanish Golden Age and the entire Spanish literary canon.'
p2713
aS'As a founding work of modern Western literature and one of the earliest canonical novels, it regularly appears high on lists of the greatest works of fiction ever published, such as the Bokklubben World Library collection which cites Don_Quixote as authors\' choice for the "best literary work ever written".'
p2714
aS'It has had major influence on the literary community, as evidenced by direct references in Alexandre Dumas\' The_Three_Musketeers (1844), Mark Twain\'s Adventures of Huckleberry Finn (1884), and Edward Rofstein\'s Cyrano_de_Bergerac, as well as the word "quixotic".'
p2715
aS'Arthur_Schopenhauer cited Don_Quixote as one of the four greatest novels ever written, along with Tristram Shandy, La Nouvelle Heloise, and Wilhelm Meister. Summary Miguel de Cervantes said that the first chapters are taken from "The Archive of La Mancha" and the rest translated from the Arabic from the Moorish author Cid Hamet Ben Engeli.'
p2716
aS'This metafictional trick appears to be designed to give a greater credibility to the text, by implying that Don_Quixote is a real character and that the story truly occurred several decades back.'
p2717
aS'It stars Sonia Braga, Jose Wilker and Mauro Mendonca in the leading roles.'
p2718
aS'The screenplay was adapted by Barreto, Eduardo Coutinho and Leopoldo Serran.When initially released, Dona Flor became the most successful film in Brazilian history.'
p2719
aS'Its box office was only reached by a Brazilian production 35 years later by the 2010 blockbuster Elite Squad: The Enemy Within.'
p2720
aS"Internationally, Dona Flor received nominations for a Golden Globe and a BAFTA Award.In 1982, an American remake titled Kiss Me Goodbye, starring Sally Field, James Caan, and Jeff Bridges in the leading roles, was released. Plot Vadinho (Jose Wilker), Flor's irresponsible husband, drops dead while dancing in a street carnival party."
p2721
aS'Only Flor (Sonia Braga) expresses remorse after his death.'
p2722
aS"Flor's friends and family see Vadinho's death as a chance for Flor to find happiness after the misery brought upon her by Vadinho's spendthrift ways and near total lack of respectability."
p2723
aS"Roughly the first half of Dona Flor recounts Flor's marriage with Vadinho in an extended flashback."
p2724
aS"The Donatists (named for the Berber Christian bishop Donatus Magnus) were members of a schismatic church not in communion with the churches of the rest of Early Christianity in Late Antiquity.Donatism was an indirect outcome of Diocletian's persecutions."
p2725
aS'The governor of Africa had been lenient towards the large Christian minority under his rule during the persecutions.'
p2726
aS'He was satisfied when Christians handed over their Scriptures as a token repudiation of their faith.'
p2727
aS'Some Christians acceded to this convenient action.'
p2728
aS'When the persecutions came to an end, however, they were branded traditores, "those who handed (the holy things) over" by the zealous, mostly from the poorer classes.Like the Novatianist schism of the previous century, the Donatists were rigorists, holding that the church must be a church of "saints," not "sinners," and that sacraments, such as baptism, administered by traditores were invalid.'
p2729
aS'Probably in 311, a new bishop of Carthage, Caecilian, was consecrated by someone who had allegedly been a traditor, Felix of Aptungi; his opponents consecrated a short-lived rival, who was succeeded by Donatus, after whom the schism was named.In 313, a commission appointed by Pope Miltiades fought against the Donatists, but they continued to exist, viewing themselves, and not the other Christians, as the "true Church," the only one with "valid sacraments."'
p2730
aS'Because of their association with the Circumcellions, they brought upon themselves repression by the imperial authorities, but they drew upon African regional sentiment, while their opponents had the support of Rome.'
p2731
aS'It is commonly heard when a vehicle sounding a siren or horn approaches, passes, and recedes from an observer.'
p2732
aS'Compared to the emitted frequency, the received frequency is higher during the approach, identical at the instant of passing by, and lower during the recession.When the source of the waves is moving toward the observer, each successive wave crest is emitted from a position closer to the observer than the previous wave.'
p2733
aS'Therefore, each wave takes slightly less time to reach the observer than the previous wave.'
p2734
aS'Hence, the time between the arrival of successive wave crests at the observer is reduced, causing an increase in the frequency.'
p2735
aS'While they are travelling, the distance between successive wave fronts is reduced, so the waves "bunch together".'
p2736
aS'Conversely, if the source of waves is moving away from the observer, each wave is emitted from a position farther from the observer than the previous wave, so the arrival time between successive waves is increased, reducing the frequency.'
p2737
aS'The distance between successive wave fronts is then increased, so the waves "spread out".For waves that propagate in a medium, such as sound waves, the velocity of the observer and of the source are relative to the medium in which the waves are transmitted.'
p2738
aS'In awarding the prize, the Swedish Academy described her as "that epicist of the female experience, who with scepticism, fire and visionary power has subjected a divided civilisation to scrutiny".'
p2739
aS"Lessing was the eleventh woman and the oldest person ever to receive the Nobel Prize in Literature.In 2001, Lessing was awarded the David Cohen Prize for a lifetime's achievement in British literature."
p2740
aS'In 2008, The Times ranked her fifth on a list of "The 50 greatest British writers since 1945". Life  Early life Lessing was born Doris May Tayler in Kermanshah, Iran, on 22 October 1919, to Captain Alfred Tayler and Emily Maude Tayler (nee McVeagh), both British subjects.'
p2741
aS'Her father, who had lost a leg during his service in World_War_I, met his future wife, a nurse, at the Royal Free Hospital where he was recovering from his amputation.'
p2742
aS'The couple moved to Kermanshah, for Alfred to take a job as a clerk for the Imperial Bank of Persia; it was there that Doris was born in 1919.'
p2743
aS'In 1925, the family moved to the British colony of Southern Rhodesia (now Zimbabwe) to farm maize and other plants on about 1,000 acres (400 ha) of bush that Alfred bought.'
p2744
aS'In the rough environment, Emily tried to lead an Edwardian lifestyle, which would have been easy had the family been wealthy; in reality, such a lifestyle was not feasible.'
p2745
aS"She dropped her middle name and assumed her mother's maiden name after her father abandoned the family when she was 12 years old, one of two traumatic incidents early in her life."
p2746
aS'The other was her contraction of polio at age seven which left her with a weakened right leg and a permanent limp.'
p2747
aS'"It formed me, guided me, instructed me, helped me and humiliated me," Lange once said of her altered gait.'
p2748
aS'"I\'ve never gotten over it, and I am aware of the force and power of it.'
p2749
aS'" Career Lange graduated from the Wadleigh High School for Girls  and was educated in photography at Columbia University in New_York_City, in a class taught by Clarence H. White.'
p2750
aS'She was informally apprenticed to several New York photography studios, including that of the famed Arnold Genthe.'
p2751
aS'In 1918, she left New York with a female friend to travel the world, but was forced to end the trip in San_Francisco due to a robbery and settled there, working as a photo finisher.'
p2752
aS'The state used as its constitution the 1663 colonial charter that required a man to own $134 in property to vote, and gave an equal weight in the Rhode Island General Assembly to all towns no matter what their population.'
p2753
aS'The effect in the 1830s was that the rapidly growing industrial cities were far outnumbered in the legislature, to the annoyance of businessmen and industrialists.'
p2754
aS'Furthermore few immigrants or factory workers could vote, despite their growing numbers.All other states in 1840 saw a huge surge in turnout, but nothing happened in Rhode Island.'
p2755
aS'At first the middle classes (like Dorr himself--he was a Harvard man) took the lead.'
p2756
aS'However the Charter government, controlled by rural elites, fought back hard.'
p2757
aS'For six weeks in 1842 there were two rival governments.'
p2758
aS'The Dorrites, led by self-proclaimed governor Dorr, pulled back from violence (after their cannon misfired).'
p2759
aS'The most likely date is 1851.The title, locale and subject of the poem\'s descriptive opening lines is the shore of the English ferry port of Dover, Kent, facing Calais, France, at the Strait of Dover, the narrowest part (21 miles) of the English Channel, where Arnold honeymooned in 1851. Analysis In Stefan Collini\'s opinion, "Dover_Beach" is a difficult poem to analyse, and some of its passages and metaphors have become so well known that they are hard to see with "fresh eyes".'
p2760
aS'Arnold begins with a naturalistic and detailed nightscape of the beach at Dover in which auditory imagery plays a significant role ("Listen!'
p2761
aS'you hear the grating roar").'
p2762
aS'The beach, however, is bare, with only a hint of humanity in a light that "gleams and is gone".'
p2763
aS'Reflecting the traditional notion that the poem was written during Arnold\'s honeymoon (see composition section), one critic notes that "the speaker might be talking to his bride".The sea is calm to-night.The tide is full, the moon lies fairUpon the straits; --on the French coast the lightGleams and is gone; the cliffs of England stand,Glimmering and vast, out in the tranquil bay.Come to the window, sweet is the night-air!Only, from the long line of sprayWhere the sea meets the moon-blanch\'d land,Listen!'
p2764
aS'you hear the grating roarOf pebbles which the waves draw back, and fling,At their return, up the high strand,Begin, and cease, and then again begin,With tremulous cadence slow, and bringThe eternal note of sadness in.Arnold looks at two aspects of this scene, its soundscape (in the first and second stanzas) and the retreating action of the tide (in the third stanza).'
p2765
aS'He hears the sound of the sea as "the eternal note of sadness".'
p2766
aS'The English word "dragon" derives from Greek drakon (drakon), "dragon, serpent of huge size, water-snake". Name The word dragon entered the English language in the early 13th century from Old French dragon, which in turn comes from Latin draconem (nominative draco) meaning "huge serpent, dragon," from the Greek word drakon, drakon (genitive drakontos, drakontos) "serpent, giant seafish".'
p2767
aS'The Greek and Latin term referred to any great serpent, not necessarily mythological, and this usage was also current in English up to the 18th century. Morphology A dragon is a mythological representation of a reptile.'
p2768
aS'In antiquity, dragons were mostly envisaged as serpents, but since the Middle Ages, it has become common to depict them with legs, resembling a lizard.Dragons are usually shown in modern times with a body like a huge lizard, or a snake with two pairs of lizard-type legs, and able to emit fire from their mouths.'
p2769
aS'The European dragon has bat-like wings growing from its back.'
p2770
aS'A dragon-like creature with wings but only a single pair of legs is known as a wyvern. Comparative mythology The association of the serpent with a monstrous opponent overcome by a heroic deity has its roots in the mythology of the Ancient Near East, including Canaanite (Hebrew, Ugaritic), Hittite and Mesopotamian.'
p2771
aS'Humbaba, the fire-breathing dragon-fanged beast first described in the Epic_of_Gilgamesh is sometimes described as a dragon with Gilgamesh playing the part of dragon-slayer.'
p2772
aS'The legless serpent (Chaoskampf) motif entered Greek mythology and ultimately Christian mythology, although the serpent motif may already be part of prehistoric Indo-European mythology as well, based on comparative evidence of Indic and Germanic material.Although dragons occur in many legends around the world, different cultures have varying stories about monsters that have been grouped together under the dragon label.'
p2773
aS'It is considered a masterpiece of Chinese literature and is generally acknowledged to be the pinnacle of Chinese fiction.'
p2774
aS'"Redology" is the field of study devoted exclusively to this work.The title has also been translated as Red Chamber Dream and A Dream of Red Mansions.'
p2775
aS'The novel circulated in manuscript copies with various titles until its print publication, in 1791.'
p2776
aS"While the first 80 chapters were written by Cao Xueqin, Gao E, who prepared the first and second printed editions with his partner Cheng Weiyuan in 1791-2, added 40 additional chapters to complete the novel.Red Chamber is believed to be semi-autobiographical, mirroring the rise and decay of author Cao Xueqin's own family and, by extension, of the Qing Dynasty."
p2777
aS'As the author details in the first chapter, it is intended to be a memorial to the damsels he knew in his youth: friends, relatives and servants.'
p2778
aS'The novel is remarkable not only for its huge cast of characters and psychological scope, but also for its precise and detailed observation of the life and social structures typical of 18th-century Chinese aristocracy. Language The novel is composed in written vernacular (baihua) rather than Classical Chinese (wenyan).'
p2779
aS"Cao Xueqin was well versed in Chinese poetry and in Classical Chinese, having written tracts in the semi-wenyan style, while the novel's dialogue is written in the Beijing Mandarin dialect, which was to become the basis of modern spoken Chinese."
p2780
aS'The Epistles of Wisdom is the foundational text of the Druze faith alongside supplemental texts such as the Epistles of India.'
p2781
aS'The Druze faith incorporates elements of Gnosticism, Neoplatonism, Pythagoreanism, Ismailism, Judaism, Christianity, Hinduism, Buddhism and other philosophies and beliefs, creating a distinct and secretive theology known to esoterically interpret religious scriptures and to highlight the role of the mind and truthfulness.'
p2782
aS'The Druze follow theopany, and in reincarnation or the transmigration of the soul.'
p2783
aS'At the end of the cycle of rebirth, which is achieved through successive reincarnations, the soul is united with the Cosmic Mind (Al Aaqal Al Kulli).Although dwarfed by other larger communities, the Druze community played an important role in shaping the history of the Levant, and continues to play a large political role there.'
p2784
aS'However, as an ethnic and religious minority in every country in which they live, they have frequently experienced persecution.'
p2785
aS'Druze are considered Muslims But often labeled as infidels (Murtadun).'
p2786
aS'Ali az-Zahir of the Fatimid Caliphate campaigned to exterminate the faith, ethnically cleansing Druze communities in Antioch, Aleppo, and northern Syria.'
p2787
aS'His greatest ambition was to serve his country as a successful civil servant, but he proved unable to make the necessary accommodations.'
p2788
aS'His life, like the whole country, was devastated by the An Lushan Rebellion of 755, and his last 15 years were a time of almost constant unrest.Although initially he was little-known to other writers, his works came to be hugely influential in both Chinese and Japanese literary culture.'
p2789
aS'Of his poetic writing, nearly fifteen hundred poems have been preserved over the ages.'
p2790
aS'He has been called the "Poet-Historian" and the "Poet-Sage" by Chinese critics, while the range of his work has allowed him to be introduced to Western readers as "the Chinese Virgil, Horace, Ovid, Shakespeare, Milton, Burns, Wordsworth, Beranger, Hugo or Baudelaire". Life Traditional Chinese literary criticism emphasized the life of an author when interpreting a work, a practice which Burton Watson attributes to "the close links that traditional Chinese thought posits between art and morality".'
p2791
aS"Since many of Du_Fu's poems feature morality and history, this practice is particularly important."
p2792
aS'Another reason, identified by the Chinese historian William Hung, is that Chinese poems are typically concise, omitting context that might be relevant, but which an informed contemporary could be assumed to know.'
p2793
aS'For modern Western readers, "The less accurately we know the time, the place and the circumstances in the background, the more liable we are to imagine it incorrectly, and the result will be that we either misunderstand the poem or fail to understand it altogether".'
p2794
aS'In his later life he acquired a reputation, which he encouraged, as a "roistering, drunken and doomed poet".Thomas was born in Swansea, Wales, in 1914.'
p2795
aS'An undistinguished pupil, he left school at 16, becoming a journalist for a short time.'
p2796
aS'Although many of his works appeared in print while he was still a teenager, it was the publication of "Light breaks where no sun shines", in 1934, that caught the attention of the literary world.'
p2797
aS'While living in London, Thomas met Caitlin Macnamara, whom he married in 1937.'
p2798
aS'Their relationship was defined by alcoholism and was mutually destructive.'
p2799
aS'In the early part of his marriage, Thomas and his family lived hand-to-mouth, settling in the Welsh fishing village of Laugharne.Although Thomas was appreciated as a popular poet in his lifetime, he found earning a living as a writer difficult, which resulted in him augmenting his income with reading tours and broadcasts.'
p2800
aS"His radio recordings for the BBC during the late 1940s brought him to the public's attention and he was used by the Corporation as a populist voice of the literary scene."
p2801
aS'He is remembered as an eminent voice of 20th century English literature. Life  Early years Edward Estlin Cummings was born to Robert Cummings and Whelma Haswell Clarke, who were Unitarian.'
p2802
aS'He exhibited transcendental leanings his entire life.'
p2803
aS'As he grew in maturity and age, Cummings moved more toward an "I, Thou" relationship with God.'
p2804
aS'His journals are replete with references to "le bon Dieu," as well as prayers for inspiration in his poetry and artwork (such as "Bon Dieu!'
p2805
aS'may I some day do something truly great.'
p2806
aS'amen.").'
p2807
aS'Cummings "also prayed for strength to be his essential self (\'may I be I is the only prayer--not may I be great or good or beautiful or wise or strong\'), and for relief of spirit in times of depression (\'almighty God!'
p2808
aS'Forster\'s humanistic impulse toward understanding and sympathy may be aptly summed up in the epigraph to his 1910 novel Howards_End: "Only connect ... ".'
p2809
aS'His 1908 novel, A_Room_with_a_View, is his most optimistic work, while A_Passage_to_India (1924) brought him his greatest success.'
p2810
aS'He was nominated for the Nobel Prize in Literature 13 different years. Early years Forster was born into an Anglo-Irish and Welsh middle-class family at 6 Melcombe Place, Dorset Square, London NW1, in a building that no longer exists.'
p2811
aS'He was the only child of Alice Clara "Lily" (nee Whichelo) and Edward Morgan Llewellyn Forster, an architect.'
p2812
aS'His name was officially registered as Henry Morgan Forster, but at his baptism he was accidentally named Edward Morgan Forster.'
p2813
aS'To distinguish him from his father, he was always called Morgan.'
p2814
aS"His father died of tuberculosis on 30 October 1880, before Morgan's second birthday."
p2815
aS'The Soviet zone surrounded West Berlin, but did not include it; as a result, West Berlin remained outside the jurisdiction of the GDR.The German Democratic Republic was established in the Soviet Zone, while the Federal Republic was established in the three western zones.'
p2816
aS'The East was often described as a satellite state of the Soviet Union.'
p2817
aS'Soviet occupation authorities began transferring administrative responsibility to German communist leaders in 1948, and the GDR began to function as a state on 7 October 1949.'
p2818
aS'Soviet forces, however, remained in the country throughout the Cold War.'
p2819
aS'The GDR established the Ministry for State Security, or "Stasi", which aided the Soviet Army in suppressing uprisings in 1953.'
p2820
aS'Until 1989, the GDR was governed by the Socialist Unity Party (SED), though other parties nominally participated in its alliance organisation, the National Front of Democratic Germany.The economy was centrally planned, and increasingly state-owned.'
p2821
aS'Prices of basic goods and services were set by central government planners, rather than rising and falling through market forces.'
p2822
aS'Echinoderms are found at every ocean depth, from the intertidal zone to the abyssal zone.'
p2823
aS'The phylum contains about 7000 living species, making it the second-largest grouping of deuterostomes (a superphylum), after the chordates (which include the vertebrates, such as birds, fishes, mammals, and reptiles).'
p2824
aS'Echinoderms are also the largest phylum that has no freshwater or terrestrial (land-based) representatives.Aside from the hard-to-classify Arkarua (a Precambrian animal with Echinoderm-like pentamerous radial symmetry), the first definitive members of the phylum appeared near the start of the Cambrian.The echinoderms are important both biologically and geologically.'
p2825
aS'Biologically, there are few other groupings so abundant in the biotic desert of the deep sea, as well as shallower oceans.'
p2826
aS'The more notably distinct trait, which most echinoderms have, is their remarkable powers of regeneration of tissue, organs, limbs, and of asexual reproduction, and in some cases, complete regeneration from a single limb.'
p2827
aS'Geologically, the value of echinoderms is in their ossified skeletons, which are major contributors to many limestone formations, and can provide valuable clues as to the geological environment.'
p2828
aS'Further, it is held by some scientists that the radiation of echinoderms was responsible for the Mesozoic Marine Revolution. Taxonomy and evolution Along with the chordates and hemichordates, echinoderms are deuterostomes, one of the two major divisions of the animal kingdom, the other being the protostomes.'
p2829
aS'Performed with great success on the Roman stage, they feature a mix of visionary politics and eroticism that made Virgil a celebrity, legendary in his own lifetime. Eclogue 4 Capping a sequence or cycle in which Virgil created and augmented a new political mythology, "Eclogue 4" reaches out to imagine a golden age ushered in by the birth of a boy heralded as "great increase of Jove," which ties in with divine associations claimed in the propaganda of Octavian, the ambitious young heir to Julius Caesar.'
p2830
aS'The poet makes this notional scion of Jove the occasion to predict his own metabasis up the scale in epos, rising from the humble range of the bucolic to the lofty range of the heroic, potentially rivaling Homer: he thus signals his own ambition to make Roman epic that will culminate in the Aeneid.'
p2831
aS"In the surge of ambition, Virgil also projects defeating the legendary poet Orpheus and his mother, the epic muse Calliope, as well as Pan, the inventor of the bucolic pipe, even in Pan's homeland of Arcadia, which Virgil will claim as his own at the climax of his eclogue book in the tenth eclogue."
p2832
aS"Biographical identification of the fourth eclogue's child has proved elusive; but the figure proved a link between traditional Roman authority and Christianity."
p2833
aS'The connection is first made in the Oration of Constantine  appended to the Life of Constantine by Eusebius of Caesarea (a reading to which Dante makes fleeting reference in his Purgatorio).'
p2834
aS'Some scholars have also remarked similarities between the eclogue\'s prophetic themes and the words of Isaiah 11:6: "a little child shall lead.'
p2835
aS'" Eclogue 5 "Eclogue 5" articulates another significant pastoral theme, the shepherd-poet\'s concern with achieving worldly fame through poetry.'
p2836
aS'The Edict separated civil from religious unity, treated some Protestants for the first time as more than mere schismatics and heretics, and opened a path for secularism and tolerance.'
p2837
aS'In offering general freedom of conscience to individuals, the Edict offered many specific concessions to the Protestants, such as amnesty and the reinstatement of their civil rights, including the right to work in any field or for the State and to bring grievances directly to the king.'
p2838
aS'It marked the end of the religious wars that had afflicted France during the second half of the 16th century.The Edict of St. Germain promulgated 36 years before by Catherine de Medici had granted limited tolerance to Huguenots, but was overtaken by events, as it was not formally registered until after the Massacre of Vassy on 1 March 1562, which triggered the first of the French Wars of Religion.The later revocation of the Edict_of_Nantes in October 1685 by Louis XIV, the grandson of Henry IV, drove an exodus of Protestants, and increased the hostility of Protestant nations bordering France. Background The Edict aimed primarily to end the long-running, disruptive French Wars of Religion.'
p2839
aS'Henry IV also had personal reasons for supporting the Edict.'
p2840
aS'Prior to assuming the throne in 1589 he had espoused Protestantism, and he remained sympathetic to the Protestant cause: he had converted to Catholicism in 1593 only in order to secure his position as king, supposedly saying "Paris is well worth a Mass".'
p2841
aS'The Edict succeeded in restoring peace and internal unity to France, though it pleased neither party: Catholics rejected the apparent recognition of Protestantism as a permanent element in French society and still hoped to enforce religious uniformity, while Protestants aspired to parity with Catholics.'
p2842
aS'"Toleration in France was a royal notion, and the religious settlement was dependent upon the continued support of the crown.'
p2843
aS"Wharton combined her insider's view of America's privileged classes with a brilliant, natural wit to write humorous, incisive novels and short stories of social and psychological insight."
p2844
aS"She was well acquainted with many of her era's other literary and public figures, including Theodore_Roosevelt. Biography  Early life and marriage Edith_Wharton was born to George Frederic Jones and Lucretia Stevens Rhinelander at their brownstone at 14 West Twenty-third Street in New_York_City."
p2845
aS'She had two much older brothers, Frederic Rhinelander, who was sixteen, and Henry Edward, who was eleven.'
p2846
aS'She was baptized April 20, 1862, Easter Sunday, at Grace Church.'
p2847
aS'To her friends and family she was known as "Pussy Jones".'
p2848
aS'The saying "keeping up with the Joneses" is said to refer to her father\'s family.'
p2849
aS'She was also related to the Rensselaer family, the most prestigious of the old patroon families.'
p2850
aS'He elaborated critiques of historicism and of psychologism in logic.'
p2851
aS'Not limited to empiricism, but believing that experience is the source of all knowledge, he worked on a method of phenomenological reduction by which a subject may come to know directly an essence.Although born into a Jewish family, Husserl was baptized as a Lutheran in 1886.'
p2852
aS'He studied mathematics under Karl Weierstrass and Leo Konigsberger, and philosophy under Franz Brentano and Carl Stumpf.'
p2853
aS'Husserl himself taught philosophy as a Privatdozent at Halle from 1887, then as professor, first at Gottingen from 1901, then at Freiburg from 1916 until he retired in 1928.'
p2854
aS'Thereafter he gave two notable lectures: at Paris in 1929, and at Prague in 1935.'
p2855
aS'The notorious 1933 race laws of the Nazi regime took away his academic standing and privileges.'
p2856
aS'Following an illness, he died at Freiburg in 1938. Life and career  Youth and education Husserl was born in 1859 in Prostejov (German: Prossnitz), a town in the Margraviate of Moravia, which was then in the Austrian Empire, and now belongs to the Czech_Republic.'
p2857
aS'His use and development of Norwegian folk music in his own compositions put the music of Norway in the international spectrum, as well as helping to develop a national identity, much as Jean_Sibelius and Antonin_Dvorak did in Finland and Bohemia, respectively.'
p2858
aS'Grieg is regarded as simultaneously nationalistic and cosmopolitan in his orientation, for although born in Bergen and buried there, he traveled widely throughout Europe, and considered his music to express both the beauty of Norwegian rural life and the culture of Europe as a whole.'
p2859
aS"He is the most celebrated person from the city of Bergen, with numerous statues depicting his image, and many cultural entities named after him: the city's largest building (Grieg Hall), its most advanced music school (Grieg Academy), its professional choir (Edvard_Grieg Kor), and even private companies (Grieg Music)."
p2860
aS"The Edvard_Grieg Museum in Troldhaugen (Grieg's former home in Bergen) is dedicated to his legacy. Biography Edvard Hagerup Grieg was born in Bergen, Norway, on 15 June 1843."
p2861
aS'His parents were Alexander Grieg (1806-1875), a merchant and vice-consul in Bergen; and Gesine Judithe Hagerup (1814-1875), a music teacher and daughter of Edvard Hagerup.'
p2862
aS'The family name, originally spelled Greig, has Scottish origins.'
p2863
aS"After the Battle of Culloden in 1746, Grieg's great-grandfather, Alexander Greig, traveled widely, settling in Norway about 1770, and establishing business interests in Bergen.Edvard_Grieg was raised in a musical milieu."
p2864
aS'Christian was a doctor and medical officer who married Laura, a woman half his age, in 1861.'
p2865
aS'Edvard had an elder sister, Johanne Sophie, and three younger siblings: Peter Andreas, Laura Catherine, and Inger Marie.'
p2866
aS'Both Sophie and Edvard appear to have inherited their artistic talent from their mother.'
p2867
aS'Edvard_Munch was related to painter Jacob Munch and historian Peter Andreas Munch.The family moved to Christiania (now Oslo) in 1864 when Christian Munch was appointed medical officer at Akershus Fortress.'
p2868
aS"Edvard's mother died of tuberculosis in 1868, as did Munch's favorite sister Johanne Sophie in 1877."
p2869
aS"After their mother's death, the Munch siblings were raised by their father and by their aunt Karen."
p2870
aS'Often ill for much of the winters and kept out of school, Edvard would draw to keep himself occupied.'
p2871
aS'He also composed choral works, including The Dream of Gerontius, chamber music and songs.'
p2872
aS"He was appointed Master of the King's Musick in 1924.Although Elgar is often regarded as a typically English composer, most of his musical influences were not from England but from continental Europe."
p2873
aS'He felt himself to be an outsider, not only musically, but socially.'
p2874
aS'In musical circles dominated by academics, he was a self-taught composer; in Protestant Britain, his Roman Catholicism was regarded with suspicion in some quarters; and in the class-conscious society of Victorian and Edwardian Britain, he was acutely sensitive about his humble origins even after he achieved recognition.'
p2875
aS'He nevertheless married the daughter of a senior British army officer.'
p2876
aS'She inspired him both musically and socially, but he struggled to achieve success until his forties, when after a series of moderately successful works his Enigma_Variations (1899) became immediately popular in Britain and overseas.'
p2877
aS'He followed the Variations with a choral work, The Dream of Gerontius (1900), based on a Roman Catholic text that caused some disquiet in the Anglican establishment in Britain, but it became, and has remained, a core repertory work in Britain and elsewhere.'
p2878
aS'Both in his urban and rural scenes, his spare and finely calculated renderings reflected his personal vision of modern American life. Biography  Early life Hopper was born in Upper Nyack, New York, a yacht-building center on the Hudson River north of New_York_City.'
p2879
aS'He was one of two children of a comfortably well-off, middle-class family.'
p2880
aS'His parents, of mostly Dutch ancestry, were Elizabeth Griffiths Smith and Garret Henry Hopper, a dry-goods merchant.'
p2881
aS"Although not so successful as his forebears, Garrett provided well for his two children with considerable help from his wife's inheritance."
p2882
aS'He retired at age forty-nine.'
p2883
aS'Edward and his only sister Marion attended both private and public schools.'
p2884
aS'They were raised in a strict Baptist home.'
p2885
aS'While finishing his Ph.D. he went to California to work with Alfred Kroeber documenting the indigenous languages there.'
p2886
aS'He was employed by the Geological Survey of Canada for fifteen years, where he came into his own as one of the most significant linguists in North America, the other being Leonard Bloomfield.'
p2887
aS'He was offered a professorship at the University of Chicago, and stayed for several years continuing to work for the professionalization of the discipline of linguistics.'
p2888
aS'By the end of his life he was professor of anthropology at Yale, where he never really fit in.'
p2889
aS'Among his many students were the linguists Mary Haas and Morris Swadesh, and anthropologists such as Fred Eggan and Hortense Powdermaker.With his linguistic background, Sapir became the one student of Boas to develop most completely the relationship between linguistics and anthropology.'
p2890
aS'Sapir studied the ways in which language and culture influence each other, and he was interested in the relation between linguistic differences, and differences in cultural world views.'
p2891
aS'This part of his thinking was developed by his student Benjamin Lee Whorf into the principle of linguistic relativity or the "Sapir-Whorf" hypothesis.'
p2892
aS'Other historians regard this positive picture as only partly true, and not at all in the later part of his reign.'
p2893
aS'In the view of Richard Mortimer, the return of the Godwins from exile in 1052 "meant the effective end of his exercise of power".'
p2894
aS'The difference in his level of activity from the earlier part of his reign "implies a withdrawal from affairs".The son of AEthelred_the_Unready and Emma of Normandy, Edward succeeded Cnut the Great\'s son Harthacnut, restoring the rule of the House of Wessex after the period of Danish rule since Cnut conquered England in 1016.'
p2895
aS'When Edward died in 1066 he was succeeded by Harold_Godwinson, who was defeated and killed in the same year by the Normans under William_the_Conqueror at the Battle_of_Hastings.Edward is called Confessor to reflect his reputation as a saint who did not suffer martyrdom, as opposed to Edward the Martyr.He was canonised in 1161 by Pope Alexander III, and is commemorated on 13 October by both the Church of England and the Roman Catholic Church in England and Wales.'
p2896
aS'Saint Edward was one of the national saints of England until King Edward III adopted Saint George as patron saint in about 1350. Early years and exile Edward was the seventh son of AEthelred_the_Unready, and the first by his second wife, Emma of Normandy.'
p2897
aS"Edward was born between 1003 and 1005 in Islip, Oxfordshire, and is first recorded as a 'witness' to two charters in 1005."
p2898
aS'He had one full brother, Alfred, and a sister, Godgifu.'
p2899
aS"The son of Henry VIII and Jane Seymour, Edward was the third monarch of the Tudor dynasty and England's first monarch raised as a Protestant."
p2900
aS"During Edward's reign, the realm was governed by a Regency Council because he never reached his majority."
p2901
aS"The Council was first led by his uncle Edward Seymour, 1st Duke of Somerset, (1547-1549), and then by John Dudley, 1st Earl of Warwick, from 1551 Duke of Northumberland.Edward's reign was marked by economic problems and social unrest that, in 1549, erupted into riot and rebellion."
p2902
aS'An expensive war with Scotland, at first successful, ended with military withdrawal from Scotland as well as Boulogne-sur-Mer in exchange for peace.'
p2903
aS'The transformation of the Church into a recognisably Protestant body also occurred under Edward, who took great interest in religious matters.'
p2904
aS'Although his father, Henry VIII, had severed the link between the Church of England and Rome, Henry VIII had never permitted the renunciation of Catholic doctrine or ceremony.'
p2905
aS"It was during Edward's reign that Protestantism was established for the first time in England with reforms that included the abolition of clerical celibacy and the Mass and the imposition of compulsory services in English."
p2906
aS'Throughout his life, he not only hated his given name, but also his family\'s habit of calling him "Win".'
p2907
aS'As an adult, he always used the signature "E.'
p2908
aS'A.'
p2909
aS'" Education Robinson\'s early struggles led many of his poems to have a dark pessimism and his stories to deal with "an American dream gone awry."'
p2910
aS'His eldest brother, Dean Robinson, was a doctor and had become addicted to laudanum while medicating himself for neuralgia.'
p2911
aS'The middle brother, Herman, a handsome and charismatic man, married the woman Edwin loved, Emma Loehen Shepherd.'
p2912
aS"Emma thought highly of Edwin and encouraged his poetry, but he was deemed too young to be in realistic competition for her hand, which didn't keep him from being rattled deeply by witnessing what he considered her being bamboozled by Herman's charm and choosing shallowness over depth."
p2913
aS'American astronomer Vesto Slipher provided the first evidence for this argument almost a decade before. Biography Edwin_Hubble was born to Virginia Lee James (1864-1934) and John Powell Hubble, an insurance executive, in Marshfield, Missouri, and moved to Wheaton, Illinois, in 1900.'
p2914
aS'In his younger days, he was noted more for his athletic prowess than his intellectual abilities, although he did earn good grades in every subject except for spelling.'
p2915
aS'Edwin was a gifted athlete playing baseball, football, basketball, and he ran track in both high school and college.'
p2916
aS'He played a variety of positions on the basketball court from center to shooting guard.'
p2917
aS"In fact Hubble even led the University of Chicago's basketball team to their first conference title in 1907."
p2918
aS'He won seven first places and a third place in a single high school track and field meet in 1906.His studies at the University of Chicago were concentrated on mathematics and astronomy, which led to a bachelor of science degree in 1910.'
p2919
aS'Hubble also became a member of the Kappa Sigma Fraternity.'
p2920
aS'He grew up in Bloomfield Hills, Michigan, where his father was a teacher at the Cranbrook Academy of Art and he took courses in sculpture and furniture design there.'
p2921
aS'He had a close relationship with fellow students Charles and Ray Eames, and became good friends with Florence Knoll (nee Schust).Beginning in September 1929, he studied sculpture at the Academie de la Grande Chaumiere in Paris, France.'
p2922
aS'He then went on to study at the Yale School of Architecture, completing his studies in 1934.'
p2923
aS'Subsequently, he toured Europe and North Africa for a year and returned for a year to his native Finland, after which he returned to Cranbrook to work for his father and teach at the academy.'
p2924
aS'He became a naturalized citizen of the United_States in 1940.'
p2925
aS'Saarinen was recruited by Donal McLaughlin, an architectural school friend from his Yale days, to join the military service in the Office of Strategic Services (OSS).'
p2926
aS'Saarinen was assigned to draw illustrations for bomb disassembly manuals and to provide designs for the Situation Room in the White House.'
p2927
aS'It is a Mediterranean country and is bordered by the Gaza Strip and Israel to the northeast, the Gulf of Aqaba to the east, the Red_Sea to the east and south, Sudan to the south and Libya to the west.With over 89 million inhabitants, Egypt is the most populous country in North Africa and the Arab World, the third-most populous in Africa (after Nigeria and Ethiopia), and the fifteenth-most populous in the world.'
p2928
aS'The great majority of its people live near the banks of the Nile River, an area of about 40,000 square kilometres (15,000 sq mi), where the only arable land is found.'
p2929
aS"The large regions of the Sahara desert, which constitute most of Egypt's territory, are sparsely inhabited."
p2930
aS"About half of Egypt's residents live in urban areas, with most spread across the densely populated centres of greater Cairo, Alexandria and other major cities in the Nile Delta.Egypt has one of the longest histories of any modern country, arising in the tenth millennium BCE as one of the world's first nation states."
p2931
aS'Considered a cradle of civilization, Ancient Egypt experienced some of the earliest developments of writing, agriculture, urbanisation, organised religion and central government in history.'
p2932
aS'Iconic monuments such as the Giza Necropolis and its Great Sphinx, as well the ruins of Memphis, Thebes, Karnak, and the Valley of the Kings, reflect this legacy and remain a significant focus of archaeological study and popular interest worldwide.'
p2933
aS"Egypt's rich cultural heritage is an integral part of its national identity, having endured and at times assimilated various foreign influences, including Greek, Persian, Roman, Arab, Ottoman, and European.Modern Egypt is considered to be a regional and middle power, with significant cultural, political, and military influence in North Africa, the Middle East and the Muslim world."
p2934
aS'The music was written "in the spring, summer and fall of 1975."'
p2935
aS'Glass recounts the collaborative process: "I put [Wilson\'s notebook of sketches] on the piano and composed each section like a portrait of the drawing before me.'
p2936
aS'The score was begun in the spring of 1975 and completed by the following November, and those drawings were before me all the time."'
p2937
aS'The premiere took place on July 25, 1976, at the Avignon Festival in France.'
p2938
aS'The opera contains writings by Christopher Knowles, Samuel M. Johnson and Lucinda Childs.'
p2939
aS"It is Glass's first and longest opera score, taking approximately five hours in full performance without intermission; given the length, the audience is permitted to enter and leave as desired.The work became the first in Glass's thematically related Portrait Trilogy, along with Satyagraha (1979), and Akhnaten (1983)."
p2940
aS'These three operas were described by Glass as portraits of people whose personal vision transformed the thinking of their times through the power of ideas rather than by military force. Composition and performance history Glass and Wilson first met to discuss the prospects of a collaborative work, and decided on an opera of between four and five hours in length based around a historical persona.'
p2941
aS'He trained and became a master within that tradition before traveling at age 26 to Venice, as other Greek artists had done.'
p2942
aS'In 1570 he moved to Rome, where he opened a workshop and executed a series of works.'
p2943
aS'During his stay in Italy, El_Greco enriched his style with elements of Mannerism and of the Venetian Renaissance.'
p2944
aS'In 1577, he moved to Toledo, Spain, where he lived and worked until his death.'
p2945
aS"In Toledo, El_Greco received several major commissions and produced his best-known paintings.El_Greco's dramatic and expressionistic style was met with puzzlement by his contemporaries but found appreciation in the 20th century."
p2946
aS'El_Greco is regarded as a precursor of both Expressionism and Cubism, while his personality and works were a source of inspiration for poets and writers such as Rainer_Maria_Rilke and Nikos Kazantzakis.'
p2947
aS'El_Greco has been characterized by modern scholars as an artist so individual that he belongs to no conventional school.'
p2948
aS'As of 2013, El_Salvador had a population of approximately 6.29 million, making it the most densely populated country in the region.'
p2949
aS'Its population consists largely of Mestizos of European and Indigenous American descent.Present-day El_Salvador was inhabited by numerous sophisticated Mesoamerican nations, predominantly the Cuzcatlecs but also the Lenca and Maya prior to the European exploration and subsequent colonization of the Americas.'
p2950
aS'By 1525, the Spanish Empire had conquered the territory, incorporating it into the Viceroyalty of New Spain ruled by the Viceroy from Mexico City until 1821, when it achieved independence from Spain as part of the First Mexican Empire, only to further secede as part of the Federal Republic of Central America in 1823.'
p2951
aS"Upon the republic's dissolution in 1841, El_Salvador became sovereign until forming a short-lived union with Honduras and Nicaragua called the Greater Republic of Central America, which lasted from 1895 to 1898.From the late 19th to mid 20th century, El_Salvador endured chronic political and economic instability characterized by coups, revolts, and a succession of authoritarian rulers."
p2952
aS'Persistent socioeconomic inequality and civil unrest culminated in the devastating Salvadoran Civil War (1979-1992), which was fought between the military-led government and a coalition of left-wing guerrilla groups.'
p2953
aS"The conflict ended with a negotiated settlement that established a multiparty constitutional republic, which remains in place to this day.El_Salvador's economy was historically dominated by agriculture, beginning with the indigo plant (anil in Spanish), the most important crop during the colonial period, and followed thereafter by coffee, which by the early 20th century accounted for 90 percent of export earnings."
p2954
aS'El_Salvador has since reduced its dependence on coffee and embarked on diversifying the economy by opening up trade and financial links and expanding the manufacturing sector.'
p2955
aS'It can also be carried by ions in an electrolyte, or by both ions and electrons such as in a plasma.The SI unit for measuring an electric current is the ampere, which is the flow of electric charge across a surface at the rate of one coulomb per second.'
p2956
aS'Electric_current is measured using a device called an ammeter.Electric_currents cause Joule heating, which creates light in incandescent light bulbs.'
p2957
aS'They also create magnetic fields, which are used in motors, inductors and generators.The particles that carry the charge in an electric current are called charge carriers.'
p2958
aS'In metals, one or more electrons from each atom are loosely bound to the atom, and can move freely about within the metal.'
p2959
aS'These conduction electrons are the charge carriers in metal conductors. Symbol The conventional symbol for current is I, which originates from the French phrase intensite de courant, or in English current intensity.'
p2960
aS'This phrase is frequently used when discussing the value of an electric current, but modern practice often shortens this to simply current.'
p2961
aS"The I symbol was used by Andre-Marie Ampere, after whom the unit of electric current is named, in formulating the eponymous Ampere's force law, which he discovered in 1820."
p2962
aS'The concept of an electric field was introduced by Michael Faraday. Definition The electric field  at a given point is defined as the (vectorial) force  that would be exerted on a stationary test particle of unit charge by electromagnetic forces (i.e.'
p2963
aS'the Lorentz force).'
p2964
aS'A particle of charge  would be subject to a force .Its SI units are newtons per coulomb (N[?'
p2965
aS']C-1) or, equivalently, volts per metre (V[?'
p2966
aS']m-1), which in terms of SI base units are kg[?]m[?]s-3[?'
p2967
aS']A-1. Sources of electric field  Causes and description Electric_fields are caused by electric charges or varying magnetic fields.'
p2968
aS"The former effect is described by Gauss's law, the latter by Faraday's law of induction, which together are enough to define the behavior of the electric field as a function of charge repartition and magnetic field."
p2969
aS'The higher the associated electronegativity number, the more an element or compound attracts electrons towards it.'
p2970
aS'First proposed by Linus Pauling in 1932 as a development of valence bond theory, it has been shown to correlate with a number of other chemical properties.'
p2971
aS'Electronegativity cannot be directly measured and must be calculated from other atomic or molecular properties.'
p2972
aS'Several methods of calculation have been proposed, and although there may be small differences in the numerical values of the electronegativity, all methods show the same periodic trends between elements.The most commonly used method of calculation is that originally proposed by Linus Pauling.'
p2973
aS'This gives a dimensionless quantity, commonly referred to as the Pauling scale, on a relative scale running from around 0.7 to 3.98 (hydrogen  2.20).'
p2974
aS'When other methods of calculation are used, it is conventional (although not obligatory) to quote the results on a scale that covers the same range of numerical values: this is known as an electronegativity in Pauling units.Electronegativity, as it is usually calculated, is not strictly a property of an atom, but rather a property of an atom in a molecule.'
p2975
aS'Properties of a free atom include ionization energy and electron affinity.'
p2976
aS"Originally titled Stanzas Wrote in a Country Church-Yard, the poem was completed when Gray was living near St Giles' parish church at Stoke Poges."
p2977
aS'It was sent to his friend Horace Walpole, who popularised the poem among London literary circles.'
p2978
aS'Gray was eventually forced to publish the work on 15 February 1751, to pre-empt a magazine publisher from printing an unlicensed copy of the poem.The poem is an elegy in name but not in form; it employs a style similar to that of contemporary odes, but it embodies a meditation on death, and remembrance after death.'
p2979
aS'The poem argues that the remembrance can be good and bad, and the narrator finds comfort in pondering the lives of the obscure rustics buried in the churchyard.'
p2980
aS"The two versions of the poem, Stanzas and Elegy, approach death differently; the first contains a stoic response to death, but the final version contains an epitaph which serves to repress the narrator's fear of dying."
p2981
aS'With its discussion of, and focus on, the obscure and the known, the poem has possible political ramifications, but it does not make any definite claims on politics to be more universal in its approach to life and death.Claimed as "probably still today the best-known and best-loved poem in English", the Elegy quickly became popular.'
p2982
aS"It was printed many times and in a variety of formats, translated into many languages, and praised by critics even after Gray's other poetry had fallen out of favour."
p2983
aS"Anne's marriage to Henry VIII was annulled, and Elizabeth was declared illegitimate."
p2984
aS'Her half-brother, Edward VI, ruled until his death in 1553, bequeathing the crown to Lady Jane Grey and ignoring the claims of his two half-sisters, Elizabeth and the Roman Catholic Mary, in spite of statute law to the contrary.'
p2985
aS"Edward's will was set aside and Mary became queen, deposing Lady Jane Grey."
p2986
aS"During Mary's reign, Elizabeth was imprisoned for nearly a year on suspicion of supporting Protestant rebels.In 1558, Elizabeth succeeded her half-sister to the throne and set out to rule by good counsel."
p2987
aS'She depended heavily on a group of trusted advisers, led by William Cecil, Baron Burghley.'
p2988
aS'One of her first actions as queen was the establishment of an English Protestant church, of which she became the Supreme Governor.'
p2989
aS'This Elizabethan Religious Settlement was to evolve into the Church of England.'
p2990
aS'They are one of the three main classes of galaxy originally described by Edwin_Hubble in his 1936 work The Realm of the Nebulae, along with spiral and lenticular galaxies.'
p2991
aS'They range in shape from nearly spherical to highly flat and in size from tens of millions to over one trillion stars.'
p2992
aS'Originally, Edwin_Hubble thought that elliptical galaxies may evolve into spiral galaxies, which later turned out to be false.'
p2993
aS'Stars found inside of elliptical galaxies are much older than stars found in spiral galaxies.Most elliptical galaxies are composed of older, low-mass stars, with a sparse interstellar medium and minimal star formation activity, and they tend to be surrounded by large numbers of globular clusters.'
p2994
aS'Elliptical galaxies are believed to make up approximately 10-15% of galaxies in the Virgo Supercluster, and they are not the dominant type of galaxy in the universe overall.'
p2995
aS'They are preferentially found close to the centers of galaxy clusters.'
p2996
aS'Elliptical galaxies are (together with lenticular galaxies) also called "early-type" galaxies (ETG), due to their location in the Hubble sequence, and are found to be less common in the early Universe. General characteristics Elliptical galaxies are characterized by several properties that make them distinct from other classes of galaxy.'
p2997
aS'His first major sociological work was The Division of Labour in Society (1893).'
p2998
aS"In 1895, he published The Rules of Sociological Method and set up the first European department of sociology, becoming France's first professor of sociology."
p2999
aS"In 1898, he established the journal L'Annee Sociologique."
p3000
aS"Durkheim's seminal monograph, Suicide (1897), a study of suicide rates in Catholic and Protestant populations, pioneered modern social research and served to distinguish social science from psychology and political philosophy."
p3001
aS'The Elementary Forms of the Religious Life (1912) presented a theory of religion, comparing the social and cultural lives of aboriginal and modern societies.Durkheim was also deeply preoccupied with the acceptance of sociology as a legitimate science.'
p3002
aS'He refined the positivism originally set forth by Auguste Comte, promoting what could be considered as a form of epistemological realism, as well as the use of the hypothetico-deductive model in social science.'
p3003
aS'For him, sociology was the science of institutions, if this term is understood in its broader meaning as "beliefs and modes of behaviour instituted by the collectivity" and its aim being to discover structural social facts.'
p3004
aS'Zola was nominated for the first and second Nobel Prize in Literature in 1901 and 1902. Early life Zola was born in Paris in 1840.'
p3005
aS'His father, Francois Zola (originally Francesco Zolla), was an Italian engineer, and his mother, Emilie Aubert, was French.'
p3006
aS'The family moved to Aix-en-Provence in the southeast when Emile was three years old.'
p3007
aS'Four years later, in 1847, his father died, leaving his mother on a meager pension.'
p3008
aS"In 1858, the Zolas moved to Paris, where Emile's childhood friend Paul_Cezanne soon joined him."
p3009
aS'Zola started to write in the romantic style.'
p3010
aS'His widowed mother had planned a law career for Emile, but he failed his Baccalaureat examination.Before his breakthrough as a writer, Zola worked as a clerk in a shipping firm and then in the sales department for a publisher (Hachette).'
p3011
aS'After the Japanese invasion of the Philippines in 1941, he cooperated with the new rulers, even making a radio appeal for the surrender of the American and Filipino forces on Bataan.'
p3012
aS'He was arrested as a collaborator after the Americans returned but was later freed in a general amnesty. Early life and career Emilio Famy Aguinaldo was born on March 23, 1869 in Cavite el Viejo (present-day Kawit), in Cavite (province), to Carlos Aguinaldo and Trinidad Famy, a Tagalog Chinese mestizo couple who had eight children, the seventh of whom was Emilio.'
p3013
aS"The Aguinaldo family was quite well-to-do, as his father, Carlos Aguinaldo was the community's appointed gobernadorcillo (municipal governor) in the Spanish colonial administration."
p3014
aS'He studied at Colegio de San Juan de Letran but wasn\'t able to finish his studies due to outbreak of cholera.Emilio became the "Cabeza de Barangay" of Binakayan, a chief barrio of Cavite el Viejo, when he was only 17 years old to avoid conscription.In 1895 the Maura Law that called for the reorganization of local governments was enacted.'
p3015
aS'At the age of 25 Aguinaldo became Cavite Viejo\'s first "gobernadorcillo capitan municipal" (Municipal Governor-Captain) while on a business trip in Mindoro. Personal life On January 1, 1896, he married Hilaria del Rosario (1877-1921).'
p3016
aS'They had five children: Carmen Aguinaldo Melencio, Emilio_Aguinaldo, Jr, Maria Aguinaldo Poblete, Cristina Aguinaldo Suntay and Miguel Aguinaldo.'
p3017
aS'Hilaria died of leprosy on March 6, 1921 at the age of 44.'
p3018
aS"After she studied at the Amherst Academy for seven years in her youth, she spent a short time at Mount Holyoke Female Seminary before returning to her family's house in Amherst."
p3019
aS'Considered an eccentric by the locals, she became known for her penchant for white clothing and her reluctance to greet guests or, later in life, even leave her room.'
p3020
aS'Most of her friendships were therefore carried out by correspondence.While Dickinson was a prolific private poet, fewer than a dozen of her nearly 1,800 poems were published during her lifetime.'
p3021
aS'The work that was published during her lifetime was usually altered significantly by the publishers to fit the conventional poetic rules of the time.'
p3022
aS"Dickinson's poems are unique for the era in which she wrote; they contain short lines, typically lack titles, and often use slant rhyme as well as unconventional capitalization and punctuation."
p3023
aS"Many of her poems deal with themes of death and immortality, two recurring topics in letters to her friends.Although most of her acquaintances were probably aware of Dickinson's writing, it was not until after her death in 1886--when Lavinia, Dickinson's younger sister, discovered her cache of poems--that the breadth of Dickinson's work became apparent."
p3024
aS'Her first collection of poetry was published in 1890 by personal acquaintances Thomas Wentworth Higginson and Mabel Loomis Todd, both of whom heavily edited the content.'
p3025
aS'As in her other novels, Austen explores the concerns and difficulties of genteel women living in Georgian-Regency England; she also creates a lively comedy of manners among her characters.Before she began the novel, Austen wrote, "I am going to take a heroine whom no one but myself will much like."'
p3026
aS'In the first sentence she introduces the title character as "Emma Woodhouse, handsome, clever, and rich."'
p3027
aS"Emma is spoiled, headstrong, and self-satisfied; she greatly overestimates her own matchmaking abilities; she is blind to the dangers of meddling in other people's lives; and her imagination and perceptions often lead her astray.This novel has been adapted for several films, many television programs, and a long list of stage plays. Plot summary Emma Woodhouse has just attended the wedding of Miss Taylor, her best friend and former governess, to Mr Weston."
p3028
aS'Having introduced them, Emma takes credit for their marriage, and decides that she rather likes matchmaking.'
p3029
aS'She returns home to Hartfield with her father, who misses Miss Taylor equally with his daughter.'
p3030
aS'Against the advice of Mr Knightley, Emma forges ahead with her new interest, and tries to match her new friend Harriet Smith to Mr Elton, the local vicar.'
p3031
aS"Emma is convinced that Mr Elton's attentions are a result of his attraction for Harriet."
p3032
aS'Endoplasmic_reticulum occurs in most types of eukaryotic cells, including the most primitive Giardia, but is absent from red blood cells and spermatozoa.'
p3033
aS'There are two types of endoplasmic reticulum, rough and smooth.'
p3034
aS'The outer (cytosolic) face of the rough endoplasmic reticulum is studded with ribosomes that are the sites of protein synthesis.'
p3035
aS'The rough endoplasmic reticulum is especially prominent in cells such as hepatocytes whereas active smooth endoplasmic reticulum lacks ribosomes and functions in lipid metabolism, carbohydrate metabolism, and detoxification and is especially abundant in mammalian liver and gonad cells.'
p3036
aS'The lacy membranes of the endoplasmic reticulum were first seen in 1945 using electron microscopy. Structure The general structure of the endoplasmic reticulum is a network of membranes called cisternae.'
p3037
aS'These sac-like structures are held together by the cytoskeleton.'
p3038
aS'The phospholipid membrane encloses a space, the cisternal space (or lumen), which is continuous with the perinuclear space but separate from the cytosol.'
p3039
aS'Endymion is written in rhyming couplets in iambic pentameter (also known as heroic couplets).'
p3040
aS'Keats based the poem on the Greek myth of Endymion, the shepherd beloved by the moon goddess Selene.'
p3041
aS'The poem elaborates on the original story and renames Selene "Cynthia" (an alternative name for Artemis). Narrative It starts by painting a rustic scene of trees, rivers, shepherds, and sheep.'
p3042
aS'The shepherds gather around an altar and pray to Pan, god of shepherds and flocks.'
p3043
aS'As the youths sing and dance, the elder men sit and talk about what life would be like in the shades of Elysium.'
p3044
aS'However, Endymion, the "brain-sick shepherd-prince" of Mt.'
p3045
aS'Latmos, is in a trancelike state, and not participating in their discourse.'
p3046
aS"It is an orchestral work comprising fourteen variations on an original theme.Elgar dedicated the work 'to my friends pictured within', each variation being a musical sketch of one of his circle of close acquaintances (see musical cryptogram)."
p3047
aS"Those portrayed include Elgar's wife Alice, his friend and publisher Augustus J. Jaeger and Elgar himself."
p3048
aS"In a programme note for a performance in 1911 Elgar wrote:This work, commenced in a spirit of humour & continued in deep seriousness, contains sketches of the composer's friends."
p3049
aS'It may be understood that these personages comment or reflect on the original theme & each one attempts a solution of the Enigma, for so the theme is called.'
p3050
aS"The sketches are not 'portraits' but each variation contains a distinct idea founded on some particular personality or perhaps on some incident known only to two people."
p3051
aS"This is the basis of the composition, but the work may be listened to as a 'piece of music' apart from any extraneous consideration."
p3052
aS"In naming his theme 'Enigma' Elgar posed a challenge which has generated much speculation but has never been conclusively answered."
p3053
aS'Fermi held several patents related to the use of nuclear power, and was awarded the 1938 Nobel Prize in Physics for his work on induced radioactivity by neutron bombardment and the discovery of transuranic elements.'
p3054
aS"He was widely regarded as one of the very few physicists to excel both theoretically and experimentally.Fermi's first major contribution was to statistical mechanics."
p3055
aS'After Wolfgang Pauli announced his exclusion principle in 1925, Fermi followed with a paper in which he applied the principle to an ideal gas, employing a statistical formulation now known as Fermi-Dirac statistics.'
p3056
aS'Today, particles that obey the exclusion principle are called "fermions".'
p3057
aS'Later Pauli postulated the existence of an uncharged invisible particle emitted along with an electron during beta decay, to satisfy the law of conservation of energy.'
p3058
aS'Fermi took up this idea, developing a model that incorporated the postulated particle, which he named the "neutrino".'
p3059
aS"His theory, later referred to as Fermi's interaction and still later as weak interaction, described one of the four fundamental forces of nature."
p3060
aS'The same situation exists in classical mechanics: only a change or difference in energy carries physical meaning.'
p3061
aS'Enthalpy itself is a thermodynamic potential, so in order to measure the enthalpy of a system, we must refer to a defined reference point; therefore what we measure is the change in enthalpy, DH.'
p3062
aS'The change DH is positive in endothermic reactions, and negative in heat-releasing exothermic processes.For processes under constant pressure, DH is equal to the change in the internal energy of the system, plus the pressure-volume work that the system has done on its surroundings.'
p3063
aS'This means that the change in enthalpy under such conditions is the heat absorbed (or released) by the material through a chemical reaction or by external heat transfer.'
p3064
aS'Enthalpies for chemical substances at constant pressure assume standard state: most commonly 1 bar pressure.'
p3065
aS'Standard state does not, strictly speaking, specify a temperature (see standard state), but expressions for enthalpy generally reference the standard heat of formation at 25 degC.Enthalpy of ideal gases and incompressible solids and liquids does not depend on pressure, unlike entropy and Gibbs energy.'
p3066
aS'Real materials at common temperatures and pressures usually closely approximate this behavior, which greatly simplifies enthalpy calculation and use in practical designs and analyses. Origins The word enthalpy is based on the Greek enthalpein (enthalpein), which means "to warm in".'
p3067
aS'Systems that are not isolated may decrease in entropy, provided they increase the entropy of their environment by at least that same amount.'
p3068
aS'Since entropy is a state function, the change in the entropy of a system is the same for any process that goes from a given initial state to a given final state, whether the process is reversible or irreversible.'
p3069
aS'However, irreversible processes increase the combined entropy of the system and its environment.The change in entropy (DS) of a system was originally defined for a thermodynamically reversible process as,where T is the absolute temperature of the system, dividing an incremental reversible transfer of heat into that system (dQ).'
p3070
aS'(If heat is transferred out the sign would be reversed giving a decrease in entropy of the system.)'
p3071
aS'The above definition is sometimes called the macroscopic definition of entropy because it can be used without regard to any microscopic description of the contents of a system.'
p3072
aS'The concept of entropy has been found to be generally useful and has several other formulations.'
p3073
aS'Entropy was discovered when it was noticed to be a quantity that behaves as a function of state, as a consequence of the second law of thermodynamics.Entropy is an extensive property.'
p3074
aS'The molecules at the beginning of the process are called substrates and the enzyme converts these into different molecules, called products.'
p3075
aS'Almost all metabolic processes in the cell need enzymes in order to occur at rates fast enough to sustain life.'
p3076
aS'The set of enzymes made in a cell determines which metabolic pathways occur in that cell.'
p3077
aS'The study of enzymes is called enzymology.Enzymes are known to catalyze more than 5,000 biochemical reaction types.'
p3078
aS'Most enzymes are proteins, although a few are catalytic RNA molecules.'
p3079
aS"Enzymes' specificity comes from their unique three-dimensional structures.Like all catalysts, enzymes increase the rate of a reaction by lowering its activation energy."
p3080
aS'Some enzymes can make their conversion of substrate to product occur many millions of times faster.'
p3081
aS"The literary history of Gilgamesh begins with five Sumerian poems about 'Bilgamesh' (Sumerian for 'Gilgamesh'), king of Uruk."
p3082
aS'These independent stories were later used as source material for a combined epic.'
p3083
aS'The first surviving version of this combined epic, known as the "Old Babylonian" version, dates to the 18th century BC and is titled after its incipit, Shutur eli sharri ("Surpassing All Other Kings").'
p3084
aS'Only a few tablets of it have survived.'
p3085
aS'The later "Standard" version dates from the 13th to the 10th centuries BC and bears the incipit Sha naqba imuru ("He who Saw the Deep", in modern terms: "He who Sees the Unknown").'
p3086
aS'Approximately two thirds of this longer, twelve-tablet version have been recovered.'
p3087
aS'Some of the best copies were discovered in the library ruins of the 7th-century BC Assyrian king Ashurbanipal.The first half of the story discusses Gilgamesh, king of Uruk, and Enkidu, a wild man created by the gods to stop him oppressing the people of Uruk.'
p3088
aS'Much of what is known about Epicurean philosophy derives from later followers and commentators.For Epicurus, the purpose of philosophy was to attain the happy, tranquil life, characterized by ataraxia--peace and freedom from fear--and aponia--the absence of pain--and by living a self-sufficient life surrounded by friends.'
p3089
aS"He taught that pleasure and pain are the measures of what is good and evil; death is the end of both body and soul and should therefore not be feared; the gods neither reward nor punish humans; the universe is infinite and eternal; and events in the world are ultimately based on the motions and interactions of atoms moving in empty space. BiographyEdit His parents, Neocles and Chaerestrate, both Athenian-born, and his father a citizen, had emigrated to the Athenian settlement on the Aegean island of Samos about ten years before Epicurus's birth in February 341 BC."
p3090
aS'As a boy, he studied philosophy for four years under the Platonist teacher Pamphilus.'
p3091
aS'At the age of eighteen, he went to Athens for his two-year term of military service.'
p3092
aS'The playwright Menander served in the same age-class of the ephebes as Epicurus.After the death of Alexander_the_Great, Perdiccas expelled the Athenian settlers on Samos to Colophon, on the coast of what is now Turkey.'
p3093
aS'After the completion of his military service, Epicurus joined his family there.'
p3094
aS'He studied under Nausiphanes, who followed the teachings of Democritus.'
p3095
aS'The strained ring makes epoxides more reactive than other ethers.'
p3096
aS'Simple epoxides are named from the parent compound ethylene oxide or oxirane, such as in chloromethyloxirane.'
p3097
aS'When appearing as a functional group, an epoxide carries the epoxy prefix, as in the compound 1,2-epoxycycloheptane, which can also be called cycloheptene epoxide, or simply cycloheptene oxide.A polymer formed by reacting epoxide units is called a polyepoxide or an epoxy.'
p3098
aS'Epoxy resins are used as adhesives and structural materials.'
p3099
aS'Polymerization of an epoxide gives a polyether, for example ethylene oxide polymerizes to give polyethylene glycol, also known as polyethylene oxide. Synthesis The dominant epoxides industrially are ethylene oxide and propylene oxide, which are produced respectively on the scales of approximately 15 and 3 million tonnes.'
p3100
aS'The epoxidation of ethylene involves its catalytic reaction of oxygen according to the following stoichiometry:7 H2CCH2 + 6 O2 - 6 C2H4O + 2 CO2 + 2 H2OThe direct reaction of oxygen with alkenes is useful only for this epoxide.'
p3101
aS'Other alkenes fail to react usefully, even propylene. Olefin peroxidation Most epoxides are generated by treating alkenes with peroxide-containing reagents, which donate a single oxygen atom.'
p3102
aS'Known equilibrium constant values can be used to determine the composition of a system at equilibrium.For a general chemical equilibriumthe thermodynamic equilibrium constant can be defined such that, at equilibrium,where curly brackets denote the thermodynamic activities of the chemical species.'
p3103
aS'The right-hand side of this equation corresponds to the reaction quotient Q for arbitrary values of the activities, and becomes the equilibrium constant as shown when the reaction is at equilibrium.An equilibrium constant is related to the standard Gibbs free energy change for the reaction.If deviations from ideal behaviour are neglected, the activities of solutes may be replaced by concentrations, [A], and the activity quotient becomes a concentration quotient, Kc.Kc is defined as equal to the thermodynamic equilibrium constant but with concentrations of reactants and products instead of activities.'
p3104
aS'(Kc appears here to have units of concentration raised to some power while K is dimensionless; however as discussed below under Definitions, the concentration factors in Kc are properly divided by a standard concentration so that Kc is dimensionless also.'
p3105
aS')Again assuming ideal behavior, the activity of a solvent may be replaced by its mole fraction, or approximately by 1 in dilute solution.'
p3106
aS'The activity of a pure liquid or solid phase is exactly 1.'
p3107
aS'The activity of a species in an ideal gas phase may be replaced by its partial pressure.A knowledge of equilibrium constants is essential for the understanding of many chemical systems, as well as biochemical processes such as oxygen transport by hemoglobin in blood and acid-base homeostasis in the human body.Stability constants, formation constants, binding constants, association constants and dissociation constants are all types of equilibrium constant.'
p3108
aS'See also Determination of equilibrium constants for experimental and computational methods. Types of equilibrium constants  Cumulative and stepwise formation constants A cumulative or overall constant, given the symbol b, is the constant for the formation of a complex from reagents.'
p3109
aS"The play's action is something of a detective story, involving the attempts of the child psychiatrist, Dr. Martin Dysart, to understand the cause of the boy's actions while wrestling with his own sense of purpose."
p3110
aS'The stage show ran in London between 1973 and 1975: later came the Broadway productions that starred Anthony Hopkins as Dysart (later played by Richard Burton, Leonard Nimoy, and Anthony Perkins), and from the London production, Peter Firth as Alan.'
p3111
aS'Tom Hulce replaced Firth during the Broadway run.'
p3112
aS'The Broadway production ran for 1,209 performances.'
p3113
aS'Marian Seldes appeared in every single performance of the Broadway run, first in the role of Hesther and then as Dora.Numerous other issues inform the narrative.'
p3114
aS'Most important are religious and ritual sacrifice themes, and the manner in which character Alan Strang constructs a personal theology involving the horses and the supreme godhead, "Equus".'
p3115
aS'Alan sees the horses as representative of God and confuses his adoration of his "God" with sexual attraction.'
p3116
aS'On 12 June 1917, he was transferred to the Western Front, 2nd Company, Reserves, Field Depot of the 2nd Guards Reserve Division at Hem-Lenglet.'
p3117
aS'On 26 June, he was posted to the 15th Reserve Infantry Regiment, 2nd Company, Engineer Platoon Bethe, and was stationed between Torhout and Houthulst.'
p3118
aS'On 31 July, he was wounded by shrapnel in the left leg, right arm and neck, and was repatriated to an army hospital in Germany where he spent the rest of the war. Teacher After the war he continued his teacher training and worked from 1 August 1919 as a primary school teacher in Lohne, at that time in the county of Lingen, now in the county of Bentheim.'
p3119
aS'From May 1920 he worked in Klein Berssen in the former County of Hummling, now Emsland, and from August 1920 in Nahne, which has been a part of Osnabruck since 1972.'
p3120
aS'On 20 November 1920 he applied for leave of absence from teaching, bringing this period of his life to an end. Other jobs Remarque worked at a number of different jobs, including librarian, businessman, journalist, and editor.'
p3121
aS'His first paid writing job was as a technical writer for the Continental Rubber Company, a German tire manufacturer. Novelist At the age of 16, Remarque had made his first attempts at writing; this included essays, poems, and the beginnings of a novel that was finished later and published in 1920 as The Dream Room (Die Traumbude).'
p3122
aS'When he published All_Quiet_on_the_Western_Front, Remarque changed his middle name in memory of his mother and reverted to the earlier spelling of the family name to dissociate himself from his novel Die Traumbude.'
p3123
aS'His work was a precursor to later artistic movements such as minimalism, repetitive music, and the Theatre of the Absurd.An eccentric, Satie was introduced as a "gymnopedist" in 1887, shortly before writing his most famous compositions, the Gymnopedies.'
p3124
aS'Later, he also referred to himself as a "phonometrician" (meaning "someone who measures sounds") preferring this designation to that of a "musician", after having been called "a clumsy but subtle technician" in a book on contemporary French composers published in 1911.In addition to his body of music, Satie also left a remarkable set of writings, having contributed work for a range of publications, from the dadaist 391 to the American culture chronicle Vanity Fair.'
p3125
aS'Although in later life he prided himself on always publishing his work under his own name, in the late 19th century he appears to have used pseudonyms such as Virginie Lebeau and Francois de Paule in some of his published writings. Early life and training Satie was the son of Alfred Satie and his wife Jane Leslie (nee Anton), who was born in London to Scottish parents.'
p3126
aS'Erik was born at Honfleur in Normandy; his home there is open to the public.'
p3127
aS"When Satie was four years old, his family moved to Paris, his father having been offered a translator's job in the capital."
p3128
aS"After his mother's death in 1872, he was sent (at age 6), together with his younger brother, Conrad, back to Honfleur to live with his paternal grandparents."
p3129
aS'There he received his first music lessons from a local organist.'
p3130
aS'Hemingway produced most of his work between the mid-1920s and the mid-1950s, and won the Nobel Prize in Literature in 1954.'
p3131
aS'He published seven novels, six short story collections, and two non-fiction works.'
p3132
aS'Additional works, including three novels, four short story collections, and three non-fiction works, were published posthumously.'
p3133
aS'Many of his works are considered classics of American literature.Hemingway was raised in Oak Park, Illinois.'
p3134
aS'After high school he reported for a few months for The Kansas City Star, before leaving for the Italian front to enlist with the World_War_I ambulance drivers.'
p3135
aS'In 1918, he was seriously wounded and returned home.'
p3136
aS'His wartime experiences formed the basis for his novel A_Farewell_to_Arms (1929).In 1921, he married Hadley Richardson, the first of his four wives.'
p3137
aS'His best-known contribution to social theory is his study of symbolic interaction.'
p3138
aS'This took the form of dramaturgical analysis, beginning with his 1959 book, The_Presentation_of_Self_in_Everyday_Life.'
p3139
aS"Goffman's other major works include Asylums (1961), Stigma (1963), Interaction Ritual (1967), Frame Analysis (1974), and Forms of Talk (1981)."
p3140
aS'His major areas of study included the sociology of everyday life, social interaction, the social construction of self, social organization (framing) of experience, and particular elements of social life such as total institutions and stigmas. Life Goffman was born 11 June 1922, in Mannville, Alberta, Canada, to Max Goffman and Anne Goffman, nee Averbach.'
p3141
aS'He was from a family of Ukrainian Jews who had emigrated to Canada at the turn of the century.'
p3142
aS'He had an older sibling, Frances Bay, who became an actress.'
p3143
aS"The family moved to Dauphin, Manitoba, where his father operated a successful tailoring business.From 1937 Goffman attended St. John's Technical High School in Winnipeg, where his family had moved that year."
p3144
aS'Glycerides, which are fatty acid esters of glycerol, are important esters in biology, being one of the main classes of lipids, and making up the bulk of animal fats and vegetable oils.'
p3145
aS'Esters with low molecular weight are commonly used as fragrances and found in essential oils and pheromones.'
p3146
aS'Phosphoesters form the backbone of DNA molecules.'
p3147
aS'Nitrate esters, such as nitroglycerin, are known for their explosive properties, while polyesters are important plastics, with monomers linked by ester moieties. NomenclatureEdit  EtymologyEdit The word \'ester\' was coined in 1848 by German chemist Leopold Gmelin, probably as a contraction of the German Essigather, "acetic ether". IUPAC nomenclatureEdit Ester names are derived from the parent alcohol and the parent acid, where the latter may be organic or inorganic.'
p3148
aS'Esters derived from the simplest carboxylic acids are commonly named according to the more traditional, so-called "trivial names" e.g.'
p3149
aS'as formate, acetate, propionate, and butyrate, as opposed to the IUPAC nomenclature methanoate, ethanoate, propanoate and butanoate.'
p3150
aS'Esters derived from more complex carboxylic acids are, on the other hand, more frequently named using the systematic IUPAC name, based on the name for the acid followed by the suffix -oate.'
p3151
aS'Across the Baltic Sea lies Sweden in the west and Finland in the north.'
p3152
aS'The territory of Estonia consists of a mainland and over 1500 islands and islets in the Baltic Sea, covering 45,227 km2 (17,462 sq mi) of land, and is influenced by a humid continental climate.Estonia is a democratic parliamentary republic divided into fifteen counties, with its capital and largest city being Tallinn.'
p3153
aS'With a population of 1.3 million, it is one of the least-populous member states of the European Union, Eurozone, the North Atlantic Treaty Organization and the Schengen Area.'
p3154
aS'The Estonians are a Finnic people, and the official language, Estonian, is a Finno-Ugric language closely related to Finnish and the Sami languages, and distantly to Hungarian.A developed country with an advanced, high-income economy and high living standards, Estonia ranks very high in the Human Development Index, and performs favourably in measurements of economic freedom, civil liberties, education, and press freedom (third in the world in 2012).'
p3155
aS'Estonia is often described as one of the most wired countries in Europe. Etymology One hypothesis is that the modern name of Estonia originated from the Aesti described by the Roman historian Tacitus in his Germania (ca.'
p3156
aS'98 AD).Ancient Scandinavian sagas refer to a land called Eistland, as the country is still called in Icelandic, and close to the Danish, German, Dutch, Swedish and Norwegian term Estland for the country.'
p3157
aS'Early Latin and other ancient versions of the name are Estia and Hestia.Esthonia was a common alternative English spelling prior to 1921. History  Prehistory Human settlement in Estonia became possible 11,000 to 13,000 years ago, when the ice from the last glacial era melted.'
p3158
aS'The novel was adapted into a film, Ethan_Frome, in 1993. Plot Ethan_Frome is set in the fictional New England town of Starkfield, where a visiting engineer tells the story of his encounter with Ethan_Frome, a man with a history of thwarted dreams and desires.'
p3159
aS'The accumulated longing of Frome ends in an ironic turn of events.'
p3160
aS'His initial impressions are based on his observations of Frome going about his mundane tasks in Starkfield, and something about him catches the eye and curiosity of the visitor, but no one in the town seems interested in revealing many details about the man or his history - or perhaps they are not able to.'
p3161
aS"The narrator ultimately finds himself in the position of staying overnight at Frome's house in order to escape a winter storm, and from there he observes Frome and his private circumstances, which he shares and which triggers other people in town to be more forthcoming with their own knowledge and impressions.The novel is framed by the literary device of an extended flashback."
p3162
aS'The prologue, which is neither named as such nor numbered, opens with an unnamed male narrator spending a winter in Starkfield while in the area on business.'
p3163
aS'He spots a limping, quiet man around the village, who is somehow compelling in his demeanor and carriage.'
p3164
aS'This is Ethan_Frome, who is a local fixture of the community, having been a lifelong resident.'
p3165
aS'It can cause alcohol intoxication when consumed in sufficient quantity.Ethanol is a volatile, flammable, colorless liquid with a slight chemical odor.'
p3166
aS'It is used as an antiseptic, a solvent, a fuel, and, due to its low freezing point, the active fluid in post-mercury thermometers.'
p3167
aS'Its structural formula, CH3CH2OH, is often abbreviated as C2H5OH, C2H6O or EtOH. Etymology Ethanol is the systematic name defined by the International Union of Pure and Applied Chemistry (IUPAC) for a molecule with two carbon atoms (prefix "eth-"), having a single bond between them (suffix "-ane"), and an attached functional group-OH group (suffix "-ol").The prefix ethyl was coined in 1834 by the German chemist Justus Liebig.'
p3168
aS'Ethyl is a contraction of the French word ether (any substance that evaporated or sublimated readily at room temperature) and the Greek word ule (hyle, substance).The name ethanol was coined as a result of a resolution that was adopted at the International Conference on Chemical Nomenclature that was held in April 1892 in Geneva, Switzerland.The term "alcohol" now refers to a wider class of substances in chemistry nomenclature, but in common parlance it remains the name of ethanol.'
p3169
aS'Ultimately a medieval loan from Arabic al-kuhl, use of alcohol in this sense is modern, introduced in the mid 18th century.'
p3170
aS'Before that time, Middle Latin alcohol referred to "powdered ore of antimony; powdered cosmetic", by the later 17th century "any sublimated substance; distilled spirit" use for "the spirit of wine" (shortened from a full expression alcohol of wine) recorded 1753.'
p3171
aS'The systematic use in chemistry dates to 1850. Chemical formula Ethanol is a 2-carbon alcohol.'
p3172
aS'It is the simplest alkene (a hydrocarbon with carbon-carbon double bonds), and the second simplest unsaturated hydrocarbon after acetylene (C2H2).Ethylene is widely used in chemical industry, and its worldwide production (over 109 million tonnes in 2006) exceeds that of any other organic compound.'
p3173
aS'Ethylene is also an important natural plant hormone, used in agriculture to force the ripening of fruits.'
p3174
aS"Ethylene's hydrate is ethyl alcohol. Structure and properties This hydrocarbon has four hydrogen atoms bound to a pair of carbon atoms that are connected by a double bond."
p3175
aS'All six atoms that comprise ethylene are coplanar.'
p3176
aS'The H-C-H angle is 117.4deg, close to the 120deg for ideal sp2 hybridized carbon.'
p3177
aS'The molecule is also relatively rigid: rotation about the C-C bond is a high energy process that requires breaking the p-bond.The p-bond in the ethylene molecule is responsible for its useful reactivity.'
p3178
aS'The double bond is a region of high electron density, thus it is susceptible to attack by electrophiles.'
p3179
aS'Their Roman name is the origin of the terms Tuscany, which refers to their heartland, and Etruria, which can refer to their wider region.In Attic Greek, the Etruscans were known as Turrenoi (Tyrrhenoi), earlier Tyrsenoi, from which the Romans derived the names Tyrrheni (Etruscans), Tyrrhenia (Etruria), and Mare Tyrrhenum (Tyrrhenian Sea), prompting some to associate them with the Teresh (Sea Peoples).'
p3180
aS'The word may also be related to the Hittite Taruisa.'
p3181
aS'The Etruscans called themselves Rasenna, which was syncopated to Rasna or Rasna.As distinguished by its unique language, this civilization endured from the time of the earliest Etruscan inscriptions (c. 700 BC) until its assimilation into the Roman Republic in the late 4th century BC.'
p3182
aS'At its maximum extent, during the foundational period of Rome and the Roman kingdom, it flourished in three confederacies of cities: of Etruria, of the Po valley with the eastern Alps, and of Latium and Campania.Culture that is identifiably Etruscan developed in Italy after about 800 BC approximately over the range of the preceding Iron Age Villanovan culture.'
p3183
aS'The latter gave way in the 7th century to a culture that was influenced by Hellenic, Magna Graecian, and Phoenician contacts.'
p3184
aS'After 500 BC, the political destiny of Italy passed out of Etruscan hands.'
p3185
aS'The latest mitochondrial DNA study (2013) shows that Etruscans appear to fall very close to a Neolithic population from Central Europe and to other Tuscan populations. Legend and historyEdit  Origin and historyEdit The origins of the Etruscans are mostly lost in prehistory, although Greek historians as early as the 5th century BCE, repeatedly associated the Tyrrhenians (Tyrrhenoi/Turrenoi, Tyrsenoi/Tursenoi) as Pelasgians.'
p3186
aS'He was active in Alexandria during the reign of Ptolemy I (323-283 BC).'
p3187
aS'His Elements is one of the most influential works in the history of mathematics, serving as the main textbook for teaching mathematics (especially geometry) from the time of its publication until the late 19th or early 20th century.'
p3188
aS'In the Elements, Euclid deduced the principles of what is now called Euclidean geometry from a small set of axioms.'
p3189
aS'Euclid also wrote works on perspective, conic sections, spherical geometry, number theory and rigor.Euclid is the anglicized version of the Greek name Eukleides, which means "renowned, glorious". Life Very few original references to Euclid survive, so little is known about his life.'
p3190
aS'The date, place and circumstances of both his birth and death are unknown and may only be estimated roughly relative to other figures mentioned alongside him.'
p3191
aS'He is rarely mentioned by name by other Greek mathematicians from Archimedes onward, who usually call him "o stoikheiotes" ("the author of Elements").'
p3192
aS'The few historical references to Euclid were written centuries after he lived, by Proclus c. 450 AD and Pappus of Alexandria c. 320 AD.Proclus introduces Euclid only briefly in his Commentary on the Elements.'
p3193
aS'Eugene himself was baptized into the Orthodox Christian faith.'
p3194
aS'Many sources cite his birthdate as 1912, this error being due to vanity on the part of Ionesco himself, who wanted the year of his birth to coincide with that when his idol, Romanian playwright Caragiale, died.He spent most of his childhood in France and, while there, had an experience he claimed affected his perception of the world more significantly than any other.'
p3195
aS'As Deborah B. Gaensbauer describes in Eugene_Ionesco Revisited, "Walking in summer sunshine in a white-washed provincial village under an intense blue sky, [Ionesco] was profoundly altered by the light."'
p3196
aS'He was struck very suddenly with a feeling of intense luminosity, the feeling of floating off the ground and an overwhelming feeling of well-being.'
p3197
aS'When he "floated" back to the ground and the "light" left him, he saw that the real world in comparison was full of decay, corruption and meaningless repetitive action.'
p3198
aS'This also coincided with the revelation that death takes everyone in the end.'
p3199
aS'Much of his later work, reflecting this new perception, demonstrates a disgust for the tangible world, a distrust of communication, and the subtle sense that a better world lies just beyond our reach.'
p3200
aS"The drama Long Day's Journey Into Night is often numbered on the short list of being among the finest American plays in the 20th century alongside A Streetcar Named Desire and Death_of_a_Salesman.O'Neill's plays were among the first to include speeches in American vernacular and involve characters on the fringes of society, where they struggle to maintain their hopes and aspirations, but ultimately slide into disillusionment and despair."
p3201
aS'Of his very few comedies, only one is well-known (Ah, Wilderness!).'
p3202
aS"Nearly all of his other plays involve some degree of tragedy and personal pessimism. Early life O'Neill was born in a Broadway hotel room in Longacre Square (now Times Square), in the Barrett Hotel."
p3203
aS'The site is now a Starbucks (1500 Broadway, Northeast corner of 43rd & Broadway).'
p3204
aS'A commemorative plaque is posted on the outside wall with the inscription "Eugene_O\'Neill, October 16, 1888 ~ November 27, 1953 America\'s greatest playwright was born on this site then called Barrett Hotel, Presented by Circle in the Square.'
p3205
aS'"He was the son of Irish immigrant actor James O\'Neill, and of Mary Ellen Quinlan, who was also of Irish descent.'
p3206
aS"Because of his father's occupation, O'Neill was sent to St. Aloysius Academy for Boys, a Catholic boarding school in the Riverdale section of the Bronx, where he found his only solace in books."
p3207
aS'Leonhard Euler, for whom the concept is named, was responsible for much of this early work.'
p3208
aS'In modern mathematics, the Euler_characteristic arises from homology and, more abstractly, homological algebra. Polyhedra The Euler_characteristic  was classically defined for the surfaces of polyhedra, according to the formulawhere V, E, and F are respectively the numbers of vertices (corners), edges and faces in the given polyhedron.'
p3209
aS"Any convex polyhedron's surface has Euler_characteristicThis equation is known as Euler's polyhedron formula."
p3210
aS'It corresponds to the Euler_characteristic of the sphere (i.e.'
p3211
aS'kh  2), and applies identically to spherical polyhedra.'
p3212
aS"An illustration of the formula on some polyhedra is given below.The surfaces of nonconvex polyhedra can have various Euler_characteristics;For regular polyhedra, Arthur Cayley derived a modified form of Euler's formula using the density D, vertex figure density dv, and face density :This version holds both for convex polyhedra (where the densities are all 1) and the non-convex Kepler-Poinsot polyhedra.Projective polyhedra all have Euler_characteristic 1, like the real projective plane, while the surfaces of toroidal polyhedra all have Euler_characteristic 0, like the torus. Planar graphs The Euler_characteristic can be defined for connected planar graphs by the same  formula as for polyhedral surfaces, where F is the number of faces in the graph, including the exterior face.The Euler_characteristic of any planar connected graph G is 2."
p3213
aS'This is easily proved by induction on the number of faces determined by G, starting with a tree as the base case.'
p3214
aS'Some ancient scholars attributed ninety-five plays to him but according to the Suda it was ninety-two at most.'
p3215
aS'Of these, eighteen or nineteen have survived more or less complete (there has been debate about his authorship of Rhesus, largely on stylistic grounds) and there are also fragments, some substantial, of most of the other plays.'
p3216
aS'More of his plays have survived intact than those of Aeschylus and Sophocles together, partly due to mere chance and partly because his popularity grew as theirs declined--he became, in the Hellenistic Age, a cornerstone of ancient literary education, along with Homer, Demosthenes and Menander.Euripides is identified with theatrical innovations that have profoundly influenced drama down to modern times, especially in the representation of traditional, mythical heroes as ordinary people in extraordinary circumstances.'
p3217
aS'This new approach led him to pioneer developments that later writers adapted to comedy, some of which are characteristic of romance.'
p3218
aS'Yet he also became "the most tragic of poets", focusing on the inner lives and motives of his characters in a way previously unknown.'
p3219
aS'He was "the creator of...that cage which is the theatre of Shakespeare\'s Othello, Racine\'s Phedre, of Ibsen and Strindberg," in which "...imprisoned men and women destroy each other by the intensity of their loves and hates", and yet he was also the literary ancestor of comic dramatists as diverse as Menander and George_Bernard_Shaw.He was also unique among the writers of ancient Athens for the sympathy he demonstrated towards all victims of society, including women.'
p3220
aS"His conservative male audiences were frequently shocked by the 'heresies' he put into the mouths of characters, such as these words of his heroine Medea:Sooner would I standThree times to face their battles, shield in hand,Than bear one child!His contemporaries associated him with Socrates as a leader of a decadent intellectualism, both of them being frequently lampooned by comic poets such as Aristophanes."
p3221
aS'They are both there for preliminary hearings before possible trials (2a).Euthyphro has come to lay manslaughter charges against his father, as his father had allowed one of his workers to die exposed to the elements without proper care and attention (3e-4d).'
p3222
aS"This worker had killed a slave belonging to the family estate on the island of Naxos; while Euthyphro's father waited to hear from the expounders of religious law (exegetes cf."
p3223
aS'Laws 759d) about how to proceed, the worker died bound and gagged in a ditch.'
p3224
aS'Socrates expresses his astonishment at the confidence of a man able to take his own father to court on such a serious charge, even when Athenian Law allows only relatives of the deceased to sue for murder (Dem.'
p3225
aS'43 SS 57).'
p3226
aS'Euthyphro misses the astonishment, and merely confirms his overconfidence in his own judgment of religious/ethical matters.'
p3227
aS'In an example of "Socratic irony," Socrates states that Euthyphro obviously has a clear understanding of what is pious (to osion to hosion) and impious (to anosion to anosion).'
p3228
aS'As a writer, Evelyn_Waugh is recognised as one of the great prose stylists of the English language in the 20th century.The son of a publisher, Waugh was educated at Lancing College and then at Hertford College, Oxford, and briefly worked as a schoolmaster before becoming a full-time writer.'
p3229
aS'As a young man, he acquired many fashionable and aristocratic friends, and developed a taste for country house society.'
p3230
aS'In the 1930s, he travelled extensively, often as a special newspaper correspondent; thus was he reporting from Abyssinia at the time of the 1935 Italian invasion.'
p3231
aS'He served in the British armed forces throughout the Second World War (1939-45), first in the Royal Marines and then in the Royal Horse Guards.'
p3232
aS"He was a perceptive writer who used the experiences and the wide range of people he encountered in his works of fiction, generally to humorous effect; Waugh's detachment was such that he fictionalised his own mental breakdown, which occurred in the early 1950s.After the failure of his first marriage, Waugh converted to Catholicism in 1930."
p3233
aS'His traditionalist stance led him to strongly oppose all attempts to reform the Church; the changes by the Second Vatican Council (1962-65) greatly disturbed his sensibilities, especially the introduction of the vernacular Mass.'
p3234
aS'That blow to his religious traditionalism, his dislike for the welfare state culture of the post-War world, and the decline of his health, darkened his final years; nonetheless, he continued to write.'
p3235
aS'Because responsibility or consequence for self-directed action lies partly outside the self, an element of externalization is involved.'
p3236
aS'If there are external benefits, such as in public safety, less of the good may be produced than would be the case if the producer were to receive payment for the external benefits to others.'
p3237
aS'For the purpose of these statements, overall cost and benefit to society is defined as the sum of the imputed monetary value of benefits and costs to all parties involved.'
p3238
aS'Thus, unregulated markets in goods or services with significant externalities generate prices that do not reflect the full social cost or benefit of their transactions; such markets are therefore inefficient. Implications Voluntary exchange is considered mutually beneficial to both parties involved, because buyers or sellers would not trade if either thought it detrimental to themselves.'
p3239
aS'However, a transaction can cause additional effects on third parties.'
p3240
aS'From the perspective of those affected, these effects may be negative (pollution from a factory), or positive (honey bees kept for honey that also pollinate neighboring crops).'
p3241
aS'Neoclassical welfare economics asserts that, under plausible conditions, the existence of externalities will result in outcomes that are not socially optimal.'
p3242
aS'In higher organisms, the eye is a complex optical system which collects light from the surrounding environment, regulates its intensity through a diaphragm, focuses it through an adjustable assembly of lenses to form an image, converts this image into a set of electrical signals, and transmits these signals to the brain through complex neural pathways that connect the eye via the optic nerve to the visual cortex and other areas of the brain.'
p3243
aS'Eyes with resolving power have come in ten fundamentally different forms, and 96% of animal species possess a complex optical system.'
p3244
aS'Image-resolving eyes are present in molluscs, chordates and arthropods.The simplest "eyes", such as those in microorganisms, do nothing but detect whether the surroundings are light or dark, which is sufficient for the entrainment of circadian rhythms.'
p3245
aS'From more complex eyes, retinal photosensitive ganglion cells send signals along the retinohypothalamic tract to the suprachiasmatic nuclei to effect circadian adjustment and to the pretectal nuclei to control the pupillary light reflex. Overview Complex eyes can distinguish shapes and colours.'
p3246
aS'The visual fields of many organisms, especially predators, involve large areas of binocular vision to improve depth perception.'
p3247
aS'In other organisms, eyes are located so as to maximise the field of view, such as in rabbits and horses, which have monocular vision.The first proto-eyes evolved among animals 600 million years ago about the time of the Cambrian explosion.'
p3248
aS'The last common ancestor of animals possessed the biochemical toolkit necessary for vision, and more advanced eyes have evolved in 96% of animal species in six of the ~35 main phyla.'
p3249
aS'His best-known works include Ripostes (1912), Hugh Selwyn Mauberley (1920) and the unfinished 120-section epic, The Cantos (1917-69).Working in London in the early 20th century as foreign editor of several American literary magazines, Pound helped discover and shape the work of contemporaries such as T. S. Eliot, James_Joyce, Robert_Frost, and Ernest_Hemingway.'
p3250
aS'He was responsible for the 1915 publication of Eliot\'s "The Love Song of J. Alfred Prufrock" and the serialization from 1918 of Joyce\'s Ulysses.'
p3251
aS'Hemingway wrote of him in 1925: "He defends [his friends] when they are attacked, he gets them into magazines and out of jail.'
p3252
aS'...'
p3253
aS'He introduces them to wealthy women.'
p3254
aS'He gets publishers to take their books.'
p3255
aS'He sits up all night with them when they claim to be dying ... he advances them hospital expenses and dissuades them from suicide.'
p3256
aS'Fitzgerald is considered a member of the "Lost Generation" of the 1920s.'
p3257
aS'He finished four novels: This Side of Paradise, The Beautiful and Damned, The Great Gatsby (his best known), and Tender Is the Night.'
p3258
aS'A fifth, unfinished novel, The Love of the Last Tycoon, was published posthumously.'
p3259
aS'Fitzgerald also wrote many short stories that treat themes of youth and promise along with age and despair. Early life Born in 1896 in Saint Paul, Minnesota, to an upper-middle-class family, Fitzgerald was named after his famous second cousin, three times removed, Francis Scott Key, but was referred to by the familiar moniker Scott Fitzgerald.'
p3260
aS'He was also named after his deceased sister, Louise Scott, one of two sisters who died shortly before his birth.'
p3261
aS'"Well, three months before I was born," he wrote as an adult, "my mother lost her other two children ...'
p3262
aS'I think I started then to be a writer."'
p3263
aS'Its most basic occurrence is the fact that there are n!'
p3264
aS'ways to arrange n distinct objects into a sequence (i.e., permutations of the set of objects).'
p3265
aS'This fact was known at least as early as the 12th century, to Indian scholars.'
p3266
aS'Fabian Stedman in 1677 described factorials as applied to change ringing.'
p3267
aS'After describing a recursive approach, Stedman gives a statement of a factorial (using the language of the original):Now the nature of these methods is such, that the changes on one number comprehends [includes] the changes on all lesser numbers, ... insomuch that a compleat Peal of changes on one number seemeth to be formed by uniting of the compleat Peals on all lesser numbers into one entire body;The notation n!'
p3268
aS'was introduced by Christian Kramp in 1808.The definition of the factorial function can also be extended to non-integer arguments, while retaining its most important properties; this involves more advanced mathematics, notably techniques from mathematical analysis. Definition The factorial function is formally defined by the productor by the recurrence relationThe factorial function can also be defined by using the power rule asAll of the above definitions incorporate the instancein the first case by the convention that the product of no numbers at all is 1.'
p3269
aS'This is convenient because:There is exactly one permutation of zero objects (with nothing to permute, "everything" is left in place).The recurrence relation (n + 1)!'
p3270
aS'The two armies met on friendly terms but back in Europe it became a war scare.'
p3271
aS'The British held firm as Britain and France were on the verge of war with heated rhetoric on both sides.'
p3272
aS'Under heavy pressure the French withdrew, securing Anglo-Egyptian control over the area.'
p3273
aS'The status quo was recognised by an agreement between the two states acknowledging British control over Egypt, while France became the dominant power in Morocco.'
p3274
aS'France was humiliated by the result.'
p3275
aS'It was the last crisis between the two that involved a threat of war (until 1940) and opened the way for closer relations in the Entente cordiale in 1904.'
p3276
aS"It gave rise to the 'Fashoda syndrome' in French foreign policy, or seeking to assert French influence in areas which might be becoming susceptible to British influence. Background During the late 19th century, Africa was rapidly being developed by European colonial powers."
p3277
aS'Other fasts may be only partially restrictive, limiting particular foods or substances.'
p3278
aS'The fast may also be intermittent in nature.'
p3279
aS'Fasting practices may preclude sexual intercourse and other activities as well as food.In a physiological context, fasting may refer to (1) the metabolic status of a person who has not eaten overnight, and (2) to the metabolic state achieved after complete digestion and absorption of a meal.'
p3280
aS'Several metabolic adjustments occur during fasting, and some diagnostic tests are used to determine a fasting state.'
p3281
aS'For example, a person is assumed to be fasting after 8-12 hours from their last meal.'
p3282
aS'Metabolic changes toward the fasting state begin after absorption of a meal (typically 3-5 hours after a meal); "post-absorptive state" is synonymous with this usage, in contrast to the postprandial state of ongoing digestion.'
p3283
aS'A diagnostic fast refers to prolonged fasting (from 8-72 hours depending on age) conducted under observation for investigation of a problem, usually hypoglycemia.'
p3284
aS'The Faust legend has been the basis for many literary, artistic, cinematic, and musical works that have reinterpreted it through the ages.'
p3285
aS'Faust and the adjective Faustian imply a situation in which an ambitious person surrenders moral integrity in order to achieve power and success for a delimited term.The Faust of early books--as well as the ballads, dramas, movies, and puppet-plays which grew out of them--is irrevocably damned because he prefers human to divine knowledge; "he laid the Holy Scriptures behind the door and under the bench, refused to be called doctor of Theology, but preferred to be styled doctor of Medicine".'
p3286
aS'Plays and comic puppet theatre loosely based on this legend were popular throughout Germany in the 16th century, often reducing Faust and Mephistopheles to figures of vulgar fun.'
p3287
aS'The story was popularised in England by Christopher_Marlowe, who gave it a classic treatment in his play, The Tragical History of Doctor Faustus (1604).'
p3288
aS'In Goethe\'s reworking of the story two hundred years later, Faust becomes a dissatisfied intellectual who yearns for "more than earthly meat and drink" in his life. Summary of the story Faust is bored and depressed with his life as a scholar.'
p3289
aS'After an attempt to take his own life, he calls on the Devil for further knowledge and magic powers with which to indulge all the pleasure and knowledge of the world.'
p3290
aS"In response, the Devil's representative, Mephistopheles, appears."
p3291
aS"In 2008, a Spanish judge opened an investigation into Lorca's death."
p3292
aS'The Garcia Lorca family eventually dropped objections to the excavation of a potential gravesite near Alfacar, but no human remains were found.According to Spanish naming customs, a person usually uses their father\'s surname as their main surname; as Garcia is a very widely-used name and Lorca is not, Garcia Lorca is often referred to for short by his mother\'s less common surname "Lorca", rather than Garcia. Life and career  Early years Garcia Lorca was born on 5 June 1898, in Fuente Vaqueros, a small town a few miles west of Granada, southern Spain.'
p3293
aS'His father, Federico Garcia Rodriguez, was a prosperous landowner with a farm in the fertile vega (valley) surrounding Granada and a comfortable villa in the heart of the city.'
p3294
aS'Garcia Rodriguez saw his fortunes rise with a boom in the sugar industry.'
p3295
aS"Garcia Lorca's mother, Vicenta Lorca Romero, was a teacher."
p3296
aS'After Fuente Vaqueros, the family moved in 1905 to the nearby town of Valderrubio (at the time named Asquerosa).'
p3297
aS'In 1909, when the boy was 11, his family moved to the regional capital of Granada; their best known residence there is the summer home known as the Huerta de San Vicente, on what was then the outskirts of the city of Granada.'
p3298
aS'Mendelssohn was recognised early as a musical prodigy, but his parents were cautious and did not seek to capitalise on his talent.Mendelssohn enjoyed early success in Germany, where he also revived interest in the music of Johann_Sebastian_Bach, and in his travels throughout Europe.'
p3299
aS'He was particularly well received in Britain as a composer, conductor and soloist, and his ten visits there - during which many of his major works were premiered - form an important part of his adult career.'
p3300
aS'His essentially conservative musical tastes, however, set him apart from many of his more adventurous musical contemporaries such as Franz_Liszt, Richard Wagner and Hector Berlioz.'
p3301
aS'The Leipzig Conservatoire (now the University of Music and Theatre Leipzig), which he founded, became a bastion of this anti-radical outlook.Mendelssohn wrote symphonies, concerti, oratorios, piano music and chamber music.'
p3302
aS"His best-known works include his Overture and incidental music for A Midsummer Night's Dream, the Italian Symphony, the Scottish Symphony, the overture The Hebrides, his mature Violin Concerto, and his String Octet."
p3303
aS'His Songs Without Words are his most famous solo piano compositions.'
p3304
aS'After a long period of relative denigration due to changing musical tastes and anti-Semitism in the late 19th and early 20th centuries, his creative originality has now been recognised and re-evaluated.'
p3305
aS'Words are not mere vocal labels or communicational adjuncts superimposed upon an already given order of things.'
p3306
aS'They are collective products of social interaction, essential instruments through which human beings constitute and articulate their world.'
p3307
aS'This typically twentieth-century view of language has profoundly influenced developments throughout the whole range of human sciences.'
p3308
aS'It is particularly marked in linguistics, philosophy, psychology, sociology and anthropology.Although they have undergone extension and critique over time, the dimensions of organization introduced by Saussure continue to inform contemporary approaches to the phenomenon of language.'
p3309
aS'Prague school linguist Jan Mukarovsky writes that Saussure\'s "discovery of the internal structure of the linguistic sign differentiated the sign both from mere acoustic \'things\' ... and from mental processes", and that in this development "new roads were thereby opened not only for linguistics, but also, in the future, for the theory of literature."'
p3310
aS'Ruqaiya Hasan argues that "the impact of Saussure\'s theory of the linguistic sign has been such that modern linguists and their theories have since been positioned by reference to him: they are known as pre-Saussurean, Saussurean, anti-Saussurean, post-Saussurean, or non-Saussure.'
p3311
aS'" Biography Ferdinand Mongin de Saussure was born in Geneva in 1857.'
p3312
aS'Ferromagnetism (including ferrimagnetism) is the strongest type: it is the only one that typically creates forces strong enough to be felt, and is responsible for the common phenomena of magnetism in magnets encountered in everyday life.'
p3313
aS'Substances respond weakly to magnetic fields with three other types of magnetism, paramagnetism, diamagnetism, and antiferromagnetism, but the forces are usually so weak that they can only be detected by sensitive instruments in a laboratory.'
p3314
aS'An everyday example of ferromagnetism is a refrigerator magnet used to hold notes on a refrigerator door.'
p3315
aS'The attraction between a magnet and ferromagnetic material is "the quality of magnetism first apparent to the ancient world, and to us today".Permanent magnets (materials that can be magnetized by an external magnetic field and remain magnetized after the external field is removed) are either ferromagnetic or ferrimagnetic, as are other materials that are noticeably attracted to them.'
p3316
aS'Only a few substances are ferromagnetic.'
p3317
aS'The common ones are iron, nickel, cobalt and most of their alloys, some compounds of rare earth metals, and a few naturally-occurring minerals such as lodestone.Ferromagnetism is very important in industry and modern technology, and is the basis for many electrical and electromechanical devices such as electromagnets, electric motors, generators, transformers, and magnetic storage such as tape recorders, and hard disks. History and distinction from ferrimagnetism Historically, the term ferromagnetism was used for any material that could exhibit spontaneous magnetization: a net magnetic moment in the absence of an external magnetic field.'
p3318
aS'This general definition is still in common use.'
p3319
aS"The German libretto was originally prepared by Joseph Sonnleithner from the French of Jean-Nicolas Bouilly and the work premiered at Vienna's Theater an der Wien on 20 November 1805."
p3320
aS'The next year Stephan von Breuning helped shorten the three acts to two.'
p3321
aS'After further work on the libretto by Georg Friedrich Treitschke a final version performed at the Karntnertortheater on 23 May 1814.'
p3322
aS'By convention both of the first two versions are referred to as Leonore.The opera tells how Leonore, disguised as a prison guard named "Fidelio", rescues her husband Florestan from death in a political prison.'
p3323
aS'Bouilly\'s scenario fits Beethoven\'s aesthetic and political outlook: a story of personal sacrifice, heroism and eventual triumph (the usual topics of Beethoven\'s "middle period") with its underlying struggle for liberty and justice mirroring contemporary political movements in Europe.'
p3324
aS'Some notable moments in the opera include the "Prisoners\' Chorus", an ode to freedom sung by a chorus of political prisoners, Florestan\'s vision of Leonore come as an angel to rescue him, and the scene in which the rescue finally takes place.'
p3325
aS"The finale celebrates Leonore's bravery with alternating contributions of soloists and chorus. Performance history Fidelio underwent two extensive revisions by Beethoven."
p3326
aS'The most commonly used fields are the field of real numbers, the field of complex numbers, and the field of rational numbers, but there are also finite fields, fields of functions, algebraic number fields, p-adic fields, and so forth.Any field may be used as the scalars for a vector space, which is the standard general context for linear algebra.'
p3327
aS'The theory of field extensions (including Galois theory) involves the roots of polynomials with coefficients in a field; among other results, this theory leads to impossibility proofs for the classical problems of angle trisection and squaring the circle with a compass and straightedge, as well as a proof of the Abel-Ruffini theorem on the algebraic insolubility of quintic equations.'
p3328
aS'In modern mathematics, the theory of fields (or field theory) plays an essential role in number theory and algebraic geometry.As an algebraic structure, every field is a ring, but not every ring is a field.'
p3329
aS'The most important difference is that fields allow for division (though not division by zero), while a ring need not possess multiplicative inverses; for example the integers form a ring, but 2x  1 has no solution in integers.'
p3330
aS'Also, the multiplication operation in a field is required to be commutative.'
p3331
aS'A ring in which division is possible but commutativity is not assumed (such as the quaternions) is called a division ring or skew field.'
p3332
aS'(Historically, division rings were sometimes referred to as fields, while fields were called commutative fields.'
p3333
aS'"Fionn" means "blond", "fair", "white", or "bright".'
p3334
aS'The hero\'s childhood name was Deimne (/\'deIni/; Irish pronunciation: [djebnji]), literally "sureness" or "certainty", also a name that means a young male deer; several legends tell how he gained the name Fionn when his hair turned prematurely white.'
p3335
aS'The name Fionn is related to the Welsh name Gwyn, as in the mythological figure Gwyn ap Nudd, and to the continental Celtic Vindos, a form of the god Belenus.The 19th-century Irish revolutionary organisation known as the Fenian Brotherhood took its name from these legends.'
p3336
aS"The Scottish form of his name, Fingal /'fINGg@l/, comes from a retelling of the legends in epic form by the 18th-century poet James Macpherson. Legend  Birth Most of Fionn's early adventures are recounted in the narrative The Boyhood Deeds of Fionn."
p3337
aS'He was the son of Cumhall, leader of the Fianna, and Muirne, daughter of the druid Tadg mac Nuadat who lived on the hill of Almu in County Kildare.'
p3338
aS'Cumhall abducted Muirne after her father refused him her hand, so Tadg appealed to the High King, Conn of the Hundred Battles, who outlawed Cumhall.'
p3339
aS'The Battle of Cnucha was fought between Conn and Cumhall, and Cumhall was killed by Goll mac Morna, who took over leadership of the Fianna.'
p3340
aS"The Union's forces were slow in positioning themselves, allowing Confederate reinforcements time to arrive by rail."
p3341
aS'Each side had about 18,000 poorly trained and poorly led troops in their first battle.'
p3342
aS'It was a Confederate victory followed by a disorganized retreat of the Union forces.Just months after the start of the war at Fort Sumter, the Northern public clamored for a march against the Confederate capital of Richmond, Virginia, which they expected to bring an early end to the rebellion.'
p3343
aS'Yielding to political pressure, Brig.'
p3344
aS'Gen. Irvin McDowell led his unseasoned Union Army across Bull Run against the equally inexperienced Confederate Army of Brig.'
p3345
aS'Gen. P. G. T. Beauregard camped near Manassas Junction.'
p3346
aS"McDowell's ambitious plan for a surprise flank attack on the Confederate left was poorly executed by his officers and men; nevertheless, the Confederates, who had been planning to attack the Union left flank, found themselves at an initial disadvantage.Confederate reinforcements under Brig."
p3347
aS'It was launched on 27 November 1095 by Pope Urban II with the primary goal of responding to an appeal from Byzantine Emperor Alexios I Komnenos, who requested that western volunteers come to his aid and help to repel the invading Seljuq Turks from Anatolia.'
p3348
aS'An additional goal soon became the principal objective--the Christian reconquest of the sacred city of Jerusalem and the Holy Land and the freeing of the Eastern Christians from Muslim rule.During the crusade, knights, peasants and serfs from many nations of Western Europe travelled over land and by sea, first to Constantinople and then on towards Jerusalem.'
p3349
aS"The Crusaders arrived at Jerusalem, launched an assault on the city, and captured it in July 1099, massacring many of the city's Muslim, Christian, and Jewish inhabitants."
p3350
aS'They also established the crusader states of the Kingdom of Jerusalem, the County of Tripoli, the Principality of Antioch, and the County of Edessa.The First_Crusade was followed by the Second to the Ninth Crusades.'
p3351
aS'It was also the first major step towards reopening international trade in the West since the fall of the Western Roman Empire.'
p3352
aS'Because the First_Crusade was largely concerned with Jerusalem, a city which had not been under Christian dominion for 461 years, and the crusader army had refused to return the land to the control of the Byzantine Empire, the status of the First_Crusade as defensive or as aggressive in nature remains controversial. Origin The origin of the Crusades in general, and particularly that of the First_Crusade, is widely debated among historians.'
p3353
aS'The Crusades are most commonly linked to the political and social situation in 11th-century Europe, the rise of a reform movement within the papacy, and the political and religious confrontation of Christianity and Islam in Europe and the Middle East.'
p3354
aS'The primary role of the flagellum is locomotion but it also often has function as a sensory organelle, being sensitive to chemicals and temperatures outside the cell.'
p3355
aS'Flagella are organelles defined by function rather than structure.'
p3356
aS'There are large differences between different types of flagella; the prokaryotic and eukaryotic flagella differ greatly in protein composition, structure, and mechanism of propulsion.'
p3357
aS'However, both are used for swimming.An example of a flagellate bacterium is the ulcer-causing Helicobacter pylori, which uses multiple flagella to propel itself through the mucus lining to reach the stomach epithelium.'
p3358
aS'An example of a eukaryotic flagellate cell is the mammalian sperm cell, which uses its flagellum to propel itself through the female reproductive tract.'
p3359
aS'Eukaryotic flagella are structurally identical to eukaryotic cilia, although distinctions are sometimes made according to function and/or length. Types Three types of flagella have so far been distinguished; bacterial, archaeal and eukaryotic.The main differences among these three types are summarized below:Bacterial flagella are helical filaments, each with a rotary motor at its base which can turn clockwise or counterclockwise.'
p3360
aS'They provide two of several kinds of bacterial motility.Archaeal flagella (Archaella) are superficially similar to bacterial flagella, but are different in many details and considered non-homologous.Eukaryotic flagella--those of animal, plant, and protist cells--are complex cellular projections that lash back and forth.'
p3361
aS'She was a Southern writer who often wrote in a Southern Gothic style and relied heavily on regional settings and grotesque characters.'
p3362
aS'Her writing also reflected her own Roman Catholic faith, and frequently examined questions of morality and ethics.O\'Connor\'s Complete Stories won the 1972 U.S. National Book Award for Fiction and was named the "Best of the National Book Awards" by Internet visitors in 2009. Early years and education O\'Connor was born on March 25, 1925, in Savannah, Georgia, the only child of Edward F. O\'Connor, a real estate agent, and Regina Cline.'
p3363
aS'She described herself as a "pigeon-toed child with a receding chin and a you-leave-me-alone-or-I\'ll-bite-you complex."'
p3364
aS'When she was six, living at a home still standing, she experienced her first brush with celebrity status.'
p3365
aS'The Pathe News people filmed "Little Mary O\'Connor" with her trained chicken, and showed the film around the country.'
p3366
aS'She said, "When I was six I had a chicken that walked backward and was in the Pathe News.'
p3367
aS'I was in it too with the chicken.'
p3368
aS'A turbulent political history includes periods of rule by the powerful Medici family, and numerous religious and republican revolutions.'
p3369
aS"From 1865 to 1871 the city was the capital of the recently established Kingdom of Italy.The Historic Centre of Florence attracts millions of tourists each year, and Euromonitor International ranked the city as the world's 89th most visited in 2012, with 1.8 million visitors."
p3370
aS'It was declared a World Heritage Site by UNESCO in 1982.'
p3371
aS'The city is noted for its culture, Renaissance art and architecture and monuments.'
p3372
aS'The city also contains numerous museums and art galleries, such as the Uffizi Gallery and the Palazzo Pitti, and still exerts an influence in the fields of art, culture and politics.'
p3373
aS"Due to Florence's artistic and architectural heritage, it has been ranked by Forbes as one of the most beautiful cities in the world.Florence is an important city in Italian fashion, being ranked in the top 51 fashion capitals of the world; furthermore, it is a major national economic centre, as a tourist and industrial hub."
p3374
aS'In 2008, the city had the 17th highest average income in Italy. History Florence originated as a Roman city, and later, after a long period as a flourishing trading and banking medieval commune, it was the birthplace of the Italian Renaissance .'
p3375
aS'Jacksonville is the most populous city in Florida, and the largest city by area in the contiguous United_States.'
p3376
aS'The Miami metropolitan area is the eighth-largest metropolitan area in the United_States.'
p3377
aS'Tallahassee is the state capital.A peninsula between the Gulf of Mexico, the Atlantic Ocean, and the Straits of Florida, it has the longest coastline in the contiguous United_States, approximately 1,350 miles (2,170 km), and is the only state that borders both the Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean.'
p3378
aS'Much of the state is at or near sea level and is characterized by sedimentary soil.'
p3379
aS'The climate varies from subtropical in the north to tropical in the south.'
p3380
aS'The American alligator, American crocodile, Florida panther and manatee can be found in the Everglades National Park.Since the first European contact was made in 1513 by Spanish explorer Juan Ponce de Leon - who named it La Florida ([la flo\'rida] "The Flowery") upon landing there in the Easter season, Pascua Florida - Florida was a challenge for the European colonial powers before it gained statehood in the United_States in 1845.'
p3381
aS'It was a principal location of the Seminole Wars against the Indians, and racial segregation after the American Civil War.Today, Florida is distinguished by its large Hispanic community and high population growth, as well as its increasing environmental concerns.'
p3382
aS'Etymologically, angiosperm means a plant that produces seeds within an enclosure, in other words, a fruiting plant.The ancestors of flowering plants diverged from gymnosperms around 245-202 million years ago, and the first flowering plants known to exist are from 160 million years ago.'
p3383
aS'They diversified enormously during the Lower Cretaceous and became widespread around 120 million years ago, but replaced conifers as the dominant trees only around 60-100 million years ago. Angiosperm derived characteristics Angiosperms differ from other seed plants in several ways, described in the table.'
p3384
aS'These distinguishing characteristics taken together have made the angiosperms the most diverse and numerous land plants and the most commercially important group to humans. Evolution Fossilized spores suggest that higher plants (embryophytes) have lived on land for at least 475 million years.'
p3385
aS'Early land plants reproduced sexually with flagellated, swimming sperm, like the green algae from which they evolved.'
p3386
aS'An adaptation to terrestrialization was the development of upright meiosporangia for dispersal by spores to new habitats.'
p3387
aS'This feature is lacking in the descendants of their nearest algal relatives, the Charophycean green algae.'
p3388
aS'A later terrestrial adaptation took place with retention of the delicate, avascular sexual stage, the gametophyte, within the tissues of the vascular sporophyte.'
p3389
aS'As the most electronegative element, it is extremely reactive: almost all other elements, including some noble gases, form compounds with fluorine.Among the elements, fluorine ranks 24th in universal abundance and 13th in terrestrial abundance.'
p3390
aS'Fluorite, the primary mineral source of fluorine, was first described in 1529; as it was added to metal ores to lower their melting points for smelting, the Latin verb fluo meaning "flow" became associated with it.'
p3391
aS'Proposed as an element in 1810, fluorine proved difficult and dangerous to separate from its compounds, and several early experimenters died or sustained injuries from their attempts.'
p3392
aS'Only in 1886 did French chemist Henri Moissan isolate elemental fluorine using low-temperature electrolysis, a process still employed for modern production.'
p3393
aS'Industrial synthesis of fluorine gas for uranium enrichment, its largest application, began during the Manhattan Project in World_War_II.Owing to the expense of refining pure fluorine, most commercial applications of the element involve the use of its compounds, with about half of mined fluorite used in steelmaking.'
p3394
aS'The rest is converted into corrosive hydrogen fluoride en route to various organic fluorides, or into cryolite which plays a key role in aluminium refining.'
p3395
aS'Organic fluorides have very high chemical and thermal stability; their major uses are as refrigerants, electrical insulation and cookware, the last as PTFE (Teflon).'
p3396
aS'According to the instrument classification of Hornbostel-Sachs, flutes are categorized as edge-blown aerophones.A musician who plays the flute can be referred to as a flute player, flautist, flutist or, less commonly, fluter or flutenist.Aside from the voice, flutes are the earliest known musical instruments.'
p3397
aS'A number of flutes dating to about 43,000 to 35,000 years ago have been found in the Swabian Alb region of Germany.'
p3398
aS'These flutes demonstrate that a developed musical tradition existed from the earliest period of modern human presence in Europe.'
p3399
aS'Flutes including the famous Bansuri, have been an integral part of Indian classical music since 1500 BC.'
p3400
aS'A major deity of Hinduism, Krishna, has been associated with the flute. Etymology The word flute first entered the English language during the Middle English period, as floute, or else flowte, flo(y)te, possibly from Old French flaute and from Old Provencal flaut, or else from Old French fleute, flaute, flahute via Middle High German floite or Dutch fluit.'
p3401
aS'The English verb flout has the same linguistic root, and the modern Dutch verb fluiten still shares the two meanings.'
p3402
aS'Attempts to trace the word back to the Latin flare (to blow, inflate) have been pronounced "phonologically impossible" or "inadmissable".'
p3403
aS'These existing tensions between the two countries coincided with rioting during a 1970 FIFA World Cup qualifier.'
p3404
aS'The war began on 14 July 1969, when the Salvadoran military launched an attack against Honduras.'
p3405
aS'The Organization of American States negotiated a ceasefire on the night of 18 July (hence "100 Hour War"), which took full effect on 20 July.'
p3406
aS'Salvadoran troops were withdrawn in early August.Despite the elapse of more than forty years, a formal peace treaty, a decision by the International Court of Justice and the support of the Organization of American States, the dispute remains active. Context Although the nickname "Football_War" implies that the conflict was due to a football match, the causes of the war go much deeper.'
p3407
aS'The roots of the war were issues over land reform in Honduras and immigration and demographic problems in El_Salvador.'
p3408
aS'Honduras is more than five times the size of neighbouring El_Salvador, but in 1969 the population of El_Salvador (3.7 million) was some 40% higher than that of Honduras (2.6 million).'
p3409
aS'At the beginning of the twentieth century, Salvadorans had begun migrating to Honduras in large numbers.'
p3410
aS'The novel is full of esoteric references to Kabbalah, alchemy and conspiracy theory -- so many that critic and novelist Anthony Burgess suggested that it needed an index.'
p3411
aS'The pendulum of the title refers to an actual pendulum designed by the French physicist Leon Foucault to demonstrate the rotation of the earth, and has symbolic significance within the novel.'
p3412
aS'Some believe it refers to the philosopher Michel_Foucault, noting Eco\'s friendship with the French philosopher, but the author "specifically rejects any intentional reference to Michel_Foucault" -- this is regarded as one of his subtle literary jokes. Plot summary After reading too many manuscripts about occult conspiracy theories, three vanity publisher employees (Belbo, Diotallevi and Casaubon) invent their own conspiracy for fun.'
p3413
aS'They call this satirical intellectual game "The Plan".'
p3414
aS"The three become increasingly obsessed with The Plan, and sometimes forget that it's just a game."
p3415
aS'Worse still, other conspiracy theorists learn about The Plan, and take it seriously.'
p3416
aS"Belbo finds himself the target of a real secret society that believes he possesses the key to the lost treasure of the Knights Templar.The book opens with the narrator, Casaubon (his name refers to classical scholar Isaac Casaubon, and also evokes a scholar character in George_Eliot's Middlemarch) hiding in fear after closing time in the Parisian technical museum Musee des Arts et Metiers."
p3417
aS'As a result of the loss of genetic variation, the new population may be distinctively different, both genotypically and phenotypically, from the parent population from which it is derived.'
p3418
aS'In extreme cases, the founder effect is thought to lead to the speciation and subsequent evolution of new species.In the figure shown, the original population has nearly equal numbers of blue and red individuals.'
p3419
aS'The three smaller founder populations show that one or the other color may predominate (founder effect), due to random sampling of the original population.'
p3420
aS'A population bottleneck may also cause a founder effect even though it is not strictly a new population.The founder effect occurs when a small group of migrants that is not genetically representative of the population from which they came establish in a new area.'
p3421
aS'In addition to founder effects, the new population is often a very small population and so shows increased sensitivity to genetic drift, an increase in inbreeding, and relatively low genetic variation.'
p3422
aS'This can be observed in the limited gene pools of Icelanders, Ashkenazi Jews, Faroe Islanders, Easter Islanders, Filipinos, and those native to Pitcairn Island.'
p3423
aS"Another example is the legendarily high deaf population of Martha's Vineyard, which resulted in the development of Martha's Vineyard Sign Language. Founder mutation In genetics, a founder mutation is a mutation that appears in the DNA of one or more individuals who are founders of a distinct population."
p3424
aS'For example, in the map of the United_States of America, Utah and Arizona are adjacent, but Utah and New_Mexico, which only share a point that also belongs to Arizona and Colorado, are not.Despite the motivation from coloring political maps of countries, the theorem is not of particular interest to mapmakers.'
p3425
aS'According to an article by the math historian Kenneth May (Wilson 2014, 2), "Maps utilizing only four colors are rare, and those that do usually require only three.'
p3426
aS'Books on cartography and the history of mapmaking do not mention the four-color property.'
p3427
aS'"Three colors are adequate for simpler maps, but an additional fourth color is required for some maps, such as a map in which one region is surrounded by an odd number of other regions that touch each other in a cycle.'
p3428
aS'The five color theorem, which has a short elementary proof, states that five colors suffice to color a map and was proven in the late 19th century (Heawood 1890); however, proving that four colors suffice turned out to be significantly harder.'
p3429
aS'A number of false proofs and false counterexamples have appeared since the first statement of the four color theorem in 1852.The four color theorem was proven in 1976 by Kenneth Appel and Wolfgang Haken.'
p3430
aS'It was the first major theorem to be proved using a computer.'
p3431
aS'The intention of the crusaders was to then continue to the Holy Land with promised Byzantine financial and military assistance.'
p3432
aS'On 23 June 1203 the main crusader fleet reached Constantinople.'
p3433
aS'Smaller contingents continued to Acre.In August 1203, following clashes outside Constantinople, Alexios Angelos was crowned as co-Emperor with crusader support.'
p3434
aS'However in January 1204, he was deposed by a popular uprising in Constantinople.'
p3435
aS'The Western crusaders were no longer able to receive their promised payments, and when Alexios IV was murdered on 8 February 1204, the crusaders and Venetians decided on the outright conquest of Constantinople.'
p3436
aS'In April 1204, they captured and brutally sacked the city, and set up a new Latin Empire as well as partitioning other Byzantine territories between themselves.Byzantine resistance based on unconquered sections of the empire such as Nicaea, Trebizond, and Epirus ultimately recovered Constantinople.The Fourth_Crusade is considered to be one of the final acts in the Great Schism between the Eastern Orthodox Church and Roman Catholic Church, and a key turning point in the decline of the Byzantine Empire. Background Ayyubid Sultan Saladin had conquered most of the Frankish, Latin Kingdom of Jerusalem, including the ancient city itself, in 1187.'
p3437
aS'The Kingdom had been established 88 years before, after the capture and sack of Jerusalem in the First_Crusade.'
p3438
aS'Bacon took up painting in his early 20s but worked sporadically and uncertainly until his mid-30s.'
p3439
aS'Unsure of his ability, he drifted as a highly complex bon vivant, homosexual, gambler and interior decorator and designer of furniture, rugs and bathroom tiles.'
p3440
aS'He later admitted that his artistic career was delayed because he spent too long looking for subject matter that could sustain his interest.His breakthrough came with the 1944 triptych Three Studies for Figures at the Base of a Crucifixion, which in the immediate aftermath of the Second World War, sealed his reputation as a uniquely bleak chronicler of the human condition.'
p3441
aS'Remarking on the cultural significance of Three Studies, John Russell observed that "there was painting in England before the Three Studies, and painting after them, and no one...can confuse the two.'
p3442
aS'"Bacon said that he saw images "in series", and his artistic output typically focused on a single subject or format for sustained periods, often in triptych or diptych formats.'
p3443
aS'His output can be crudely described as sequences or variations on a single motif; beginning with the 1930s Picasso-informed Furies, moving on to the 1940s male heads isolated in rooms or geometric structures, the 1950s screaming popes, and the mid-to-late 1950s animals and lone figures.'
p3444
aS'These were followed by his early 1960s variations on crucifixion scenes.'
p3445
aS'After his death, he remained extremely influential through his works, especially as philosophical advocate and practitioner of the scientific method during the scientific revolution.Bacon has been called the father of empiricism.'
p3446
aS'His works established and popularised inductive methodologies for scientific inquiry, often called the Baconian method, or simply the scientific method.'
p3447
aS'His demand for a planned procedure of investigating all things natural marked a new turn in the rhetorical and theoretical framework for science, much of which still surrounds conceptions of proper methodology today.Bacon was knighted in 1603, and created Baron Verulam in 1618 and Viscount St. Alban in 1621; as he died without heirs, both titles became extinct upon his death.'
p3448
aS'He died of pneumonia, supposedly contracted while studying the effects of freezing on the preservation of meat. Biography  Early life Francis_Bacon was born on 22 January 1561 at York House near the Strand in London, the son of Sir Nicholas Bacon by his second wife, Anne (Cooke) Bacon, the daughter of the noted humanist Anthony Cooke.'
p3449
aS"His mother's sister was married to William Cecil, 1st Baron Burghley, making Burghley Bacon's uncle.Biographers believe that Bacon was educated at home in his early years owing to poor health, which would plague him throughout his life."
p3450
aS'He received tuition from John Walsall, a graduate of Oxford with a strong leaning toward Puritanism.'
p3451
aS'He entered Trinity College, Cambridge, on 5 April 1573 at the age of 12, living for three years there, together with his older brother Anthony Bacon under the personal tutelage of Dr John Whitgift, future Archbishop of Canterbury.'
p3452
aS"He was known as the Swamp Fox. Early life In 1732, Francis_Marion was born on his family's plantation in Berkeley County, South Carolina."
p3453
aS'Around the age of 15, he was hired on a ship bound for the West Indies which sank on his first voyage; the crew escaped on a lifeboat but had to spend one week at sea before reaching land.'
p3454
aS"During the following years, Marion managed the family's plantation. French and Indian War Marion began his military career shortly before his 25th birthday."
p3455
aS'On January 1, 1757, Francis and his brother, Job, were recruited by Captain John Postell to serve in the French and Indian War and to drive the Cherokee Indians away from the border.'
p3456
aS'In 1761, Marion served as a lieutenant under Captain William Moultrie in a campaign against the Cherokee which destroyed many Indian villages and burned crops to starve the Cherokee into surrendering. American Revolutionary War  Early service On June 21, 1775, Marion was commissioned Captain in the 2nd South Carolina Regiment under William Moultrie, with whom he served in June 1776 in the defense of Fort Sullivan (today known as Fort Moultrie), in Charleston harbor.In September 1776, the Continental Congress commissioned Marion as a Lieutenant Colonel.'
p3457
aS'In the autumn of 1779, he took part in the siege of Savannah, a failed Franco-American attempt to capture the Georgia city. Fall of Charleston A British expedition under Henry Clinton moved into South Carolina in the early Spring of 1780 and laid siege to Charleston.'
p3458
aS'Marion was not captured with the rest of the garrison when Charleston fell on May 12, 1780, because he had broken an ankle in an accident and had left the city to recuperate.'
p3459
aS'Through his works he was both a commentator on and chronicler of his era.'
p3460
aS'The subversive imaginative element in his art, as well as his bold handling of paint, provided a model for the work of artists of later generations, notably Edouard Manet, Pablo_Picasso and Francis_Bacon. Biography  Early years Goya was born in Fuendetodos, Aragon, Spain, on 30 March 1746 to Jose Benito de Goya y Franque and Gracia de Lucientes y Salvador.'
p3461
aS'His family lived in a home bearing the family crest of his mother.'
p3462
aS'His father, who was of Basque origin, earned his living as a gilder.'
p3463
aS'About 1749, the family bought a house in the city of Saragossa and some years later moved into it; Goya may have attended school at Escuelas Pias.'
p3464
aS"He formed a close friendship with Martin Zapater at this time, and their correspondence from the 1770s to the 1790s is a valuable source for understanding Goya's early career at the court of Madrid."
p3465
aS'At age 14, Goya studied under the painter Jose Luzan, in Luzan\'s workshop he was copying stamps for 4 years until he decided to work by his own, as he wrote later on "paint from my invention".'
p3466
aS'In his 1908 book entitled The Presidential Succession in 1910, Madero called on voters to prevent the sixth reelection of Porfirio Diaz, which Madero considered anti-democratic.'
p3467
aS'His vision would lay the foundation for a democratic, 20th-century Mexico but without polarizing the social classes.'
p3468
aS'To that effect, he bankrolled the Anti-Reelectionist Party (later the Progressive Constitutional Party) and urged the Mexicans to rise up against Diaz, which ignited the Mexican Revolution in 1910.'
p3469
aS"Madero's candidacy against Diaz garnered widespread support in Mexico, since he was someone of independent financial means, ideological determination, and bravery to oppose Diaz when it was dangerous to do so."
p3470
aS'Arrested by the dictatorship shortly after being declared Presidential candidate by his party, the opposition leader escaped from prison and launched the Plan of San Luis Potosi from the United_States, in this manner beginning the Mexican Revolution.Following the resignation of Diaz from the presidency on 25 May 1911 after the signing of the Treaty of Ciudad Juarez, Madero became the highest political leader of the country.'
p3471
aS'Known as "Maderistas", Madero\'s followers referred to him as the "caudillo de la Revolucion" (leader of the Revolution).'
p3472
aS'He was elected president on 15 October 1911 by almost 90% of the vote.'
p3473
aS'French-German War), often referred to in France as the War of 1870 (19 July 1870 - 10 May 1871), was a conflict between the Second French Empire and the German states of the North German Confederation led by the Kingdom of Prussia.'
p3474
aS'The conflict centered on Prussian ambitions to extend German unification.'
p3475
aS'Prussian chancellor Otto von Bismarck planned to provoke a French attack in order to draw the southern German states--Baden, Wurttemberg, Bavaria and Hesse-Darmstadt--into an alliance with the Prussian-dominated North German Confederation.Bismarck adroitly created a diplomatic crisis over the succession to the Spanish throne, then rewrote a dispatch about a meeting between King William of Prussia and the French foreign minister, to make it appear that the French had been insulted.'
p3476
aS'The French press and parliament demanded a war, which the generals of Napoleon III assured him that France would win.'
p3477
aS'Napoleon and his Prime Minister, Emile Ollivier, for their parts sought war to solve political disunity in France.'
p3478
aS'On 16 July 1870, the French parliament voted to declare war on the German Kingdom of Prussia and hostilities began three days later.'
p3479
aS'The German coalition mobilised its troops much more quickly than the French and rapidly invaded northeastern France.'
p3480
aS'His rule, based on a purged military, a rural militia known as the Tonton Macoute, and the use of a personality cult, resulted in the murder of an estimated 30,000 Haitians and the exile of many more.Prior to his rule, Duvalier, who was a physician by profession, was known for successfully fighting diseases and acquired the nickname \'Papa Doc\' ("Daddy Doctor" in French).'
p3481
aS'He took the title of President for Life in 1964 and remained in power until he died in 1971.'
p3482
aS'He was succeeded by his son, Jean-Claude, who was nicknamed "Baby Doc". Early life and career Duvalier was born in Port-au-Prince, the son of Duval Duvalier, a justice of the peace, and Ulyssia Abraham, a baker.'
p3483
aS'He was largely raised by an aunt.'
p3484
aS'He completed a degree in medicine from the University of Haiti in 1934 and served as staff physician at several local hospitals.'
p3485
aS'He spent a year at the University of Michigan studying public health and in 1943 became active in a United_States-sponsored campaign to control the spread of contagious tropical diseases, helping the poor to fight typhus, yaws, malaria and other tropical diseases that had ravaged Haiti for years.'
p3486
aS'His patients affectionately called him "Papa Doc", a moniker that he used throughout his life.Lucky enough to be schooled and literate in a country where few were educated, Duvalier saw firsthand the political turmoil in his country.'
p3487
aS'He served under the Vichy Regime in its earlier years.'
p3488
aS'Subsequently, however, he joined the Resistance, moved to the left, and held ministerial office repeatedly under the Fourth Republic.'
p3489
aS"He opposed de Gaulle's establishment of the Fifth Republic."
p3490
aS"Although at times a politically isolated figure, Mitterrand outmanoeuvred rivals to become the left's standard bearer in every presidential election from 1965 to 1988, except 1969."
p3491
aS'Elected President in the May 1981 presidential election, he was re-elected in 1988 and held office until 1995.Mitterrand invited the Communist Party into his first government, a controversial move at the time.'
p3492
aS'In the event, the Communists were boxed in as junior partners and, rather than taking advantage, saw their support erode.'
p3493
aS'They left the cabinet in 1984.'
p3494
aS'Gehry is also the designer of the future National Dwight D. Eisenhower Memorial. Early life Gehry was born Frank Owen Goldberg on February 28, 1929, in Toronto, Ontario, to parents Irwin and Thelma (nee Thelma Caplan) Goldberg.'
p3495
aS'His parents were Polish Jews.'
p3496
aS'A creative child, he was encouraged by his grandmother, with whom he would build little cities out of scraps of wood.'
p3497
aS'With these scraps from her husband\'s hardware store, she entertained him for hours, building imaginary houses and futuristic cities on the living room floor.His use of corrugated steel, chain link fencing, unpainted plywood and other utilitarian or "everyday" materials was partly inspired by spending Saturday mornings at his grandfather\'s hardware store.'
p3498
aS'He would spend time drawing with his father and his mother introduced him to the world of art.'
p3499
aS'"So the creative genes were there", Gehry says.'
p3500
aS'"But my father thought I was a dreamer, I wasn\'t gonna amount to anything.'
p3501
aS'Hals played an important role in the evolution of 17th-century group portraiture. Biography Hals was born in 1582 or 1583, in Antwerp as the son of the cloth merchant Franchois Fransz Hals van Mechelen (c.1542-1610) and his second wife Adriaentje van Geertenryck.'
p3502
aS"Like many, Hals' parents fled during the Fall of Antwerp (1584-1585) from the Spanish Netherlands to Haarlem, where he lived for the remainder of his life."
p3503
aS"Hals studied under another Flemish emigre, Karel van Mander, whose Mannerist influence, however, is barely noticeable in Hals' work.In 1610, Hals became a member of the Haarlem Guild of Saint Luke, and he started to earn money as an art restorer for the city council."
p3504
aS'He worked on their large art collection that Karel van Mander had described in his Schilderboeck ("Painter\'s Book") published in Haarlem in 1604.'
p3505
aS'The most notable of these were the works of Geertgen tot Sint Jans, Jan van Scorel and Jan Mostaert, that hung in the St. Janskerk in Haarlem.'
p3506
aS'The restoration work was paid for by the city of Haarlem, since all Catholic religious art had been confiscated after the satisfactie van Haarlem, which gave Catholics equal rights to Protestants, had been reversed in 1578.'
p3507
aS'However, the entire collection of paintings was not formally possessed by the city council until 1625, after the city fathers had decided which paintings were suitable for the city hall.'
p3508
aS'For more than four decades, the life and works of Frantz_Fanon have inspired national liberation movements in Palestine, Sri_Lanka, the U.S. and South Africa. Biography  Martinique and the Second World War Frantz_Fanon was born on the Caribbean island of Martinique, which was then a French colony and is now a French departement.'
p3509
aS'His father was a descendant of enslaved Africans; his mother was said to be an "illegitimate" child of African, Indian and European descent, whose white ancestors came from Strasbourg in Alsace.'
p3510
aS"Fanon's family was socio-economically middle-class and they could afford the fees for the Lycee Schoelcher, then the most prestigious high school in Martinique, where the writer Aime Cesaire was one of his teachers.After France fell to the Nazis in 1940, Vichy French naval troops were blockaded on Martinique."
p3511
aS'Forced to remain on the island, French sailors took over the government from the Martiniquan people and established a collaborationist regime.'
p3512
aS'In the face of economic distress and in the isolation under the blockade, they instituted an oppressive regime; Fanon described them as taking off their masks and behaving like "authentic racists."'
p3513
aS'Many accusations of harassment and sexual misconduct arose.'
p3514
aS'The abuse of the Martiniquan people by the French Navy influenced Fanon, reinforcing his feelings of alienation and his disgust with colonial racism.'
p3515
aS'In his lifetime, most of the population of Prague spoke Czech, and the division between Czech- and German-speaking people was a tangible reality, as both groups were strengthening their national identity.'
p3516
aS'The Jewish community often found itself in between the two sentiments, naturally raising questions about a place to which one belongs.'
p3517
aS'Kafka himself was fluent in both languages, considering German his mother tongue.Kafka trained as a lawyer and after completing his legal education, obtained employment with an insurance company.'
p3518
aS'He began to write short stories in his spare time.'
p3519
aS'For the rest of his life, he complained about the little time he had to devote to what he came to regard as his calling.'
p3520
aS'He regretted having to devote so much attention to his Brotberuf ("day job", literally "bread job").'
p3521
aS'Kafka preferred to communicate by letter; he wrote hundreds of letters to family and close female friends, including his father, his fiancee Felice Bauer, and his youngest sister Ottla.'
p3522
aS'Liszt was also a well-known and influential composer, piano teacher and conductor.'
p3523
aS'He was a benefactor to other composers, including Richard Wagner, Hector Berlioz, Camille Saint-Saens, Edvard_Grieg and Alexander Borodin.As a composer, Liszt was one of the most prominent representatives of the "Neudeutsche Schule" ("New German School").'
p3524
aS'He left behind an extensive and diverse body of work in which he influenced his forward-looking contemporaries and anticipated some 20th-century ideas and trends.'
p3525
aS'Some of his most notable contributions were the invention of the symphonic poem, developing the concept of thematic transformation as part of his experiments in musical form and making radical departures in harmony.'
p3526
aS"He also played an important role in popularizing a wide array of music by transcribing it for piano. Life  Early life The earliest known ancestor of Liszt is his great-grandfather, Sebastian List, who was one of the thousands of migrant Danube Swabians locally migrating within the Austrian Empire's territories (around the area now constituting Lower Austria and Hungary) in the first half of the 18th century."
p3527
aS'Sebastian was a cotter and was said to be born in Rajka (Ragendorf), Moson County, Kingdom of Hungary, around 1703, where he died on January 7, 1793.'
p3528
aS"Liszt's grandfather was an overseer on several Esterhazy estates; he could play the piano, violin and organ."
p3529
aS'His output consists of over six hundred secular vocal works (mainly Lieder), seven complete symphonies, sacred music, operas, incidental music and a large body of chamber and piano music.'
p3530
aS'Appreciation of his music while he was alive was limited to a relatively small circle of admirers in Vienna, but interest in his work increased significantly in the decades following his death.'
p3531
aS'Felix_Mendelssohn, Robert Schumann, Franz_Liszt, Johannes_Brahms and other 19th-century composers discovered and championed his works.'
p3532
aS'Today, Schubert is ranked among the greatest composers of the late Classical era and early Romantic era and is one of the most frequently performed composers of the early nineteenth century. Biography  Early life and education Schubert was born in Himmelpfortgrund (now a part of Alsergrund), Vienna, Archduchy of Austria on 31 January 1797.'
p3533
aS'His father, Franz Theodor Schubert, the son of a Moravian peasant, was a parish schoolmaster; his mother, Elisabeth (Vietz), was the daughter of a Silesian master locksmith and had been a housemaid for a Viennese family before marriage.'
p3534
aS"Of Franz Theodor's fourteen children (one of them illegitimate, born in 1783), nine died in infancy.Their father was a well-known teacher, and his school in Lichtental (in Vienna's ninth district) had numerous students in attendance."
p3535
aS"Though he was not recognized or even formally trained as a musician, he passed on certain musical basics to his gifted son.At age six, Franz began to receive regular instruction from his father, and a year later was enrolled at his father's school."
p3536
aS'Chopin was born in what was then the Duchy of Warsaw, and grew up in Warsaw, which after 1815 became part of Congress Poland.'
p3537
aS'A child prodigy, he completed his musical education and composed many of his works in Warsaw before leaving Poland at the age of 20, less than a month before the outbreak of the November 1830 Uprising.At the age of 21 he settled in Paris.'
p3538
aS'Thereafter, during the last 18 years of his life, he gave only some 30 public performances, preferring the more intimate atmosphere of the salon.'
p3539
aS'He supported himself by selling his compositions and teaching piano, for which he was in high demand.'
p3540
aS'Chopin formed a friendship with Franz_Liszt and was admired by many of his musical contemporaries, including Robert Schumann.'
p3541
aS'In 1835 he obtained French citizenship.'
p3542
aS'After a failed engagement to a Polish girl, from 1837 to 1847 he maintained an often troubled relationship with the French writer George Sand.'
p3543
aS'He was sent to Florida in the United_States in 1884 to manage an orange plantation.'
p3544
aS'There he soon neglected his managerial duties, and in 1886 returned to Europe.'
p3545
aS'Having been influenced by African-American music during his short stay in Florida, he began composing.'
p3546
aS"After a brief period of formal musical study in Germany beginning in 1886, he embarked on a full-time career as a composer in Paris and then in nearby Grez-sur-Loing, where he and his wife Jelka lived for the rest of their lives, except during the First World War.Delius's first successes came in Germany, where Hans Haym and other conductors promoted his music from the late 1890s."
p3547
aS"In Delius's native Britain, it was 1907 before his music made regular appearances in concert programmes, after Thomas Beecham took it up."
p3548
aS"Beecham conducted the full premiere of A Mass of Life in London in 1909 (he had premiered Part II in Germany in 1908); he staged the opera A Village Romeo and Juliet at Covent Garden in 1910; and he mounted a six-day Delius festival in London in 1929, as well as making gramophone recordings of many of Delius's works."
p3549
aS'After 1918 Delius began to suffer the effects of syphilis, contracted during his earlier years in Paris.'
p3550
aS'He became known as Frederick_the_Great (Friedrich der Grosse) and was nicknamed Der Alte Fritz ("Old Fritz") by the Prussian people.In his youth, Frederick was more interested in music and philosophy than the art of war.'
p3551
aS'He defied his authoritarian father, Frederick William I, and sought to run away with his best friend Hans Hermann von Katte.'
p3552
aS'They were caught at the border and King Frederick William I nearly executed his son for desertion.'
p3553
aS'After being pardoned, he was forced to watch the official beheading of Hans.'
p3554
aS'Upon ascending to the Prussian throne, he attacked Austria and claimed Silesia during the Silesian Wars, winning military acclaim for himself and Prussia.'
p3555
aS'Near the end of his life, Frederick physically connected most of his realm by conquering Polish territories in the First Partition of Poland.'
p3556
aS'He was an influential military theorist whose analysis emerged from his extensive personal battlefield experience and covered issues of strategy, tactics, mobility and logistics.Frederick was a proponent of enlightened absolutism.'
p3557
aS'French has evolved from Gallo-Romance, the spoken Latin in Gaul, and more specifically in Northern Gaul.'
p3558
aS"Its closest relatives are the other langues d'oil--languages historically spoken in northern France and in southern Belgium, which French (Francien) has largely supplanted."
p3559
aS'French was also influenced by native Celtic languages of Northern Roman Gaul like Gallia Belgica and by the (Germanic) Frankish language of the post-Roman Frankish invaders.'
p3560
aS"Today, owing to France's past overseas expansion, there are numerous French-based creole languages, most notably Haitian Creole."
p3561
aS'A French-speaking person or nation may be referred to as Francophone.French is the second-most widespread language worldwide after English, being an official language in 29 countries, most of which are members of la francophonie, the community of French-speaking countries.'
p3562
aS'It is spoken as a first language in France, southern Belgium, western Switzerland, Monaco, Canada and by various communities elsewhere.French is the second-most widely spoken mother tongue in the European Union.'
p3563
aS'As a result of French and Belgian colonialism from the 17th and 18th century onward, French was introduced to new territories in the Americas, Africa and Asia.'
p3564
aS'The period is the duration of time of one cycle in a repeating event, so the period is the reciprocal of the frequency.'
p3565
aS"For example, if a newborn baby's heart beats at a frequency of 120 times a minute, its period - the interval between beats - is half a second (60 seconds (i.e., a minute) divided by 120 beats)."
p3566
aS'Frequency is an important parameter used in science and engineering to specify the rate of oscillatory and vibratory phenomena, such as mechanical vibrations, audio (sound) signals, radio waves, and light. Definitions and units For cyclical processes, such as rotation, oscillations, or waves, frequency is defined as a number of cycles per unit time.'
p3567
aS'In physics and engineering disciplines, such as optics, acoustics, and radio, frequency is usually denoted by a Latin letter f or by the Greek letter n (nu).'
p3568
aS'Note, the related concept, angular frequency, is usually denoted by the Greek letter o (omega), which uses the SI unit radians per second (rad/s).For counts per unit of time, the SI unit for frequency is hertz (Hz), named after the German physicist Heinrich Hertz; 1 Hz means that an event repeats once per second.'
p3569
aS'A previous name for this unit was cycles per second (cps).A traditional unit of measure used with rotating mechanical devices is revolutions per minute, abbreviated r/min or rpm.'
p3570
aS'60 r/min equals one hertz.The period, usually denoted by T, is the duration of one cycle, and is the reciprocal of the frequency f:The SI unit for period is the second.Other than waves frequency related to occurrence of something can be denoted by:Where  is the number of times an event occurred and  is the duration.Frequency may also be denoted by the lowercase letter Nu,  (see e.g.'
p3571
aS'Dry friction is subdivided into static friction ("stiction") between non-moving surfaces, and kinetic friction between moving surfaces.Fluid friction describes the friction between layers of a viscous fluid that are moving relative to each other.Lubricated friction is a case of fluid friction where a lubricant fluid separates two solid surfaces.Skin friction is a component of drag, the force resisting the motion of a fluid across the surface of a body.Internal friction is the force resisting motion between the elements making up a solid material while it undergoes deformation.When surfaces in contact move relative to each other, the friction between the two surfaces converts kinetic energy into thermal energy.'
p3572
aS'This property can have dramatic consequences, as illustrated by the use of friction created by rubbing pieces of wood together to start a fire.'
p3573
aS'Kinetic_energy is converted to thermal energy whenever motion with friction occurs, for example when a viscous fluid is stirred.'
p3574
aS'Another important consequence of many types of friction can be wear, which may lead to performance degradation and/or damage to components.'
p3575
aS'Friction is a component of the science of tribology.Friction is not itself a fundamental force.'
p3576
aS'Dry friction arises from a combination of inter-surface adhesion, surface roughness, surface deformation, and surface contamination.'
p3577
aS'The complexity of these interactions makes the calculation of friction from first principles impractical and necessitates the use of empirical methods for analysis and the development of theory. History The classic rules of sliding friction were discovered by Leonardo da Vinci (1452-1519), but remained unpublished in his notebooks.'
p3578
aS'One of the key tenets of his philosophy is "life-affirmation", which embraces the realities of the world in which we live over the idea of a world beyond.'
p3579
aS'It further champions the creative powers of the individual to strive beyond social, cultural, and moral contexts.'
p3580
aS"Nietzsche's attitude towards religion and morality was marked with atheism, psychologism and historism: he considered them to be human creations ultimately produced by insecurities and flaws rather than effective means to alleviate those flaws."
p3581
aS'His radical questioning of the value and objectivity of truth has been the focus of extensive commentary, and his influence remains substantial, especially in schools of continental philosophy such as existentialism, postmodernism, and post-structuralism.'
p3582
aS'His ideas of individual overcoming and transcendence beyond structure and context have had a profound impact on late-twentieth and early-twenty-first century thinkers, who have used these concepts as points of departure in the development of their philosophies.Nietzsche began his career as a classical philologist--a scholar of Greek and Roman textual criticism--before turning to philosophy.'
p3583
aS'In 1869, at age 24, he became the youngest-ever occupant of the Chair of Classical Philology at the University of Basel.'
p3584
aS'He resigned in 1879 due to health problems that plagued him most of his life.'
p3585
aS'They frequently discussed issues concerning aesthetics, and Schiller encouraged Goethe to finish works he left as sketches.'
p3586
aS'This relationship and these discussions led to a period now referred to as Weimar Classicism.'
p3587
aS'They also worked together on Xenien, a collection of short satirical poems in which both Schiller and Goethe challenge opponents to their philosophical vision. Early life and career Friedrich_Schiller was born on 10 November 1759, in Marbach, Wurttemberg as the only son of military doctor Johann Kaspar Schiller (1733-96) and Elisabeth Dorothea Kodweiss (1732-1802).'
p3588
aS'Schiller grew up in a very religious family and spent much of his youth studying the Bible, which would later influenced his dramatic style of writing as a playwright They also had five daughters.'
p3589
aS"His father was away in the Seven Years' War when Friedrich was born."
p3590
aS'He was named after king Frederick_the_Great, but he was called Fritz by nearly everyone.'
p3591
aS'Kaspar Schiller was rarely home during the war, but he did manage to visit the family once in a while.'
p3592
aS'The timing of the outbreak of the Fronde des parlements, directly after the Peace of Westphalia (1648) that ended the Thirty Years War, was significant.'
p3593
aS'The nuclei of the armed bands that terrorized parts of France under aristocratic leaders during this period had been hardened in a generation of war in Germany, where troops still tended to operate autonomously.'
p3594
aS'Louis XIV, impressed as a young ruler with the experience of the Fronde, came to reorganize French fighting forces under a stricter hierarchy whose leaders ultimately could be made or unmade by the King.'
p3595
aS'A. Lloyd Moote argues that Cardinal_Mazarin blundered into the crisis but came out well ahead at the end.'
p3596
aS'The Fronde represented the final attempt of the French nobility to do battle with the king, and they were humiliated.'
p3597
aS'The long-term result was to strengthen Royal authority, but to weaken the economy.'
p3598
aS'The Fronde facilitated the emergence of absolute monarchy.'
p3599
aS'For example, nitrogen gas (N2) at 0degC and a pressure of  has a fugacity of .'
p3600
aS'This means that the chemical potential of real nitrogen at a pressure of 100 atm is less than if nitrogen were an ideal gas; the value of the chemical potential is that which nitrogen as an ideal gas would have at a pressure of 97.03 atmFugacities are determined experimentally or estimated from various models such as a Van der Waals gas that are closer to reality than an ideal gas.'
p3601
aS'The ideal gas pressure and fugacity are related through the dimensionless fugacity coefficient .For nitrogen at 100 atm, the fugacity coefficient is 97.03 atm / 100 atm  0.9703.'
p3602
aS'For an ideal gas, fugacity and pressure are equal so  is 1.The contribution of nonideality to the chemical potential of a real gas is equal to RT ln .'
p3603
aS'Again for nitrogen at 100 atm, the chemical potential is m  mid + RT ln 0.9703, which is less than the ideal value mid because of intermolecular attractive forces.The fugacity is closely related to the thermodynamic activity.'
p3604
aS'For a gas, the activity is simply the fugacity divided by a reference pressure to give a dimensionless quantity.'
p3605
aS'This reference pressure is called the standard state and normally chosen as 1 atmosphere or 1 bar, Again using nitrogen at 100 atm as an example, since the fugacity is 97.03 atm, the activity is just 97.03 without units.Accurate calculations of chemical equilibrium for real gases should use the fugacity rather than the pressure.'
p3606
aS'The adjectival form is fugal.'
p3607
aS'Variants include fughetta (literally, "a small fugue") and fugato (a passage in fugal style within another work that is not a fugue).A fugue usually has three sections: an exposition, a development, and finally, a recapitulation that contains the return of the subject in the fugue\'s tonic key, though not all fugues have a recapitulation.'
p3608
aS'In the Middle Ages, the term was widely used to denote any works in canonic style; by the Renaissance, it had come to denote specifically imitative works.'
p3609
aS'Since the 17th century, the term fugue has described what is commonly regarded as the most fully developed procedure of imitative counterpoint.Most fugues open with a short main theme, the subject, which then sounds successively in each voice (after the first voice is finished stating the subject, a second voice repeats the subject at a different pitch, and other voices repeat in the same way); when each voice has entered, the exposition is complete.'
p3610
aS'This is often followed by a connecting passage, or episode, developed from previously heard material; further "entries" of the subject then are heard in related keys.'
p3611
aS'Episodes (if applicable) and entries are usually alternated until the "final entry" of the subject, by which point the music has returned to the opening key, or tonic, which is often followed by closing material, the coda.'
p3612
aS'In this sense, a fugue is a style of composition, rather than a fixed structure.The form evolved during the 18th century from several earlier types of contrapuntal compositions, such as imitative ricercars, capriccios, canzonas, and fantasias.'
p3613
aS'Cylindrical ones are called carbon nanotubes or buckytubes.'
p3614
aS"Fullerenes are similar in structure to graphite, which is composed of stacked graphene sheets of linked hexagonal rings; but they may also contain pentagonal (or sometimes heptagonal) rings.The first fullerene molecule to be discovered, and the family's namesake, buckminsterfullerene (C60), was prepared in 1985 by Richard Smalley, Robert Curl, James Heath, Sean O'Brien, and Harold Kroto at Rice University."
p3615
aS'The name was a homage to Buckminster Fuller, whose geodesic domes it resembles.'
p3616
aS'The structure was also identified some five years earlier by Sumio Iijima, from an electron microscope image, where it formed the core of a "bucky onion."'
p3617
aS'Fullerenes have since been found to occur in nature.'
p3618
aS'More recently, fullerenes have been detected in outer space.'
p3619
aS'According to astronomer Letizia Stanghellini, "It\'s possible that buckyballs from outer space provided seeds for life on Earth.'
p3620
aS'Conversely, from the other perspective, this error is known as the actor-observer bias, in which people tend to overemphasize the role of a situation in their behaviors and underemphasize the role of their own personalities. ExamplesEdit Alice, a driver, is about to pass through an intersection.'
p3621
aS'Her light turns green, and she begins to accelerate, but another car drives through the red light, crossing in front of her.'
p3622
aS'Alice slams on the brakes, and is frustrated with the other driver, thinking that he was overtly being reckless; however, she is unaware that the other driver was actually suffering from his first episode of cataplexy - a temporary condition causing muscular weakness, and in this case, paralysis - rendering him incapable of stopping.'
p3623
aS'Of course, this was not anything the other driver could have foreseen or prevented, but as an outsider, Alice was inclined to believe that his behavior reflected his fundamental nature of poor driving skills or a reckless attitude. DetailsEdit The phrase was coined by Lee Ross some years after a classic experiment by Edward E. Jones and Victor Harris (1967).'
p3624
aS'Ross argued in a popular paper that the fundamental attribution error forms the conceptual bedrock for the field of social psychology.'
p3625
aS'Jones wrote that he found Ross\' phrase "overly provocative and somewhat misleading", and also joked: "Furthermore, I\'m angry that I didn\'t think of it first."'
p3626
aS'Some psychologists, including Daniel Gilbert, have used the phrase "correspondence bias" for the fundamental attribution error.'
p3627
aS'One major difference is that fungal cells have cell walls that contain chitin, unlike the cell walls of plants and some protists, which contain cellulose, and unlike the cell walls of bacteria.'
p3628
aS'These and other differences show that the fungi form a single group of related organisms, named the Eumycota (true fungi or Eumycetes), that share a common ancestor (is a monophyletic group).'
p3629
aS'This fungal group is distinct from the structurally similar myxomycetes (slime molds) and oomycetes (water molds).'
p3630
aS'The discipline of biology devoted to the study of fungi is known as mycology (from the Greek mukes, mukes, meaning "fungus").'
p3631
aS'Mycology has often been regarded as a branch of botany, even though it is a separate kingdom in biological taxonomy.'
p3632
aS'Genetic studies have shown that fungi are more closely related to animals than to plants.Abundant worldwide, most fungi are inconspicuous because of the small size of their structures, and their cryptic lifestyles in soil, on dead matter, and as symbionts of plants, animals, or other fungi.'
p3633
aS'They may become noticeable when fruiting, either as mushrooms or as molds.'
p3634
aS'It was largely an Italian phenomenon, though there were parallel movements in Russia, England and elsewhere.'
p3635
aS'The Futurists practised in every medium of art, including painting, sculpture, ceramics, graphic design, industrial design, interior design, urban design, theatre, film, fashion, textiles, literature, music, architecture and even gastronomy.'
p3636
aS"Its key figures were the Italians Filippo Tommaso Marinetti, Umberto Boccioni, Carlo Carra, Gino Severini, Giacomo Balla, Antonio Sant'Elia, Bruno Munari, Benedetta Cappa and Luigi Russolo, the Russians Natalia Goncharova, Velimir Khlebnikov, Igor Severyanin, David Burliuk, Aleksei Kruchenykh and Vladimir Mayakovsky, and the Portuguese Almada Negreiros."
p3637
aS'It glorified modernity and aimed to liberate Italy from the weight of its past.'
p3638
aS"Cubism contributed to the formation of Italian Futurism's artistic style."
p3639
aS"Important Futurist works included Marinetti's Manifesto of Futurism, Boccioni's sculpture Unique Forms of Continuity in Space and Balla's painting, Abstract Speed + Sound (pictured)."
p3640
aS'To some extent Futurism influenced the art movements Art Deco, Constructivism, Surrealism, Dada, and to a greater degree Precisionism, Rayonism, and Vorticism. Italian Futurism Futurism is an avant-garde movement founded in Milan in 1909 by the Italian poet Filippo Tommaso Marinetti.'
p3641
aS"Many of his works are marked by a preoccupation with Christianity, explored through the prism of the individual confronted with life's hardships and beauty.He began writing in his 20s, and his first novel, Poor Folk, was published in 1846 when he was 25."
p3642
aS'His major works include Crime_and_Punishment (1866), The Idiot (1869), Demons (1872) and The_Brothers_Karamazov (1880).'
p3643
aS'His output consists of eleven novels, three novellas, seventeen short novels and numerous other works.'
p3644
aS'Many literary critics rate him as one of the greatest psychologists in world literature.'
p3645
aS'His novella Notes From Underground is considered to be one of the first works of existentialist literature.Born in Moscow in 1821, Dostoyevsky was introduced to literature at an early age through fairy tales and legends, and through books by Russian and foreign authors.'
p3646
aS'His mother died in 1837, when he was 15, and around the same time he left school to enter the Nikolayev Military Engineering Institute.'
p3647
aS'After graduating, he worked as an engineer and briefly enjoyed a lavish lifestyle, translating books to earn extra money.'
p3648
aS'Along with Russell, he led the turn away from idealism in British philosophy, and became well known for his advocacy of common sense concepts, his contributions to ethics, epistemology, and metaphysics, and "his exceptional personality and moral character."'
p3649
aS'He was Professor of Philosophy at the University of Cambridge, highly influential among (though not a member of) the Bloomsbury Group, and the editor of the influential journal Mind.'
p3650
aS'He was elected a fellow of the British Academy in 1918.'
p3651
aS'He was a member of the Cambridge Apostles, the intellectual secret society, from 1894, and the Cambridge University Moral Sciences Club. Life and work Moore was born in South London on 4 November 1873.'
p3652
aS'His eldest brother was Thomas Sturge Moore, a poet, writer and engraver.In 1892, he was educated at Dulwich College and then attended Trinity College Cambridge to study classics for moral sciences.'
p3653
aS'He became a Fellow of Trinity in 1898, and went on to hold the University of Cambridge chair of mental philosophy and logic, from 1925 to 1939.Moore is best known today for his defence of ethical non-naturalism, his emphasis on common sense in philosophical method, and the paradox that bears his name.'
p3654
aS'He was admired by and influential among other philosophers, and also by the Bloomsbury Group, but is (unlike his colleague Russell) mostly unknown today outside of academic philosophy.'
p3655
aS'Set in 1925, the story unravels in Ilheus, a quiet northeastern coastal city thriving with cocoa crops and aspirations for progress, even though the traditional ways still rule.'
p3656
aS'Fleeing the drought from the Brazilian backlands, gorgeous Gabriela fascinates everyone with her beauty.'
p3657
aS'At first unaware of the ardent love that will grow between them, Nacib, a Turkish immigrant who owns the Vesuvio bar, hires Gabriela (played by Juliana Paes - India, A Love Story) to cook at his establishment.'
p3658
aS'She waits on the Colonels whose political powers dictate the gossip ridden town.'
p3659
aS"But Gabriela's irresistible beauty and earthy sensuality continue to unintentionally trigger every man's lustful desire, driving Nacib to the brink of jealous insanity."
p3660
aS'He realizes he cannot live without her, and when he finds out his burning passion is mutual, Nacib asks Gabriela to marry him.'
p3661
aS'Gabriela accepts his proposal, much to the dismay of the colonels who long for her.'
p3662
aS'There he received detailed training in the arts of fugue and counterpoint.'
p3663
aS'Mayr was also instrumental in obtaining a place for the young man at the Bologna Academy, where, at the age of 19, he wrote his first one-act opera, the comedy Il Pigmalione, which may not have ever been performed during his lifetime.Over the course of his career, Donizetti wrote almost 70 operas.'
p3664
aS"An offer in 1822 from Domenico Barbaja, the impresario of the Teatro di San Carlo in Naples, which followed the composer's ninth opera, led to his move to that city and his residency there which lasted until the production of Caterina Cornaro in January 1844."
p3665
aS"In all, Naples presented 51 of Donizetti's operas.Before 1830, success came primarily with his comic operas, the serious ones failing to attract significant audiences."
p3666
aS'However, his first notable success came with an opera seria, Zoraida di Granata, which was presented in 1822 in Rome.'
p3667
aS"In 1830, when Anna Bolena was premiered, Donizetti made a major impact on the Italian and international opera scene and this shifted the balance of success away from primarily comedic operas, although even after that date, his best-known works included comedies such as L'elisir d'amore (1832) and Don Pasquale (1843)."
p3668
aS'Significant historical dramas did appear and became successful; they included Lucia di Lammermoor (the first to have a libretto written by Salvadore Cammarano) given in Naples in 1835, and one of the most successful Neapolitan operas, Roberto Devereux in 1837.'
p3669
aS'The surgical removal of the gallbladder is called a cholecystectomy. Structure The gallbladder is a hollow organ that sits just beneath the right lobe of the liver.'
p3670
aS'In adults, the gallbladder measures approximately 8 centimetres (3.1 in) in length and 4 centimetres (1.6 in) in diameter when fully distended.'
p3671
aS'The gallbladder has a capacity of about 100 mL.The gallbladder is shaped like a tapered sac, with the open end opening into the biliary tree and the cystic duct.'
p3672
aS'Anatomically, the gallbladder is divided into three sections: the fundus, body, and neck: The fundus is a rounded end that faces the front of the body.'
p3673
aS'The body is in contact with the liver, lying in the gallbladder fossa, a depression at the bottom of the liver.'
p3674
aS'The neck tapers and is continuous with the cystic duct, part of the biliary tree.'
p3675
aS'The cystic duct unites with the common hepatic duct to become the common bile duct.'
p3676
aS'His nationalization of the Suez Canal Company and the brief union he presided over with Syria were acclaimed throughout the Arab world.'
p3677
aS"However, his intervention in the North Yemen Civil War was largely unsuccessful and his prestige took a blow with Egypt's defeat in the Six-Day War.Nasser led the 1952 overthrow of the monarchy and introduced far-reaching land reforms the following year."
p3678
aS'Following a 1954 Muslim Brotherhood-led attempt on his life, he cracked down on the organization, put President Muhammad Naguib under house arrest, and assumed executive office, officially becoming president in June 1956.'
p3679
aS"Nasser's nationalization of the Suez Canal and his emergence as the political victor from the subsequent Suez Crisis substantially elevated his popularity in Egypt and the Arab world."
p3680
aS'Calls for pan-Arab unity under his leadership increased, culminating with the formation of the United Arab Republic with Syria (1958-1961).'
p3681
aS'In 1962, Nasser began a series of major socialist measures and modernization reforms in Egypt.'
p3682
aS"Despite setbacks to his pan-Arabist cause, by 1963 Nasser's supporters gained power in several Arab countries and he became embroiled in the North Yemen Civil War.He began his second presidential term in March 1965 after his political opponents were banned from running."
p3683
aS'Bursts can last from ten milliseconds to several hours.'
p3684
aS'The initial burst is usually followed by a longer-lived "afterglow" emitted at longer wavelengths (X-ray, ultraviolet, optical, infrared, microwave and radio).Most observed GRBs are believed to consist of a narrow beam of intense radiation released during a supernova or hypernova as a rapidly rotating, high-mass star collapses to form a neutron star, quark star, or black hole.'
p3685
aS'A subclass of GRBs (the "short" bursts) appear to originate from a different process - this may be due to the merger of binary neutron stars.'
p3686
aS'The cause of the precursor burst observed in some of these short events may be due to the development of a resonance between the crust and core of such stars as a result of the massive tidal forces experienced in the seconds leading up to their collision, causing the entire crust of the star to shatter.The sources of most GRBs are billions of light years away from Earth, implying that the explosions are both extremely energetic (a typical burst releases as much energy in a few seconds as the Sun will in its entire 10-billion-year lifetime) and extremely rare (a few per galaxy per million years).'
p3687
aS'All observed GRBs have originated from outside the Milky Way galaxy, although a related class of phenomena, soft gamma repeater flares, are associated with magnetars within the Milky Way.'
p3688
aS'It has been hypothesized that a gamma-ray burst in the Milky Way, pointing directly towards the Earth, could cause a mass extinction event.GRBs were first detected in 1967 by the Vela satellites, a series of satellites designed to detect covert nuclear weapons tests.'
p3689
aS'Hundreds of theoretical models were proposed to explain these bursts in the years following their discovery, such as collisions between comets and neutron stars.'
p3690
aS'It was derived from the Phoenician letter Gimel .'
p3691
aS"Letters that arose from gamma include the Roman C and G and the Cyrillic letters G and G'. Uses  Greek In Ancient Greek, gamma represented a voiced velar stop /g/."
p3692
aS'In Modern Greek, it represents a voiced fricative.'
p3693
aS'It is realized either as a palatal /j/ (before a front vowel, /e, i/), or as a velar /g/ (in all other environments).Both in Ancient and in Modern Greek, before other velars (k, kh, x k, kh, ks), gamma represents a velar nasal /NG/.'
p3694
aS'A double gamma gg represents the sequence /NGg/ (phonetically varying [NGg~g]) or /NGg/. International Phonetic Alphabet In the International Phonetic Alphabet, lowercase gamma (g) represents the voiced velar fricative.'
p3695
aS'A lowercase gamma that lies above the baseline rather than crossing it (u) represents the close-mid back unrounded vowel. Mathematics and science  Lower case The lower-case letter  is used as a symbol for:Chromatic number of a graph, sometimes  (Chi) is used, which is also used for the Euler_characteristicGamma radiation in nuclear physicsThe photon, the elementary particle of lightSurface energy in materials scienceThe Lorentz factor in theory of relativityThe heat capacity ratio Cp/Cv in thermodynamicsThe activity coefficient in thermodynamicsThe gyromagnetic ratio in electromagnetismGamma oscillation in neuroscienceGamma motoneurons in neuroscienceGamma is a non-SI metric unit of measure of mass equal to one microgram (1 mg).'
p3696
aS'This always-rare use is currently deprecated.Gamma is also a non-SI unit of measure of magnetic flux density, sometimes used in geophysics, equal to 1 nanotesla (nT).The power by which the luminance of an image is increased in gamma correctionThe Euler-Mascheroni constantIn mechanical engineering:Specific weightThe shear rate of a fluid is represented by a lower case gamma with a dot above it: Austenite (also known as g-iron), a metallic non-magnetic allotrope or solid solution of iron.The gamma carbon is the third carbon attached to a functional group in Organic Chemistry and Biochemistry nomenclature; see Alpha and beta carbon Upper case The upper-case letter  is used as a symbol for:In mathematics, the gamma function (usually written as -function) is an extension of the factorial to complex numbersIn probability theory and statistics, the gamma distribution is a two-parameter family of continuous probability distributions.Circulation in fluid mechanicsAs reflection coefficient in physics and electrical engineeringThe tape alphabet of a Turing machineThe Feferman-Schutte ordinal G0 Meteorology Gamma was one of the names used in the 2005 Atlantic hurricane season as Tropical Storm Gamma. Technical notes  HTML The HTML entities for uppercase and lowercase gamma are &Gamma; and &gamma;. Unicode Greek GammaCoptic GammaLatin / phonetic GammaCJK Square GammaTechnical / Mathematical GammaThese characters are used only as mathematical symbols.'
p3697
aS'Completing an orbit in roughly seven days, Ganymede participates in a 1:2:4 orbital resonance with the moons Europa and Io, respectively.'
p3698
aS"It has a diameter of 5,268 km (3,273 mi), 8% larger than that of the planet Mercury, but has only 45% of the latter's mass."
p3699
aS"Its diameter is 2% larger than that of Saturn's Titan, the second largest moon."
p3700
aS'It also has the highest mass of all planetary satellites, with 2.02 times the mass of the Moon.'
p3701
aS'Additionally, it is the 9th largest object in the Solar System, and the largest without a substantial atmosphere.Ganymede is composed of approximately equal amounts of silicate rock and water ice.'
p3702
aS"It is a fully differentiated body with an iron-rich, liquid core, and an internal ocean that may contain more water than all of Earth's oceans together."
p3703
aS'Its surface is composed of two main types of terrain.'
p3704
aS"In 1998, Gao was granted French citizenship.Gao's drama is considered to be fundamentally absurdist in nature and avant-garde in his native China."
p3705
aS"His prose works tend to be less celebrated in China but are highly regarded elsewhere in Europe and the West. Early life Gao's original home town is Taizhou, Jiangsu."
p3706
aS'Born in Ganzhou, Jiangxi, China in 1940, Gao has been a French citizen since 1998.'
p3707
aS"In 1992 he was awarded the Chevalier de l'Ordre des Arts et des Lettres by the French government. Early years in Jiangxi and Jiangsu Gao's father was a clerk in the Bank of China, and his mother was a member of the Young Men's Christian Association."
p3708
aS'His mother was once a playactress of Anti-Japanese Theatre during the Second Sino-Japanese War.'
p3709
aS"Under his mother's influence, Gao enjoyed painting, writing and theatre very much when he was a little boy."
p3710
aS'During his middle school years, he read lots of literature translated from the West, and he studied sketching, ink and wash painting, oil painting and clay sculpture under the guidance of painter Yun Zongying (simplified Chinese: Yun Zong Ying ; traditional Chinese: Yun Zong Ying ; pinyin: Yun Zongying).In 1950, his family moved to Nanjing.'
p3711
aS'The censors of the College de la Sorbonne stigmatized it as obscene, and in a social climate of increasing religious oppression, it was treated with suspicion, and contemporaries avoided mentioning it.'
p3712
aS'According to Rabelais, the philosophy of his giant Pantagruel, "Pantagruelism", is rooted in "a certain gaiety of mind pickled in the scorn of fortuitous things" (French: une certaine gaite d\'esprit confite dans le mepris des choses fortuites).Rabelais had studied Ancient Greek and he applied it in inventing hundreds of new words in the text, some of which became part of the French_language.'
p3713
aS'Wordplay and risque humor abound in his writing. Initial publication Although different editions divide the work into a varying number of tomes, the original book is a single novel consisting of five volumes. Plot summary  Pantagruel The full modern English title for the work commonly known as Pantagruel is The Horrible and Terrifying Deeds and Words of the Very Renowned Pantagruel King of the Dipsodes, Son of the Great Giant Gargantua and in French, Les horribles et epouvantables faits et prouesses du tres renomme Pantagruel Roi des Dipsodes, fils du Grand Geant Gargantua.'
p3714
aS'The original title of the work was Pantagruel roy des dipsodes restitue a son naturel avec ses faictz et prouesses espoventables.'
p3715
aS'Although most modern editions of Rabelais\'s work place Pantagruel as the second volume of a series, it was actually published first, around 1532 under the pen name "Alcofribas Nasier", an anagram of Francois Rabelais.'
p3716
aS'Pantagruel was a sequel to an anonymous book entitled The Great Chronicles of the Great and Enormous Giant Gargantua (in French, Les Grandes Chroniques du Grand et Enorme Geant Gargantua).'
p3717
aS'This early Gargantua text enjoyed great popularity, despite its rather poor construction.'
p3718
aS'The censors of the College de la Sorbonne stigmatized it as obscene, and in a social climate of increasing religious oppression, it was treated with suspicion, and contemporaries avoided mentioning it.'
p3719
aS'According to Rabelais, the philosophy of his giant Pantagruel, "Pantagruelism", is rooted in "a certain gaiety of mind pickled in the scorn of fortuitous things" (French: une certaine gaite d\'esprit confite dans le mepris des choses fortuites).Rabelais had studied Ancient Greek and he applied it in inventing hundreds of new words in the text, some of which became part of the French_language.'
p3720
aS'Wordplay and risque humor abound in his writing. Initial publication Although different editions divide the work into a varying number of tomes, the original book is a single novel consisting of five volumes. Plot summary  Pantagruel The full modern English title for the work commonly known as Pantagruel is The Horrible and Terrifying Deeds and Words of the Very Renowned Pantagruel King of the Dipsodes, Son of the Great Giant Gargantua and in French, Les horribles et epouvantables faits et prouesses du tres renomme Pantagruel Roi des Dipsodes, fils du Grand Geant Gargantua.'
p3721
aS'The original title of the work was Pantagruel roy des dipsodes restitue a son naturel avec ses faictz et prouesses espoventables.'
p3722
aS'Although most modern editions of Rabelais\'s work place Pantagruel as the second volume of a series, it was actually published first, around 1532 under the pen name "Alcofribas Nasier", an anagram of Francois Rabelais.'
p3723
aS'Pantagruel was a sequel to an anonymous book entitled The Great Chronicles of the Great and Enormous Giant Gargantua (in French, Les Grandes Chroniques du Grand et Enorme Geant Gargantua).'
p3724
aS'This early Gargantua text enjoyed great popularity, despite its rather poor construction.'
p3725
aS'These included raids or invasions of the Kara-Khitan Khanate, Caucasus, Khwarezmid Empire, Western Xia and Jin dynasties.'
p3726
aS'These campaigns were often accompanied by wholesale massacres of the civilian populations - especially in the Khwarezmian and Xia controlled lands.'
p3727
aS'By the end of his life, the Mongol Empire occupied a substantial portion of Central Asia and China.Before Genghis_Khan died, he assigned Ogedei Khan as his successor and split his empire into khanates among his sons and grandsons.'
p3728
aS'He died in 1227 after defeating the Western Xia.'
p3729
aS'He was buried in an unmarked grave somewhere in Mongolia at an unknown location.'
p3730
aS'His descendants extended the Mongol Empire across most of Eurasia by conquering or creating vassal states out of all of modern-day China, Korea, the Caucasus, Central Asia, and substantial portions of modern Eastern Europe, Russia, and Southwest Asia.'
p3731
aS'Many of these invasions repeated the earlier large-scale slaughters of local populations.'
p3732
aS'His father and grandfather were both London vintners; several previous generations had been merchants in Ipswich.'
p3733
aS'(His family name derives from the French chausseur, meaning "shoemaker".)'
p3734
aS"In 1324 John Chaucer, Geoffrey's father, was kidnapped by an aunt in the hope of marrying the twelve-year-old boy to her daughter in an attempt to keep property in Ipswich."
p3735
aS'The aunt was imprisoned and the PS250 fine levied suggests that the family was financially secure--bourgeois, if not elite.'
p3736
aS'John Chaucer married Agnes Copton, who, in 1349, inherited properties including 24 shops in London from her uncle, Hamo de Copton, who is described in a will dated 3 April 1354 and listed in the City Hustings Roll as "moneyer"; he was said to be moneyer at the Tower of London.'
p3737
aS"In the City Hustings Roll 110, 5, Ric II, dated June 1380, Geoffrey_Chaucer refers to himself as me Galfridum Chaucer, filium Johannis Chaucer, Vinetarii, Londonie' .While records concerning the lives of his contemporary poets, William Langland and the Pearl Poet are practically non-existent, since Chaucer was a public servant, his official life is very well documented, with nearly five hundred written items testifying to his career."
p3738
aS'The first of the "Chaucer Life Records" appears in 1357, in the household accounts of Elizabeth de Burgh, the Countess of Ulster, when he became the noblewoman\'s page through his father\'s connections, a common medieval form of apprenticeship for boys into knighthood or prestige appointments.'
p3739
aS"', presenting pioneering analyses of social individuality and fragmentation."
p3740
aS'For Simmel, culture referred to "the cultivation of individuals through the agency of external forms which have been objectified in the course of history".'
p3741
aS'Simmel discussed social and cultural phenomena in terms of "forms" and "contents" with a transient relationship; form becoming content, and vice versa, dependent on the context.'
p3742
aS'In this sense he was a forerunner to structuralist styles of reasoning in the social sciences.'
p3743
aS"With his work on the metropolis, Simmel was a precursor of urban sociology, symbolic interactionism and social network analysis.An acquaintance of Max_Weber, Simmel wrote on the topic of personal character in a manner reminiscent of the sociological 'ideal type'."
p3744
aS'He broadly rejected academic standards, however, philosophically covering topics such as emotion and romantic love.'
p3745
aS"Both Simmel and Weber's nonpositivist theory would inform the eclectic critical theory of the Frankfurt School.Simmel's most famous works today are The Problems of the Philosophy of History (1892), The Philosophy of Money (1907), The Metropolis and Mental Life (1903), Soziologie (1908, inc."
p3746
aS'In particular, he developed the notion of the master-slave dialectic and the concept of Geist ("mind-spirit") as the expression of the integration ("sublation", Aufheben), without elimination or reduction, of otherwise seemingly contradictory or opposing ideas.'
p3747
aS'Examples include relationships between nature and freedom and between immanence and transcendence.'
p3748
aS'He also made original and influential contributions to speculative logic, the role of history, and the concepts of negativity and the ethical.Hegel influenced many thinkers and writers whose own positions varied widely.'
p3749
aS'Karl Barth described Hegel as a "Protestant Aquinas", while Maurice Merleau-Ponty wrote that "All the great philosophical ideas of the past century - the philosophies of Marx and Nietzsche, phenomenology, German existentialism, and psychoanalysis - had their beginnings in Hegel". Life  Early years  Childhood Hegel was born on August 27, 1770 in Stuttgart, in the Duchy of Wurttemberg in southwestern Germany.'
p3750
aS'Christened Georg Wilhelm Friedrich, he was known as Wilhelm to his close family.'
p3751
aS'His father, Georg Ludwig, was Rentkammersekretar (secretary to the revenue office) at the court of Karl Eugen, Duke of Wurttemberg.'
p3752
aS"Hegel's mother, Maria Magdalena Louisa (nee Fromm), was the daughter of a lawyer at the High Court of Justice at the Wurttemberg court."
p3753
aS'Berkeley is also known for his critique of abstraction, an important premise in his argument for immaterialism.In 1709, Berkeley published his first major work, An Essay towards a New Theory of Vision, in which he discussed the limitations of human vision and advanced the theory that the proper objects of sight are not material objects, but light and colour.'
p3754
aS'This foreshadowed his chief philosophical work A Treatise Concerning the Principles of Human Knowledge in 1710 which, after its poor reception, he rewrote in dialogue form and published under the title Three Dialogues between Hylas and Philonous in 1713.In this book, Berkeley\'s views were represented by Philonous (Greek: "lover of mind"), while Hylas (Greek: "matter") embodies the Irish thinker\'s opponents, in particular John Locke.'
p3755
aS"Berkeley argued against Sir Isaac_Newton's doctrine of absolute space, time and motion in De Motu (On Motion), published 1721."
p3756
aS'His arguments were a precursor to the views of Mach and Einstein.'
p3757
aS'In 1732, he published Alciphron, a Christian apologetic against the free-thinkers, and in 1734, he published The Analyst, a critique of the foundations of calculus, which was influential in the development of mathematics.His last major philosophical work, Siris (1744), begins by advocating the medicinal use of tar water, and then continues to discuss a wide range of topics including science, philosophy, and theology.'
p3758
aS"Interest in Berkeley's work increased after World_War_II, because he tackled many of the issues of paramount interest to philosophy in the 20th century such as the problems of perception, the difference between primary and secondary qualities, and the importance of language. Biography  Ireland Berkeley was born at his family home, Dysart Castle, near Thomastown, County Kilkenny, Ireland, the eldest son of William Berkeley, a cadet of the noble family of Berkeley."
p3759
aS"He was educated at Kilkenny College and attended Trinity College, Dublin, completing a master's degree in 1707."
p3760
aS'He was also an essayist, novelist and short story writer.'
p3761
aS'Nearly all his writings address prevailing social problems with a vein of comedy which makes their stark themes more palatable.'
p3762
aS"Issues which engaged Shaw's attention included education, marriage, religion, government, health care, and class privilege.He was most angered by what he perceived as the exploitation of the working class."
p3763
aS'An ardent socialist, Shaw wrote many brochures and speeches for the Fabian Society.'
p3764
aS'He became an accomplished orator in the furtherance of its causes, which included gaining equal rights for men and women, alleviating abuses of the working class, rescinding private ownership of productive land, and promoting healthy lifestyles.'
p3765
aS'For a short time he was active in local politics, serving on the St Pancras Vestry.Shaw was noted for expressing his views in uncompromising language, whether on vegetarianism (branding his own pre-vegetarian self a "cannibal"), the development of the human race (his own brand of eugenics was driven by encouragement of miscegenation and marrying across class lines), or on political questions (in spite of his own generally liberal views he was not an uncritical supporter of democracy, and is even recorded as supporting, or at least condoning, the dictators of the 1930s).In 1898, Shaw married Charlotte Payne-Townshend, a fellow Fabian, whom he survived.'
p3766
aS"They settled in Ayot St Lawrence in a house now called Shaw's Corner."
p3767
aS"Chapman has been identified as the Rival Poet of Shakespeare's sonnets by William Minto, and as an anticipator of the Metaphysical Poets of the 17th century."
p3768
aS"Chapman is best remembered for his translations of Homer's Iliad and Odyssey, and the Homeric Batrachomyomachia. Life and work Chapman was born at Hitchin in Hertfordshire."
p3769
aS'There is conjecture that he studied at Oxford but did not take a degree, though no reliable evidence affirms this.'
p3770
aS"We know very little about Chapman's early life, but Mark Eccles uncovered records that reveal much about Chapman's difficulties and expectations."
p3771
aS'In 1585 Chapman was approached in a friendly fashion by John Wolfall, Sr., who offered to supply a bond of surety for a loan to furnish Chapman money "for his proper use in Attendance upon the then Right Honorable Sir Rafe Sadler Knight."'
p3772
aS"Chapman's courtly ambitions led him into a trap."
p3773
aS'He apparently never received any money, but he would be plagued for many years by the papers he had signed.'
p3774
aS"Female authors were published under their own names during Eliot's life, but she wanted to escape the stereotype of women only writing lighthearted romances."
p3775
aS'She also wished to have her fiction judged separately from her already extensive and widely known work as an editor and critic.'
p3776
aS'An additional factor in her use of a pen name may have been a desire to shield her private life from public scrutiny and to prevent scandals attending her relationship with the married George Henry Lewes, with whom she lived for over 20 years.Her 1872 work Middlemarch has been described by Martin Amis and Julian Barnes as the greatest novel in the English language. Life  Early life and education Mary Ann Evans was born in Nuneaton, Warwickshire, England.'
p3777
aS'She was the second child of Robert Evans (1773-1849) and Christiana Evans (nee Pearson, 1788-1836), the daughter of a local mill-owner.'
p3778
aS"Mary Ann's name was sometimes shortened to Marian."
p3779
aS'Her full siblings were Christiana, known as Chrissey (1814-59), Isaac (1816-1890), and twin brothers who survived a few days in March 1821.'
p3780
aS"She also had a half-brother, Robert (1802-64), and half-sister, Fanny (1805-82), from her father's previous marriage to Harriet Poynton (?1780-1809)."
p3781
aS'5 March] - 14 April 1759) was a German-born, British Baroque composer who spent the bulk of his career in London, becoming well known for his operas, oratorios, anthems, and organ concertos.'
p3782
aS'Born in a family indifferent to music, Handel received critical training in Halle, Hamburg and Italy before settling in London (1712), and became a naturalized British subject in 1727.'
p3783
aS'He was strongly influenced both by the great composers of the Italian Baroque and the middle-German polyphonic choral tradition.Within fifteen years, Handel had started three commercial opera companies to supply the English nobility with Italian opera.'
p3784
aS'Musicologist Winton Dean writes that his operas show that "Handel was not only a great composer; he was a dramatic genius of the first order."'
p3785
aS"As Alexander's Feast (1736) was well received, Handel made a transition to English choral works."
p3786
aS'After his success with Messiah (1742) he never performed an Italian opera again.'
p3787
aS'Almost blind, and having lived in England for nearly fifty years, he died in 1759, a respected and rich man.'
p3788
aS'Among his best-known works are the orchestral compositions Rhapsody in Blue (1924) and An American in Paris (1928) as well as the opera Porgy and Bess (1935).Gershwin studied piano under Charles Hambitzer and composition with Rubin Goldmark and Henry Cowell.'
p3789
aS'He began his career as a song plugger, but soon started composing Broadway theatre works with his brother Ira Gershwin, and Buddy DeSylva.'
p3790
aS'He moved to Paris to study with Nadia Boulanger, where he began to compose An American in Paris.'
p3791
aS'After returning to New_York_City, he wrote Porgy and Bess with Ira and the author DuBose Heyward.'
p3792
aS"Initially a commercial failure, Porgy and Bess is now considered one of the most important American operas of the twentieth century.Gershwin moved to Hollywood and composed numerous film scores until his death in 1937 from a brain tumor.Gershwin's compositions have been adapted for use in many films and for television, and several became jazz standards recorded in many variations."
p3793
aS'Many celebrated singers and musicians have covered his songs. Biography  Early Life Gershwin was born of Russian and Lithuanian Jewish descent.'
p3794
aS'His grandfather, Jakov Gershowitz, had served for 25 years as a mechanic for the Imperial Russian Army to earn the right of free travel and residence as a Jew.'
p3795
aS'He was the third British monarch of the House of Hanover, but unlike his two predecessors he was born in Britain, spoke English as his first language, and never visited Hanover.His life and reign, which were longer than any other British monarch before him, were marked by a series of military conflicts involving his kingdoms, much of the rest of Europe, and places farther afield in Africa, the Americas and Asia.'
p3796
aS"Early in his reign, Great Britain defeated France in the Seven Years' War, becoming the dominant European power in North America and India."
p3797
aS"However, many of Britain's American colonies were soon lost in the American Revolutionary War."
p3798
aS'Further wars against revolutionary and Napoleonic France from 1793 concluded in the defeat of Napoleon at the Battle of Waterloo in 1815.In the later part of his life, George III suffered from recurrent, and eventually permanent, mental illness.'
p3799
aS'Although it has since been suggested that he suffered from the blood disease porphyria, the cause of his illness remains unknown.'
p3800
aS"After a final relapse in 1810, a regency was established, and George III's eldest son, George, Prince of Wales, ruled as Prince Regent."
p3801
aS'On George III\'s death, the Prince Regent succeeded his father as George IV.Historical analysis of George III\'s life has gone through a "kaleidoscope of changing views" that have depended heavily on the prejudices of his biographers and the sources available to them.'
p3802
aS'During the American Civil War he served as a Union general, rising from command of a brigade to the Army of the Potomac.'
p3803
aS"He is best known for defeating Confederate General Robert E. Lee at the Battle_of_Gettysburg in 1863.Meade's Civil War combat experience started as a brigade commander in the Peninsula Campaign and the Seven Days Battles, including the Battle of Glendale, where he was wounded severely."
p3804
aS'As a division commander, he had notable success at the Battle of South Mountain and assumed temporary corps command at the Battle_of_Antietam.'
p3805
aS'His division was arguably the most successful during the assaults at the Battle of Fredericksburg.During the Gettysburg Campaign, he was appointed to command the Army of the Potomac just three days before the Battle_of_Gettysburg, but was able to organize his forces to fight a successful defensive battle against Robert E. Lee.'
p3806
aS'This victory was marred by his ineffective pursuit during the Retreat from Gettysburg, by the inconclusive campaigns in the fall of 1863, and by intense political rivalries within the Army, notably with Daniel Sickles.In 1864-65, Meade continued to command the Army of the Potomac through the Overland Campaign, the Richmond-Petersburg Campaign, and the Appomattox Campaign, but he was overshadowed by the direct supervision of the general in chief, Lt. Gen. Ulysses S. Grant, who accompanied him throughout these campaigns.'
p3807
aS'He also suffered from a reputation as a man of short, violent temper who was hostile toward the press and received hostility in return.'
p3808
aS'After the war, he commanded several important departments during Reconstruction. Early life and education Meade was born in 1815 in Cadiz, Spain, the eighth of eleven children of Richard Worsam Meade (1778-1828) and Margaret Coats Butler (1782-1852).'
p3809
aS'At the age of 14 he was sent to a Moravian School in Neuwied, Germany, where he remained for two years.'
p3810
aS'He read law and was articled as a solicitor, but abandoned that profession for journalism and poetry.'
p3811
aS'He collaborated with Edward Gryffydh Peacock, son of Thomas Love Peacock in publishing a privately circulated literary magazine, the Monthly Observer.'
p3812
aS"He married Edward Peacock's widowed sister Mary Ellen Nicolls in 1849 when he was twenty-one years old and she was twenty-eight.He collected his early writings, first published in periodicals, into Poems, published to some acclaim in 1851."
p3813
aS'In 1856 he posed as the model for The Death of Chatterton, a hugely popular painting by the English Pre-Raphaelite painter Henry Wallis (1830-1916).'
p3814
aS'His wife ran off with Wallis in 1858; she died three years later.'
p3815
aS'The collection of "sonnets" entitled Modern Love (1862) came of this experience as did The Ordeal of Richard Feverel, his first "major novel".He married Marie Vulliamy in 1864 and settled in Surrey.'
p3816
aS'He is perhaps best known for his dystopian novel Nineteen Eighty-Four (1949) and the allegorical novella Animal Farm (1945).'
p3817
aS'His non-fiction works, including The Road to Wigan Pier (1937), documenting his experience of working class life in the north of England, and Homage to Catalonia (1938), an account of his experiences in the Spanish_Civil_War, are widely acclaimed, as are his essays on politics, literature, language, and culture.'
p3818
aS'In 2008, The Times ranked him second on a list of "The 50 greatest British writers since 1945".Orwell\'s work continues to influence popular and political culture, and the term Orwellian--descriptive of totalitarian or authoritarian social practices--has entered the language together with many of his neologisms, including, but not limited to, cold war, Big Brother, Thought Police, Room 101, Memory hole, doublethink, and thoughtcrime. Life  Early years Eric Arthur Blair was born on 25 June 1903, in Motihari, Bengal Presidency (present-day Bihar), in British India.'
p3819
aS'His great-grandfather Charles Blair was a wealthy country gentleman in Dorset who married Lady Mary Fane, daughter of Thomas Fane, 8th Earl of Westmorland, and had income as an absentee landlord of plantations in Jamaica.'
p3820
aS'His grandfather, Thomas Richard Arthur Blair, was a clergyman.'
p3821
aS'Although the gentility passed down the generations, the prosperity did not; Eric Blair described his family as "lower-upper-middle class".'
p3822
aS'His father, Richard Walmesley Blair, worked in the Opium Department of the Indian Civil Service.'
p3823
aS'He presided over the convention that drafted the current United_States Constitution.'
p3824
aS'Even while alive he was called the "father of his country".Widely admired for his strong leadership qualities, Washington was unanimously elected President in the first two national elections.'
p3825
aS'He oversaw the creation of a strong, well-financed national government that maintained neutrality in the French Revolutionary Wars, suppressed the Whiskey_Rebellion, and won acceptance among Americans of all types.'
p3826
aS"Washington's incumbency established many precedents, still in use today, such as the cabinet system, the inaugural address, and the title Mr. President."
p3827
aS'His retirement from office after two terms established a tradition which was unbroken until 1940.Born into the provincial gentry of Colonial Virginia, his family were wealthy planters who owned tobacco plantations and slaves which he inherited; he owned hundreds of slaves throughout his lifetime, but his views on slavery evolved.'
p3828
aS'In his youth he became a senior British officer in the colonial militia during the first stages of the French and Indian War.'
p3829
aS'In 1775, the Second Continental Congress commissioned Washington as commander-in-chief of the Continental Army in the American Revolution.'
p3830
aS'He was recognised as an outstanding pianist, though he chose not to capitalise on this skill and rarely performed in public.'
p3831
aS'Returning to Paris after almost three years in Italy, he found that the main Parisian opera theatres preferred the established classical repertoire to the works of newcomers.'
p3832
aS'His keyboard and orchestral compositions were likewise largely ignored; as a result, his career stalled, and he earned his living mainly by arranging and transcribing the music of others.'
p3833
aS'Restless for success, he began many theatrical projects during the 1860s, most of which were abandoned.'
p3834
aS"Neither of his two operas that reached the stage in this time--Les pecheurs de perles and La jolie fille de Perth--were immediately successful.After the Franco-Prussian_War of 1870-71, during which Bizet served in the National Guard, he had little success with his one-act opera Djamileh, though an orchestral suite derived from his incidental music to Alphonse Daudet's play L'Arlesienne was instantly popular."
p3835
aS"The production of Bizet's final opera, Carmen, was delayed because of fears that its themes of betrayal and murder would offend audiences."
p3836
aS"After its premiere on 3 March 1875, Bizet was convinced that the work was a failure; he died of a heart attack three months later, unaware that it would prove a spectacular and enduring success.Bizet's marriage to Genevieve Halevy was intermittently happy and produced one son."
p3837
aS'His experimental explorations in prosody (especially sprung rhythm) and his use of imagery established him as a daring innovator in a period of largely traditional verse. Life  Early life and family Gerard_Manley_Hopkins was born in Stratford, Essex (now in Greater London), as the first of nine children to Manley and Catherine (Smith) Hopkins.'
p3838
aS'His father founded a marine insurance firm and, at one time, served as the Hawaiian consul general in London.'
p3839
aS'He was also, for a time, the church warden at St John-at-Hampstead.'
p3840
aS"His grandfather was the physician John Simm Smith, university colleague of John_Keats, and close friend of the eccentric philanthropist Ann Thwaytes.A poet, Hopkins' father published works including A Philosopher's Stone and Other Poems (1843), Pietas Metrica (1849), and Spicelegium Poeticum, A Gathering of Verses by Manley Hopkins (1892)."
p3841
aS'He reviewed poetry for The Times and wrote one novel.'
p3842
aS'Catherine (Smith) Hopkins was the daughter of a London physician, particularly fond of music and of reading, especially German philosophy, literature and the novels of Dickens.'
p3843
aS'Both parents were deeply religious High Church Anglicans.'
p3844
aS'He received the Nobel Prize in Literature in 1912. Life  Childhood and Youth Gerhart_Hauptmann was born in 1862 in Obersalzbrunn, now known as Szczawno-Zdroj, in Lower Silesia (then a part of Prussia, now part of Poland).'
p3845
aS'His parents were the Robert and Marie Hauptmann, who ran a hotel in the area.'
p3846
aS'As a youth, Hauptmann had a reputation of being loose with the truth.'
p3847
aS'Beginning in 1868, he attended the village school and then, in 1874, the Realschule in Breslau for which he had only barely passed the qualifying exam.'
p3848
aS'Hauptmann had difficulties adjusting himself to his new surroundings in the city.'
p3849
aS'He lived, along with his brother Carl, in a somewhat run-down student boarding house before finding lodging with a pastor.'
p3850
aS'He also ran into problems with the Prussian-influenced school.'
p3851
aS"A literary innovator and pioneer of Modernist literature, Stein's work broke with the narrative, linear, and temporal conventions of the 19th-century."
p3852
aS'She was also known as a collector of Modernist art.In 1933, Stein published a kind of memoir of her Paris years, The Autobiography of Alice B. Toklas, written in the voice of Toklas, her life partner.'
p3853
aS'The book became a literary bestseller and vaulted Stein from the relative obscurity of cult literary figure into the light of mainstream attention. Early life Gertrude_Stein, the youngest of a family of five children, was born on February 3, 1874, in Allegheny, Pennsylvania (merged with Pittsburgh in 1907) to upper-class Jewish parents, Daniel and Amelia Stein.'
p3854
aS'German and English were spoken at their home.'
p3855
aS"Stein's father was a wealthy businessman with real estate holdings, and director of San_Francisco street car lines, the Market Street Railway, in an era when public transportation was a privately owned enterprise.When Stein was three years old she and her family moved to Vienna and then Paris."
p3856
aS'Accompanied by governesses and tutors, the Steins endeavored to imbue their children with the cultured sensibilities of European history and life.'
p3857
aS"After a year-long sojourn abroad, they returned to America in 1878, settling in Oakland, California, where Stein attended First Hebrew Congregation of Oakland's Sabbath school.Her mother died in 1888 and her father in 1891."
p3858
aS'The central principle of gestalt psychology is that the mind forms a global whole with self-organizing tendencies.'
p3859
aS'This principle maintains that when the human mind (perceptual system) forms a percept or gestalt, the whole has a reality of its own, independent of the parts.'
p3860
aS'The original famous phrase of Gestalt psychologist Kurt Koffka, "The whole is other than the sum of the parts" is often incorrectly translated  as "The whole is greater than the sum of its parts" and thus used when explaining gestalt theory, and further incorrectly applied to systems theory.'
p3861
aS'Koffka did not like the translation.'
p3862
aS'He firmly corrected students who replaced "other" by "greater".'
p3863
aS'"This is not a principle of addition" he said.'
p3864
aS'The whole has an independent existence.In the domain of perception, Gestalt psychologists stipulate that perceptions are the products of complex interactions among various stimuli.'
p3865
aS'He favored nationalism, industrialization, centralization, social welfare and populism - for the latter, Vargas won the nickname "The Father of the Poor".'
p3866
aS"He was a proponent of workers' rights as well as a staunch anti-communist.Vargas was brought to power by political outsiders and the rank and file of the Armed Forces in the Revolution of 1930, a reaction to his loss in elections earlier that year."
p3867
aS'His ascent marked the end of the Brazilian oligarchic Old Republic and states-dominated coffee with milk politics.'
p3868
aS'He successfully influenced the outcome of the Brazilian presidential election of 1934, and instituted an authoritarian corporatist regime in 1937 known as the New State, prolonging his hold on power.'
p3869
aS'Vargas went on to appease and eventually dominate his supporters, and pushed his political agenda as he built a propaganda machine around his figure.Vargas sought to transform Brazil from a plantation-based economy into an industrialized powerhouse under the guidance of the government intervention.'
p3870
aS'His embrace of developmentalism was expressed not only in strong rhetoric, but also by lending protection to domestic industries and in a heavy investment budget aimed at kick-starting "strategic" sectors and setting up the necessary infrastructure.'
p3871
aS'Vargas created state monopolies for oil (Petrobras), mining (Vale), steelmaking (National Siderurgy Company), alkalis (National Alkalis Company) and automobiles (National Motors Factory).'
p3872
aS'The word Ghana means "Warrior King" in Mande.Ghana has a population of approximately 27 million from a variety of ethnic and religious groups.'
p3873
aS'Its varied geography includes savannas, forests, springs, cave systems, mountains, estuaries, and nature reserves.'
p3874
aS"Ghana's 560-kilometre (350-mile) coast is dotted by culturally significant castles, forts, and harbours."
p3875
aS'Prior to colonisation by the British empire in the early-20th century, Ghana was the site of numerous kingdoms and empires, the most powerful being the Kingdom of Ashanti.'
p3876
aS"In 1957, it became the first sub-saharan African nation to declare independence from European colonisation.Ghana's economy is the ninth-largest on the Africa continent by purchasing power parity and nominal GDP."
p3877
aS"Ghana is a major producer of petroleum and natural gas, with the continent's fifth largest oil reserves and sixth largest natural gas reserves."
p3878
aS"It is one of the world's largest gold and diamond producers, and is projected to be the largest producer of cocoa in the world as of 2015."
p3879
aS'He was one of nine children of Michele Puccini and Albina Magi.'
p3880
aS"The Puccini family was established in Lucca as a local musical dynasty by Puccini's great-great grandfather - also named Giacomo (1712-1781)."
p3881
aS'This first Giacomo_Puccini was maestro di cappella of the Cattedrale di San Martino in Lucca.'
p3882
aS"He was succeeded in this position by his son, Antonio Puccini, and then by Antonio's son Domenico, and Domenico's son Michele (father of the subject of this article)."
p3883
aS'Each of these men studied music at Bologna, and some took additional musical studies elsewhere.'
p3884
aS'Domenico Puccini studied for a time under Giovanni Paisiello.'
p3885
aS'Each composed music for the church.'
p3886
aS'Vico is best known for his magnum opus, the Scienza Nuova of 1725, often published in English as New Science.Vico is a precursor of systemic and complexity thinking, as opposed to Cartesian analysis and other kinds of reductionism.'
p3887
aS'He is also well known for noting that verum esse ipsum factum ("true itself is fact" or "the true itself is made"), a proposition that has been read as an early instance of constructivist epistemology.Vico is often claimed to have inaugurated modern philosophy of history, although the term is not found in his text (Vico speaks of a "history of philosophy narrated philosophically").'
p3888
aS'While Vico was not, strictly speaking, a historicist, interest in him has often been driven by historicists (such as Isaiah Berlin and Hayden White). Biography Born to a bookseller and the daughter of a carriage maker in Naples, Italy, Vico attended a series of grammar schools, but ill-health and dissatisfaction with Jesuit scholasticism led to home schooling.'
p3889
aS'Evidence from his autobiographical work points to the likelihood Vico was mostly self-taught.'
p3890
aS"According to Costelloe, this was due to his father's influence on him during a three year absence from school caused by a fall at the age of seven.After a bout of typhus in 1686, Vico accepted a tutoring position in Vatolla (a Frazione of the comune of Perdifumo), south of Salerno, that would last for nine years."
p3891
aS'In 1699, he married a childhood friend, Teresa Destito, and took a chair in rhetoric at the University of Naples.'
p3892
aS'Throughout his career, Vico would aspire to, but never attain, the more respectable chair of jurisprudence.'
p3893
aS'In addition, he painted, wrote plays, and designed metalwork and stage sets.Bernini possessed the ability to depict dramatic narratives with characters showing intense psychological states, but also to organize large-scale sculptural works which convey a magnificent grandeur.'
p3894
aS'His skill in manipulating marble ensured that he would be considered a worthy successor of Michelangelo, far outshining other sculptors of his generation, including his rival, Alessandro Algardi.'
p3895
aS'His talent extended beyond the confines of sculpture to a consideration of the setting in which it would be situated; his ability to synthesize sculpture, painting, and architecture into a coherent conceptual and visual whole has been termed by the art historian Irving Lavin the "unity of the visual arts".'
p3896
aS'A deeply religious man, working in Counter Reformation Rome, Bernini used light as an important metaphorical device in his religious settings, often using hidden light sources that could intensify the focus of religious worship or enhance the dramatic moment of a sculptural narrative.Bernini was also a leading figure in the emergence of Roman Baroque architecture along with his contemporaries, the architect Francesco Borromini and the painter and architect Pietro da Cortona.'
p3897
aS'Early in their careers they had all worked at the same time at the Palazzo Barberini, initially under Carlo Maderno and, following his death, under Bernini.'
p3898
aS'Later on, however, they were in competition for commissions, and fierce rivalries developed, particularly between Bernini and Borromini.'
p3899
aS"Despite the arguably greater architectural inventiveness of Borromini and Cortona, Bernini's artistic pre-eminence, particularly during the reigns of popes Urban VIII (1623-44) and Alexander VII (1655-65), meant he was able to secure the most important commissions in the Rome of his day, the various massive embellishment projects of the newly finished St. Peter's Basilica, completed under Pope Paul V with the addition of Maderno's nave and facade and finally re-consecrated by Pope Urban VIII on November 18, 1626, after 150 years of planning and building."
p3900
aS'The Rock of Gibraltar is the major landmark of the region.'
p3901
aS'At its foot is a densely populated city area, home to almost 30,000 Gibraltarians and other nationalities.An Anglo-Dutch force captured Gibraltar from Spain in 1704 during the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession on behalf of the Habsburg pretender to the Spanish throne.'
p3902
aS'The territory was subsequently ceded to Britain "in perpetuity" under the Treaty of Utrecht in 1713.'
p3903
aS'It was an important base for the Royal Navy; today its economy is based largely on tourism, online gambling, financial services, and shipping.The sovereignty of Gibraltar is a major point of contention in Anglo-Spanish relations as Spain asserts a claim to the territory.'
p3904
aS'Gibraltarians overwhelmingly rejected proposals for Spanish sovereignty in a 1967 referendum and again in 2002.'
p3905
aS'Under the Gibraltar constitution of 2006, Gibraltar governs its own affairs, though some powers, such as defence and foreign relations, remain the responsibility of the UK Government. Etymology The name Gibraltar is the Spanish derivation of the Arabic name Jabal TTariq (jbl Trq), meaning "Mountain of Tariq".'
p3906
aS'It refers to the Rock of Gibraltar, which was named after the Umayyad general Tariq ibn-Ziyad who led the initial incursion into Iberia in advance of the main Umayyad force in 711 under the command of Umayyad Caliph Al-Walid I.'
p3907
aS'His story is recorded in chapters 6 to 8 of the Book of Judges.'
p3908
aS"He is also named in chapter 11 of the Epistle to the Hebrews as an example of a man of faith. Family Gideon is the son of Joash, from the Abiezrite clan in the tribe of Manasseh and lived in Ephra. Biblical narrative As is the pattern throughout the book of Judges, the Israelites again turned away from God after 40 years of peace brought by Deborah's victory over Canaan and were allowed to be oppressed by the neighboring Midianites and Amalekites and the children of the east."
p3909
aS'God chose Gideon, a young man from the tribe of Manasseh, to free the people of Israel and to condemn their worship of idols.Very unsure of both himself and God\'s command, he requested proof of God\'s will by three miracles: firstly a sign from an angel in Judges 6:16, and then two signs involving a fleece, performed on consecutive nights and the exact opposite of each other:36 Then Gideon said to God, "If You will deliver Israel through me, as You have spoken, 37 behold, I will put a fleece of wool on the threshing floor.'
p3910
aS'If there is dew on the fleece only, and it is dry on all the ground, then I will know that You will deliver Israel through me, as You have spoken."'
p3911
aS'38 And it was so.'
p3912
aS'When he arose early the next morning and squeezed the fleece, he drained the dew from the fleece, a bowl full of water.'
p3913
aS'39 Then Gideon said to God, "Do not let Your anger burn against me that I may speak once more; please let me make a test once more with the fleece, let it now be dry only on the fleece, and let there be dew on all the ground."'
p3914
aS'N. Lewis was born in 1875 in Weymouth, Massachusetts.'
p3915
aS'After receiving his PhD in chemistry from Harvard University and studying abroad in Germany and the Philippines, Lewis moved to California to teach chemistry at the University of California, Berkeley.'
p3916
aS'Several years later, he became the Dean of the college of Chemistry at Berkeley, where he spent the rest of his life.'
p3917
aS'As a professor, he incorporated thermodynamic principles into the chemistry curriculum and reformed chemical thermodynamics in a mathematically rigorous manner accessible to ordinary chemists.'
p3918
aS'He began measuring the free energy values related to several chemical processes, both organic and inorganic.In 1916, he also proposed his theory of bonding and added information about electrons in the periodic table of the elements.'
p3919
aS'In 1933, he started his research on isotope separation.'
p3920
aS'Lewis worked with hydrogen and managed to purify a sample of heavy water.'
p3921
aS'Some of his ideas in the philosophy of mind have been referred to as "behaviourist."'
p3922
aS'Ryle\'s best known book is The Concept of Mind (1949), in which he writes that the "general trend of this book will undoubtedly, and harmlessly, be stigmatised as \'behaviourist\'."'
p3923
aS'Ryle, having engaged in detailed study of the key works of Bernard Bolzano, Franz Brentano, Alexius Meinong, Edmund_Husserl, and Martin_Heidegger, himself suggested instead that the book "could be described as a sustained essay in phenomenology, if you are at home with that label.'
p3924
aS'" Life Ryle was born in Brighton, England, in 1900, and grew up in an environment of learning.'
p3925
aS'His father was a Brighton doctor, a generalist who had interests in philosophy and astronomy, and passed on to his children an impressive library.'
p3926
aS"Ryle was educated at Brighton College, and in 1919 he went up to Queen's College at Oxford to study Classics but was quickly drawn to Philosophy."
p3927
aS'He graduated with first-class honours in classical honour moderations (1921), literae humaniores (1923), and politics, philosophy, and economics (1924), and was appointed as lecturer in philosophy at Christ Church, Oxford in 1925.'
p3928
aS'After 1919, he became interested in traditional painting techniques, and worked in a neoclassical or neo-Baroque style, while frequently revisiting the metaphysical themes of his earlier work. Life and works De Chirico was born in Volos, Greece, to a Genovese mother and a Sicilian father.'
p3929
aS"After studying art in Athens--mainly under the guidance of the influential Greek painter Georgios Roilos and Georgios Jakobides--and Florence, he moved to Germany in 1906, following his father's death in 1905."
p3930
aS'He entered the Academy of Fine Arts in Munich, where he read the writings of the philosophers Nietzsche, Arthur_Schopenhauer and Otto Weininger and also studied the works of Arnold Bocklin and Max Klinger.He returned to Italy in the summer of 1909 and spent six months in Milan.'
p3931
aS"At the beginning of 1910, he moved to Florence where he painted the first of his 'Metaphysical Town Square' series, The Enigma of an Autumn Afternoon, after the revelation he felt in Piazza Santa Croce."
p3932
aS'He also painted The Enigma of the Oracle while in Florence.'
p3933
aS'In July 1911 he spent a few days in Turin on his way to Paris.'
p3934
aS"De Chirico was profoundly moved by what he called the 'metaphysical aspect' of Turin: the architecture of its archways and piazzas."
p3935
aS'Documents suggest that he first visited Rome in 1537, when he is listed as a chorister at the Santa Maria Maggiore basilica.'
p3936
aS'He studied with Robin Mallapert and Firmin Lebel.'
p3937
aS'He spent most of his career in the city.Palestrina came of age as a musician under the influence of the northern European style of polyphony, which owed its dominance in Italy primarily to two influential Netherlandish composers, Guillaume Dufay and Josquin des Prez, who had spent significant portions of their careers there.'
p3938
aS'Italy itself had yet to produce anyone of comparable fame or skill in polyphony.From 1544 to 1551, Palestrina was organist of the cathedral of St. Agapito, the principal church of his native city.'
p3939
aS"His first published compositions, a book of Masses, had made so favorable an impression with Pope_Julius_III (previously the Bishop of Palestrina) that in 1551 he appointed Palestrina maestro di cappella or musical director of the Cappella Giulia, (Julian Chapel, in the sense of choir), the choir of the chapter of canons at St. Peter's Basilica."
p3940
aS"This book of Masses was the first by a native composer, since in the Italian states of Palestrina's day, most composers of sacred music were from the Low Countries, France, Portugal, or Spain."
p3941
aS'In fact the book was modeled on one by Cristobal de Morales: the woodcut in the front is almost an exact copy of the one from the book by the Spanish composer.During the next decade, Palestrina held positions similar to his Julian Chapel appointment at other chapels and churches in Rome, notably St John Lateran (1555-1560, a post previously held by Lassus), and St Mary Major (1561-1566).'
p3942
aS'He denounced clerical corruption, despotic rule and the exploitation of the poor.'
p3943
aS'He prophesied the coming of a biblical flood and a new Cyrus from the north who would reform the Church.'
p3944
aS'In September 1494, when Charles VIII of France invaded Italy, and threatened Florence, such prophesies seemed on the verge of fulfilment.'
p3945
aS'While Savonarola intervened with the French king, the Florentines expelled the ruling Medici and, at the friar\'s urging, established a "popular" republic.'
p3946
aS'Declaring that Florence would be the New Jerusalem, the world center of Christianity and "richer, more powerful, more glorious than ever", he instituted an extreme puritanical campaign, enlisting the active help of Florentine youth.In 1495 when Florence refused to join Pope Alexander VI\'s Holy League against the French, the Vatican summoned Savonarola to Rome.'
p3947
aS'He disobeyed and further defied the pope by preaching under a ban, highlighting his campaign for reform with processions, bonfires of the vanities, and pious theatricals.'
p3948
aS'In retaliation, the Pope excommunicated him in May 1497, and threatened to place Florence under an interdict.'
p3949
aS"The English Gitanjali or Song Offerings is a collection of 103 English poems of Tagore's own English translations of his Bengali poems first published in November 1912 by the India Society of London."
p3950
aS'It contained translations of 53 poems from the original Bengali Gitanjali, as well as 50 other poems which were from his drama Achalayatan and eight other books of poetry -- mainly Gitimalya (17 poems), Naivedya (15 poems) and Kheya (11 poems).The translations were often radical, leaving out or altering large chunks of the poem and in one instance fusing two separate poems (song 95, which unifies songs 89,90 of Naivedya).'
p3951
aS'The translations were undertaken prior to a visit to England in 1912, where the poems were extremely well received.'
p3952
aS'In 1913, Tagore became the first non-European to win the Nobel Prize for Literature, largely for the English Gitanjali.The English Gitanjali became very famous in the West, and was widely translated.'
p3953
aS'The word gitanjali is composed from "gita", song, and "anjali", offering, and thus means - "An offering of songs"; but the word for offering, anjali, has a strong devotional connotation, so the title may also be interpreted as "prayer offering of song". Poems Some poems involve themes related to nature, but here, too, the spiritual is subtly present, as in this poem (no.'
p3954
aS'57):Light, my light, the world-filling light, the eye-kissing light, heart-sweetening light!Ah, the light dances, my darling, at the centre of my life; the light strikes, my darling, the chords of my love; the sky opens, the wind runs wild, laughter passes over the earth.The butterflies spread their sails on the sea of light.'
p3955
aS'Lilies and jasmines surge up on the crest of the waves of light.The light is shattered into gold on every cloud, my darling, and it scatters gems in profusion.Mirth spreads from leaf to leaf, my darling, and gladness without measure.'
p3956
aS'He was appointed general by the provisional government of Milan in 1848, General of the Roman Republic in 1849 by the Minister of War, and led the Expedition of the Thousand on behalf and with the consent of Victor Emmanuel II.He has been called the "Hero of Two Worlds" because of his military enterprises in Brazil, Uruguay and Europe.'
p3957
aS'These earned him a considerable reputation in Italy and abroad, aided by exceptional international media coverage at the time.'
p3958
aS'Many of the greatest intellectuals of his time, such as Victor_Hugo, Alexandre Dumas, and George Sand, showered him with admiration.'
p3959
aS'The United Kingdom and the United_States helped him a great deal, offering him financial and military support in difficult circumstances.In the popular telling of his story, he is associated with the red shirts worn by his volunteers in lieu of a uniform. Childhood and Youth Garibaldi was born and christened Giuseppe Maria Garibaldi on 4 July 1807 in Nice, which had been directly annexed by Napoleonic France in 1805, to Giovanni Domenico Garibaldi and Maria Rosa Nicoletta Raimondo.'
p3960
aS"In 1814, the Congress_of_Vienna returned Nice to Victor Emmanuel I of Sardinia.Garibaldi's family's involvement in coastal trade drew him to a life at sea."
p3961
aS'He participated actively in the community of the Nizzardo Italians and was certified in 1832 as a merchant marine captain.In April 1833 he travelled to Taganrog, Russia, in the schooner Clorinda with a shipment of oranges.'
p3962
aS'During ten days in port he met Giovanni Battista Cuneo from Oneglia, a politically active immigrant and member of the secret La Giovine Italia / Young Italy movement of Giuseppe_Mazzini.'
p3963
aS'He also helped define the modern European movement for popular democracy in a republican state. Biography  Early years Mazzini was born in Genoa, then part of the Ligurian Republic, under the rule of the French Empire.'
p3964
aS'His father, Giacomo Mazzini, originally from Chiavari, was a university professor who had adhered to Jacobin ideology; his mother, Maria Drago, was renowned for her beauty and religious (Jansenist) fervour.'
p3965
aS'From a very early age, Mazzini showed good learning qualities (as well as a precocious interest in politics and literature).'
p3966
aS'He was admitted to the University at only 14, graduating in law in 1826, and initially practiced as a "poor man\'s lawyer".'
p3967
aS'He also hoped to become a historical novelist or a dramatist, and in the same year he wrote his first essay, Dell\'amor patrio di Dante ("On Dante\'s Patriotic Love"), which was published in 1837.'
p3968
aS"In 1828-29 he collaborated with a Genoese newspaper, L'indicatore genovese, which was however soon closed by the Piedmontese authorities."
p3969
aS"He then became one of the leading authors of L'Indicatore Livornese, published at Livorno by F. D. Guerrazzi, until this paper was closed down by the authorities, too.In 1827 Mazzini travelled to Tuscany, where he became a member of the Carbonari, a secret association with political purposes."
p3970
aS'Unlike his contemporary, Richard Wagner, Verdi was concerned to develop the forms of romantic opera that he inherited, rather than to change them through revolution.In his early operas Verdi demonstrated a sympathy with the Risorgimento movement which sought the unification of Italy.'
p3971
aS'He also participated briefly as an elected politician.'
p3972
aS'The chorus "Va, pensiero" from his early opera Nabucco (1842), and similar choruses in later operas, were much in the spirit of the unification movement, and the composer himself became esteemed as a representative of these ideals.'
p3973
aS'An intensely private person, Verdi however did not seek to ingratiate himself with popular movements and as he became professionally successful was able to reduce his operatic workload and sought to establish himself as a landowner in his native region.'
p3974
aS"He surprised the musical world by returning, after his success with the opera Aida (1871), with three late masterpieces: his Requiem (1874), and the operas Otello (1887) and Falstaff (1893).Verdi's musical influence on his successors was limited."
p3975
aS"His operas remain today extremely popular, especially the three peaks of his 'middle period': Rigoletto, Il_trovatore and La_traviata, and the bicentenary of his birth in 2013 was widely celebrated in broadcasts and performances. Life  Childhood and education Verdi, the first child of Carlo Giuseppe_Verdi (1785-1867) and Luigia Uttini (1787-1851), was born at their home in Le Roncole, a village near Busseto, then in the Departement Taro and within the borders of the First French Empire following the annexation of the Duchy of Parma and Piacenza in 1808."
p3976
aS'The baptismal register, prepared on 11 October 1813, lists his parents Carlo and Luigia as "innkeeper" and "spinner" respectively.'
p3977
aS'They also abrade rock and debris from their substrate to create landforms such as cirques and moraines.'
p3978
aS'Glaciers form only on land and are distinct from the much thinner sea ice and lake ice that form on the surface of bodies of water.On Earth, 99% of glacial ice is contained within vast ice sheets in the polar regions, but glaciers may be found in mountain ranges on every continent except Australia, and on a few high-latitude oceanic islands.'
p3979
aS'Between 35degN and 35degS, glaciers occur only in the Himalayas, Andes, Rocky Mountains, a few high mountains in East Africa, Mexico, New_Guinea and on Zard Kuh in Iran.'
p3980
aS"Glaciers cover about 10 percent of Earth's land surface."
p3981
aS"Continental glaciers cover nearly 5 million square miles of Antarctica's 5.1 million square miles, with an average thickness of 7,000 feet."
p3982
aS'Greenland and Patagonia also have huge expanses of continental glaciers.'
p3983
aS'Glacial ice is the largest reservoir of freshwater on Earth.'
p3984
aS'The term glass, in popular usage, is often used to refer only to this type of material, which is familiar from use as window glass and in glass bottles.'
p3985
aS'Of the many silica-based glasses that exist, ordinary glazing and container glass is formed from a specific type called soda-lime glass, composed of approximately 75% silicon dioxide (SiO2), sodium oxide (Na2O) from sodium carbonate (Na2CO3), calcium oxide, also called lime (CaO), and several minor additives.'
p3986
aS"A very clear and durable quartz glass can be made from pure silica; the other compounds above are used to improve the temperature workability of the product.Many applications of silicate glasses derive from their optical transparency, which gives rise to one of silicate glasses' primary uses as window panes."
p3987
aS'Glass will transmit, reflect and refract light; these qualities can be enhanced by cutting and polishing to make optical lenses, prisms, fine glassware, and optical fibers for high speed data transmission by light.'
p3988
aS'Glass can be colored by adding metallic salts, and can also be painted.'
p3989
aS'These qualities have led to the extensive use of glass in the manufacture of art objects and in particular, stained glass windows.'
p3990
aS'Although brittle, silicate glass is extremely durable, and many examples of glass fragments exist from early glass-making cultures.'
p3991
aS"It is based on Mamet's experience having previously worked in a similar office.The title comes from two real estate properties mentioned in the play: Glengarry Highlands, which is currently the prime real estate everyone is attempting to sell, and Glen Ross Farms, which is mentioned by several characters as having been very lucrative for those selling it several years ago.The world premiere was at the National Theatre in London on September 21, 1983 where Bill Bryden's production in the Cottesloe Theatre was acclaimed as a triumph of ensemble acting.The play opened on Broadway on March 25, 1984 and closed on February 17, 1985."
p3992
aS'The production was directed by Gregory Mosher and starred Joe Mantegna, Mike Nussbaum, Robert Prosky, Lane Smith, James Tolkan, Jack Wallace and J. T. Walsh.'
p3993
aS'The production was nominated for four Tony awards including Best Play, Best Director, and two Best Featured Actor nominations for Robert Prosky and Joe Mantegna, who won the production\'s one Tony. Characters Richard "Ricky" RomaThe most successful salesman in the office.'
p3994
aS'Although Roma seems to think of himself as a latter-day cowboy and regards his ability to make a sale as a sign of his virility, he admits only to himself that it is all luck.'
p3995
aS"He is ruthless, dishonest and immoral, but succeeds because he has a talent for figuring out a client's weaknesses and crafting a pitch that will exploit those weaknesses."
p3996
aS'He is a smooth talker and often speaks in grand, poetic soliloquies.Shelly "The Machine" LeveneAn older, once-successful salesman, who has fallen on hard times and has not closed a big deal in a long time.'
p3997
aS"In Mamet's original 1983 stage version, Levene mentions his daughter as a final ploy to gain Williamson's sympathy in order to get better leads, though this fails due to Levene's flippant nature and their longstanding animosity."
p3998
aS'This is unlike the photon, which mediates the electromagnetic interaction but lacks an electric charge.'
p3999
aS'Gluons therefore participate in the strong interaction in addition to mediating it, making QCD significantly harder to analyze than QED (quantum electrodynamics). PropertiesEdit The gluon is a vector boson; like the photon, it has a spin of 1.'
p4000
aS'While massive spin-1 particles have three polarization states, massless gauge bosons like the gluon have only two polarization states because gauge invariance requires the polarization to be transverse.'
p4001
aS"In quantum field theory, unbroken gauge invariance requires that gauge bosons have zero mass (experiment limits the gluon's rest mass to less than a few meV/c2)."
p4002
aS'The gluon has negative intrinsic parity. Numerology of gluonsEdit Unlike the single photon of QED or the three W and Z bosons of the weak interaction, there are eight independent types of gluon in QCD.This may be difficult to understand intuitively.'
p4003
aS'Quarks carry three types of color charge; antiquarks carry three types of anticolor.'
p4004
aS'Gluons may be thought of as carrying both color and anticolor, but to correctly understand how they are combined, it is necessary to consider the mathematics of color charge in more detail. Color charge and superpositionEdit In quantum mechanics, the states of particles may be added according to the principle of superposition; that is, they may be in a "combined state" with a probability, if some particular quantity is measured, of giving several different outcomes.'
p4005
aS'Its codons are GGU, GGC, GGA, GGG of the genetic code.Glycine is a colourless, sweet-tasting crystalline solid.'
p4006
aS'It is unique among the proteinogenic amino acids in that it is achiral.'
p4007
aS'It can fit into hydrophilic or hydrophobic environments, due to its minimal side chain of only one hydrogen atom. Production Glycine was discovered in 1820, by Henri Braconnot who boiled a gelatinous object with sulfuric acid.Glycine is manufactured industrially by treating chloroacetic acid with ammonia:ClCH2COOH + 2 NH3 - H2NCH2COOH + NH4ClAbout 15 million kg are produced annually in this way.In the USA (by GEO Specialty Chemicals, Inc.) and in Japan (by Showa Denko KK), glycine is produced via the Strecker amino acid synthesis.There are two producers of glycine in the United_States: Chattem Chemicals, Inc., a subsidiary of Mumbai-based Sun Pharmaceutical, and GEO Specialty Chemicals, Inc., which purchased the glycine and naphthalene sulfonate production facilities of Hampshire Chemical Corp, a subsidiary of Dow Chemical.Chattem\'s manufacturing process ("MCA" process) occurs in batches and results in a finished product with some residual chloride but no sulfate, while GEO\'s manufacturing process is considered a semi-batch process and results in a finished product with some residual sulfate but no chloride. Acid-base properties and structures In aqueous solution, glycine itself is amphoteric: at low pH the molecule can be protonated with a pKa of about 9.6 and at high pH it loses a proton with a pKa of about 2.4 (precise values of pKa depend on temperature and ionic strength).'
p4008
aS'The nature of glycine in aqueous solution has been investigated by theoretical methods.'
p4009
aS'In solution the ratio of concentrations of the two isomers is independent of both the analytical concentration and of pH.'
p4010
aS'This ratio is simply the equilibrium constant for isomerization.Both isomers of glycine have been observed by microwave spectroscopy in the gas phase.'
p4011
aS'The solid-state structure has been analyzed in detail. Metabolism  Biosynthesis Glycine is not essential to the human diet, as it is biosynthesized in the body from the amino acid serine, which is in turn derived from 3-phosphoglycerate.'
p4012
aS'The desert basins of the Gobi are bounded by the Altai Mountains and the grasslands and steppes of Mongolia on the north, by the Taklamakan Desert to the West, by the Hexi Corridor and Tibetan Plateau to the southwest, and by the North China Plain to the southeast.'
p4013
aS'The Gobi is most notable in history as part of the great Mongol Empire, and as the location of several important cities along the Silk Road.The Gobi is a rain shadow desert formed by the Himalaya range blocking rain-carrying clouds from the Indian Ocean from reaching the Gobi territory. Geography The Gobi measures over 1,600 km (1,000 mi) from southwest to northeast and 800 km (500 mi) from north to south.'
p4014
aS'The desert is widest in the west, along the line joining the Lake Bosten and the Lop Nor (87deg-89deg east).'
p4015
aS"It occupies an arc of land 1,295,000 km2 (500,000 sq mi) in area as of 2007; it is the fifth-largest desert in the world and Asia's largest."
p4016
aS'Much of the Gobi is not sandy but has exposed bare rock.The Gobi has several different Chinese names, including Sha Mo  (Shamo, a generic term for deserts) and Han Hai  (Hanhai, "endless sea").'
p4017
aS'In its broadest definition, the Gobi includes the long stretch of desert and semi-desert area extending from the foot of the Pamirs, 77deg east, to the Greater Khingan Mountains, 116deg-118deg east, on the border of Manchuria; and from the foothills of the Altay, Sayan, and Yablonoi mountain ranges on the north to the Kunlun, Altyn-Tagh, and Qilian mountain ranges, which form the northern edges of the Tibetan Plateau, on the south.A relatively large area on the east side of the Greater Khingan range, between the upper waters of the Songhua (Sungari) and the upper waters of the Liao-ho, is reckoned to belong to the Gobi by conventional usage.'
p4018
aS'Some geographers and ecologists prefer to regard the western area of the Gobi region (as defined above): the basin of the Tarim in Xinjiang and the desert basin of Lop Nor and Hami (Kumul), as forming a separate and independent desert, called the Taklamakan Desert.Archeologists and paleontologists have done excavations in the Nemegt Basin in the northwestern part of the Gobi_Desert (in Mongolia), which is noted for its fossil treasures, including early mammals, dinosaur eggs, and prehistoric stone implements, some 100,000 years old. Climate The Gobi is a cold desert, with frost and occasionally snow occurring on its dunes.'
p4019
aS'Chemically, gold is a transition metal and a group 11 element.'
p4020
aS'It is one of the least reactive chemical elements, and is solid under standard conditions.'
p4021
aS'The metal therefore occurs often in free elemental (native) form, as nuggets or grains, in rocks, in veins and in alluvial deposits.'
p4022
aS'It occurs in a solid solution series with the native element silver (as electrum) and also naturally alloyed with copper and palladium.'
p4023
aS"Less commonly, it occurs in minerals as gold compounds, often with tellurium (gold tellurides).Gold's atomic number of 79 makes it one of the higher atomic number elements that occur naturally in the universe."
p4024
aS'It is thought to have been produced in supernova nucleosynthesis and to have been present in the dust from which the Solar System formed.'
p4025
aS'Because the Earth was molten when it was just formed, almost all of the gold present in the early Earth probably sank into the planetary core.'
p4026
aS'The Variations are named after Johann Gottlieb Goldberg, who may have been the first performer. Composition The tale of how the variations came to be composed comes from an early biography of Bach by Johann Nikolaus Forkel:[For this work] we have to thank the instigation of the former Russian ambassador to the electoral court of Saxony, Count Kaiserling, who often stopped in Leipzig and brought there with him the aforementioned Goldberg, in order to have him given musical instruction by Bach.'
p4027
aS'The Count was often ill and had sleepless nights.'
p4028
aS'At such times, Goldberg, who lived in his house, had to spend the night in an antechamber, so as to play for him during his insomnia.'
p4029
aS"... Once the Count mentioned in Bach's presence that he would like to have some clavier pieces for Goldberg, which should be of such a smooth and somewhat lively character that he might be a little cheered up by them in his sleepless nights."
p4030
aS'Bach thought himself best able to fulfill this wish by means of Variations, the writing of which he had until then considered an ungrateful task on account of the repeatedly similar harmonic foundation.'
p4031
aS'But since at this time all his works were already models of art, such also these variations became under his hand.'
p4032
aS'Yet he produced only a single work of this kind.'
p4033
aS'The khanate is also known as the Kipchak Khanate or as the Ulus of Jochi.After the death of Batu Khan in 1255, the prosperity of his dynasty lasted for a full century, until 1359, though the intrigues of Nogai did instigate a partial civil war in the late 1290s.'
p4034
aS"The Horde's military power peaked during the reign of Uzbeg (1312-41), who adopted Islam."
p4035
aS'The territory of the Golden_Horde at its peak included most of Eastern Europe from the Urals to the bank of the Danube River, extending east deep into Siberia.'
p4036
aS"In the south, the Golden_Horde's lands bordered on the Black_Sea, the Caucasus Mountains, and the territories of the Mongol dynasty known as the Ilkhanate.The khanate experienced violent internal political disorder beginning in 1359, before it was briefly reunited under Tokhtamysh in 1381."
p4037
aS'However, soon after the 1396 invasion of Tamerlane, it broke into smaller Tatar khanates that declined steadily in power.'
p4038
aS'At the start of the 15th century the Horde began to fall apart.'
p4039
aS'By 1433 it was being referred to simply as the Great Horde.'
p4040
aS'The cornerstone of Luke-Acts\' theology is "salvation history", the author\'s understanding that God\'s purpose is seen in the way he has acted, and will continue to act, in history.'
p4041
aS'It divides the history of first century Christianity into three stages: first the arrival among men of Jesus the Messiah, from his birth to the beginning of his earthly mission in the meeting with John the Baptist; second the earthly career of Jesus, ending in his Passion, death and resurrection (concluding the gospel story per se); and finally the times of James, Peter and Paul, from Jerusalem to Rome (the story told in Acts).The majority view is that Luke the Evangelist, the companion of Paul, was not the author of Luke-Acts.'
p4042
aS'The anonymous author took for his sources the gospel of Mark, the sayings collection called the Q source, and a collection of material called the L (for Luke) source; the most probable date is around 80-100 CE, and there is evidence that it was still being substantially revised well into the 2nd century. Composition and setting  Background Autographs do not survive for ancient books such as the Gospel_of_Luke and the other Gospels.'
p4043
aS'They survive in scribal copies propagated over time.'
p4044
aS'In the process of recopying, variations slipped in, different regional manuscript traditions emerged with multiple streams of transmission, and corrections and adjustments were made, for theological reasons or to iron out incongruencies between copies or different translations into numerous languages.'
p4045
aS"The editions of biblical and other ancient texts we read today are established by collating all major surviving manuscripts, using also the evidence from citations of them in Patristic writers, in order to produce a version which, by the consensus of scholars of textual criticism, most likely approximates to the form of the lost autographs.The earliest partial manuscript witnesses (the technical term for written sources) for Luke's gospel are five 3rd-century papyrus fragments; the earliest complete attestations are 4th and 5th century."
p4046
aS'These fall into two "families", the Western and the Alexandrian: the differences between these pose major difficulties, and the problem of the "original" text remains unresolved.'
p4047
aS'He is generally considered to be the father of analytic philosophy, for his writings on the philosophy of language and mathematics.'
p4048
aS'While he was mainly ignored by the intellectual world when he published his writings, Giuseppe Peano (1858-1932) and Bertrand Russell (1872-1970) introduced his work to later generations of logicians and philosophers.'
p4049
aS'The Frege programming language is named after him. Life  Childhood (1848-69) Frege was born in 1848 in Wismar, in the state of Mecklenburg-Schwerin (which is today part of the German federal state Mecklenburg-Vorpommern).'
p4050
aS"His father Carl (Karl) Alexander Frege (3 August 1809 - 30 November 1866) was the co-founder and headmaster of a girls' high school until his death."
p4051
aS"After Carl's death, the school was led by Frege's mother Auguste Wilhelmine Sophie Frege (born Bialloblotzky of Polish descent, 12 January 1815 - 14 October 1898).In childhood, Frege encountered philosophies that would guide his future scientific career."
p4052
aS'For example, his father wrote a textbook on the German language for children aged 9-13, entitled Hulfsbuch zum Unterrichte in der deutschen Sprache fur Kinder von 9 bis 13 Jahren (2nd ed., Wismar 1850; 3rd ed., Wismar and Ludwigslust: Hinstorff, 1862), the first section of which dealt with the structure and logic of language.Frege studied at a gymnasium in Wismar and graduated in 1869.'
p4053
aS"His teacher Gustav Adolf Leo Sachse (5 November 1843 - 1 September 1909), who was a poet, played the most important role in determining Frege's future scientific career, encouraging him to continue his studies at the University of Jena. Studies at University: Jena and Gottingen (1869-74) Frege matriculated at the University of Jena in the spring of 1869 as a citizen of the North German Confederation."
p4054
aS'Through 67 years of writings which included over 25 novels, he explored the ambivalent moral and political issues of the modern world, often through a Catholic perspective.Although Greene objected strongly to being described as a Roman Catholic novelist rather than as a novelist who happened to be Catholic, Catholic religious themes are at the root of much of his writing, especially the four major Catholic novels: Brighton Rock, The_Power_and_the_Glory, The Heart of the Matter and The End of the Affair; which are regarded as "the gold standard" of the Catholic novel.'
p4055
aS'Several works such as The Confidential Agent, The Third Man, The Quiet American, Our_Man_in_Havana and The Human Factor also show an avid interest in the workings of international politics and espionage.Greene was born into a large, influential family that included the owners of the Greene King Brewery.'
p4056
aS'He was born in and boarded at Berkhamsted School in Hertfordshire, England, where his father taught and became headmaster.'
p4057
aS'He was unhappy at the school, and attempted suicide several times.'
p4058
aS'He went up to Balliol College, Oxford to study history, where while an undergraduate he published his first work in 1925, a poorly received volume of poetry, Babbling April.'
p4059
aS'After graduating Greene worked first as a private tutor and then as a journalist - first on the Nottingham Journal and then as a sub-editor on The Times.'
p4060
aS'He converted to Catholicism in 1926, after meeting his future wife Vivien Dayrell-Browning.'
p4061
aS"The novel was first published as a serial in Dickens's weekly periodical All the Year Round, from 1 December 1860 to August 1861."
p4062
aS"In October 1861, Chapman and Hall published the novel in three volumes.It is set among marshes in Kent, and in London, in the early to mid-1800s, and contains some of Dickens' most memorable scenes, including the opening, in a graveyard, where the young Pip is accosted by the escaped convict, Abel Magwitch."
p4063
aS'Great_Expectations is full of extreme imagery - poverty; prison ships and chains, and fights to the death - and has a colourful cast of characters who have entered popular culture.'
p4064
aS'These include the eccentric Miss Havisham, the beautiful but cold Estella, and Joe, the kind and generous blacksmith.'
p4065
aS"Dickens's themes include wealth and poverty, love and rejection, and the eventual triumph of good over evil."
p4066
aS'Great_Expectations is popular both with readers and literary critics, and has been translated into many languages, and adapted numerous times into various media.Upon its release, the novel received near universal acclaim.'
p4067
aS'Thomas Carlyle spoke disparagingly of "all that Pip\'s nonsense".'
p4068
aS"It threatened, but did not reach, the aristocratic district of Westminster, Charles II's Palace of Whitehall, and most of the suburban slums."
p4069
aS"It consumed 13,200 houses, 87 parish churches, St Paul's Cathedral and most of the buildings of the City authorities."
p4070
aS"It is estimated to have destroyed the homes of 70,000 of the City's 80,000 inhabitants."
p4071
aS'The death toll is unknown but traditionally thought to have been small, as only six verified deaths were recorded.'
p4072
aS'This reasoning has recently been challenged on the grounds that the deaths of poor and middle-class people were not recorded, while the heat of the fire may have cremated many victims leaving no recognisable remains.'
p4073
aS'A melted piece of pottery on display at the Museum of London found by archaeologists in Pudding Lane, where the fire started, shows that the temperature reached 1700 degC.The Great Fire started at the bakery of Thomas Farriner (or Farynor) on Pudding Lane, shortly after midnight on Sunday, 2 September, and spread rapidly west across the City of London.'
p4074
aS'The use of the major firefighting technique of the time, the creation of firebreaks by means of demolition, was critically delayed owing to the indecisiveness of the Lord Mayor of London, Sir Thomas Bloodworth.'
p4075
aS'President Johnson first used the term "Great_Society" during a speech at Ohio University, then unveiled the program in greater detail at an appearance at University of Michigan.'
p4076
aS'New major spending programs that addressed education, medical care, urban problems, and transportation were launched during this period.'
p4077
aS'The program and its initiatives were subsequently promoted by him and fellow Democrats in Congress in the 1960s and years following.'
p4078
aS"The Great_Society in scope and sweep resembled the New Deal domestic agenda of Franklin D. Roosevelt.Some Great_Society proposals were stalled initiatives from John F. Kennedy's New Frontier."
p4079
aS"Johnson's success depended on his skills of persuasion, coupled with the Democratic landslide in the 1964 election that brought in many new liberals to Congress, making the House of Representatives in 1965 the most liberal House since 1938.Anti-war Democrats complained that spending on the Vietnam_War choked off the Great_Society."
p4080
aS'While some of the programs have been eliminated or had their funding reduced, many of them, including Medicare, Medicaid, the Older Americans Act and federal education funding, continue to the present.'
p4081
aS"The Great_Society's programs expanded under the administrations of Richard_Nixon and Gerald Ford. Economic and social conditions Unlike the old New Deal, which was a response to a severe financial and economic calamity, the Great_Society initiatives came just as the United_States' post-World_War_II prosperity was starting to fade, but before the coming decline was being felt by the middle and upper classes."
p4082
aS"Athens is the nation's capital and largest city, followed by Thessaloniki, which is the second largest city and it is commonly referred to as the co-capital.Greece is strategically located at the crossroads of Europe, Asia, and Africa."
p4083
aS'Situated on the southern tip of the Balkan peninsula, Greece shares land borders with Albania to the northwest, the Republic of Macedonia and Bulgaria to the north and Turkey to the northeast.'
p4084
aS'The country consists of nine geographic regions: Macedonia, Central Greece, the Peloponnese, Thessaly, Epirus, the Aegean Islands (including the Dodecanese and Cyclades), Thrace, Crete, and the Ionian Islands.'
p4085
aS'The Aegean Sea lies to the east of the mainland, the Ionian Sea to the west, and the Mediterranean Sea to the south.'
p4086
aS'Greece has the longest coastline on the Mediterranean Basin and the 11th longest coastline in the world at 13,676 km (8,498 mi) in length, featuring a vast number of islands (approximately 2,000, of which 227 are inhabited).'
p4087
aS'Eighty percent of Greece is mountainous, of which Mount Olympus is the highest peak at 2,917 m (9,570 ft).The modern Greek state, which was established in 1830 following the war of independence from the Ottoman_Empire, traces its roots to the civilization of Ancient Greece, which is considered the cradle of all Western civilization.'
p4088
aS'As such, Greece is the birthplace of democracy, Western philosophy, the Olympic Games, Western literature, historiography, political science, major scientific and mathematical principles, and Western drama, including both tragedy and comedy.'
p4089
aS'The GFP from A. victoria has a major excitation peak at a wavelength of 395 nm and a minor one at 475 nm.'
p4090
aS'Its emission peak is at 509 nm, which is in the lower green portion of the visible spectrum.'
p4091
aS'The fluorescence quantum yield (QY) of GFP is 0.79.'
p4092
aS'The GFP from the sea pansy (Renilla reniformis) has a single major excitation peak at 498 nm.In cell and molecular biology, the GFP gene is frequently used as a reporter of expression.'
p4093
aS'In modified forms it has been used to make biosensors, and many animals have been created that express GFP as a proof-of-concept that a gene can be expressed throughout a given organism.'
p4094
aS'The GFP gene can be introduced into organisms and maintained in their genome through breeding, injection with a viral vector, or cell transformation.'
p4095
aS'To date, the GFP gene has been introduced and expressed in many Bacteria, Yeast and other Fungi, fish (such as zebrafish), plant, fly, and mammalian cells, including human.'
p4096
aS'In 2008, the people of Greenland passed a referendum supporting greater autonomy; 75% of votes cast were in favour.'
p4097
aS"Greenland is the world's largest island, over three-quarters of which is covered by the only contemporary ice sheet outside of Antarctica."
p4098
aS'With a population of about 56,370 (2013), it is the least densely populated country in the world.Greenland has been inhabited off and on for at least the last 4,500 years by Arctic peoples whose forebears migrated there from what is now Canada.'
p4099
aS'Norsemen settled the uninhabited southern part of Greenland, beginning in the 10th century, and Inuit peoples arrived in the 13th century.'
p4100
aS'The Norse colonies disappeared in the late 15th century.'
p4101
aS'In the early 18th century, Scandinavia and Greenland came back into contact with each other, and Denmark established sovereignty over the island.Having been claimed by Denmark-Norway for centuries, Greenland became a Danish colony in 1814, and a part of the Danish Realm in 1953 under the Constitution of Denmark.'
p4102
aS'In 1973, Greenland joined the European Economic Community with Denmark.'
p4103
aS'The artificially overvalued money tends to drive an artificially undervalued money out of circulation and is a consequence of price control.The law was named in 1858 by Henry Dunning Macleod, after Sir Thomas Gresham (1519-1579), who was an English financier during the Tudor dynasty.'
p4104
aS'However, there are numerous predecessors.'
p4105
aS'The law had been stated earlier by Nicolaus Copernicus; for this reason, it is occasionally known as the Copernicus Law.'
p4106
aS'It was also stated in the 14th century, by Nicole Oresme, and by jurist and historian Al-Maqrizi (1364-1442) in the Mamluk Empire; and noted by Aristophanes in his play The_Frogs, which dates from around the end of the 5th century BC. "Good" money and "bad" money "Good" money is money that shows little difference between its nominal value (the face value of the coin) and its commodity value (the value of the metal of which it is made, often precious metals, nickel, or copper).In the absence of legal-tender laws, metal coin money will freely exchange at somewhat above bullion market value.'
p4107
aS'This may be observed in bullion coins such as the Canadian Gold Maple Leaf, the South African Krugerrand, the American Gold Eagle, or even the silver Maria Theresa thaler (Austria).'
p4108
aS'Coins of this type are of a known purity and are in a convenient form to handle.'
p4109
aS'People prefer trading in coins rather than in anonymous hunks of precious metal, so they attribute more value to the coins of equal weight.'
p4110
aS"This is possible because GDP is a measure of 'value added' rather than sales; it adds each firm's value added (the value of its output minus the value of goods that are used up in producing it)."
p4111
aS'For example, a firm buys steel and adds value to it by producing a car; double counting would occur if GDP added together the value of the steel and the value of the car.'
p4112
aS"Because it is based on value added, GDP also increases when an enterprise reduces its use of materials or other resources ('intermediate consumption') to produce the same output.The more familiar use of GDP estimates is to calculate the growth of the economy from year to year (and recently from quarter to quarter)."
p4113
aS"The pattern of GDP growth is held to indicate the success or failure of economic policy and to determine whether an economy is 'in recession'. History The concept of GDP was first developed by Simon Kuznets for a US Congress report in 1934."
p4114
aS'In this report, Kuznets warned against its use as a measure of welfare (see below under limitations and criticisms).'
p4115
aS"After the Bretton Woods conference in 1944, GDP became the main tool for measuring a country's economy."
p4116
aS"At that time Gross National Product (GNP) was the preferred estimate, which differed from GDP in that it measured production by a country's citizens at home and abroad rather than its 'resident institutional units' (see OECD definition above)."
p4117
aS'One of the most familiar examples of a group is the set of integers together with the addition operation; the addition of any two integers forms another integer.'
p4118
aS'The abstract formalization of the group axioms, detached as it is from the concrete nature of any particular group and its operation, allows entities with highly diverse mathematical origins in abstract algebra and beyond to be handled in a flexible way, while retaining their essential structural aspects.'
p4119
aS'The ubiquity of groups in numerous areas within and outside mathematics makes them a central organizing principle of contemporary mathematics.Groups share a fundamental kinship with the notion of symmetry.'
p4120
aS'For example, a symmetry group encodes symmetry features of a geometrical object: the group consists of the set of transformations that leave the object unchanged and the operation of combining two such transformations by performing one after the other.'
p4121
aS'Lie groups are the symmetry groups used in the Standard Model of particle physics; Point groups are used to help understand symmetry phenomena in molecular chemistry; and Poincare groups can express the physical symmetry underlying special relativity.The concept of a group arose from the study of polynomial equations, starting with Evariste Galois in the 1830s.'
p4122
aS'After contributions from other fields such as number theory and geometry, the group notion was generalized and firmly established around 1870.'
p4123
aS'Modern group theory--an active mathematical discipline--studies groups in their own right.'
p4124
aS"A representative democracy, Guatemala's capital and largest city is Nueva Guatemala de la Asuncion, also known as Guatemala City.The region of modern day Guatemala had for centuries comprised the core of the Mayan civilization, which extended across Mesoamerica."
p4125
aS'Most of the country was conquered by the Spanish in the 16th century, becoming part of the colony of New Spain.'
p4126
aS'Guatemala attained independence in 1821 as part of the Federal Republic of Central America, which dissolved in 1841.From the mid to late 19th century, Guatemala endured chronic instability and civil strife.'
p4127
aS'Beginning in the early 20th century, it was ruled by a series of dictators backed by the United Fruit Company and the United_States government.'
p4128
aS'In 1944, one such authoritarian leader, Jorge Ubico, was overthrown by a pro-democratic military coup, initiating the ten-year Guatemalan Revolution, which led to sweeping social and economic reforms.'
p4129
aS'The revolution was ended by a U.S.-backed military coup in 1954.From 1960 to 1996, Guatemala underwent a bloody civil war fought between the U.S.-backed government and leftist rebels, which included massacres of the Mayan population perpetrated by the former in the Ixil Triangle.'
p4130
aS"Since the end of the war, Guatemala has witnessed both economic growth and successful democratic elections, though it continues to struggle with high rates of poverty, crime, drug trade, and instability.Guatemala's abundance of biologically significant and unique ecosystems, which includes a large number of endemic species, contributes to Mesoamerica's designation as a biodiversity hotspot."
p4131
aS'The struggle for power between the Papacy and the Holy Roman Empire had arisen with the Investiture Conflict, which began in 1075 and ended with the Concordat_of_Worms in 1122.'
p4132
aS'The division between the Guelphs_and_Ghibellines in Italy, however, persisted until the 15th century. HistoryEdit  OriginsEdit Guelph (often spelled Guelf; in Italian Guelfo, plural Guelfi) is an Italian form of Welf, the family of the dukes of Bavaria (including the namesake Welf, as well as Henry the Lion).'
p4133
aS'The Welfs were said to have used the name as a rallying cry during the Battle of Weinsberg in 1140, in which the rival Hohenstaufens of Swabia (led by Conrad III) used Waiblingen, the name of a castle, as their cry.'
p4134
aS'Waiblingen, at the time pronounced and spelled somewhat like "Wibellingen", subsequently became Ghibellino in Italian.The names were likely introduced to Italy during the reign of Frederick Barbarossa.'
p4135
aS'When Frederick conducted military campaigns in Italy to expand imperial power there, his supporters became known as Ghibellines (Ghibellini).'
p4136
aS"The Lombard League and its allies were defending the liberties of the urban communes against the Emperor's encroachments and became known as Guelphs (Guelfi).The Ghibellines were thus the imperial party, while the Guelphs supported the Pope."
p4137
aS'Broadly speaking, Guelphs tended to come from wealthy mercantile families, whereas Ghibellines were predominantly those whose wealth was based on agricultural estates.'
p4138
aS'Standing at 3.49 metres (11 ft 5 in) tall and 7.76 metres (25 ft 6 in) wide, the large mural shows the suffering of people, animals, and buildings wrenched by violence and chaos.The painting is believed to be a response to the bombing of Guernica, a Basque Country village in northern Spain, by German and Italian warplanes at the request of the Spanish Nationalists.'
p4139
aS"Upon completion, Guernica was displayed around the world in a brief tour, becoming famous and widely acclaimed, and believed to have helped bring worldwide attention to the Spanish_Civil_War. Commission In January 1937, the Spanish Republican government commissioned Picasso to create a large mural for the Spanish display at the Exposition Internationale des Arts et Techniques dans la Vie Moderne at the 1937 World's Fair in Paris."
p4140
aS'At the time, Picasso was living in Paris, where he had been named Honorary Director-in-Exile of the Prado Museum.'
p4141
aS'He had last visited Spain in 1934 and never returned.'
p4142
aS"However, it was only on May 1, having read George Steer's eyewitness account of the bombing of Guernica (originally published in both The Times and The New York Times on April 28), that he abandoned his initial project and started sketching a series of preliminary drawings for Guernica, and which he would finish in early June 1937. Composition The overall scene is within a room where, at an open end on the left, a wide-eyed bull stands over a woman grieving over a dead child in her arms."
p4143
aS'The center is occupied by a horse falling in agony as if it had just been run through by a spear or javelin.'
p4144
aS"The large gaping wound in the horse's side is a major focus of the painting."
p4145
aS'By Lemuel Gulliver, First a Surgeon, and then a Captain of Several Ships, commonly known as Gulliver\'s_Travels (1726, amended 1735), is a prose satire by Anglo-Irish writer and clergyman Jonathan_Swift, that is both a satire on human nature and a parody of the "travellers\' tales" literary subgenre.'
p4146
aS"It is Swift's best known full-length work, and a classic of English literature.The book became popular as soon as it was published."
p4147
aS'John Gay wrote in a 1726 letter to Swift that "It is universally read, from the cabinet council to the nursery."'
p4148
aS'Since then, it has never been out of print.Cavehill in Belfast is thought to have inspired part of book two of the novel.'
p4149
aS'Swift imagined that the mountain resembled the shape of a sleeping giant safeguarding the city. Plot summary  Part I: A Voyage to Lilliput 4 May 1699 - 13 April 1702The book begins with a short preamble in which Lemuel Gulliver, in the style of books of the time, gives a brief outline of his life and history before his voyages.'
p4150
aS'He enjoys travelling, although it is that love of travel that is his downfall.'
p4151
aS'During his first voyage, Gulliver is washed ashore after a shipwreck and finds himself a prisoner of a race of tiny people, less than 6 inches tall, who are inhabitants of the island country of Lilliput.'
p4152
aS'He is best known in the United_States for his study of race relations, which culminated in his book An American Dilemma: The Negro Problem and Modern Democracy.'
p4153
aS'The study was influential in the 1954 landmark U.S. Supreme Court Decision Brown v. Board of Education. Childhood Myrdal was born on 6 December 1898 in Gustafs, Sweden, to Karl Adolf Pettersson (1876-1934), a railroad employee, and his wife Anna Sofia Karlsson (1878-1965).'
p4154
aS'He took the name Myrdal in 1914 after his ancestors farm Myr in Dalarna. Education and early career There is a possibly apocryphal story about an interaction between him and Gustav Cassel, where Cassel was reported to say, "Gunnar, you should be more respectful to your elders, because it is we who will determine your promotion," and he replied, "Yes, but it is we who will write your obituaries.'
p4155
aS'"Gunnar_Myrdal graduated with a law degree from Stockholm University in 1923 and a doctorate in economics in 1927.'
p4156
aS"In 1919, he met Alva Reimer, whom he married in 1924.In Gunnar_Myrdal's doctoral dissertation, published in 1927, he examined the role of expectations in price formation."
p4157
aS'His analysis strongly influenced the Stockholm school.'
p4158
aS"He built on Knut Wicksell's theories of Cumulative process of endogenous money, stressing the importance of Knightian uncertainty and Ex ante and Ex post expectations role in the economic process.Between 1925 and 1929 he studied in Britain and Germany."
p4159
aS'His fellow plotters were John Wright, Thomas Wintour, Thomas Percy, Guy Fawkes, Robert Keyes, Thomas Bates, Robert Wintour, Christopher Wright, John Grant, Ambrose Rookwood, Sir Everard Digby and Francis Tresham.'
p4160
aS'Fawkes, who had 10 years of military experience fighting in the Spanish Netherlands in suppression of the Dutch Revolt, was given charge of the explosives.The plot was revealed to the authorities in an anonymous letter sent to William Parker, 4th Baron Monteagle, on 26 October 1605.'
p4161
aS'During a search of the House of Lords at about midnight on 4 November 1605, Fawkes was discovered guarding 36 barrels of gunpowder--enough to reduce the House of Lords to rubble--and arrested.'
p4162
aS"Most of the conspirators fled from London as they learned of the plot's discovery, trying to enlist support along the way."
p4163
aS'Several made a stand against the pursuing Sheriff of Worcester and his men at Holbeche House; in the ensuing battle Catesby was one of those shot and killed.'
p4164
aS'At their trial on 27 January 1606, eight of the survivors, including Fawkes, were convicted and sentenced to be hanged, drawn and quartered.Details of the assassination attempt were allegedly known by the principal Jesuit of England, Father Henry Garnet.'
p4165
aS'Although he was convicted of treason and sentenced to death, doubt has been cast on how much he really knew of the plot.'
p4166
aS'This period is called the Golden Age of India and was marked by extensive inventions and discoveries in science, technology, engineering, art, dialectic, literature, logic, mathematics, astronomy, religion, and philosophy that crystallized the elements of what is generally known as Hindu culture.'
p4167
aS'Chandra Gupta I, Samudra Gupta, and Chandra Gupta II were the most notable rulers of the Gupta dynasty.'
p4168
aS'The 4th century CE Sanskrit poet Kalidasa credits Guptas with having conquered about twenty one kingdoms, both in and outside India, including the kingdoms of Parasikas, the Hunas, the Kambojas, tribes located in the west and east Oxus valleys, the Kinnaras, Kiratas etc.The high points of this cultural creativity are magnificent architecture, sculptures and paintings.'
p4169
aS'The Gupta period produced scholars such as Kalidasa, Aryabhata, Varahamihira, Vishnu Sharma and Vatsyayana who made great advancements in many academic fields.'
p4170
aS'Science and political administration reached new heights during the Gupta era.'
p4171
aS'Strong trade ties also made the region an important cultural center and set the region up as a base that would influence nearby kingdoms and regions in Burma, Sri_Lanka, and Southeast Asia.'
p4172
aS'The earliest available Indian epics are also thought to have been committed to written texts around this period.The empire gradually declined because of many factors such as substantial loss of territory and imperial authority caused by their own erstwhile feudatories and the invasion by the Huna peoples from Central Asia.'
p4173
aS"He set up a unique spiritual, social, and political platform based on equality, fraternal love, goodness, and virtue.It is part of Sikh religious belief that the spirit of Guru_Nanak's sanctity, divinity and religious authority descended upon each of the nine subsequent Gurus when the Guruship was devolved on to them. Family and early life Nanak was born on 15 April 1469 at Rai Bhoi Ki Talvandi (present day Nankana Sahib, Punjab, Pakistan) near Lahore."
p4174
aS'His parents were Kalyan Chand Das Bedi, popularly shortened to Mehta Kalu, and Mata Tripta.'
p4175
aS'His father was the local patwari (accountant) for crop revenue in the village of Talwandi.'
p4176
aS'His parents were both Hindus and belonged to the merchant caste.He had one sister, Bebe Nanaki, who was five years older than he was.'
p4177
aS'In 1475 she married and moved to Sultanpur.'
p4178
aS'Nanak was attached to his sister and followed her to Sultanpur to live with her and her husband.'
p4179
aS"At the age of around 16 years, Nanak started working under Daulat Khan Lodi, employer of Nanki's husband."
p4180
aS'While in his lifetime his status as a conductor was established beyond question, his own music gained wide popularity only after periods of relative neglect which included a ban on its performance in much of Europe during the Nazi era.'
p4181
aS'After 1945 the music was discovered and championed by a new generation of listeners; Mahler then became one of the most frequently performed and recorded of all composers, a position he has sustained into the 21st century.Born in humble circumstances, Mahler displayed his musical gifts at an early age.'
p4182
aS'After graduating from the Vienna Conservatory in 1878, he held a succession of conducting posts of rising importance in the opera houses of Europe, culminating in his appointment in 1897 as director of the Vienna Court Opera (Hofoper).'
p4183
aS'During his ten years in Vienna, Mahler--who had converted to Catholicism to secure the post--experienced regular opposition and hostility from the anti-Semitic press.'
p4184
aS'Nevertheless, his innovative productions and insistence on the highest performance standards ensured his reputation as one of the greatest of opera conductors, particularly as an interpreter of the stage works of Wagner and Mozart.'
p4185
aS"Late in his life he was briefly director of New York's Metropolitan Opera and the New York Philharmonic.Mahler's oeuvre is relatively small; for much of his life composing was necessarily a part-time activity while he earned his living as a conductor."
p4186
aS"Aside from early works such as a movement from a piano quartet composed when he was a student in Vienna, Mahler's works are designed for large orchestral forces, symphonic choruses and operatic soloists."
p4187
aS'His independence set an example that was important to later artists, such as the Impressionists and the Cubists.'
p4188
aS"Courbet occupies an important place in 19th-century French painting as an innovator and as an artist willing to make bold social statements through his work.Courbet's paintings of the late 1840s and early 1850s brought him his first recognition."
p4189
aS'They challenged convention by depicting unidealized peasants and workers, often on a grand scale traditionally reserved for paintings of religious or historical subjects.'
p4190
aS"Courbet's subsequent paintings were mostly of a less overtly political character: landscapes, seascapes, hunting scenes, nudes and still lifes."
p4191
aS"He was imprisoned for six months in 1871 for his involvement with the Paris_Commune, and lived in exile in Switzerland from 1873 until his death.I am fifty years old and I have always lived in freedom; let me end my life free; when I am dead let this be said of me: 'He belonged to no school, to no church, to no institution, to no academy, least of all to any regime except the regime of liberty.'"
p4192
aS' Biography Courbet was born in 1819 to Regis and Sylvie Oudot Courbet in Ornans (department of Doubs).'
p4193
aS'Being a prosperous farming family, anti-monarchical feelings prevailed in the household.'
p4194
aS'The celebrated short story writer Maupassant was a protege of Flaubert. Life  Early life and education Flaubert was born on 12 December 1821, in Rouen, in the Seine-Maritime department of Upper Normandy, in northern France.'
p4195
aS'He was the second son of Anne Justine Caroline (nee Fleuriot; 1793-1872) and Achille-Cleophas Flaubert (1784-1846), director and senior surgeon of the major hospital in Rouen.'
p4196
aS'He began writing at an early age, as early as eight according to some sources.He was educated at the Lycee Pierre_Corneille in Rouen, and did not leave until 1840, when he went to Paris to study law.'
p4197
aS'In Paris, he was an indifferent student and found the city distasteful.'
p4198
aS'He made a few acquaintances, including Victor_Hugo.'
p4199
aS'Toward the end of 1840, he traveled in the Pyrenees and Corsica.'
p4200
aS'In 1846, after an attack of epilepsy, he left Paris and abandoned the study of law. Personal life From 1846 to 1854, Flaubert had a relationship with the poet Louise Colet; his letters to her survive.'
p4201
aS'He led Sweden to military supremacy during the Thirty Years War, helping to determine the political as well as the religious balance of power in Europe.He is often regarded as one of the greatest military commanders of all time, with innovative use of combined arms.'
p4202
aS'His most notable military victory was the Battle of Breitenfeld.'
p4203
aS'With a superb military machine with good weapons, excellent training, and effective field artillery, backed by an efficient government which could provide necessary funds, Gustavus Adolphus was poised to make himself a major European leader, but he was killed at the Battle of Lutzen in 1632.'
p4204
aS'He was ably assisted in his efforts by Count Axel Oxenstierna, the Lord High Chancellor of Sweden, who also acted as regent after his death.In an era characterized by almost endless warfare, he led his armies as king from 1611 (at age 16) until his death in battle in 1632 while leading a charge--as Sweden rose from the status of a mere regional power to one of the great powers of Europe and a model of early modern era government.'
p4205
aS'Within only a few years of his accession, Sweden had become the largest nation in Europe after Russia and Spain.'
p4206
aS'Some have called him the "father of modern warfare", or the first great modern general.'
p4207
aS'Under his tutelage, Sweden and the Protestant cause developed a number of excellent commanders, such as Lennart Torstensson, who would go on to defeat Sweden\'s enemies and expand the boundaries and the power of the empire long after Gustavus Adolphus\' death in battle.He was known by the epithets "The Golden King" and "The Lion of the North" by neighboring sovereigns.'
p4208
aS'He wrote some 300 short stories, six novels, three travel books, and one volume of verse.'
p4209
aS'His first published story, "Boule de Suif" ("Ball of Fat", 1880), is often considered his masterpiece. Biography Henri-Rene-Albert-Guy_de_Maupassant was born on August 5, 1850 at the Chateau de Miromesnil (Castle Miromesnil, near Dieppe in the Seine-Inferieure (now Seine-Maritime) department in France.'
p4210
aS'He was the first son of Laure Le Poittevin and Gustave de Maupassant, both from prosperous bourgeois families.'
p4211
aS'When Maupassant was 11 and his brother Herve was five, his mother, an independent-minded woman, risked social disgrace to obtain a legal separation from her husband.After the separation, Laure Le Poittevin kept her two sons.'
p4212
aS"With the father's absence, Maupassant's mother became the most influential figure in the young boy's life."
p4213
aS'She was an exceptionally well read woman and was very fond of classical literature, particularly Shakespeare.'
p4214
aS'Until the age of thirteen, Guy happily lived with his mother, at Etretat, in the Villa des Verguies, where, between the sea and the luxuriant countryside, he grew very fond of fishing and outdoor activities.'
p4215
aS'She was appointed Poet Laureate of Illinois in 1968, a position she held until her death, and Poet Laureate Consultant in Poetry to the Library of Congress in 1985. Early life Gwendolyn Elizabeth Brooks was born on June 7, 1917, in Topeka, Kansas, and died on December 3, 2000 in Chicago, IL.'
p4216
aS'She was the first child of David Anderson Brooks and Keziah (Wims) Brooks.'
p4217
aS'Her mother was a school teacher and chose that field of work because she could not afford to attend medical school.'
p4218
aS'(Family lore held that her paternal grandfather had escaped slavery to join the Union forces during the American Civil War.'
p4219
aS')When Brooks was six weeks old, her family moved to Chicago, Illinois during the Great Migration; from then on, Chicago remained her home.'
p4220
aS'According to biographer Kenny Jackson Williams, Brooks first attended a leading white high school in the city, Hyde Park High School, transferred to the all-black Wendell Phillips, and then to the integrated Englewood High School.'
p4221
aS'After completing high school, she graduated in 1936 from Wilson Junior College, now known as Kennedy-King College.'
p4222
aS'The process converts atmospheric nitrogen (N2) to ammonia (NH3) by a reaction with hydrogen (H2) using a metal catalyst under high temperatures and pressures:N2 + 3 H2 - 2 NH3   (DH  -92.4 kJ*mol-1)Before the development of the Haber_process, ammonia had been difficult to produce on an industrial scale with early methods such as the Odda process, Birkeland-Eyde process and Frank-Caro process all being highly inefficient.Although the Haber_process is mainly used to produce fertilizer today, during World_War_I, it provided Germany with a source of ammonia for the production of explosives, compensating for the Allied trade blockade on Chilean saltpeter. History Throughout the nineteenth century the demand for nitrates and ammonia for use as fertilizers and industrial feedstocks had been steadily increasing, however the main source remained the mining of niter deposits.'
p4223
aS'By the start of the twentieth century it was being predicted that these reserves would be unable to satisfy future demand and research into new potential sources of ammonia became ever-more important.'
p4224
aS'The most obvious source was atmospheric nitrogen (N2), which makes up nearly 80% of the air, however N2 is exceptionally stable and will not readily react with other chemicals.'
p4225
aS'Converting N2 into ammonia is therefore exceedingly difficult and posed a chemical challenge which occupied the efforts of chemists across the world.Haber together with his assistant Robert Le Rossignol developed the high-pressure devices and catalysts used to demonstrate the Haber_process at laboratory scale.'
p4226
aS'They demonstrated their process in the summer of 1909 by producing ammonia from air drop by drop, at the rate of about 125 ml (4 US fl oz) per hour.'
p4227
aS"The process was purchased by the German chemical company BASF, which assigned Carl Bosch the task of scaling up Haber's tabletop machine to industrial-level production."
p4228
aS'He succeeded in this process in 1910.'
p4229
aS'In Greek mythology, Hades is the oldest male child of Cronus and Rhea considering the order of birth from the mother, or the youngest, considering the regurgitation by the father.'
p4230
aS"The latter view is attested in Poseidon's speech in the Iliad."
p4231
aS'According to myth, he and his brothers Zeus and Poseidon defeated the Titans and claimed rulership over the cosmos, ruling the underworld, air, and sea, respectively; the solid earth, long the province of Gaia, was available to all three concurrently.Later, the Greeks started referring to the god as Plouton (see below), which the Romans Latinized as Pluto.'
p4232
aS'The Romans would associate Hades/Pluto with their own chthonic gods, Dis Pater and Orcus.'
p4233
aS'The corresponding Etruscan god was Aita.'
p4234
aS'He is often pictured with the three-headed dog Cerberus.'
p4235
aS'In the later mythological tradition, though not in antiquity, he is associated with the Helm of Darkness and the bident.The term "Hades" in Christian theology (and in New Testament Greek) is parallel to Hebrew sheol (shvl, "grave, dirt-pit"), and refers to the abode of the dead.'
p4236
aS'As Bondye does not intercede in human affairs, vodouists direct their worship toward spirits subservient to Bondye, called Loa.'
p4237
aS'Every loa is responsible for a particular aspect of life, with the dynamic and changing personalities of each loa reflecting the many possibilities inherent to the aspects of life over which they preside.'
p4238
aS'In order to navigate daily life, vodouists cultivate personal relationships with the loa through the presentation of offerings, the creation of personal altars and devotional objects, and participation in elaborate ceremonies of music, dance, and spirit possession.Vodou originated in the Caribbean and developed in the French Empire in the 18th century among West African slaves when African religious practice was actively suppressed, and enslaved Africans were forced to convert to Christianity.'
p4239
aS'Religious practices of contemporary Vodou are descended from, and closely related to, West African Vodun as practiced by the Fon and Ewe.'
p4240
aS'Vodou also incorporates elements and symbolism from other African peoples including the Yoruba and Kongo; as well as Taino religious beliefs, Roman Catholicism, and European spirituality including mysticism, Freemasonry, and other influences. Names and etymologyEdit Vodou is a Haitian Creole word that formerly referred to only a small subset of Haitian rituals.'
p4241
aS'It is descended from an Ayizo word referring to "mysterious forces or powers that govern the world and the lives of those who reside within it, but also a range of artistic forms that function in conjunction with these vodun energies."'
p4242
aS'In Haiti, practitioners occasionally use "Vodou" to refer to Haitian religion generically, but it is more common for practitioners to refer to themselves as those who "serve the spirits" (sevite) by participating in ritual ceremonies, usually called a "service to the Loa" (sevis loa) or an "African service" (sevis gineh).'
p4243
aS'The gathering during Hajj is considered the largest annual gathering of people in the world.'
p4244
aS"The state of being physically and financially capable of performing the Hajj is called istita'ah, and a Muslim who fulfills this condition is called a mustati."
p4245
aS'The Hajj is a demonstration of the solidarity of the Muslim people, and their submission to God (Allah).'
p4246
aS'The word Hajj means "to intend a journey", which connotes both the outward act of a journey and the inward act of intentions.The pilgrimage occurs from the 8th to 12th (or in some cases 13th) of Dhu al-Hijjah, the last month of the Islamic calendar.'
p4247
aS'Because the Islamic calendar is lunar and the Islamic year is about eleven days shorter than the Gregorian year, the Gregorian date of Hajj changes from year to year.'
p4248
aS'Ihram is the name given to the special spiritual state in which pilgrims wear two white sheets of seamless cloth and abstain from certain things.The Hajj is associated with the life of Islamic prophet Muhammad from the 7th century, but the ritual of pilgrimage to Mecca is considered by Muslims to stretch back thousands of years to the time of Abraham.'
p4249
aS"During Hajj, pilgrims join processions of hundreds of thousands of people, who simultaneously converge on Mecca for the week of the Hajj, and perform a series of rituals: each person walks counter-clockwise seven times around the Ka'aba (the cube-shaped building and the direction of prayer for the Muslims), runs back and forth between the hills of Al-Safa and Al-Marwah, drinks from the Zamzam Well, goes to the plains of Mount Arafat to stand in vigil, spends a night in the plain of Muzdalifa, and performs symbolic stoning of the devil by throwing stones at three pillars."
p4250
aS'It is a characteristic of the material from which the conductor is made, since its value depends on the type, number, and properties of the charge carriers that constitute the current. Discovery The Hall_effect was discovered in 1879 by Edwin Herbert Hall while he was working on his doctoral degree at Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore, Maryland.'
p4251
aS'His measurements of the tiny effect produced in the apparatus he used were an experimental tour de force, accomplished 18 years before the electron was discovered. Theory The Hall_effect is due to the nature of the current in a conductor.'
p4252
aS'Current consists of the movement of many small charge carriers, typically electrons, holes, ions (see Electromigration) or all three.'
p4253
aS'When a magnetic field is present, these charges experience a force, called the Lorentz force.'
p4254
aS"When such a magnetic field is absent, the charges follow approximately straight, 'line of sight' paths between collisions with impurities, phonons, etc."
p4255
aS'However, when a magnetic field with a perpendicular component is applied, their paths between collisions are curved so that moving charges accumulate on one face of the material.'
p4256
aS'This leaves equal and opposite charges exposed on the other face, where there is a scarcity of mobile charges.'
p4257
aS'In the modern IUPAC nomenclature, this group is known as group 17.The group of halogens is the only periodic table group that contains elements in three of the four main states of matter at standard temperature and pressure.'
p4258
aS'All of the halogens form acids when bonded to hydrogen.'
p4259
aS'Most halogens are typically produced from minerals or salts.'
p4260
aS'The middle halogens, that is chlorine, bromine and iodine, are often used as disinfectants.'
p4261
aS'Organobromides are the most important class of flame retardants.'
p4262
aS'Elemental halogens are generally toxic. History The fluorine mineral fluorospar was known as early as 1529.'
p4263
aS'Early chemists realized that fluorine compounds contain an undiscovered element, but were unable to isolate it.'
p4264
aS'Because of its close relation to the time-evolution of a system, it is of fundamental importance in most formulations of quantum theory.The Hamiltonian is named after Sir William Rowan Hamilton (1805 - 1865), an Irish physicist, astronomer, and mathematician, best known for his reformulation of Newtonian mechanics, now called Hamiltonian mechanics. Introduction The Hamiltonian is the sum of the kinetic energies of all the particles, plus the potential energy of the particles associated with the system.'
p4265
aS'For different situations or number of particles, the Hamiltonian is different since it includes the sum of kinetic energies of the particles, and the potential energy function corresponding to the situation. The Schrodinger Hamiltonian  One particle By analogy with classical mechanics, the Hamiltonian is commonly expressed as the sum of operators corresponding to the kinetic and potential energies of a system in the formwhereis the potential energy operator andis the kinetic energy operator in which m is the mass of the particle, the dot denotes the dot product of vectors, andis the momentum operator wherein [?]'
p4266
aS'is the del operator.'
p4267
aS'The dot product of [?]'
p4268
aS'with itself is the Laplacian [?]2.'
p4269
aS'In three dimensions using Cartesian coordinates the Laplace operator isAlthough this is not the technical definition of the Hamiltonian in classical mechanics, it is the form it most commonly takes.'
p4270
aS'Combining these together yields the familiar form used in the Schrodinger equation:which allows one to apply the Hamiltonian to systems described by a wave function Ps(r, t).'
p4271
aS'Claudius had murdered his own brother, Hamlet\'s father King Hamlet, and subsequently seized the throne, marrying his deceased brother\'s widow, Hamlet\'s mother Gertrude.Hamlet is Shakespeare\'s longest play and among the most powerful and influential tragedies in English literature, with a story capable of "seemingly endless retelling and adaptation by others."'
p4272
aS"The play seems to have been one of Shakespeare's most popular works during his lifetime and still ranks among his most-performed, topping the performance list of the Royal Shakespeare Company and its predecessors in Stratford-upon-Avon since 1879."
p4273
aS'It has inspired writers from Goethe and Dickens to Joyce and Murdoch, and has been described as "the world\'s most filmed story after Cinderella".The story of Hamlet ultimately derives from the legend of Amleth, preserved by 13th-century chronicler Saxo Grammaticus in his Gesta Danorum, as subsequently retold by 16th-century scholar Francois de Belleforest.'
p4274
aS'Shakespeare may also have drawn on an earlier (hypothetical) Elizabethan play known today as the Ur-Hamlet, though some scholars believe he himself wrote the Ur-Hamlet, later revising it to create the version of Hamlet we now have.'
p4275
aS"He almost certainly created the title role for Richard Burbage, the leading tragedian of Shakespeare's time."
p4276
aS'In the 400 years since, the role has been performed by highly acclaimed actors from each successive age.Three different early versions of the play are extant, the First Quarto (Q1, 1603), the Second Quarto (Q2, 1604), and the First Folio (F1, 1623).'
p4277
aS'Each version includes lines, and even entire scenes, missing from the others.'
p4278
aS"It is by far the shortest of Dickens' novels, barely a quarter of the length of those written immediately before and after it."
p4279
aS'Also, unlike all but one of his other novels, Hard_Times has neither a preface nor illustrations.'
p4280
aS'Moreover, it is his only novel not to have scenes set in London.'
p4281
aS'Instead the story is set in the fictitious Victorian industrial Coketown, a generic Northern English mill-town, in some ways similar to Manchester, though smaller.'
p4282
aS"Coketown may be partially based on 19th-century Preston.One of Dickens's reasons for writing Hard_Times was that sales of his weekly periodical, Household Words, were low, and it was hoped the novel's publication in instalments would boost circulation - as indeed proved to be the case."
p4283
aS'Since publication it has received a mixed response from critics.'
p4284
aS"Critics such as F. R. Leavis, George_Bernard_Shaw, and Thomas Macaulay have mainly focused on Dickens's treatment of trade unions and his post-Industrial Revolution pessimism regarding the divide between capitalist mill owners and undervalued workers during the Victorian era. Prevalence of utilitarianism The Utilitarians were one of the targets of this novel."
p4285
aS'"If an external time dependent force is present, the harmonic oscillator is described as a driven oscillator.Mechanical examples include pendulums (with small angles of displacement), masses connected to springs, and acoustical systems.'
p4286
aS'Other analogous systems include electrical harmonic oscillators such as RLC circuits.'
p4287
aS'The harmonic oscillator model is very important in physics, because any mass subject to a force in stable equilibrium acts as a harmonic oscillator for small vibrations.'
p4288
aS'Harmonic_oscillators occur widely in nature and are exploited in many manmade devices, such as clocks and radio circuits.'
p4289
aS'They are the source of virtually all sinusoidal vibrations and waves. Simple harmonic oscillator A simple harmonic oscillator is an oscillator that is neither driven nor damped.'
p4290
aS"It consists of a mass m, which experiences a single force, F, which pulls the mass in the direction of the point x0 and depends only on the mass's position x and a constant k. Balance of forces (Newton's second law) for the system isSolving this differential equation, we find that the motion is described by the functionwhereThe motion is periodic, repeating itself in a sinusoidal fashion with constant amplitude, A."
p4291
aS'In addition to its amplitude, the motion of a simple harmonic oscillator is characterized by its period T, the time for a single oscillation or its frequency f  1/T, the number of cycles per unit time.'
p4292
aS"The two first met after a concert of Berlioz's works conducted by Narcisse Girard on 22 December 1833, three years after the premiere of Berlioz's Symphonie fantastique."
p4293
aS'Paganini had acquired a superb viola, a Stradivarius--"But I have no suitable music.'
p4294
aS'Would you like to write a solo for viola?'
p4295
aS'You are the only one I can trust for this task.'
p4296
aS'"Berlioz began "by writing a solo for viola, but one which involved the orchestra in such a way as not to reduce the effectiveness of the orchestral contribution."'
p4297
aS'When Paganini saw the sketch of the allegro movement, with all the rests in the viola part, he told Berlioz it would not do, and that he expected to be playing continuously.'
p4298
aS"They then parted, with Paganini disappointed. Description Harold_en_Italie is a four-movement work featuring an extensive part for solo viola.Lord Byron's poem Childe Harold's Pilgrimage inspired the mood of Harold."
p4299
aS'His death marked the end of Anglo-Saxon rule over England.Harold was a powerful earl and member of a prominent Anglo-Saxon family with ties to King Cnut.'
p4300
aS'Upon the death of Edward_the_Confessor in January 1066, the Witenagemot convened and chose Harold to succeed; he was crowned in Westminster Abbey.'
p4301
aS'In late September he successfully repelled an invasion by rival claimant Harald Hardrada of Norway, before marching his army back south to meet William_the_Conqueror at Hastings some two weeks later.He is considered by some Orthodox Christians and theologians to be the last Orthodox King of England and a possible passion-bearer, after conspiracy by William_the_Conqueror and Pope Alexander II to secure a strict Roman Rite over the British Isles, which at the time may not have yet realized the effects of the East-West Schism. Family background Harold was a son of Godwin (1001-1053), the powerful Earl of Wessex, and of Gytha Thorkelsdottir, sister-in-law of King Cnut the Great of England and Denmark.'
p4302
aS"Gytha's brother was Ulf Jarl, who married Cnut's sister Estrith (ca 1015/1016)."
p4303
aS"This made Ulf the son-in-law of King Sweyn Forkbeard (died 1014); Ulf and Estrith's son would become King Sweyn II of Denmark in 1047."
p4304
aS'Godwin was the son of Wulfnoth, probably a thegn and a native of Sussex.'
p4305
aS"Godwin remained an earl throughout the remainder of Cnut's reign, one of only two earls to survive to the end of Cnut's reign."
p4306
aS'His best-known plays include The Birthday Party (1957), The Homecoming (1964), and Betrayal (1978), each of which he adapted for the screen.'
p4307
aS"His screenplay adaptations of others' works include The Servant (1963), The Go-Between (1971), The French Lieutenant's Woman (1981), The_Trial (1993), and Sleuth (2007)."
p4308
aS"He also directed or acted in radio, stage, television, and film productions of his own and others' works.Pinter was born and raised in Hackney, east London, and educated at Hackney Downs School."
p4309
aS'He was a sprinter and a keen cricket player, acting in school plays and writing poetry.'
p4310
aS'He attended the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art but did not complete the course.'
p4311
aS'He was fined for refusing National Service as a conscientious objector.'
p4312
aS'Subsequently, he continued training at the Central School of Speech and Drama and worked in repertory theatre in Ireland and England.'
p4313
aS'It depicts the harsh life for African Americans under slavery.'
p4314
aS'It reached millions as a novel and play, and became influential in the United_States and Great Britain.'
p4315
aS'It energized anti-slavery forces in the American North, while provoking widespread anger in the South.'
p4316
aS'She wrote 30 books, including novels, three travel memoirs, and collections of articles and letters.'
p4317
aS'She was influential for both her writings and her public stands on social issues of the day. Life and work Harriet Elisabeth Beecher was born in Litchfield, Connecticut, on June 14, 1811.'
p4318
aS'She was the seventh of 13 children born to outspoken religious leader Lyman Beecher and Roxana (Foote), a deeply religious woman who died when Stowe was only five years old.'
p4319
aS"Roxana's maternal grandfather was General Andrew Ward of the Revolutionary War."
p4320
aS"Under Truman, the Allies successfully concluded World_War_II; in the aftermath of the conflict, tensions with the Soviet Union increased, marking the start of the Cold War.Truman was born in Missouri and spent most of his youth on his family's farm."
p4321
aS'During World_War_I, he served in combat in France as an artillery officer in his National Guard unit.'
p4322
aS'After the war, he briefly owned a haberdashery and joined the Democratic Party political machine of Tom Pendergast in Kansas City, Missouri.'
p4323
aS'Truman was first elected to public office as a county official and became a U.S.'
p4324
aS'Senator in 1935.'
p4325
aS'He gained national prominence as head of the Truman Committee formed in March 1941, which exposed waste, fraud, and corruption in wartime contracts.During World_War_II, while Nazi Germany surrendered a few weeks after Truman assumed the Presidency, the war with Imperial Japan was expected to last another year or more.'
p4326
aS"Truman approved the use of atomic weapons against Japan, intending to force Japan's surrender and spare American lives in a planned invasion; the decision remains controversial."
p4327
aS'The Federalists also discussed their grievances with the Louisiana Purchase and the Embargo of 1807.'
p4328
aS"However, weeks after the convention's end, news of Major General Andrew_Jackson's overwhelming victory in New_Orleans swept over the Northeast, discrediting and disgracing the Federalists, resulting in their elimination as a major national political force. Background  Relations with Great Britain and France Under the administrations of George_Washington and John_Adams, a vigorous trade with France was maintained while both administrations engaged in an undeclared war with France."
p4329
aS'With the resumption of the Napoleonic Wars at the same time that Thomas Jefferson assumed office, relations with both France and Great Britain declined.'
p4330
aS"Jefferson's goal was an expansion of free trade created by Great Britain lifting trade restrictions placed against the United_States."
p4331
aS'However, to force Britain into compliance, he adopted anti-foreign trade policies such as the Embargo Act of 1807 and the Non-Intercourse Act of 1809.'
p4332
aS'These policies were very unpopular among Northeastern merchants and shippers.'
p4333
aS"Jefferson's successor, President James Madison, and what is now called by historians the Democratic-Republican Party, continued his policies.The opposing Federalist Party regained strength especially in New England, and in New York where it collaborated with Lieutenant Governor DeWitt Clinton of New_York_City and supported him for president in 1812. Opposition to the War_of_1812 When Madison was re-elected in 1812 the discontent in New England intensified."
p4334
aS'Hathor was worshiped by royalty and common people alike in whose tombs she is depicted as "Mistress of the West" welcoming the dead into the next life.'
p4335
aS'In other roles she was a goddess of music, dance, foreign lands and fertility who helped women in childbirth, as well as the patron goddess of miners.The cult of Hathor predates the historic period, and the roots of devotion to her are therefore difficult to trace, though it may be a development of predynastic cults which venerated fertility, and nature in general, represented by cows.Hathor is commonly depicted as a cow goddess with horns in which is set a sun disk with Uraeus.'
p4336
aS'Twin feathers are also sometimes shown in later periods as well as a menat necklace.'
p4337
aS'Hathor may be the cow goddess who is depicted from an early date on the Narmer Palette and on a stone urn dating from the 1st dynasty that suggests a role as sky-goddess and a relationship to Horus who, as a sun god, is "housed" in her.The Ancient Egyptians viewed reality as multi-layered in which deities who merge for various reasons, while retaining divergent attributes and myths, were not seen as contradictory but complementary.'
p4338
aS'In a complicated relationship Hathor is at times the mother, daughter and wife of Ra and, like Isis, is at times described as the mother of Horus, and associated with Bast.The cult of Osiris promised eternal life to those deemed morally worthy.'
p4339
aS'Originally the justified dead, male or female, became an Osiris but by early Roman times females became identified with Hathor and men with Osiris.The Ancient Greeks sometimes identified Hathor with the goddess Aphrodite, while in Roman mythology she corresponds to Venus. Early depictions Hathor is ambiguously depicted until the 4th dynasty.'
p4340
aS'In the historical era Hathor is shown using the imagery of a cow deity.'
p4341
aS'It is the northernmost island group in Polynesia, occupying most of an archipelago in the central Pacific Ocean.'
p4342
aS'Hawaii is the only U.S. state not located in the Americas.'
p4343
aS'The state does not observe daylight saving time.The state encompasses nearly the entire volcanic Hawaiian archipelago, which comprises hundreds of islands spread over 1,500 miles (2,400 km).'
p4344
aS'At the southeastern end of the archipelago, the eight main islands are--in order from northwest to southeast: Ni`ihau, Kaua`i, O`ahu, Moloka`i, Lana`i, Kaho`olawe, Maui and the Island of Hawai`i.'
p4345
aS'The last is the largest island in the group; it is often called the "Big Island" or "Hawai`i Island" to avoid confusion with the state or archipelago.'
p4346
aS"The archipelago is physiographically and ethnologically part of the Polynesian subregion of Oceania.Hawaii's diverse natural scenery, warm tropical climate, abundance of public beaches, oceanic surroundings, and active volcanoes make it a popular destination for tourists, surfers, biologists, and volcanologists."
p4347
aS"Because of its central location in the Pacific and 19th-century labor migration, Hawaii's culture is strongly influenced by North American and Asian cultures, in addition to its indigenous Hawaiian culture."
p4348
aS'An unknown person threw a dynamite bomb at police as they acted to disperse the public meeting.'
p4349
aS'The bomb blast and ensuing gunfire resulted in the deaths of seven police officers and at least four civilians; scores of others were wounded.In the internationally publicized legal proceedings that followed, eight anarchists were convicted of conspiracy.'
p4350
aS'The evidence was that one of the defendants may have built the bomb, but none of those on trial had thrown it.'
p4351
aS'Seven were sentenced to death and one to a term of 15 years in prison.'
p4352
aS'The death sentences of two of the defendants were commuted by Illinois governor Richard J. Oglesby to terms of life in prison, and another committed suicide in jail rather than face the gallows.'
p4353
aS'The other four were hanged on November 11, 1887.'
p4354
aS"In 1893, Illinois' new governor John Peter Altgeld pardoned the remaining defendants and criticized the trial.The Haymarket_affair is generally considered significant as the origin of international May Day observances for workers."
p4355
aS'In a max heap, the keys of parent nodes are always greater than or equal to those of the children and the highest key is in the root node.'
p4356
aS'In a min heap, the keys of parent nodes are less than or equal to those of the children and the lowest key is in the root node.'
p4357
aS"Heaps are crucial in several efficient graph algorithms such as Dijkstra's algorithm, and in the sorting algorithm heapsort."
p4358
aS'A common implementation of a heap is the binary heap, in which the tree is a complete binary tree (see figure).In a heap, the highest (or lowest) priority element is always stored at the root, hence the name heap.'
p4359
aS'A heap is not a sorted structure and can be regarded as partially ordered.'
p4360
aS'As visible from the Heap-diagram, there is no particular relationship among nodes on any given level, even among the siblings.'
p4361
aS'When a heap is a complete binary tree, it has a smallest possible height--a heap with N nodes always has log N height.'
p4362
aS"This setting provides the frame for Marlow's story of his obsession with the ivory trader Kurtz, which enables Conrad to create a parallel between London and Africa as places of darkness.Central to Conrad's work is the idea that there is little difference between so-called civilized people and those described as savages; Heart_of_Darkness raises important questions about imperialism and racism.Originally published as a three-part serial story in Blackwood's Magazine, the novella Heart_of_Darkness has been variously published and translated into many languages."
p4363
aS'In 1998, the Modern Library ranked Heart_of_Darkness as the sixty-seventh of the hundred best novels in English of the twentieth century. Composition and publication Joseph_Conrad acknowledged that Heart_of_Darkness was in part based on his own experiences during his travels in Africa.'
p4364
aS'In 1890, at the age of 32, he was appointed by a Belgian trading company to serve as the captain of a steamer on the Congo River.'
p4365
aS'Conrad, who was born in Poland and later settled in England, had eagerly anticipated the voyage, having decided to become a sailor at an early age.'
p4366
aS"While sailing up the Congo river from one station to another, the captain became ill, Conrad assumed command of the boat and guided the ship to the trading company's innermost station."
p4367
aS'He reportedly became disillusioned with Imperialism, after witnessing the cruelty and corruption perpetrated by the European companies in the area.'
p4368
aS"The novella's main narrator, Charles Marlow, is believed to have been based upon the author.There have been many proposed sources for the character of the antagonist, Kurtz."
p4369
aS'The "Russian manner" of the subtitle refers to the style of Anton_Chekhov, which Shaw adapts. Characters Ellie DunnNurse GuinnessCaptain ShotoverLady UtterwordHesione HushabyeMazzini DunnHector HushabyeBoss Arthur ManganRandall UtterwordBurglar (Billy Dunn) Plot summary Ellie Dunn, her father, and her fiance are invited to one of Hesione Hushabye\'s infamous dinner parties, to be held at the house of her father, the eccentric Captain Shotover, an inventor in his late 80s who is trying to create a "psychic ray" that will destroy dynamite.'
p4370
aS'The house is built in the shape of the stern of a ship.'
p4371
aS"Lady Utterword, Shotover's other daughter, arrives from Australia, but he pretends not to recognise her."
p4372
aS'Hesione says they are running out of money.'
p4373
aS'Shotover needs to invent a weapon of mass destruction.'
p4374
aS'His last invention, a lifeboat, did not bring in much cash.'
p4375
aS'Ellie intends to marry businessman Boss Mangan, but she really loves a man she met in the National Gallery.'
p4376
aS'Specific heat is the amount of heat needed to raise the temperature of a certain mass 1 degree Celsius.Heat_capacity is an extensive property of matter, meaning it is proportional to the size of the system.'
p4377
aS'When expressing the same phenomenon as an intensive property, the heat capacity is divided by the amount of substance, mass, or volume, so that the quantity is independent of the size or extent of the sample.'
p4378
aS'The molar heat capacity is the heat capacity per unit amount (SI unit: mole) of a pure substance and the specific heat capacity, often simply called specific heat, is the heat capacity per unit mass of a material.'
p4379
aS'Occasionally, in engineering contexts, the volumetric heat capacity is used.Temperature reflects the average randomized kinetic energy of constituent particles of matter (e.g.'
p4380
aS'atoms or molecules) relative to the centre of mass of the system, while heat is the transfer of energy across a system boundary into the body other than by work or matter transfer.'
p4381
aS'Translation, rotation, and vibration of atoms represent the degrees of freedom of motion which classically contribute to the heat capacity of gases, while only vibrations are needed to describe the heat capacities of most solids  , as shown by the Dulong-Petit law.'
p4382
aS'Other, more exotic contributions can come from magnetic and electronic  degrees of freedom in solids, but these rarely make substantial contributions.For quantum mechanical reasons, at any given temperature, some of these degrees of freedom may be unavailable, or only partially available, to store thermal energy.'
p4383
aS'On the subject of the title, Ibsen wrote: "My intention in giving it this name was to indicate that Hedda as a personality is to be regarded rather as her father\'s daughter than her husband\'s wife.'
p4384
aS'" Characters Hedda Tesman nee Gabler -- The main character, newly married and bored with both her marriage and life, seeking to influence a human fate for the first time.'
p4385
aS"She is the daughter of General Gabler.George (Jorgen) Tesman -- Hedda's husband, an academic who is as interested in research and travel as he is in his wife."
p4386
aS"Despite George's presumed rivalry with Eilert over Hedda, he remains a congenial and compassionate host, and even plans to return Eilert's manuscript after Eilert loses it in a drunken stupor.Juliana (Juliane) Tesman -- George's loving aunt who has raised him since early childhood."
p4387
aS'She is also called Aunt Julle in the play, and Aunt Ju-Ju by George.Thea Elvsted -- A younger schoolmate of Hedda and a former acquaintance of George.'
p4388
aS"Nervous and shy, Thea is in an unhappy marriage.Judge Brack -- An unscrupulous family friend.Eilert Lovborg (Ejlert Lovborg) -- George's former colleague, who now competes with George to achieve publication and a teaching position."
p4389
aS'Eilert was once in love with Hedda.Bertha (Berte) -- A servant of the Tesmans.Diana -- Owner of a brothel where Eilert Lovborg dies. Plot Hedda, the daughter of an aristocratic and enigmatic general, has just returned to her villa in Kristiania (now Oslo) from her honeymoon.'
p4390
aS"Heimdallr is said to be the originator of social classes among humanity and once regained Freyja's treasured possession Brisingamen while doing battle in the shape of a seal with Loki."
p4391
aS'Heimdallr and Loki are foretold to kill one another during the events of Ragnarok.'
p4392
aS'Heimdallr is additionally referred to as Rig, Hallinskidi, Gullintanni, and Vindler or Vindhler.Heimdallr is attested in the Poetic Edda, compiled in the 13th century from earlier traditional material; in the Prose Edda and Heimskringla, both written in the 13th century by Snorri Sturluson; in the poetry of skalds; and on an Old Norse runic inscription found in England.'
p4393
aS'Two lines of an otherwise lost poem about the god, Heimdalargaldr, survive.'
p4394
aS'Due to the problematic and enigmatic nature of these attestations, scholars have produced various theories about the nature of the god, including his apparent relation to rams, that he may be a personification of or connected to the world tree Yggdrasil, and potential Indo-European cognates. Names and etymology Heimdallr also appears as Heimdalr and Heimdali.'
p4395
aS"The etymology of the name is obscure, but 'the one who illuminates the world' has been proposed."
p4396
aS"Heimdallr may be connected to Mardoll, one of Freyja's names."
p4397
aS'He refused to join the Hitler Youth during the 1930s.'
p4398
aS'He was apprenticed to a bookseller before studying German at the University of Cologne.'
p4399
aS'In 1942 he married Annemarie Cech with whom he was ultimately to have three sons; she later acted as his collaborator on a number of different translations of English and American literature into German that he produced over the years.'
p4400
aS"Conscripted into the Wehrmacht, he served in France, Romania, Hungary and the Soviet Union, and was wounded four times (as well as contracting typhoid fever) before being captured by Americans in April 1945 and sent to a prisoner-of-war camp.After the war he returned to Cologne and began working in his family's cabinet shop and, for one year, worked in a municipal statistical bureau, an experience which he did not enjoy and which he left in order to take the risk of becoming a writer instead.Boll became a full-time writer at the age of 30."
p4401
aS'His first novel, Der Zug war punktlich (The Train Was on Time), was published in 1949.'
p4402
aS'He was invited to the 1949 meeting of the Group 47 circle of German authors and his work was deemed to be the best presented during the year 1951.Many other novels, short stories, radio plays and essay collections followed. Awards, honours and appointments Boll was extremely successful and was lauded on a number of occasions.'
p4403
aS"In 1953 he was awarded the Culture Prize of German Industry, the Southern German Radio Prize and the German Critics' Prize."
p4404
aS"Heine's later verse and prose are distinguished by their satirical wit and irony."
p4405
aS'He is considered part of the Young Germany movement.'
p4406
aS'His radical political views led to many of his works being banned by German authorities.'
p4407
aS'Heine spent the last 25 years of his life as an expatriate in Paris. Early life  Childhood and youth Heine was born in Dusseldorf, Rhineland, into a Jewish family.'
p4408
aS'He was called "Harry" as a child, but became "Heinrich" after his conversion to Christianity in 1825.'
p4409
aS"Heine's father, Samson Heine (1764-1828), was a textile merchant."
p4410
aS'His mother Peira (known as "Betty"), nee van Geldern (1771-1859), was the daughter of a physician.'
p4411
aS'After a scanty education, he entered the Prussian Army in 1792, served in the Rhine campaign of 1796, and retired from the service in 1799 with the rank of lieutenant.'
p4412
aS"He studied law and philosophy at the Viadrina University and in 1800 received a subordinate post in the Ministry of Finance at Berlin.In the following year, Kleist's roving, restless spirit got the better of him, and procuring a lengthened leave of absence he visited Paris and then settled in Switzerland."
p4413
aS'There he found congenial friends in Heinrich Zschokke and Ludwig Wieland (1777-1819), son of the poet Christoph Martin Wieland; and to them he read his first drama, a gloomy tragedy, The Schroffenstein Family (1803).In the autumn of 1802, Kleist returned to Germany; he visited Goethe, Schiller, and Wieland in Weimar, stayed for a while in Leipzig and Dresden, again proceeded to Paris, and returning in 1804 to his post in Berlin was transferred to the Domanenkammer (department for the administration of crown lands) at Konigsberg.'
p4414
aS'On a journey to Dresden in 1807, Kleist was arrested by the French as a spy; he remained a close prisoner of France in the Fort de Joux.'
p4415
aS'On regaining his liberty, he proceeded to Dresden, where, in conjunction with Adam Heinrich Muller (1779-1829), he published the journal Phobus in 1808.In 1809 Kleist went to Prague, and ultimately settled in Berlin, where he edited (1810/1811) the Berliner Abendblatter.'
p4416
aS'Captivated by the intellectual and musical accomplishments of the terminally ill Henriette Vogel, Kleist, who was himself more disheartened and embittered than ever, agreed to do her bidding and die with her, carrying out this resolution by first shooting Vogel and then himself on the shore of the Kleiner Wannsee (Little Wannsee) near Potsdam, on 21 November 1811.According to the Encyclopaedia Britannica Eleventh Edition, "Kleist\'s whole life was filled by a restless striving after ideal and illusory happiness, and this is largely reflected in his work.'
p4417
aS'He was by far the most important North German dramatist of the Romantic movement, and no other of the Romanticists approaches him in the energy with which he expresses patriotic indignation.'
p4418
aS'Its boiling and melting points are the lowest among all the elements and it exists only as a gas except in extremely cold conditions.Helium is the second lightest element and is the second most abundant element in the observable universe, being present at about 24% of the total elemental mass, which is more than 12 times the mass of all the heavier elements combined.'
p4419
aS'Its abundance is similar to this figure in the Sun and in Jupiter.'
p4420
aS'This is due to the very high nuclear binding energy (per nucleon) of helium-4 with respect to the next three elements after helium.'
p4421
aS'This helium-4 binding energy also accounts for why it is a product of both nuclear fusion and radioactive decay.'
p4422
aS'Most helium in the universe is helium-4, and is believed to have been formed during the Big Bang.'
p4423
aS'Large amounts of new helium are being created by nuclear fusion of hydrogen in stars.Helium is named for the Greek god of the Sun, Helios.'
p4424
aS'It was first detected as an unknown yellow spectral line signature in sunlight during a solar eclipse in 1868 by French astronomer Jules Janssen.'
p4425
aS'If the volume is not held constant, part of this work will be performed as boundary work.'
p4426
aS'The Helmholtz energy is commonly used for systems held at constant volume.'
p4427
aS'Since in this case no work is performed on the environment, the drop in the Helmholtz energy is equal to the maximum amount of useful work that can be extracted from the system.'
p4428
aS'For a system at constant temperature and volume, the Helmholtz energy is minimized at equilibrium.The Helmholtz_free_energy was developed by Hermann von Helmholtz, a German physicist, and is usually denoted by the letter A  (from the German "Arbeit" or work), or the letter F .'
p4429
aS'The IUPAC recommends the letter A  as well as the use of name Helmholtz energy.'
p4430
aS'In physics, the letter F can also be used to denote the Helmholtz energy, as Helmholtz energy is sometimes referred to as the Helmholtz function, Helmholtz_free_energy, or simply free energy (not to be confused with Gibbs free energy).While Gibbs free energy is most commonly used as a measure of thermodynamic potential, especially in the field of chemistry, it is inconvenient for some applications that do not occur at constant pressure.'
p4431
aS'For example, in explosives research, Helmholtz_free_energy is often used since explosive reactions by their nature induce pressure changes.'
p4432
aS'the tissues).'
p4433
aS"There it releases the oxygen to permit aerobic respiration to provide energy to power the functions of the organism in the process called metabolism.In mammals, the protein makes up about 96% of the red blood cells' dry content (by weight), and around 35% of the total content (including water)."
p4434
aS'Hemoglobin has an oxygen-binding capacity of 1.34 mL O2 per gram, which increases the total blood oxygen capacity seventy-fold compared to dissolved oxygen in blood.'
p4435
aS"The mammalian hemoglobin molecule can bind (carry) up to four oxygen molecules.Hemoglobin is involved in the transport of other gases: It carries some of the body's respiratory carbon dioxide (about 10% of the total) as carbaminohemoglobin, in which CO2 is bound to the globin protein."
p4436
aS'The molecule also carries the important regulatory molecule nitric oxide bound to a globin protein thiol group, releasing it at the same time as oxygen.Hemoglobin is also found outside red blood cells and their progenitor lines.'
p4437
aS'Other cells that contain hemoglobin include the A9 dopaminergic neurons in the substantia nigra, macrophages, alveolar cells, and mesangial cells in the kidney.'
p4438
aS'In these tissues, hemoglobin has a non-oxygen-carrying function as an antioxidant and a regulator of iron metabolism.Hemoglobin and hemoglobin-like molecules are also found in many invertebrates, fungi, and plants.'
p4439
aS'Although he was initially labelled a Fauve (wild beast), by the 1920s he was increasingly hailed as an upholder of the classical tradition in French painting.'
p4440
aS'His mastery of the expressive language of colour and drawing, displayed in a body of work spanning over a half-century, won him recognition as a leading figure in modern art. Early life and education Matisse was born in Le Cateau-Cambresis, in the Nord department in northern France, the oldest son of a prosperous grain merchant.'
p4441
aS'He grew up in Bohain-en-Vermandois, Picardie, France.'
p4442
aS'In 1887 he went to Paris to study law, working as a court administrator in Le Cateau-Cambresis after gaining his qualification.'
p4443
aS'He first started to paint in 1889, after his mother brought him art supplies during a period of convalescence following an attack of appendicitis.'
p4444
aS'He discovered "a kind of paradise" as he later described it, and decided to become an artist, deeply disappointing his father.In 1891 he returned to Paris to study art at the Academie Julian and became a student of William-Adolphe Bouguereau and Gustave Moreau.'
p4445
aS'Initially he painted still lifes and landscapes in a traditional style, at which he achieved reasonable proficiency.'
p4446
aS'Ridiculed during his lifetime by critics, he came to be recognized as a self-taught genius whose works are of high artistic quality.'
p4447
aS"Rousseau's work exerted an extensive influence on several generations of avant-garde artists. Background Henri_Rousseau was born in Laval, France, in 1844 into the family of a plumber; he was forced to work there as a small boy."
p4448
aS'He attended Laval High School as a day student and then as a boarder, after his father became a debtor and his parents had to leave the town upon the seizure of their house.'
p4449
aS'Though mediocre in some of his high school subjects, Rousseau won prizes for drawing and music.'
p4450
aS'After high school, he worked for a lawyer and studied law, but "attempted a small perjury and sought refuge in the army."'
p4451
aS'He served four years, starting in 1863.'
p4452
aS"With his father's death, Rousseau moved to Paris in 1868 to support his widowed mother as a government employee."
p4453
aS'His father was George Cabot Lodge, a poet, through whom he was a grandson of Senator Henry Cabot Lodge, great-great grandson of Senator Elijah H. Mills, and great-great-great-grandson of Senator George Cabot.'
p4454
aS'Through his mother, Mathilda Elizabeth Frelinghuysen Davis, he was a great-great grandson of Senator John Davis.'
p4455
aS'He had two siblings: John Davis Lodge (1903-1985), also a politician, and Helena Lodge de Streel (b.'
p4456
aS'1905).Lodge attended St. Albans School and graduated from Middlesex School.'
p4457
aS'In 1924, he graduated cum laude from Harvard University, where he was a member of the Hasty Pudding and the Fox Club. Career Lodge worked in the newspaper business, before being elected to the Massachusetts House of Representatives in 1933. Senator In November 1936, Lodge was elected to the United_States Senate as a Republican.'
p4458
aS'He defeated James Michael Curley in an open Senate contest. World_War_II Lodge served with distinction during the war, rising to the rank of lieutenant colonel.'
p4459
aS'During the war he saw two tours of duty: The first in 1942, while also serving as a U.S.'
p4460
aS'He lost his campaigns for president in 1824, 1832 and 1844.Clay was a very dominant figure in both the First and Second Party systems.'
p4461
aS'As a leading war hawk in 1812, he favored war with Britain and played a significant role in leading the nation to war in the War_of_1812.'
p4462
aS'In 1824 he ran for president and lost, but maneuvered House voting in favor of John_Quincy_Adams, who made him secretary of state as the Jacksonians denounced what they considered a "corrupt bargain."'
p4463
aS'He ran and lost again in 1832 and 1844 as the candidate of the Whig Party, which he founded and usually dominated.'
p4464
aS'Clay was the foremost proponent of the American System, fighting for an increase in tariffs to foster industry in the United_States, the use of federal funding to build and maintain infrastructure, and a strong national bank.'
p4465
aS'He opposed the annexation of Texas, fearing it would inject the slavery issue into politics.'
p4466
aS'Clay also opposed the Mexican-American War and the "Manifest Destiny" policy of Democrats, which cost him votes in the close Election of 1844.'
p4467
aS'In 1728, he travelled to Leiden to study classics and law at the University.'
p4468
aS'However, due to lack of money, he was obliged to return to London and he began writing for the theatre, some of his work being savagely critical of the contemporary government under Sir Robert Walpole.The Theatrical Licensing Act of 1737 is alleged to be a direct response to his activities.'
p4469
aS"The particular play that triggered the Licensing Act was The Golden Rump, but Fielding's satires had set the tone."
p4470
aS'Once the Licensing Act passed, political satire on the stage was virtually impossible, and playwrights whose works were staged were viewed as suspect.'
p4471
aS'Fielding, therefore, retired from the theatre and resumed his career in law and, in order to support his wife Charlotte Craddock and two children, he became a barrister.His lack of financial sense meant that he and his family often endured periods of poverty, but he was helped by Ralph Allen, a wealthy benefactor who later formed the basis of Squire Allworthy in Tom Jones.'
p4472
aS"After Fielding's death, Allen provided for the education and support of his children.Fielding never stopped writing political satire and satires of current arts and letters."
p4473
aS'The Tragedy of Tragedies (for which Hogarth designed the frontispiece) was, for example, quite successful as a printed play.'
p4474
aS'He painted works for John Boydell\'s Shakespeare Gallery, and created his own "Milton Gallery".'
p4475
aS'He held the posts of Professor of Painting and Keeper at the Royal Academy.'
p4476
aS'His style had a considerable influence on many younger British artists, including William Blake. Biography Fuseli was born in Zurich, Switzerland, the second of 18 children.'
p4477
aS'His father was Johann Caspar Fussli, a painter of portraits and landscapes, and author of Lives of the Helvetic Painters.'
p4478
aS'He intended Henry for the church, and sent him to the Caroline college of Zurich, where he received an excellent classical education.'
p4479
aS'One of his schoolmates there was Johann Kaspar Lavater, with whom he became close friends.After taking orders in 1761 Fuseli was forced to leave the country as a result of having helped Lavater to expose an unjust magistrate, whose powerful family sought revenge.'
p4480
aS'He travelled through Germany, and then, in 1765, visited England, where he supported himself for some time by miscellaneous writing.'
p4481
aS"On William's death in 1087, Henry's elder brothers Robert Curthose and William Rufus inherited Normandy and England, respectively, but Henry was left landless."
p4482
aS'Henry purchased the County of Cotentin in western Normandy from Robert, but William and Robert deposed him in 1091.'
p4483
aS'Henry gradually rebuilt his power base in the Cotentin and allied himself with William against Robert.'
p4484
aS"Henry was present when William died in a hunting accident in 1100, and he seized the English throne, promising at his coronation to correct many of William's less popular policies."
p4485
aS"Henry married Matilda of Scotland but continued to have a large number of mistresses, by whom he had many illegitimate children.Robert, who invaded in 1101, disputed Henry's control of England; this military campaign ended in a negotiated settlement that confirmed Henry as king."
p4486
aS'The peace was short-lived, and Henry invaded the Duchy of Normandy in 1105 and 1106, finally defeating Robert at the Battle of Tinchebray.'
p4487
aS'Henry kept Robert imprisoned for the rest of his life.'
p4488
aS"He became actively involved by the age of 14 in his mother's efforts to claim the throne of England, then occupied by Stephen of Blois, and was made Duke of Normandy at 17."
p4489
aS'He inherited Anjou in 1151 and shortly afterwards married Eleanor of Aquitaine, whose marriage to Louis VII of France had recently been annulled.'
p4490
aS"Stephen agreed to a peace treaty after Henry's military expedition to England in 1153: Henry inherited the kingdom on Stephen's death a year later.Henry was an energetic and sometimes ruthless ruler, driven by a desire to restore the lands and privileges of his royal grandfather, Henry I."
p4491
aS"During the early years of the younger Henry's reign he restored the royal administration in England, re-established hegemony over Wales and gained full control over his lands in Anjou, Maine and Touraine."
p4492
aS"Henry's desire to reform the relationship with the Church led to conflict with his former friend Thomas Becket, the Archbishop of Canterbury."
p4493
aS"This controversy lasted for much of the 1160s and resulted in Becket's murder in 1170."
p4494
aS'Henry soon came into conflict with Louis VII and the two rulers fought what has been termed a "cold war" over several decades.'
p4495
aS"He was thus a good candidate for the vacant Polish throne, and he was elected with the dual titles King of Poland and Grand Duke of Lithuania.Henry's rule over Poland was brief, but notable."
p4496
aS'The Henrician Articles he signed into law accepting the Polish throne established Poland as an elective monarchy subject to free election by the Polish nobility.'
p4497
aS'Of his three older brothers, two would live long enough to ascend the French throne, but both died young and without a legitimate male heir.'
p4498
aS"He abandoned Poland upon receiving word that he had inherited the throne of France at the age of 22.The kingdom of France was at the time plagued by the Wars of Religion, and Henry's authority was undermined by violent political parties funded by foreign powers: the Catholic League (supported by Spain), the Protestant Huguenots (supported by England) and the Malcontents, led by Henry's own brother, the Duke of Alencon, which was a party of Catholic and Protestant aristocrats who jointly opposed the absolutist ambitions of the king."
p4499
aS"Henry III was himself a politique, arguing that a strong and religiously tolerant monarchy would save France from collapse.After the death of Henry's younger brother Francis, Duke of Anjou, and when it became apparent that Henry would not produce an heir, the Wars of Religion grew into a succession crisis that resulted in a war known as the War of the Three Henrys."
p4500
aS"Henry III's legitimate heir was his distant cousin Henry, King of Navarre, a Protestant."
p4501
aS"The Catholic League, led by Henry I, Duke of Guise, sought to exclude Protestants from the succession and championed the Catholic Charles, Cardinal of Bourbon, as Henry III's heir.In 1589, Jacques Clement, a Catholic fanatic, murdered Henry III, who was succeeded by the King of Navarre who, as Henry IV, would assume the throne of France after converting to Catholicism, and become the first French king of the House of Bourbon. Early life  Childhood Henry was born at the royal Chateau de Fontainebleau, the fourth son of King Henry II and Catherine de' Medici and grandson of Francis I of France and Claude of France."
p4502
aS'As a Huguenot, Henry was involved in the French Wars of Religion, barely escaping assassination in the St. Bartholomew\'s Day massacre, and later led Protestant forces against the royal army.Henry, as Head of the House of Bourbon, was a direct male-line descendant of Louis IX of France, and "first prince of the blood".'
p4503
aS'Upon the death of his brother-in-law and distant cousin Henry_III_of_France in 1589, Henry was called to the French succession by the Salic law.'
p4504
aS"He initially kept the Protestant faith and had to fight against the Catholic League, which denied that he could wear France's crown as a Protestant, to obtain mastery over his kingdom."
p4505
aS'After four years of stalemate, he found it prudent to abjure the Calvinist faith.'
p4506
aS'As a pragmatic politician (in the parlance of the time, a politique), he displayed an unusual religious tolerance for the era.'
p4507
aS'Notably, he promulgated the Edict_of_Nantes in 1598, which guaranteed religious liberties to Protestants, thereby effectively ending the Wars of Religion.'
p4508
aS'He was assassinated by Francois Ravaillac, a fanatical Catholic, and was succeeded by his son Louis XIII.Considered a usurper by some Catholics and a traitor by some Protestants, Henry became target of at least 12 assassination attempts.'
p4509
aS'He was the son of Henry_James, Sr. and the brother of philosopher and psychologist William James and diarist Alice James.He is best known for a number of novels showing Americans encountering Europe and Europeans.'
p4510
aS"His method of writing from a character's point of view allowed him to explore issues related to consciousness and perception, and his style in later works has been compared to impressionist painting."
p4511
aS'His imaginative use of point of view, interior monologue and unreliable narrators brought a new depth to narrative fiction.James contributed significantly to literary criticism, particularly in his insistence that writers be allowed the greatest possible freedom in presenting their view of the world.'
p4512
aS'James claimed that a text must first and foremost be realistic and contain a representation of life that is recognisable to its readers.'
p4513
aS'Good novels, to James, show life in action and are, most importantly, interesting.In addition to his voluminous works of fiction he published articles and books of travel, biography, autobiography, and criticism, and wrote plays.'
p4514
aS'James alternated between America and Europe for the first twenty years of his life; eventually he settled in England, becoming a British subject in 1915, one year before his death.'
p4515
aS'James was nominated for the Nobel Prize in Literature in 1911, 1912, and 1916. LifeEdit  The early yearsEdit James was born at 2 Washington Place in New_York_City on 15 April 1843.'
p4516
aS'As Secretary of State (1929-1933) under Republican President Herbert Hoover, he articulated the Stimson Doctrine which announced American opposition to Japanese expansion in Asia.'
p4517
aS'He again served as Secretary of War (1940-1945) under Democrats Franklin D. Roosevelt and Harry S. Truman, and was a leading hawk calling for war against Germany.'
p4518
aS"During World_War_II he took charge of raising and training 13 million soldiers and airmen, supervised the spending of a third of the nation's GDP on the Army and the Air Forces, helped formulate military strategy, and oversaw the building and use of the atomic bomb. Early career Stimson was born in New_York_City, the son of Lewis Atterbury Stimson, a prominent surgeon, and his wife, the former Candace T. Wheeler."
p4519
aS'He was the brought up in part by his grandfather in New York.'
p4520
aS'He was educated at Phillips Academy in Andover, Massachusetts, where he gained a lifelong interest in religion and a close relationship with the school and ultimately donated his real estate to the school in his will.'
p4521
aS"He was an honorary lifetime member of Theodore_Roosevelt's Boone and Crockett Club, North America's first wildlife conservation organization."
p4522
aS'He was a Phillips trustee from 1905 to 1947, serving as president of the board from 1935 to 1945.'
p4523
aS'His most characteristic works of this kind are Tropic of Cancer (1934), Black Spring (1936), Tropic of Capricorn (1939) and The Rosy Crucifixion trilogy (1949-59), all of which are based on his experiences in New York and Paris, and all of which were banned in the United_States until 1961.'
p4524
aS'He also wrote travel memoirs and literary criticism, and painted watercolors. Early life Miller was born to Lutheran German parents, Louise Marie (Neiting) and tailor Heinrich Miller, at their home, 450 East 85th Street in the Yorkville section of Manhattan, New_York_City.'
p4525
aS'As a child, he lived for nine years at 662 Driggs Avenue in Williamsburg, Brooklyn, known at that time (and referred to frequently in his works) as the Fourteenth Ward.'
p4526
aS'In 1900, his family moved to 1063 Decatur Street in the Bushwick section of Brooklyn.'
p4527
aS'After finishing elementary school, although his family remained in Bushwick, Miller attended Eastern District High School in Williamsburg.'
p4528
aS'As a young man, he was active with the Socialist Party of America (his "quondam idol" was the black Socialist Hubert Harrison).'
p4529
aS'He attended the City College of New York for one semester. Career  Brooklyn, 1917-30 Miller married his first wife, Beatrice Sylvas Wickens, in 1917; their divorce was granted on December 21, 1923.'
p4530
aS"Moore's works are usually suggestive of the female body, apart from a phase in the 1950s when he sculpted family groups."
p4531
aS'His forms are generally pierced or contain hollow spaces.'
p4532
aS'Many interpreters liken the undulating form of his reclining figures to the landscape and hills of his birthplace, Yorkshire.Moore was born in Castleford, the son of a coal miner.'
p4533
aS'He became well-known through his carved marble and larger-scale abstract cast bronze sculptures, and was instrumental in introducing a particular form of modernism to the United Kingdom.'
p4534
aS'His ability in later life to fulfill large-scale commissions made him exceptionally wealthy.'
p4535
aS'Yet he lived frugally and most of the money he earned went towards endowing the Henry_Moore Foundation, which continues to support education and promotion of the arts. Early life Moore was born in Castleford, West Yorkshire, England, to Mary Baker and Raymond Spencer Moore.'
p4536
aS'His father was of Irish origin and became pit deputy and then under-manager of the Wheldale colliery in Castleford.'
p4537
aS"He is generally considered to be one of the greatest English composers; no other native-born English composer approached his fame until Edward_Elgar. Early life and career Purcell was born in St Ann's Lane, Old Pye Street Westminster - the area of London later known as Devil's Acre - in 1659."
p4538
aS'Henry_Purcell Senior, whose older brother Thomas Purcell (d. 1682) was also a musician, was a gentleman of the Chapel Royal and sang at the coronation of King Charles_II_of_England.'
p4539
aS'Henry the elder had three sons: Edward, Henry and Daniel.'
p4540
aS"Daniel Purcell (d. 1717), the youngest of the brothers, was also a prolific composer who wrote the music for much of the final act of The Indian Queen after Henry_Purcell's death."
p4541
aS"Henry_Purcell's family lived just a few hundred yards west of Westminster Abbey from the year 1659 onwards.After his father's death in 1664, Purcell was placed under the guardianship of his uncle Thomas who showed him great affection and kindness."
p4542
aS"Thomas was himself a gentleman of His Majesty's Chapel, and arranged for Henry to be admitted as a chorister."
p4543
aS"Henry studied first under Captain Henry Cooke (d. 1672), Master of the Children, and afterwards under Pelham Humfrey (d. 1674), Cooke's successor."
p4544
aS'Through his administrative direction, he is regarded as the main initiator of what would be known as the Age of Discoveries.'
p4545
aS'Henry was the fifth child of the Portuguese king John I and responsible for the early development of Portuguese exploration and maritime trade with other continents through the systematic exploration of Western Africa, the islands of the Atlantic Ocean, and the search for new routes.King John I was the founder of the House of Aviz.'
p4546
aS'Henry encouraged his father to conquer Ceuta (1415), the Muslim port on the North African coast across the Straits of Gibraltar from the Iberian Peninsula.'
p4547
aS'He learnt of the opportunities from the Saharan trade routes that terminated there, and became fascinated with Africa in general; he was most intrigued by the Christian legend of Prester John and the expansion of Portuguese trade.'
p4548
aS'Henry is regarded as the patron of Portuguese exploration. Life Henry was the third surviving son of King John I and his wife Philippa, sister of King Henry IV of England.'
p4549
aS"He was baptized in Porto, and may have been born there, probably when the royal couple was living in the city's old mint, now called Casa do Infante (Prince's House), or in the region nearby."
p4550
aS'Another possibility is that he was born at the Monastery of Leca do Bailio, in Leca da Palmeira, during the same residential passage of the royal couple in the city of Porto.Henry was 21 when he, his father and brothers captured the Moorish port of Ceuta in northern Morocco, that had long been a base for Barbary pirates who raided the Portuguese coast, depopulating villages by capturing their inhabitants to be sold in the African slave market.'
p4551
aS'Henry was the second monarch of the Tudor dynasty, succeeding his father, Henry VII.Besides his six marriages, Henry VIII is known for his role in the separation of the Church of England from the Roman Catholic Church.'
p4552
aS'His disagreements with the Pope led to his separation of the Church of England from papal authority, with himself, as king, as the Supreme Head of the Church of England and to the Dissolution of the Monasteries.'
p4553
aS'Because his principal dispute was with papal authority, rather than with doctrinal matters, he remained a believer in core Catholic theological teachings despite his excommunication from the Roman Catholic Church.'
p4554
aS'Henry oversaw the legal union of England and Wales with the Laws in Wales Acts 1535 and 1542.'
p4555
aS'He is also well known for a long personal rivalry with both Francis I of France and the Holy Roman Emperor Charles V, his contemporaries with whom he frequently warred.Domestically, Henry is known for his radical changes to the English Constitution, ushering in the theory of the divine right of kings to England.'
p4556
aS"Besides asserting the sovereign's supremacy over the Church of England, thus initiating the English Reformation, he greatly expanded royal power."
p4557
aS'Charges of treason and heresy were commonly used to quash dissent, and those accused were often executed without a formal trial, by means of bills of attainder.'
p4558
aS'He studied at Bowdoin College.'
p4559
aS'After spending time in Europe he became a professor at Bowdoin and, later, at Harvard College.'
p4560
aS'His first major poetry collections were Voices of the Night (1839) and Ballads and Other Poems (1841).'
p4561
aS'Longfellow retired from teaching in 1854, to focus on his writing, living the remainder of his life in Cambridge, Massachusetts, in a former headquarters of George_Washington.'
p4562
aS'His first wife Mary Potter died in 1835, after a miscarriage.'
p4563
aS'His second wife Frances Appleton died in 1861, after sustaining burns when her dress caught fire.'
p4564
aS'After her death, Longfellow had difficulty writing poetry for a time and focused on his translation.'
p4565
aS'"An equivalent way of stating the law is that the solubility of a gas in a liquid is directly proportional to the partial pressure of the gas above the liquid.An everyday example of Henry\'s_law is given by carbonated soft drinks.'
p4566
aS'Before the bottle or can of carbonated drink is opened, the gas above the drink is almost pure carbon dioxide at a pressure slightly higher than atmospheric pressure.'
p4567
aS'The drink itself contains dissolved carbon dioxide.'
p4568
aS'When the bottle or can is opened, this gas escapes, giving the characteristic hiss.'
p4569
aS'Because the partial pressure of carbon dioxide above the liquid is now much lower, some of the dissolved carbon dioxide comes out of solution as bubbles.'
p4570
aS'If a glass of the drink is left in the open, the concentration of carbon dioxide in solution will come into equilibrium with the carbon dioxide in the air, and the drink will go "flat".A slightly more exotic example of Henry\'s_law is in the decompression and decompression sickness of underwater divers. Formula and the Henry\'s_law constant Henry\'s_law can be put into mathematical terms (at constant temperature) aswhere p is the partial pressure of the gaseous solute above the solution, c is the concentration of the dissolved gas and kH is a constant with the dimensions of pressure divided by concentration.'
p4571
aS"The constant, known as the Henry's_law constant, depends on the solute, the solvent and the temperature.Some values for kH for gases dissolved in water at 298 K include:oxygen (O2) : 769.2 L*atm/molcarbon dioxide (CO2) : 29.41 L*atm/molhydrogen (H2) : 1282.1 L*atm/molThere are various other forms of Henry's Law which define the constant kH differently and require different dimensional units."
p4572
aS'Her counterpart in the religion of ancient Rome was Juno.'
p4573
aS'The cow, lion and the peacock were considered sacred to her.'
p4574
aS"Hera's mother is Rhea and her father Cronus.Portrayed as majestic and solemn, often enthroned, and crowned with the polos (a high cylindrical crown worn by several of the Great Goddesses), Hera may bear a pomegranate in her hand, emblem of fertile blood and death and a substitute for the narcotic capsule of the opium poppy."
p4575
aS'Scholar of Greek mythology Walter Burkert writes in Greek Religion, "Nevertheless, there are memories of an earlier aniconic representation, as a pillar in Argos and as a plank in Samos.'
p4576
aS'"Hera was known for her jealous and vengeful nature against Zeus\'s lovers and offspring, but also against mortals who crossed her, such as Pelias.'
p4577
aS'Paris also earned Hera\'s hatred by choosing Aphrodite as the most beautiful goddess. Etymology The name of Hera admits a variety of mutually exclusive etymologies; one possibility is to connect it with Greek ora hora, season, and to interpret it as ripe for marriage and according to Plato erate erate, "beloved" as Zeus is said to have married her for love.'
p4578
aS'According to Plutarch, Hera was an allegorical name and an anagram of aer (aer, "air").'
p4579
aS'In Rome and the modern West, he is known as Hercules, with whom the later Roman Emperors, in particular Commodus and Maximian, often identified themselves.'
p4580
aS'The Romans adopted the Greek version of his life and works essentially unchanged, but added anecdotal detail of their own, some of it linking the hero with the geography of the Central Mediterranean.'
p4581
aS'Details of his cult were adapted to Rome as well.Extraordinary strength, courage, ingenuity, and sexual prowess with both males and females were among the characteristics commonly attributed to him.'
p4582
aS'Heracles used his wits on several occasions when his strength did not suffice, such as when laboring for the king Augeas of Elis, wrestling the giant Antaeus, or tricking Atlas into taking the sky back onto his shoulders.'
p4583
aS'Together with Hermes he was the patron and protector of gymnasia and palaestrae.'
p4584
aS'His iconographic attributes are the lion skin and the club.'
p4585
aS'These qualities did not prevent him from being regarded as a playful figure who used games to relax from his labors and played a great deal with children.'
p4586
aS'As a polymath, he contributed to a wide range of subjects, including ethics, religion, anthropology, economics, political theory, philosophy, literature, biology, sociology, and psychology.'
p4587
aS'During his lifetime he achieved tremendous authority, mainly in English-speaking academia.'
p4588
aS'"The only other English philosopher to have achieved anything like such widespread popularity was Bertrand Russell, and that was in the 20th century."'
p4589
aS'Spencer was "the single most famous European intellectual in the closing decades of the nineteenth century" but his influence declined sharply after 1900; "Who now reads Spencer?"'
p4590
aS'asked Talcott_Parsons in 1937.Spencer is best known for the expression "survival of the fittest", which he coined in Principles of Biology (1864), after reading Charles Darwin\'s On the Origin of Species.'
p4591
aS'This term strongly suggests natural selection, yet as Spencer extended evolution into realms of sociology and ethics, he also made use of Lamarckism. Life Herbert_Spencer was born in Derby, England, on 27 April 1820, the son of William George Spencer (generally called George).'
p4592
aS"Spencer's father was a religious dissenter who drifted from Methodism to Quakerism, and who seems to have transmitted to his son an opposition to all forms of authority."
p4593
aS'In 1946, he received the Nobel Prize in Literature. Biography  Family background Hermann Karl Hesse was born on 2 July 1877 in the Black Forest town of Calw in Wurttemberg, German Empire.'
p4594
aS'His parents served in India at a mission under the auspices of the Basel Mission, a Protestant Christian missionary society.'
p4595
aS"Hesse's mother, Marie Gundert, was born at such a mission in India in 1842."
p4596
aS'In describing her own childhood, she said, "A happy child I was not..." As was usual among missionaries at the time, she was left behind in Europe at the age of four when her parents went to India.Hesse\'s father, Johannes Hesse, the son of a doctor, was born in 1847 in the Estonian town of Paide (Weissenstein).'
p4597
aS'In his own way, Dr Hesse was just as tyrannical as Dr Gundert.'
p4598
aS'Johannes Hesse belonged to the German minority in the part of the Baltic region, which was then a part of the Russian Empire, thus his son Hermann was at birth both a citizen of the German Empire and the Russian Empire.'
p4599
aS'Hesse had five siblings, but two of them died in infancy.'
p4600
aS'He is quick and cunning, and moves freely between the worlds of the mortal and divine, as emissary and messenger of the gods, intercessor between mortals and the divine, and conductor of souls into the afterlife.'
p4601
aS'He is protector and patron of travelers, herdsmen, thieves, orators and wit, literature and poets, athletics and sports, invention and trade.'
p4602
aS'In some myths he is a trickster, and outwits other gods for his own satisfaction or the sake of humankind.'
p4603
aS"His attributes and symbols include the herma, the rooster and the tortoise, purse or pouch, winged sandals, winged cap, and his main symbol is the herald's staff, the Greek kerykeion or Latin caduceus which consisted of two snakes wrapped around a winged staff.In the Roman adaptation of the Greek pantheon (see interpretatio romana), Hermes is identified with the Roman god Mercury, who, though inherited from the Etruscans, developed many similar characteristics, such as being the patron of commerce. Etymology The earliest form of the name Hermes is the Mycenaean Greek *hermahas, written  e-ma-a2 (e-ma-ha) in the Linear B syllabic script."
p4604
aS'Most scholars derive "Hermes" from Greek erma herma, "prop, heap of stones, boundary marker", from which the word hermai ("boundary markers dedicated to Hermes as a god of travelers") also derives.'
p4605
aS'The etymology of erma itself is unknown (probably not an Indo-European word).'
p4606
aS"R. S. P. Beekes rejects the connection with herma and suggests a Pre-Greek origin.The words Hermes and hermeneutics both have the same root, this being hermeneus.I should imagine that the name Hermes has to do with speech, and signifies that he is the interpreter (ermeneus)Plato offers a Socratic folk-etymology for Hermes's name, deriving it from the divine messenger's reliance on eirein (the power of speech)."
p4607
aS'Ancient authors credited Hesiod and Homer with establishing Greek religious customs.'
p4608
aS"Modern scholars refer to him as a major source on Greek mythology, farming techniques, early economic thought (he is sometimes identified as the first economist), archaic Greek astronomy and ancient time-keeping. Life The dating of his life is a contested issue in scholarly circles and it is covered below in Dating.Hesiod was the poet who told the story of Pandora's Jar in approximately 650 BC."
p4609
aS'Epic narrative allowed poets like Homer no opportunity for personal revelations.'
p4610
aS"However, Hesiod's extant work comprises didactic poems in which he went out of his way to let his audience in on a few details of his life."
p4611
aS'There are three explicit references in Works and Days, as well as some passages in his Theogony that support inferences made by scholars.'
p4612
aS'We learn in the former poem that his father came from Cyme in Aeolis (on the coast of Asia Minor, a little south of the island Lesbos), and crossed the sea to settle at a hamlet, near Thespiae in Boeotia, named Ascra, "a cursed place, cruel in winter, hard in summer, never pleasant" (Works, l. 640).'
p4613
aS'Hesiod\'s patrimony there, a small piece of ground at the foot of Mount Helicon, occasioned lawsuits with his brother Perses, who seems at first to have cheated him of his rightful share thanks to corrupt authorities or "kings" but later became impoverished and ended up scrounging on the thrifty poet (Works l. 35, 396).Unlike their father, Hesiod was averse to sea travel, but he once crossed the narrow strait between the Greek mainland and Euboea to participate in funeral celebrations for one Athamas of Chalcis, and there he won a tripod in a singing competition.'
p4614
aS'For several decades the question of the Higgs Field\'s existence was the last unverified part of the Standard Model of particle physics and "the central problem in particle physics".'
p4615
aS'The presence of this field, now believed to be confirmed, explains why some fundamental particles have mass when, based on the symmetries controlling their interactions, they should be massless.'
p4616
aS"It also solves several other long-standing puzzles, such as the reason for the weak force's extremely short range.Despite being present everywhere, the existence of the Higgs field is very hard to confirm."
p4617
aS'It can be detected through its excitations (i.e.'
p4618
aS'Higgs particles), but these are extremely hard to produce and detect.'
p4619
aS"The importance of this fundamental question led to a 40 year search, and the construction of one of the world's most expensive and complex experimental facilities to date, CERN's Large Hadron Collider, able to create Higgs_bosons and other particles for observation and study."
p4620
aS'On 4 July 2012, the discovery of a new particle with a mass between 125 and 7002127000000000000127 GeV/c2 was announced; physicists suspected that it was the Higgs_boson.'
p4621
aS'It belongs to the limbic system and plays important roles in the consolidation of information from short-term memory to long-term memory and spatial navigation.'
p4622
aS'The hippocampus is located under the cerebral cortex; and in primates it is located in the medial temporal lobe, underneath the cortical surface.'
p4623
aS"It contains two main interlocking parts: Ammon's horn and the dentate gyrus.In Alzheimer's_disease, the hippocampus is one of the first regions of the brain to suffer damage; memory loss and disorientation are included among the early symptoms."
p4624
aS'Damage to the hippocampus can also result from oxygen starvation (hypoxia), encephalitis, or medial temporal lobe epilepsy.'
p4625
aS'People with extensive, bilateral hippocampal damage may experience anterograde amnesia--the inability to form or retain new memories.In rodents, the hippocampus has been studied extensively as part of a brain system responsible for spatial memory and navigation.'
p4626
aS'Many neurons in the rat and mouse hippocampus respond as place cells: that is, they fire bursts of action potentials when the animal passes through a specific part of its environment.'
p4627
aS'Hippocampal place cells interact extensively with head direction cells, whose activity acts as an inertial compass, and conjecturally with grid cells in the neighboring entorhinal cortex.Since different neuronal cell types are neatly organized into layers in the hippocampus, it has frequently been used as a model system for studying neurophysiology.'
p4628
aS'Without histones, the unwound DNA in chromosomes would be very long (a length to width ratio of more than 10 million to 1 in human DNA).'
p4629
aS'For example, each human cell has about 1.8 meters of DNA, (~6 ft) but wound on the histones it has about 90 micrometers (0.09 mm) of chromatin, which, when duplicated and condensed during mitosis, result in about 120 micrometers of chromosomes. Classes Five major families of histones exist: H1/H5, H2A, H2B, H3 and H4.'
p4630
aS'Histones H2A, H2B, H3 and H4 are known as the core histones, while histones H1 and H5 are known as the linker histones.Two of each of the core histones assemble to form one octameric nucleosome core, approximately 63 Angstroms in diameter (a solenoid (DNA)-like particle).'
p4631
aS'147 base pairs of DNA wrap around this core particle 1.65 times in a left-handed super-helical turn to give a particle of around 100 Angstroms across.'
p4632
aS'The linker histone H1 binds the nucleosome at the entry and exit sites of the DNA, thus locking the DNA into place and allowing the formation of higher order structure.'
p4633
aS'The most basic such formation is the 10 nm fiber or beads on a string conformation.'
p4634
aS'This involves the wrapping of DNA around nucleosomes with approximately 50 base pairs of DNA separating each pair of nucleosomes (also referred to as linker DNA).'
p4635
aS'After c. 1180 BC, the empire came to an end during the Bronze Age collapse, splintering into several independent "Neo-Hittite" city-states, some of which survived until the 8th century BC.The Hittite language was a distinct member of the Anatolian branch of the Indo-European language family.'
p4636
aS'They referred to their native land as Hatti.'
p4637
aS'The conventional name "Hittites" is due to their initial identification with the Biblical Hittites in 19th century archaeology.Despite the use of Hatti for their core territory, the Hittites should be distinguished from the Hattians, an earlier people who inhabited the same region (until the beginning of the 2nd millennium BC) and spoke a language possibly in the Northwest Caucasian languages group known as Hattic.The Hittite military made successful use of chariots.'
p4638
aS'Although belonging to the Bronze Age, they were the forerunners of the Iron Age, developing the manufacture of iron artifacts from as early as the 18th century BC, when the "man of Burushanda"\'s gift of an iron throne and iron sceptre to the Kaneshite king Anitta was recorded in the Anitta text inscription.After 1180 BC, amid general turmoil in the Levant conjectured to have been associated with the sudden arrival of the Sea Peoples, the kingdom disintegrated into several independent "Neo-Hittite" city-states, some of which survived until as late as the 8th century BC.'
p4639
aS'The history of the Hittite civilization is known mostly from cuneiform texts found in the area of their kingdom, and from diplomatic and commercial correspondence found in various archives in Egypt and the Middle East. Archaeological discovery The Hittites used Mesopotamian cuneiform letters.'
p4640
aS'Archaeological expeditions to Hattusa have discovered entire sets of royal archives in cuneiform tablets, written either in the Semitic Mesopotamian Akkadian language of Assyria and Babylonia, the diplomatic language of the time, or in the various dialects of the Hittite confederation.Before the discoveries, the only source of information about Hittites had been the Old Testament (see Biblical Hittites).'
p4641
aS'Francis William Newman expressed the critical view, common in the early 19th Century, that, if the Hittites existed at all, "no Hittite king could have compared in power to the King of Judah...".'
p4642
aS'Without treatment, average survival time after infection with HIV is estimated to be 9 to 11 years, depending on the HIV subtype.'
p4643
aS'Infection with HIV occurs by the transfer of blood, semen, vaginal fluid, pre-ejaculate, or breast milk.'
p4644
aS'Within these bodily fluids, HIV is present as both free virus particles and virus within infected immune cells.HIV infects vital cells in the human immune system such as helper T cells (specifically CD4+ T cells), macrophages, and dendritic cells.'
p4645
aS'HIV infection leads to low levels of CD4+ T cells through a number of mechanisms, including apoptosis of uninfected bystander cells, direct viral killing of infected cells, and killing of infected CD4+ T cells by CD8 cytotoxic lymphocytes that recognize infected cells.'
p4646
aS'When CD4+ T cell numbers decline below a critical level, cell-mediated immunity is lost, and the body becomes progressively more susceptible to opportunistic infections. Virology  Classification HIV is a member of the genus Lentivirus, part of the family Retroviridae.'
p4647
aS'Lentiviruses have many morphologies and biological properties in common.'
p4648
aS'Many species are infected by lentiviruses, which are characteristically responsible for long-duration illnesses with a long incubation period.'
p4649
aS'After replacement of iodine by an hydroxyl anion, an elimination reaction takes place to the alkene.With asymmetrical amines, the major alkene product is the least substituted and generally the least stable, an observation known as the Hofmann rule.'
p4650
aS"This is in direct contrast to normal elimination reactions where the more substituted, stable product is dominant (Zaitsev's rule).The reaction is named after its discoverer, August Wilhelm von Hofmann.An example is the synthesis of trans-cyclooctene:In a related chemical test called Herzig-Meyer alkimide group determination a tertiary amine with at least one methyl group and lacking a beta-proton is allowed to react with hydrogen iodide to the quaternary ammonium salt which when heated degrades to iodomethane and the secondary amine. See also Hofmann rearrangementEmde degradation References  External links An animation of the mechanism of the Hofmann_elimination"
p4651
aS'The largest city on Hokkaido is its capital, Sapporo, which is also its only ordinance-designated city. History Hokkaido was settled by the Ainu, Nivkh, and Orok peoples 20,000 years ago.'
p4652
aS'The Nihon Shoki, finished in 720 AD, is often said to be the first mention of Hokkaido in recorded history.'
p4653
aS'According to the text, Abe no Hirafu led a large navy and army to northern areas from 658 to 660 and came into contact with the Mishihase and Emishi.'
p4654
aS'One of the places Hirafu went to was called Watarishima (Du Dao ), which is often believed to be present-day Hokkaido.'
p4655
aS'However, many theories exist in relation to the details of this event, including the location of Watarishima and the common belief that the Emishi in Watarishima were the ancestors of the present-day Ainu people.During the Nara and Heian periods (710-1185), people in Hokkaido conducted trade with Dewa Province, an outpost of the Japanese central government.'
p4656
aS'From the Middle Ages, the people in Hokkaido began to be called Ezo.'
p4657
aS'Around the same time Hokkaido came to be called Ezochi (Xia Yi Di , lit.'
p4658
aS'The name Holden_Caulfield was used in an unpublished short story written in 1942 and first appeared in print in 1945.Although it has been conjectured that J. D. Salinger got the name for Holden_Caulfield in The Catcher in the Rye when he saw a marquee for Dear Ruth (1947), starring William Holden and Joan Caulfield, Salinger\'s first Holden_Caulfield story, "I\'m Crazy," appeared in Collier\'s on December 22, 1945, a year and a half before this movie was released. Appearance and personality Holden is naive and at the same time resentful of the adult world.'
p4659
aS'He is very caring and respectful, and calls himself a "pacifist."'
p4660
aS'One of Holden\'s most striking and quintessential qualities is his powerful revulsion for "phony" qualities, a catch-all term for all the perceived hypocrisy that irritates Holden.'
p4661
aS'It is this cynicism that causes him to distance himself from other people, despite wanting connection as well.'
p4662
aS'Holden is very much a character of contradiction; at seventeen years of age he is six feet two-and-a-half inches tall, and already has some grey hair - though he himself admits that he sometimes acts more like a 13-year-old than an adult.'
p4663
aS'He continually fails classes and calls himself "dumb," yet he shows intelligence through his exceptionally articulate narration.'
p4664
aS"This idea in the book may be Holden's criticism of a society that is unable to acknowledge his hidden intelligence. In The Catcher in the Rye Holden_Caulfield is the narrator and main character of The Catcher in the Rye."
p4665
aS'It is an ancient Hindu religious festival which has become popular with non-Hindus in many parts of South Asia, as well as people of other communities outside Asia.It is primarily observed in India, Nepal, and other regions of the world with significant populations of Hindus or people of Indian origin.'
p4666
aS'The festival has, in recent times, spread to parts of Europe and North America as a spring celebration of love, frolic, and colours.Holi celebrations start with a Holika bonfire on the night before Holi where people gather, sing and dance.'
p4667
aS'The next morning is a free-for-all carnival of colours, where participants play, chase and colour each other with dry powder and coloured water, with some carrying water guns and coloured water-filled balloons for their water fight.'
p4668
aS'Anyone and everyone is fair game, friend or stranger, rich or poor, man or woman, children and elders.'
p4669
aS'The frolic and fight with colours occurs in the open streets, open parks, outside temples and buildings.'
p4670
aS'Groups carry drums and musical instruments, go from place to place, sing and dance.'
p4671
aS'People visit family, friends and foes to throw colours on each other, laugh and chit-chat, then share Holi delicacies, food and drinks.'
p4672
aS'The dispute occurred at the Homestead Steel Works in the Pittsburgh area town of Homestead, Pennsylvania, between the Amalgamated Association of Iron and Steel Workers (the AA) and the Carnegie Steel Company.'
p4673
aS'The final result was a major defeat for the union and a setback for their efforts to unionize steelworkers. Background Carnegie Steel made major technological innovations in the 1880s, especially the installation of the open-hearth system at Homestead in 1886.'
p4674
aS'It now became possible to make steel suitable for structural beams and for armor plate for the United_States Navy, which paid far higher prices for the premium product.'
p4675
aS'In addition, the plant moved increasingly toward the continuous system of production.'
p4676
aS'Carnegie installed vastly improved systems of material-handling, like overhead cranes, hoists, charging machines, and buggies.'
p4677
aS'All of this greatly sped up the process of steelmaking, and allowed the production of vastly larger quantities of the product.'
p4678
aS'As the mills expanded, the labor force grew rapidly, especially with less skilled workers.'
p4679
aS'Honduras is bordered to the west by Guatemala, to the southwest by El_Salvador, to the southeast by Nicaragua, to the south by the Pacific Ocean at the Gulf of Fonseca, and to the north by the Gulf of Honduras, a large inlet of the Caribbean Sea.Honduras was home to several important Mesoamerican cultures, most notably the Maya, prior to being conquered by Spain in the sixteenth century.'
p4680
aS'The Spanish introduced Roman Catholicism and the now predominant Spanish language, along with numerous customs that have blended with the indigenous culture.'
p4681
aS'Honduras became independent in 1821 and has since been a republic, although it has consistently endured much social strife and political instability, remaining one of the poorest countries in the Western Hemisphere.'
p4682
aS'Honduras has the highest murder rate in the world.Honduras spans an area of about 112,492 km2 and has a population exceeding 8 million.'
p4683
aS"Its northern portions are part of the Western Caribbean Zone, as reflected in the area's demographics and culture."
p4684
aS'Honduras is known for its rich natural resources, including various minerals, coffee, tropical fruit, and sugar cane, as well as for its growing textiles industry, which serves the international market. Etymology Honduras literally means "depths" in Spanish.'
p4685
aS'The name could either refer to the bay of Trujillo as an anchorage, fondura in the Leonese dialect of Spanish, or to Columbus\'s alleged quote that "Gracias a Dios que hemos salido de esas Honduras" ("Thank God we have departed from those depths").It was not until the end of the 16th century that Honduras was used for the whole province and prior to 1580, Honduras only referred to the eastern part of the province, and Higueras referred to the western part.'
p4686
aS'The law is named after 17th century British physicist Robert Hooke.'
p4687
aS'He first stated the law in 1660 as a Latin anagram.'
p4688
aS'He published the solution of his anagram in 1678 as: ut tensio, sic vis ("as the extension, so the force" or "the extension is proportional to the force").Hooke\'s equation in fact holds (to some extent) in many other situations where an elastic body is deformed, such as wind blowing on a tall building, a musician plucking a string of a guitar, or the filling of a party balloon.'
p4689
aS"An elastic body or material for which this equation can be assumed is said to be linear-elastic or Hookean.Hooke's_law is only a first order linear approximation to the real response of springs and other elastic bodies to applied forces."
p4690
aS'It must eventually fail once the forces exceed some limit, since no material can be compressed beyond a certain minimum size, or stretched beyond a maximum size, without some permanent deformation or change of state.'
p4691
aS"In fact, many materials will noticeably deviate from Hooke's_law well before those elastic limits are reached.On the other hand, Hooke's_law is an accurate approximation for most solid bodies, as long as the forces and deformations are small enough."
p4692
aS"For this reason, Hooke's_law is extensively used in all branches of science and engineering, and is the foundation of many disciplines such as seismology, molecular mechanics and acoustics."
p4693
aS'He was defeated by President Ulysses S. Grant, and died before the casting of the electoral vote.Born to a poor family in New Hampshire, Greeley was apprenticed to a printer in Vermont, and in 1831 went to New_York_City to seek his fortune.'
p4694
aS"He wrote for or edited several publications, and involved himself in Whig Party politics, taking a significant part in William Henry Harrison's successful 1840 presidential campaign."
p4695
aS'The following year, he founded the Tribune, which through weekly editions sent by mail became the highest-circulating newspaper in the country.'
p4696
aS'Among many other issues, he urged the settlement of the American West, which he saw as a land of opportunity for the young and the unemployed.'
p4697
aS'He popularized the phrase "Go West, young man, and grow up with the country," although it is uncertain whether it originated with him.Greeley\'s alliance with William H. Seward and Thurlow Weed led to him serving three months in the House of Representatives, where he angered many by investigating Congress in his newspaper.'
p4698
aS'He helped found the Republican Party in 1854, but about then broke with Seward and Weed, backing other presidential candidates against Seward at the 1860 Republican National Convention, and supporting the nominee, Abraham Lincoln.'
p4699
aS'When the Civil War broke out, he mostly supported Lincoln, though urging him to commit to the end of slavery before the president was willing to do so.'
p4700
aS'"Horace also crafted elegant hexameter verses (Sermones and Epistles) and caustic iambic poetry (Epodes).'
p4701
aS'The hexameters are amusing yet serious works, friendly in tone, leading the ancient satirist Persius to comment: "as his friend laughs, Horace slyly puts his finger on his every fault; once let in, he plays about the heartstrings".His career coincided with Rome\'s momentous change from Republic to Empire.'
p4702
aS"An officer in the republican army defeated at the Battle of Philippi in 42 BC, he was befriended by Octavian's right-hand man in civil affairs, Maecenas, and became a spokesman for the new regime."
p4703
aS'For some commentators, his association with the regime was a delicate balance in which he maintained a strong measure of independence (he was "a master of the graceful sidestep") but for others he was, in John_Dryden\'s phrase, "a well-mannered court slave". Life  - In his writings, he "tells us far more about himself, his character, his development, and his way of life than any other great poet in antiquity.'
p4704
aS'Some of the biographical writings contained in his writings can be supplemented from the short but valuable "Life of Horace" by Suetonius (in his Lives of the Poets). Childhood He was born on 8 December 65 BC in the Samnite south of Italy.'
p4705
aS'His home town, Venusia, lay on a trade route in the border region between Apulia and Lucania (Basilicata).'
p4706
aS'Various Italic dialects were spoken in the area and this perhaps enriched his feeling for language.'
p4707
aS'The horse has evolved over the past 45 to 55 million years from a small multi-toed creature into the large, single-toed animal of today.'
p4708
aS'Humans began to domesticate horses around 4000 BC, and their domestication is believed to have been widespread by 3000 BC.'
p4709
aS'Horses in the subspecies caballus are domesticated, although some domesticated populations live in the wild as feral horses.'
p4710
aS"These feral populations are not true wild horses, as this term is used to describe horses that have never been domesticated, such as the endangered Przewalski's horse, a separate subspecies, and the only remaining true wild horse."
p4711
aS"There is an extensive, specialized vocabulary used to describe equine-related concepts, covering everything from anatomy to life stages, size, colors, markings, breeds, locomotion, and behavior.Horses' anatomy enables them to make use of speed to escape predators and they have a well-developed sense of balance and a strong fight-or-flight response."
p4712
aS'Related to this need to flee from predators in the wild is an unusual trait: horses are able to sleep both standing up and lying down.'
p4713
aS'Female horses, called mares, carry their young for approximately 11 months, and a young horse, called a foal, can stand and run shortly following birth.'
p4714
aS'These various forms may possibly be different perceptions of the same multi-layered deity in which certain attributes or syncretic relationships are emphasized, not necessarily in opposition but complementary to one another, consistent with how the Ancient Egyptians viewed the multiple facets of reality.'
p4715
aS'He was most often depicted as a falcon, most likely a lanner or peregrine, or as a man with a falcon head.The earliest recorded form of Horus is the patron deity of Nekhen in Upper Egypt, who is the first known national god, specifically related to the king who in time came to be regarded as a manifestation of Horus in life and Osiris in death.'
p4716
aS'The most commonly encountered family relationship describes Horus as the son of Isis and Osiris but in another tradition Hathor is regarded as his mother and sometimes as his wife.'
p4717
aS'Horus served many functions in the Egyptian pantheon, most notably being a god of the sun, war and protection. Etymology Horus is recorded in Egyptian hieroglyphs as hr.w; the pronunciation has been reconstructed as *Haru, meaning "falcon".'
p4718
aS'Additional meanings are thought to have been "the distant one" or "one who is above, over".'
p4719
aS'By Coptic times, the name became Hor.'
p4720
aS'It was adopted into Greek as Oros Horos.'
p4721
aS'The idealistically motivated, well read, highly intelligent Schlegel sisters seek to help the struggling Basts, wishing at the same time to rid the Wilcoxes of some of their deep-seated social and economic prejudices.The Schlegels had briefly met and befriended the Wilcoxes when both families were hiking in Germany.'
p4722
aS'Helen, the youngest daughter, is romantically attracted to the younger Wilcox son, Paul; they get engaged in haste but soon afterwards regret their decision, each rejecting the other for different reasons.'
p4723
aS"The engagement is consequently broken off without acrimony, by mutual consent, despite a somewhat awkward intervention by Helen's aunt, Juley."
p4724
aS"The eldest daughter, Margaret, then resumes her friendship with Paul's mother, Ruth Wilcox."
p4725
aS"Ruth's most prized personal possession is her family home at Howards_End."
p4726
aS'She invites her friend to come and visit, feeling that Margaret would immediately connect with the values and history which the old house represents.'
p4727
aS"Ruth's own husband and children do not greatly cherish Howards_End, for all its rich cultural heritage; such abstractions, while being very dear to Margaret, are relatively insignificant to them, other than the property's real estate value on the housing market."
p4728
aS'"Howl" is considered to be one of the great works of American literature.'
p4729
aS'It came to be associated with the group of writers known as the Beat Generation.There is no foundation to the myth that "Howl" was written as a performance piece and later published by poet Lawrence Ferlinghetti of City Lights Books.'
p4730
aS"This myth was perpetuated by Ferlinghetti as part of the defense's case during the poem's obscenity trial."
p4731
aS"Upon the poem's release, Ferlinghetti and the bookstore's manager, Shigeyoshi Murao, were charged with disseminating obscene literature, and both were arrested."
p4732
aS'On October 3, 1957, Judge Clayton W. Horn ruled that the poem was not obscene. Background Allen Ginsberg wrote drafts of the poem "Howl" in mid-1954 to 1955, purportedly at a coffeehouse known today as the Caffe Mediterraneum in Berkeley, California.'
p4733
aS'Many factors went into the creation of the poem.'
p4734
aS'A short time before the composition of "Howl," Ginsberg\'s therapist, Dr. Philip Hicks, encouraged him to quit his job and pursue poetry full-time.'
p4735
aS'As the political boss of the state he commanded wide networks of supporters and was willing to take forceful action.'
p4736
aS'He established the political prominence of the Long political family.Long is best known for his Share Our Wealth program, created in 1934 under the motto "Every Man a King."'
p4737
aS'It proposed new wealth redistribution measures in the form of a net asset tax on corporations and individuals to curb the poverty and homelessness endemic nationwide during the Great Depression.'
p4738
aS'To stimulate the economy, Long advocated federal spending on public works, schools and colleges, and old age pensions.'
p4739
aS'He was an ardent critic of the policies of the Federal Reserve System.A supporter of Franklin D. Roosevelt in the 1932 presidential election, Long split with Roosevelt in June 1933 to plan his own presidential bid for 1936 in alliance with the influential Catholic priest and radio commentator Charles Coughlin.'
p4740
aS"Long was assassinated in 1935 and his national movement soon faded, but his legacy continued in Louisiana through his wife, Senator Rose McConnell Long, and his son, Senator Russell B. Long.Under Long's leadership, hospitals and educational institutions were expanded, a system of charity hospitals was set up that provided health care for the poor, massive highway construction and free bridges brought an end to rural isolation, and free textbooks were provided for schoolchildren."
p4741
aS'He remains a controversial figure in Louisiana history, with critics and supporters debating whether he was a dictator, demagogue or populist. Early life and legal career Long was born on August 30, 1893, near Winnfield, the seat of government of Winn Parish, a small town in the north-central part of the state.'
p4742
aS'Gerberga was the wife of Louis IV, King of France and mother of Lothair of France and Charles, Duke of Lower Lorraine.His paternal family, the Robertians, were powerful landowners in the Ile-de-France.'
p4743
aS'His grandfather had been King Robert I.'
p4744
aS'King Odo was his granduncle and King Rudolph was his uncle by affinity.Hugh was a seventh-generation descendant of Charlemagne as follows:Hugh_Capet, son ofHugh the Great, son ofBeatrice of Vermandois, daughter ofHerbert I, Count of Vermandois, son ofPepin, Count of Vermandois, son ofBernard of Italy, King of the Lombards, son ofPepin of Italy, King of the Lombards, son ofCharlemagne.Hugh_Capet was born into a well-connected and powerful family with many ties to the royal houses of France and Germany. Rise of the RobertiansEdit After the end of the ninth century, the descendants of Robert the Strong became indispensable in carrying out royal policies.'
p4745
aS"As Carolingian power failed, the great nobles of West Francia began to assert that the monarchy was elective, not hereditary, and twice chose Robertians (Odo I (888-898) and Robert I (922-923)) as kings, instead of Carolingians.Robert I, Hugh the Great's father, was succeeded as King of the Franks by his son-in-law, Rudolph of Burgundy."
p4746
aS'When Rudolph died in 936, Hugh the Great had to decide whether he ought to claim the throne for himself.'
p4747
aS'To claim the throne would require him to risk an election, which he would have to contest with the powerful Herbert II, Count of Vermandois, father of Hugh, Archbishop of Reims, and allied to Henry the Fowler, King of Germany; and with Hugh the Black, Duke of Burgundy, brother of the late king.'
p4748
aS"to block his rivals, Hugh the Great brought Louis d'Outremer, the dispossessed son of Charles the Simple, from his exile at the court of Athelstan of England to become king as Louis IV.This maneuver allowed Hugh to become the most powerful person in France in the first half of the tenth century."
p4749
aS'Many in the pantheon of deities of the Aztecs were inclined to have a fondness for a particular aspect of warfare.'
p4750
aS'However, Huitzilopochtli was known as the primary god of war in ancient Mexico.'
p4751
aS'Since he was the patron god of the Mexica, he was credited with both the victories and defeats that the Mexica people had on the battlefield.'
p4752
aS'It is important to remember that the defeat of their patron deity meant the defeat of his people.'
p4753
aS'This is one of the many reasons why they were concerned with providing exquisite tribute and food for him.'
p4754
aS'Not only was it important for him to survive his battles, but the fate of the Mexica people would have rested in the victory of Huitzilopochtli. Etymology The name literally means something like "Hummingbird(\'s) South" or "Hummingbird(\'s) Left", yet it has commonly been translated as "Southern hummingbird" or "left-handed hummingbird".'
p4755
aS'Despite the popularity of these latter interpretations, Huitzilopochtli\'s name most probably does not mean "left-handed/southern hummingbird" considering that the Classical Nahuatl huitzilin ("hummingbird") is the modifier of opochtli ("left-hand side") in this compound rather than the reverse; there continues to be much disagreement as to the full meaning of this name.In the tlaxotecuyotl, a hymn sung in reverence to Huitzilopotchtli, he is referred to as: the Dart-Hurler, the divine hurler, and a terror to the Mixteca. Origin stories There are a handful of origin mythologies describing the deity\'s beginnings.'
p4756
aS'He continued his studies while he served as a pastor in Glarus and later in Einsiedeln, where he was influenced by the writings of Erasmus.In 1518, Zwingli became the pastor of the Grossmunster in Zurich where he began to preach ideas on reforming the Catholic Church.'
p4757
aS'In his first public controversy in 1522, he attacked the custom of fasting during Lent.'
p4758
aS'In his publications, he noted corruption in the ecclesiastical hierarchy, promoted clerical marriage, and attacked the use of images in places of worship.'
p4759
aS'In 1525, Zwingli introduced a new communion liturgy to replace the Mass.'
p4760
aS'Zwingli also clashed with the Anabaptists, which resulted in their persecution.'
p4761
aS'Historians have debated whether or not he turned Zurich into a theocracy.'
p4762
aS'The Reformation spread to other parts of the Swiss Confederation, but several cantons resisted, preferring to remain Catholic.'
p4763
aS'The novel is notable for its controversial subject: the protagonist and unreliable narrator, a 37-to-38-year-old literature professor called Humbert_Humbert, who is obsessed with the 12-year-old Dolores Haze, with whom he becomes sexually involved after he becomes her stepfather.'
p4764
aS'"Lolita" is his private nickname for Dolores.After its publication, Lolita attained a classic status, becoming one of the best-known and most controversial examples of 20th century literature.'
p4765
aS'The novel was adapted to film by Stanley Kubrick in 1962, and again in 1997 by Adrian Lyne.'
p4766
aS'It has also been adapted several times for stage and has been the subject of two operas, two ballets, and an acclaimed but failed Broadway musical.'
p4767
aS'The name "Lolita" has entered pop culture to describe a sexually precocious girl.The Nabokov translation into Russian was published by Phaedra Publishers in New York in 1967.Lolita is included on Time\'s List of the 100 Best Novels in the English language from 1923 to 2005.'
p4768
aS"It is fourth on the Modern Library's 1998 list of the 100 Best Novels of the 20th century."
p4769
aS'It was also included in the Bokklubben World Library, a 2002 collection of the most highly regarded books in history. Plot summary Humbert_Humbert, a European literary scholar, describes the premature death of his childhood sweetheart, Annabel Leigh.'
p4770
aS"The country's capital and largest city is Budapest."
p4771
aS'Hungary is a member of the European Union, NATO, the OECD, the Visegrad Group, and the Schengen Area.'
p4772
aS'The official language is Hungarian, which is the most widely spoken non-Indo-European language in Europe.Following centuries of successive habitation by Celts, Romans, Huns, Slavs, Gepids, and Avars, the foundation of Hungary was laid in the late 9th century by the Hungarian grand prince Arpad in the Honfoglalas ("homeland-conquest").'
p4773
aS'His great-grandson Stephen I ascended to the throne in 1000 CE, converting the country to a Christian kingdom.'
p4774
aS'By the 12th century, Hungary became a middle power within the Western world, reaching a golden age by the 15th century.'
p4775
aS"Following the Battle of Mohacs in 1526 and about 150 years of partial Ottoman occupation (1541-1699), Hungary came under Habsburg rule, and later formed a significant part of the Austro-Hungarian Empire (1867-1918).Hungary's current borders were first established by the Treaty of Trianon (1920) after World_War_I, when the country lost 71% of its territory, 58% of its population, and 32% of ethnic Hungarians."
p4776
aS'Following the interwar period, Hungary joined the Axis Powers in World_War_II, suffering significant damage and casualties.'
p4777
aS'Hydrazine is highly toxic and dangerously unstable unless handled in solution.'
p4778
aS'As of 2000, approximately 120,000 tons of hydrazine hydrate (corresponding to a 64% solution of hydrazine in water by weight) were manufactured worldwide per year.'
p4779
aS'Hydrazine is mainly used as a foaming agent in preparing polymer foams, but significant applications also include its uses as a precursor to polymerization catalysts and pharmaceuticals.'
p4780
aS'Additionally, hydrazine is used in various rocket fuels and to prepare the gas precursors used in air bags.'
p4781
aS'Hydrazine is used within both nuclear and conventional electrical power plant steam cycles as an oxygen scavenger to control concentrations of dissolved oxygen in an effort to reduce corrosion. Molecular structure and properties Hydrazine forms a monohydrate that is denser (1.032 g/cm3) than the anhydrous material.Hydrazine can arise via coupling a pair of ammonia molecules by removal of one hydrogen per molecule.'
p4782
aS'Each H2N-N subunit is pyramidal in shape.'
p4783
aS'The N-N single bond distance is 1.45 A (145 pm), and the molecule adopts a gauche conformation.'
p4784
aS'Hydrogenation typically constitutes the addition of pairs of hydrogen atoms to a molecule, generally an alkene.'
p4785
aS'Catalysts are required for the reaction to be usable; non-catalytic hydrogenation takes place only at very high temperatures.'
p4786
aS'Hydrogenation reduces double and triple bonds in hydrocarbons.Because of the importance of hydrogen, many related reactions have been developed for its use.'
p4787
aS'Most hydrogenations use gaseous hydrogen (H2), but some involve the alternative sources of hydrogen, not H2: these processes are called transfer hydrogenations.'
p4788
aS'The reverse reaction, removal of hydrogen from a molecule, is called dehydrogenation.'
p4789
aS'A reaction where bonds are broken while hydrogen is added is called hydrogenolysis, a reaction that may occur to carbon-carbon and carbon-heteroatom (oxygen, nitrogen or halogen) bonds.'
p4790
aS'Hydrogenation differs from protonation or hydride addition: in hydrogenation, the products have the same charge as the reactants.Hydrogenation of unsaturated fats produces saturated fats.'
p4791
aS'His dwelling had no door or gate so that he might not be awakened by the creaking of hinges.'
p4792
aS'The river Lethe, in the underworld, flowed through his cave.'
p4793
aS'This river is known as the river of forgetfulness. Family Hypnos lived next to his twin brother, Thanatos (Thanatos, "death personified") in the underworld.'
p4794
aS'The underworld is translated into English as Hell in the Septuagint Bible.Hypnos\' mother was Nyx (Nux, "Night"), the deity of Night, and his father was Erebus, the deity of Darkness.'
p4795
aS'Nyx was a dreadful and powerful goddess, and even Zeus feared entering her realm.His wife, Pasithea, was one of the youngest of the Graces and was promised to him by Hera, who is the goddess of marriage and birth.'
p4796
aS'Pasithea is the deity of hallucination or relaxation.Hypnos\' three sons were known as the Oneiroi, which is Greek for "dreams."'
p4797
aS'Morpheus is the Winged God of Dreams and can take human form in dreams.'
p4798
aS'To predict its future outputs, either its internal state or its history must be known.'
p4799
aS'If a given input alternately increases and decreases, a typical mark of hysteresis is that the output forms a loop as in the figure.Such loops may occur purely because of a dynamic lag between input and output.'
p4800
aS'This effect disappears as the input changes more slowly.'
p4801
aS'This effect meets the description of hysteresis given above, but is often referred to as rate-dependent hysteresis to distinguish it from hysteresis with a more durable memory effect.Hysteresis occurs in ferromagnetic materials and ferroelectric materials, as well as in the deformation of some materials (such as rubber bands and shape-memory alloys) in response to a varying force.'
p4802
aS'In natural systems hysteresis is often associated with irreversible thermodynamic change.'
p4803
aS'Many artificial systems are designed to have hysteresis: for example, in thermostats and Schmitt triggers, the principle of hysteresis is applied to avoid unwanted rapid switching.'
p4804
aS'Hysteresis has been identified in many other fields, including economics and biology. Etymology and history The term "hysteresis" is derived from usteresis, an ancient Greek word meaning "deficiency" or "lagging behind".'
p4805
aS'In the foreground, a cap-wearing green-faced man stares at a goat or sheep with the image of a smaller goat being milked on its cheek.'
p4806
aS"In the foreground is a glowing tree held in the man's dark hand."
p4807
aS'The background features a collection of houses next to an Orthodox church, and an upside-down female violinist in front of a black-clothed man holding a scythe.'
p4808
aS"Note that the green-faced man wears a necklace with St. Andrew's cross, indicating that the man is a Christian."
p4809
aS"As the title suggests, I_and_the_Village is influenced by memories of the artist's place of birth and his relationship to it.The significance of the painting lies in its seamless integration of various elements of Eastern European folktales and culture, both Russian and Yiddish."
p4810
aS'Its clearly defined semiotic elements (e.g.'
p4811
aS'The Tree of Life) and daringly whimsical style were at the time considered groundbreaking.'
p4812
aS'I-It describes entities as discrete objects drawn from a defined set (e.g., he, she or any other objective entity defined by what makes it measurably different from other entities).'
p4813
aS'It can be said that "I" have as many distinct and different relationships with each "It" as there are "It"s in one\'s life.'
p4814
aS'Fundamentally, "It" refers to the world as we experience it.By contrast, the word pair I-Thou describes the world of relations.'
p4815
aS'This is the "I" that does not objectify any "It" but rather acknowledges a living relationship.'
p4816
aS'I-Thou relationships are sustained in the spirit and mind of an "I" for however long the feeling or idea of relationship is the dominant mode of perception.'
p4817
aS'A person sitting next to a complete stranger on a park bench may enter into an "I-Thou" relationship with the stranger merely by beginning to think positively about people in general.'
p4818
aS'The stranger is a person as well, and gets instantaneously drawn into a mental or spiritual relationship with the person whose positive thoughts necessarily include the stranger as a member of the set of persons about whom positive thoughts are directed.'
p4819
aS'At the time, "electric" was not yet a commonly used term. In popular culture In 1969, author Ray_Bradbury published I Sing the Body Electric, a science fiction anthology named after the poem and including a short story by the same title.'
p4820
aS'The short story was based on a 1962 Twilight Zone episode that Bradbury had also written.'
p4821
aS'"I Sing the Body Electric" is the title of a 1972 Columbia Records album by the jazz fusion group Weather Report.'
p4822
aS'"I Sing the Body Electric" is the title and first line of a song from the 1980 musical film Fame.'
p4823
aS'"I Sing the Body Electric" was the theme song heard in the PBS fitness and aerobics series Body Electric.'
p4824
aS'"I Sing the Body Electric" was referenced by Susan Sarandon\'s character, Annie Savoy, in the 1988 movie Bull Durham.'
p4825
aS'"I Sing the Body Electro" was the 1998 debut solo album of Kurtis Mantronik.'
p4826
aS'There he spent seven years before establishing his own independent design firm I. M. Pei & Associates in 1955, which became I.M.'
p4827
aS'Pei & Partners in 1966 and later in 1989 became Pei Cobb Freed & Partners.'
p4828
aS'Pei retired from full-time practice in 1990.'
p4829
aS"Since then, he has taken on work as an architectural consultant primarily from his sons' architectural firm Pei Partnership Architects."
p4830
aS"Among the early projects on which Pei took the lead were the L'Enfant Plaza Hotel in Washington, D.C. and the Green Building at MIT."
p4831
aS'His first major recognition came with the National Center for Atmospheric Research in Colorado; his new stature led to his selection as chief architect for the John F. Kennedy Library in Massachusetts.'
p4832
aS'He went on to design Dallas City Hall and the East Building of the National Gallery of Art.He returned to China for the first time in 1975 to design a hotel at Fragrant Hills, and designed Bank of China Tower, Hong Kong, a skyscraper in Hong Kong for the Bank of China fifteen years later.'
p4833
aS'Iago hates Othello (who is also known as "The Moor") and devises a plan to destroy him by making him believe that his wife is having an affair with his lieutenant, Michael Cassio.The role is thought to have been first played by Robert Armin, who typically played intelligent clown roles like Touchstone in As_You_Like_It or Feste in Twelfth Night.The character\'s source is traced to Giovanni Battista Giraldi Cinthio\'s tale "Un Capitano Moro" in Gli Hecatommithi (1565).'
p4834
aS'There, the character is simply "the ensign". Origin While no English translation of Cinthio was available in Shakespeare\'s lifetime, it is possible Shakespeare knew the Italian original, Gabriel Chappuy\'s 1584 French translation, or an English translation in manuscript.'
p4835
aS"Cinthio's tale may have been based on an actual incident occurring in Venice about 1508.While Shakespeare closely followed Cinthio's tale in composing Othello, he departed from it in some details."
p4836
aS"In Cinthio's tale, for example, the ensign suffers an unrequited lust for the Moor's wife, Desdemona, which then drives his vengeance."
p4837
aS"Desdemona dies in an entirely different manner in Cinthio's tale; the Moor commissions his ensign to bludgeon her to death with a sand-filled stocking."
p4838
aS'In gruesome detail, Cinthio follows each blow, and, when she is dead, the Moor and his ensign place her lifeless body upon her bed, smash her skull, and then cause the cracked ceiling above the bed to collapse upon her, giving the impression the falling rafters caused her death.The two murderers escape detection.'
p4839
aS'The Moor misses his wife greatly, however, and comes to loathe the sight of his ensign.'
p4840
aS"The state's largest city and capital is Boise."
p4841
aS'Residents are called "Idahoans".'
p4842
aS'Idaho was admitted to the Union on July 3, 1890, as the 43rd state.Idaho is a mountainous state with an area larger than that of all of New England.'
p4843
aS'It borders the Canadian province of British Columbia to the north, Montana to the northeast, Wyoming to the east, Nevada and Utah to the south, and Washington and Oregon to the west.'
p4844
aS'The network of dams and locks on the Columbia River and Snake_River make the city of Lewiston the farthest inland seaport on the Pacific coast of the contiguous United_States.Idaho\'s nickname is the "Gem State", because nearly every known type of gemstone has been found there.'
p4845
aS'In addition, Idaho is one of only two places in the world where star garnets can be found in any significant quantities, the other being India.'
p4846
aS'Idaho is sometimes called the "Potato State" owing to its popular and widely distributed crop.'
p4847
aS"It was first stated by Emile Clapeyron in 1834 as a combination of Boyle's law and Charles's law."
p4848
aS'The ideal gas law is often written as:where the letters denote pressure, volume, amount (in moles), ideal gas constant, and temperature of the gas, respectively.It can also be derived microscopically from kinetic theory, as was achieved (apparently independently) by August Kronig in 1856 and Rudolf Clausius in 1857. Equation The state of an amount of gas is determined by its pressure, volume, and temperature.'
p4849
aS'The modern form of the equation relates these simply in two main forms.'
p4850
aS'The temperature used in the equation of state is an absolute temperature: in the SI system of units, Kelvin. Common form The most frequently introduced form iswhere:P is the pressure of the gasV is the volume of the gasn is the amount of substance of gas (also known as number of moles)R is the ideal, or universal, gas constant, equal to the product of the Boltzmann constant and the Avogadro constant.T is the temperature of the gasIn SI units, P is measured in pascals, V is measured in cubic metres, n is measured in moles, and T in Kelvin (The Kelvin scale is a shifted Celsius scale where 0.00 Kelvin  -273.15 degrees Celsius, the lowest possible temperature).'
p4851
aS'R has the value 8.314 J*K-1*mol-1 or 0.08206 L*atm*mol-1*K-1or [?'
p4852
aS']2 calories if using pressure in standard atmospheres (atm) instead of pascals, and volume in litres instead of cubic metres. Molar form How much gas is present could be specified by giving the mass instead of the chemical amount of gas.'
p4853
aS'Therefore, an alternative form of the ideal gas law may be useful.'
p4854
aS'The speaker of this reflective ode dispels "vain deluding Joys" from his mind in a ten-line prelude, before invoking "divinest Melancholy" to inspire his future verses.'
p4855
aS'The melancholic mood is idealised by the speaker as a means by which to "attain / To something like prophetic strain," and for the central action of Il_Penseroso - which, like L\'Allegro, proceeds in couplets of iambic tetrameter - the speaker speculates about the poetic inspiration that would transpire if the imagined goddess of Melancholy he invokes were his Muse.'
p4856
aS"The highly digressive style Milton employs in L'Allegro and Il_Penseroso dually precludes any summary of the poems' dramatic action as it renders them interpretively ambiguous to critics."
p4857
aS"However, it can surely be said that the vision of poetic inspiration offered by the speaker of Il_Penseroso is an allegorical exploration of a contemplative paradigm of poetic genre. Background It is uncertain when L'Allegro and Il_Penseroso were composed, as they do not appear in Milton's Trinity College manuscript of poetry."
p4858
aS'However, the settings found in the poem suggest that they were possibly composed shortly after Milton left Cambridge.'
p4859
aS"The two poems were first published in Milton's 1645 collection of poems, The Poems of Mr. John Milton, both English and Latin, published by Humphrey Moseley. Poem As prelude to his invocation of Melancholy, the speaker dismisses joy from his imagination."
p4860
aS"Its rhythm of alternate lines of iambic trimeter and iambic pentameter is identical to that of the first ten lines of L'Allegro:Hence vain deluding Joys,The brood of folly without father bred,How little you bested,Or fill the fixed mind with all your toyes;Dwell in som idle brainAnd fancies fond with gaudy shapes possess,As thick and numberlessAs the gay motes that people the Sun Beams,Or likest hovering dreamsThe fickle Pensioners of Morpheus train."
p4861
aS'"The premiere took place at the Teatro Apollo in Rome on 19 January 1853, where it "began a victorious march throughout the operatic world," a success due to Verdi\'s work over the previous three years.'
p4862
aS'It began with his January 1850 approach to Cammarano with the idea of Il_trovatore.'
p4863
aS'There followed, slowly and with interruptions, the preparation of the libretto, first by Cammarano until his death in mid-1852 and then with the young librettist Leone Emanuele Bardare, which gave the composer the opportunity to propose significant revisions, which were accomplished under his direction.'
p4864
aS'These revisions are seen largely in the expansion of the role of Leonora.For Verdi, the three years were filled with operatic activity because work on this opera did not proceed while the composer wrote and premiered Rigoletto in Venice in March 1851 and also while his personal affairs limited his activities.'
p4865
aS"Then, in May 1851, an additional commission was offered by the Venice company after Rigoletto's success there."
p4866
aS'Then another came from Paris while he was visiting that city from late 1851 and into March 1852.'
p4867
aS'Therefore, even before the libretto for Il_trovatore was ever completed, before the music was written, and before the opera premiered, Verdi had a total of four different operatic projects underway and in various stages of development.Today, in its Italian version, Trovatore is given very frequently and is a staple of the standard operatic repertoire. Composition history How and when Verdi acquired a copy of the Gutierrez play is uncertain, but Budden notes that it appears that Giuseppina Strepponi, with whom Verdi had been living in Busseto since September 1849, had translated the play, as evidenced in a letter from her two weeks before the premiere urging him to "hurry up and give OUR Trovatore".When considering setting Gutierrez\'s play, Verdi turned to work with Cammarano, "the born operatic poet" (according to Budden).'
p4868
aS'With Chicago in the northeast, small industrial cities and great agricultural productivity in central and northern Illinois, and natural resources like coal, timber, and petroleum in the south, Illinois has a diverse economic base and is a major transportation hub.'
p4869
aS'The Port of Chicago connects the state to other global ports from the Great Lakes, via the Saint Lawrence Seaway, to the Atlantic Ocean; as well as the Great Lakes to the Mississippi River, via the Illinois River.'
p4870
aS"For decades, O'Hare International Airport has been ranked as one of the world's busiest airports."
p4871
aS"Illinois has long had a reputation as a bellwether both in social and cultural terms and politics.Although today the state's largest population center is around Chicago in the northern part of the state, the state's European population grew first in the west, with French Canadians who settled along the Mississippi River, and gave the area the name, Illinois."
p4872
aS'After the American Revolutionary War established the United_States, American settlers began arriving from Kentucky in the 1810s via the Ohio River, and the population grew from south to north.'
p4873
aS'In 1818, Illinois achieved statehood.'
p4874
aS'After construction of the Erie Canal increased traffic and trade through the Great Lakes, Chicago was founded in the 1830s on the banks of the Chicago River, at one of the few natural harbors on southern Lake Michigan.'
p4875
aS"His thought continues to have a major influence in contemporary thought, especially the fields of metaphysics, epistemology, ethics, political philosophy, and aesthetics.Kant's major work, the Critique_of_Pure_Reason (Kritik der reinen Vernunft, 1781), aimed to explain the relationship between reason and human experience."
p4876
aS'With this project, he hoped to move beyond what he took to be failures of traditional philosophy and metaphysics.'
p4877
aS'He attempted to put an end to what he considered an era of futile and speculative theories of human experience, while resisting the skepticism of thinkers such as David Hume.Kant argued that our experiences are structured by necessary features of our minds.'
p4878
aS'In his view, the mind shapes and structures experience so that, on an abstract level, all human experience shares certain essential structural features.'
p4879
aS'Among other things, Kant believed that the concepts of space and time are integral to all human experience, as are our concepts of cause and effect.'
p4880
aS'One important consequence of this view is that one never has direct experience of things, the so-called noumenal world, and that what we do experience is the phenomenal world as conveyed by our senses.'
p4881
aS"These claims summarize Kant's views upon the subject-object problem."
p4882
aS'The administrative, political, and military center of the empire was located in Cusco in modern-day Peru.'
p4883
aS'The Inca civilization arose from the highlands of Peru sometime in the early 13th century, and the last Inca stronghold was conquered by the Spanish in 1572.From 1438 to 1533, the Incas used a variety of methods, from conquest to peaceful assimilation, to incorporate a large portion of western South America, centered on the Andean mountain ranges, including, besides Peru, large parts of modern Ecuador, western and south central Bolivia, northwest Argentina, north and central Chile, and a small part of southern Colombia into a state comparable to the historical empires of Eurasia.'
p4884
aS'The official language of the empire was Quechua, although hundreds of local languages and dialects of Quechua were spoken.'
p4885
aS'Many local forms of worship persisted in the empire, most of them concerning local sacred Huacas, but the Inca leadership encouraged the worship of Inti--their sun god--and imposed its sovereignty above other cults such as that of Pachamama.'
p4886
aS'The Incas considered their king, the Sapa Inca, to be the "son of the sun.'
p4887
aS'" Name The Inca referred to their empire as Tawantinsuyu, "the four suyo".'
p4888
aS'In Quechua, tawa is four and -ntin is a suffix naming a group, so that a tawantin is a quartet, a group of four things taken together.'
p4889
aS'Bounded by the Indian Ocean on the south, the Arabian Sea on the south-west, and the Bay of Bengal on the south-east, it shares land borders with Pakistan to the west; China, Nepal, and Bhutan to the north-east; and Burma (Myanmar) and Bangladesh to the east.'
p4890
aS"In the Indian Ocean, India is in the vicinity of Sri_Lanka and the Maldives; in addition, India's Andaman and Nicobar Islands share a maritime border with Thailand and Indonesia.Home to the ancient Indus Valley Civilisation and a region of historic trade routes and vast empires, the Indian subcontinent was identified with its commercial and cultural wealth for much of its long history."
p4891
aS"Four religions--Hinduism, Buddhism, Jainism, and Sikhism--originated here, whereas Zoroastrianism and the Abrahamic religions of Judaism, Christianity, and Islam arrived in the 1st millennium CE and also helped shape the region's diverse culture."
p4892
aS"Gradually annexed by and brought under the administration of the British East India Company from the early 18th century and administered directly by the United Kingdom after the Indian_Rebellion_of_1857, India became an independent nation in 1947 after a struggle for independence that was marked by non-violent resistance led by Mahatma Gandhi.The Indian economy is the world's seventh-largest by nominal GDP and third-largest by purchasing power parity (PPP)."
p4893
aS'Following market-based economic reforms in 1991, India became one of the fastest-growing major economies; it is considered a newly industrialised country.'
p4894
aS'However, it continues to face the challenges of poverty, corruption, malnutrition, inadequate public healthcare, and terrorism.'
p4895
aS'A nuclear weapons state and a regional power, it has the third-largest standing army in the world and ranks ninth in military expenditure among nations.'
p4896
aS"The rebellion is also known as India's First War of Independence, the Great Rebellion, the Indian Rebellion, the Indian Mutiny, the Revolt of 1857, the Rebellion of 1857, the Uprising of 1857, the Sepoy Rebellion, the Indian Insurrection and the Sepoy Mutiny.Other regions of Company-controlled India, such as Bengal, the Bombay Presidency, and the Madras Presidency, remained largely calm."
p4897
aS'In Punjab, the Sikh princes backed the Company by providing soldiers and support.'
p4898
aS'The large princely states of Hyderabad, Mysore, Travancore, and Kashmir, as well as the smaller ones of Rajputana, did not join the rebellion.'
p4899
aS'In some regions, such as Oudh, the rebellion took on the attributes of a patriotic revolt against European presence.'
p4900
aS'Maratha leaders, such as Lakshmibai, the Rani of Jhansi, became folk heroes in the nationalist movement in India half a century later; however, they themselves "generated no coherent ideology" for a new order.The rebellion led to the dissolution of the East India Company in 1858.'
p4901
aS'It also led the British to reorganize the army, the financial system and the administration in India.'
p4902
aS"The country was thereafter directly governed by the crown as the new British Raj. East India Company's expansion in India Although the British East India Company had established a presence in India as far back as 1612, and earlier administered the factory areas established for trading purposes, its victory in the Battle_of_Plassey in 1757 marked the beginning of its firm foothold in Eastern India."
p4903
aS"Indonesia's republican form of government comprises an elected legislature and president."
p4904
aS'It encompasses 34 provinces, of which five have Special Administrative status.'
p4905
aS"The nation's capital city is Jakarta."
p4906
aS'The country shares land borders with Papua New_Guinea, East Timor, and Malaysia.'
p4907
aS'Other neighbouring countries include Singapore, the Philippines, Australia, Palau, and the Indian territory of the Andaman and Nicobar Islands.'
p4908
aS'Indonesia is a founding member of ASEAN and a member of the G-20 major economies.'
p4909
aS"The Indonesian economy is the world's 16th largest by nominal GDP and the 8th largest by GDP (PPP).The Indonesian archipelago has been an important trade region since at least the 7th century, when Srivijaya and then later Majapahit traded with China and India."
p4910
aS'He wields a lightning thunderbolt known as vajra and rides on a white elephant known as Airavata.'
p4911
aS'Indra is the most important deity worshiped by the Rigvedic tribes and is the son of Dyaus and the goddess Savasi.'
p4912
aS'His home is situated on Mount Meru in the heaven.'
p4913
aS'He has many epithets, notably vrsan the mighty, and vrtrahan, slayer of Vrtra, Meghavahana "the one who rides the clouds" and Devapati "the lord of devas".'
p4914
aS"Indra appears as the name of a daeva in Zoroastrianism (though 'Indra' can be used in a general sense for a leader, either of devatas or asuras), while his epithet, Verethragna, appears as a god of victory."
p4915
aS'Indra is also called Sakra frequently in the Vedas and in Buddhism (Pali: Sakka).'
p4916
aS'He is known in Burmese as sik[?]aa:mng[?'
p4917
aS'As with all spectroscopic techniques, it can be used to identify and study chemicals.'
p4918
aS'For a given sample which may be solid, liquid, or gaseous, the method or technique of infrared spectroscopy uses an instrument called an infrared spectrometer (or spectrophotometer) to produce an infrared spectrum.'
p4919
aS'A basic IR spectrum is essentially a graph of infrared light absorbance (or transmittance) on the vertical axis vs. frequency or wavelength on the horizontal axis.'
p4920
aS'Typical units of frequency used in IR spectra are reciprocal centimeters (sometimes called wave numbers), with the symbol cm-1.'
p4921
aS'Units of IR wavelength are commonly given in micrometers (formerly called "microns"), symbol mm, which are related to wave numbers in a reciprocal way.'
p4922
aS'A common laboratory instrument that uses this technique is a Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectrometer.'
p4923
aS'Two-dimensional IR is also possible as discussed below.The infrared portion of the electromagnetic spectrum is usually divided into three regions; the near-, mid- and far- infrared, named for their relation to the visible spectrum.'
p4924
aS'This boundary is known as the Bullen discontinuity, or sometimes as the Lehmann discontinuity.'
p4925
aS'A few years later, in 1940, it was hypothesized that this inner core was made of solid iron; its rigidity was confirmed in 1971.The outer core was determined to be liquid from observations showing that compressional waves pass through it, but elastic shear waves do not - or do so only very weakly.'
p4926
aS"The solidity of the inner core had been difficult to establish because the elastic shear waves that are expected to pass through a solid mass are very weak and difficult for seismographs on the Earth's surface to detect, since they become so attenuated on their way from the inner core to the surface by their passage through the liquid outer core."
p4927
aS'Dziewonski and Gilbert established that measurements of normal modes of vibration of Earth caused by large earthquakes were consistent with a liquid outer core.'
p4928
aS"Recent claims that shear waves have been detected passing through the inner core were initially controversial, but are now gaining acceptance. CompositionEdit Based on the relative prevalence of various chemical elements in our solar system, the theory of planetary formation, and constraints imposed or implied by the chemistry of the rest of the Earth's volume, the inner core is believed to consist primarily of a nickel-iron alloy known as NiFe: 'Ni' for nickel, and 'Fe' for ferrum or iron."
p4929
aS"Because the inner core is denser (12.8 ~ 13.1)g/cm3 than pure iron or nickel at Earth's inner core pressures, the inner core must contain a great amount of heavy elements with only a small amount of light elements, mainly Si with traces of O."
p4930
aS"Based on such density a study calculated that the core contains enough gold, platinum and other siderophile elements that if extracted and poured onto the Earth's surface it would cover the entire Earth with a coating 0.45 m (1.5 feet) deep."
p4931
aS']2 are not.The set of integers consists of zero (0), the natural numbers (1, 2, 3, ...), also called whole numbers or counting numbers, and their additive inverses (the negative integers, i.e.'
p4932
aS'-1, -2, -3, ...).'
p4933
aS'This is often denoted by a boldface Z ("Z") or blackboard bold  (Unicode U+2124 ) standing for the German word Zahlen ([\'tsa:l@n], "numbers").'
p4934
aS'is a subset of the sets of rational and real numbers and, like the natural numbers, is countably infinite.The integers form the smallest group and the smallest ring containing the natural numbers.'
p4935
aS'In algebraic number theory, the integers are sometimes called rational integers to distinguish them from the more general algebraic integers.'
p4936
aS'In fact, the (rational) integers are the algebraic integers that are also rational numbers. Algebraic properties Like the natural numbers, Z is closed under the operations of addition and multiplication, that is, the sum and product of any two integers is an integer.'
p4937
aS'However, with the inclusion of the negative natural numbers, and, importantly, 0, Z (unlike the natural numbers) is also closed under subtraction.'
p4938
aS'In analytical science, interferometers are used in continuous wave Fourier transform spectroscopy to analyze light containing features of absorption or emission associated with a substance or mixture.'
p4939
aS'An astronomical interferometer consists of two or more separate telescopes that combine their signals, offering a resolution equivalent to that of a telescope of diameter equal to the largest separation between its individual elements. Basic principles Interferometry makes use of the principle of superposition to combine waves in a way that will cause the result of their combination to have some meaningful property that is diagnostic of the original state of the waves.'
p4940
aS'This works because when two waves with the same frequency combine, the resulting pattern is determined by the phase difference between the two waves--waves that are in phase will undergo constructive interference while waves that are out of phase will undergo destructive interference.'
p4941
aS'Most interferometers use light or some other form of electromagnetic wave.Typically (see Fig.'
p4942
aS'1, the well-known Michelson configuration) a single incoming beam of coherent light will be split into two identical beams by a beam splitter (a partially reflecting mirror).'
p4943
aS'Each of these beams travels a different route, called a path, and they are recombined before arriving at a detector.'
p4944
aS'The path difference, the difference in the distance traveled by each beam, creates a phase difference between them.'
p4945
aS'Interferons are named for their ability to "interfere" with viral replication by protecting cells from virus infections.'
p4946
aS'IFNs also have various other functions: they activate immune cells, such as natural killer cells and macrophages; they increase host defenses by up-regulating antigen presentation by virtue of increasing the expression of major histocompatibility complex (MHC) antigens.'
p4947
aS'Certain symptoms of infections, such as fever, muscle pain and "flu-like symptoms", are also caused by the production of IFNs and other cytokines.More than twenty distinct IFN genes and proteins have been identified in animals, including humans.'
p4948
aS'They are typically divided among three classes: Type I IFN, Type II IFN, and Type III IFN.'
p4949
aS'IFNs belonging to all three classes are important for fighting viral infections and for the regulation of the immune system. Types of interferon Based on the type of receptor through which they signal, human interferons have been classified into three major types.Interferon type I: All type I IFNs bind to a specific cell surface receptor complex known as the IFN-a/b receptor (IFNAR) that consists of IFNAR1 and IFNAR2 chains.'
p4950
aS'The type I interferons present in humans are IFN-a, IFN-b, IFN-e, IFN-k and IFN-o.'
p4951
aS'In general, type I interferons are produced when the body recognizes a virus has invaded it.'
p4952
aS'Sequences that are joined together in the final mature RNA after RNA splicing are exons.'
p4953
aS'Introns are found in the genes of most organisms and many viruses, and can be located in a wide range of genes, including those that generate proteins, ribosomal RNA (rRNA), and transfer RNA (tRNA).'
p4954
aS'When proteins are generated from intron-containing genes, RNA splicing takes place as part of the RNA processing pathway that follows transcription and precedes translation.The word intron is derived from the term intragenic region, i.e.'
p4955
aS'a region inside a gene.'
p4956
aS'Although introns are sometimes called intervening sequences, the term "intervening sequence" can refer to any of several families of internal nucleic acid sequences that are not present in the final gene product, including inteins, untranslated sequences (UTR), and nucleotides removed by RNA editing, in addition to introns. Introduction Introns were first discovered in protein-coding genes of adenovirus, and were subsequently identified in genes encoding transfer RNA and ribosomal RNA genes.'
p4957
aS'Introns are now known to occur within a wide variety of genes throughout organisms and viruses within all of the biological kingdoms.The fact that genes were split or interrupted by introns was discovered independently in 1977 by Phillip Allen Sharp and Richard J. Roberts, for which they shared the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine in 1993.'
p4958
aS'The term intron was introduced by American biochemist Walter Gilbert:"The notion of the cistron [...] must be replaced by that of a transcription unit containing regions which will be lost from the mature messenger - which I suggest we call introns (for intragenic regions) - alternating with regions which will be expressed - exons."'
p4959
aS'In 1998, the Modern Library ranked Invisible_Man nineteenth on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century.'
p4960
aS'Time magazine included the novel in its TIME 100 Best English-language Novels from 1923 to 2005. Development history Ellison says in his introduction to the 30th Anniversary Edition that he started to write what would eventually become Invisible_Man in a barn in Waitsfield, Vermont in the summer of 1945 while on sick leave from the Merchant Marine.'
p4961
aS'The letters he wrote to fellow novelist Richard Wright as he started working on the novel provide evidence for its political context: the disillusion with the Communist Party that he and Wright shared.'
p4962
aS'In a letter to Wright August 18, 1945, Ellison poured out his anger toward party leaders for betraying Black and Marxist class politics during the war years.'
p4963
aS'"If they want to play ball with the bourgeoisie they needn\'t think they can get away with it.... Maybe we can\'t smash the atom, but we can, with a few well chosen, well written words, smash all that crummy filth to hell."'
p4964
aS'In the wake of this disillusion, Ellison began writing Invisible_Man, a novel that was, in part, his response to the party\'s betrayal.The book took five years to complete with one year off for what Ellison termed an "ill-conceived short novel."'
p4965
aS'Invisible_Man was published as a whole in 1952.'
p4966
aS'In 2011 the population of Ireland was about 6.4 million, ranking it the second-most populous island in Europe.'
p4967
aS"Just under 4.6 million live in the Republic of Ireland and just over 1.8 million live in Northern Ireland.The island's geography comprises relatively low-lying mountains surrounding a central plain, with several navigable rivers extending inland."
p4968
aS'The island has lush vegetation, a product of its mild but changeable oceanic climate, which avoids extremes in temperature.'
p4969
aS'Thick woodlands covered the island until the Middle Ages.'
p4970
aS'As of 2013, the amount of land that is wooded in Ireland is about 11% of the total, compared with a European average of 35%.'
p4971
aS'There are 26 extant mammal species native to Ireland.Prehistoric Ireland saw the arrival of humans after 8000 BC.'
p4972
aS'Gaelic Ireland had emerged by the 1st century and lasted until the early 17th century.'
p4973
aS"It is by mass the most common element on Earth, forming much of Earth's outer and inner core."
p4974
aS"It is the fourth most common element in the Earth's crust."
p4975
aS'Its abundance in rocky planets like Earth is due to its abundant production by fusion in high-mass stars, where the production of nickel-56 (which decays to the most common isotope of iron) is the last nuclear fusion reaction that is exothermic.'
p4976
aS'Consequently, radioactive nickel is the last element to be produced before the violent collapse of a supernova scatters precursor radionuclide of iron into space.Like other group 8 elements, iron exists in a wide range of oxidation states, -2 to +6, although +2 and +3 are the most common.'
p4977
aS'Elemental iron occurs in meteoroids and other low oxygen environments, but is reactive to oxygen and water.'
p4978
aS'Fresh iron surfaces appear lustrous silvery-gray, but oxidize in normal air to give hydrated iron oxides, commonly known as rust.'
p4979
aS'Unlike many other metals which form passivating oxide layers, iron oxides occupy more volume than the metal and thus flake off, exposing fresh surfaces for corrosion.Iron metal has been used since ancient times, although copper alloys, which have lower melting temperatures, were used even earlier in human history.'
p4980
aS"Newton made seminal contributions to optics, and he shares credit with Gottfried Leibniz for the development of calculus.Newton's Principia formulated the laws of motion and universal gravitation, which dominated scientists' view of the physical universe for the next three centuries."
p4981
aS"By deriving Kepler's laws of planetary motion from his mathematical description of gravity, and then using the same principles to account for the trajectories of comets, the tides, the precession of the equinoxes, and other phenomena, Newton removed the last doubts about the validity of the heliocentric model of the Solar System."
p4982
aS'This work also demonstrated that the motion of objects on Earth and of celestial bodies could be described by the same principles.'
p4983
aS'His prediction that Earth should be shaped as an oblate spheroid was later vindicated by the measurements of Maupertuis, La Condamine, and others, which helped convince most Continental European scientists of the superiority of Newtonian mechanics over the earlier system of Descartes.Newton built the first practical reflecting telescope and developed a theory of colour based on the observation that a prism decomposes white light into the many colours of the visible spectrum.'
p4984
aS'He formulated an empirical law of cooling, studied the speed of sound, and introduced the notion of a Newtonian fluid.'
p4985
aS'In addition to his work on calculus, as a mathematician Newton contributed to the study of power series, generalised the binomial theorem to non-integer exponents, developed a method for approximating the roots of a function, and classified most of the cubic plane curves.Newton was a fellow of Trinity College and the second Lucasian Professor of Mathematics at the University of Cambridge.'
p4986
aS'He was a devout but unorthodox Christian and, unusually for a member of the Cambridge faculty of the day, he refused to take holy orders in the Church of England, perhaps because he privately rejected the doctrine of the Trinity.'
p4987
aS'Allende has been called "the world\'s most widely read Spanish-language author".'
p4988
aS"In 2004, Allende was inducted into the American Academy of Arts and Letters, and in 2010, she received Chile's National Literature Prize."
p4989
aS"President Barack Obama awarded her the 2014 Presidential Medal of Freedom.Allende's novels are often based upon her personal experience and pay homage to the lives of women, while weaving together elements of myth and realism."
p4990
aS'She has lectured and toured many American colleges to teach literature.'
p4991
aS'Fluent in English as a second language, Allende was granted American citizenship in 1993, having lived in California with her American husband since 1989. Biography Allende was born Isabel_Allende Llona in Lima, Peru, the daughter of Francisca Llona Barros and Tomas Allende, who was at the time a second secretary at the Chilean embassy.'
p4992
aS'Her father was a first cousin of Salvador_Allende, President of Chile from 1970 to 1973; thus the former head of state is her first cousin once removed.'
p4993
aS'Many sources cite Allende as being Salvador_Allende\'s niece (without specifying that the relationship is that Tomas and Salvador are cousins); the confusion stems from Allende herself often referring to Salvador as her "\'uncle" (tio) in her private life and public interviews.'
p4994
aS'Their marriage became the basis for the political unification of Spain under their grandson, Holy Roman Emperor Charles V. After a struggle to claim her right to the throne, she reorganized the governmental system, brought the crime rate to the lowest it had been in years, and unburdened the kingdom of the enormous debt her brother had left behind.'
p4995
aS'Her reforms and those she made with her husband had an influence that extended well beyond the borders of their united kingdoms.'
p4996
aS"Isabella and Ferdinand are known for completing the Reconquista, ordering conversion or exile of their Muslim and Jewish subjects in the Spanish Inquisition, and for supporting and financing Christopher Columbus's 1492 voyage that led to the opening of the New World and to the establishment of Spain as the first global power who dominated Europe and much of the world for more than a century."
p4997
aS'In most instances, she was more influential than her husband.'
p4998
aS'Isabella was granted the title Servant of God by the Catholic Church in 1974. Life and reignEdit  Early yearsEdit Isabella was born in Madrigal de las Altas Torres, Avila, to John II of Castile and Isabella of Portugal on 22 April 1451.'
p4999
aS'At the time of her birth, she was second in line to throne after her older half-brother Henry.'
p5000
aS'Henry was 26 at that time and married but childless.'
p5001
aS'The museum celebrated the 500th anniversary of this masterpiece in 2012.'
p5002
aS"By far Grunewald's greatest and largest work, it was painted for the Monastery of St. Anthony in Isenheim near Colmar, which specialized in hospital work."
p5003
aS'The Antonine monks of the monastery were noted for their care of plague sufferers as well as their treatment of skin diseases, such as ergotism.'
p5004
aS'The image of the crucified Christ is pitted with plague-type sores, showing patients that Jesus understood and shared their afflictions. Composition The altarpiece has two sets of wings, displaying three configurations:Wings closed:With the exception of certain holy days, the wings of the altarpiece were kept closed, displaying The Crucifixion framed on the left by the martyrdom of Saint Sebastian pierced by arrows, and on the right by Saint Anthony the Great, remaining placid although he is being taunted by a frightening monster.'
p5005
aS"The two saints protect and heal the sick, Saint Anthony as the patron saint of the victims of Saint Anthony's fire and Saint Sebastian, whose aid was invoked to ward off the plague."
p5006
aS"Grunewald's Crucifixion stands as one of the most poignant representations of this scene in Western art due to the artist's masterful depiction of horrific agony, with Christ's emaciated body writhing under the pain of the nails driven through his hands and feet."
p5007
aS"This body covered with sores and riddled with thorns must have terrified the sick, but also left no doubt about Christ's suffering, thus comforting them in their communion with the Saviour, whose pain they shared."
p5008
aS'She was particularly worshipped in northern Mesopotamia, at the Assyrian cities of Nineveh, Ashur and Arbela (Erbil).Besides the lions on her gate, her symbol is an eight-pointed star.In the Babylonian pantheon, she "was the divine personification of the planet Venus".Ishtar had many lovers; however, as Guirand notes,"Woe to him whom Ishtar had honoured!'
p5009
aS'The fickle goddess treated her passing lovers cruelly, and the unhappy wretches usually paid dearly for the favours heaped on them.'
p5010
aS'Animals, enslaved by love, lost their native vigour: they fell into traps laid by men or were domesticated by them.'
p5011
aS"'Thou has loved the lion, mighty in strength', says the hero Gilgamesh to Ishtar, 'and thou hast dug for him seven and seven pits!"
p5012
aS'Thou hast loved the steed, proud in battle, and destined him for the halter, the goad and the whip.'
p5013
aS"'Even for the gods Ishtar's love was fatal."
p5014
aS'In her youth the goddess had loved Tammuz, god of the harvest, and--if one is to believe Gilgamesh --this love caused the death of Tammuz.Her cult may have involved sacred prostitution, though this is debatable.'
p5015
aS'The spins are arranged in a graph, usually a lattice, allowing each spin to interact with its neighbors.'
p5016
aS'The model allows the identification of phase transitions, as a simplified model of reality.'
p5017
aS'The two-dimensional square-lattice Ising_model is one of the simplest statistical models to show a phase transition.The Ising_model was invented by the physicist Wilhelm Lenz (1920), who gave it as a problem to his student Ernst Ising.'
p5018
aS'The one-dimensional Ising_model has no phase transition and was solved by Ising (1925) himself in his 1924 thesis.'
p5019
aS'The two-dimensional square lattice Ising_model is much harder, and was given an analytic description much later, by Lars Onsager (1944).'
p5020
aS'It is usually solved by a transfer-matrix method, although there exist different approaches, more related to quantum field theory.In dimensions greater than four, the phase transition of the Ising_model is described by mean field theory. Definition Consider a set of lattice sites L, each with a set of adjacent sites (e.g.'
p5021
aS'a graph) forming a d-dimensional lattice.'
p5022
aS'Isomers do not necessarily share similar properties, unless they also have the same functional groups.'
p5023
aS'There are many different classes of isomers, like positional isomers, cis-trans isomers and enantiomers, etc.'
p5024
aS'(see chart below).'
p5025
aS'There are two main forms of isomerism: structural isomerism and stereoisomerism (spatial isomerism). Structural isomers In structural isomers, sometimes referred to as constitutional isomers, the atoms and functional groups are joined together in different ways.'
p5026
aS'Structural isomers have different IUPAC names and may or may not belong to the same functional group.'
p5027
aS'This group includes chain isomerism whereby hydrocarbon chains have variable amounts of branching; position isomerism, which deals with the position of a functional group on a chain; and functional group isomerism, in which one functional group is split up into different ones.For example, two position isomers would be 2-fluoropropane and 1-fluoropropane, illustrated on the left side of the diagram above.In skeletal isomers the main carbon chain is different between the two isomers.'
p5028
aS'This type of isomerism is most identifiable in secondary and tertiary alcohol isomers.Tautomers are structural isomers of the same chemical substance that spontaneously interconvert with each other, even when pure.'
p5029
aS'It contains geographically diverse features within its relatively small area.'
p5030
aS"Israel's financial center is Tel Aviv, while Jerusalem is both its designated capital and the most populous individual city under the country's governmental administration."
p5031
aS'Israeli sovereignty over Jerusalem is internationally disputed.On 29 November 1947, the United Nations General Assembly recommended the adoption and implementation of the Partition Plan for Mandatory Palestine.'
p5032
aS'This UN plan specified borders for new Arab and Jewish states and also specified an area of Jerusalem and its environs which was to be administered by the UN under an international regime.'
p5033
aS'The end of the British Mandate for Palestine was set for midnight on 14 May 1948.'
p5034
aS'That day, David Ben-Gurion, the Executive Head of the Zionist Organization and president of the Jewish Agency for Palestine, declared "the establishment of a Jewish state in Eretz Israel, to be known as the State of Israel," which would start to function from the termination of the mandate.'
p5035
aS'The borders of the new state were not specified in the declaration.'
p5036
aS'His father, Mario, was a tropical agronomist and botanist who also taught agriculture and floriculture.'
p5037
aS'Born 47 years earlier in San Remo, Italy, Mario Calvino had emigrated to Mexico in 1909 where he took up an important position with the Ministry of Agriculture.'
p5038
aS'In an autobiographical essay, Italo_Calvino explained that his father "had been in his youth an anarchist, a follower of Kropotkin and then a Socialist Reformist".'
p5039
aS"In 1917, Mario left for Cuba to conduct scientific experiments, after living through the Mexican Revolution.Calvino's mother, Eva Mameli, was a botanist and university professor."
p5040
aS'A native of Sassari in Sardinia and 11 years younger than her husband, she married while still a junior lecturer at Pavia University.'
p5041
aS'Born into a secular family, Eva was a pacifist educated in the "religion of civic duty and science".'
p5042
aS'Calvino described his parents as being "very different in personality from one another", suggesting perhaps deeper tensions behind a comfortable, albeit strict, middle-class upbringing devoid of conflict.'
p5043
aS'With 61 million inhabitants, it is the 4th most populous EU member state.'
p5044
aS'Located in the heart of the Mediterranean Sea, Italy shares land borders with France, Switzerland, Austria, Slovenia, San Marino and Vatican City.Since ancient times, Magna Graecia, Etruscan, Celtic and other cultures have flourished in the territory of present-day Italy, being eventually absorbed by Rome, that became the leading political and religious centre of Western civilisation, capital of the Roman Empire and Christianity.'
p5045
aS'During the Dark Ages, the Italian Peninsula faced calamitous invasions by barbarian tribes, but beginning around the 11th century, numerous Italian city-states rose to great prosperity through shipping, commerce and banking (indeed, modern capitalism has its roots in medieval Italy).'
p5046
aS'Especially during The Renaissance, Italian culture thrived, producing scholars, artists, and polymaths such as Leonardo da Vinci, Galileo, Michelangelo and Machiavelli.'
p5047
aS'Italian explorers such as Polo, Columbus, Vespucci, and Verrazzano discovered new routes to the Far East and the New World, helping to usher in the European Age of Discovery.'
p5048
aS'Nevertheless, Italy would remain fragmented into many warring states, subsequently falling prey to larger European powers such as France, Spain, and later Austria.'
p5049
aS'Italy would thus enter a long period of decline that lasted until the mid 19th century.After various unsuccessful attempts, the second and the third wars for Italian independence resulted in the unification of most of present-day Italy between 1859-66.'
p5050
aS'18 March] 1584), commonly known as Ivan_the_Terrible (Russian:  Ivan Groznyi  , Ivan Grozny), was the Grand Prince of Moscow from 1533 to 1547 and Tsar of All the Russias from 1547 until his death.'
p5051
aS'His long reign saw the conquest of the Khanates of Kazan, Astrakhan and Siberia, transforming Russia into a multiethnic and multicontinental state spanning almost one billion acres, approximately 4,046,856 km2 (1,562,500 sq mi).'
p5052
aS"Ivan managed countless changes in the progression from a medieval state to an empire and emerging regional power, and became the first ruler to be crowned as Tsar of All the Russias.Historic sources present disparate accounts of Ivan's complex personality: he was described as intelligent and devout, yet given to rages and prone to episodic outbreaks of mental illness that increased with his age, affecting his reign."
p5053
aS'In one such outburst, he killed his groomed and chosen heir Ivan Ivanovich.'
p5054
aS"This left the Tsardom to be passed to Ivan's younger son, the weak and intellectually disabled Feodor Ivanovich."
p5055
aS"Ivan's legacy is complex: he was an able diplomat, a patron of arts and trade, founder of Russia's first Print Yard, a leader highly popular among the common people of Russia, but he is also remembered for his paranoia and arguably harsh treatment of the nobility."
p5056
aS"The Massacre of Novgorod is regarded as one of the biggest demonstrations of his mental instability and brutality. Sobriquet The English word terrible is usually used to translate the Russian word grozny in Ivan's nickname, but the modern English usage of terrible, with a pejorative connotation of bad or evil, does not precisely represent the intended meaning."
p5057
aS"His first major publication, a short story collection entitled A Sportsman's Sketches (1852), was a milestone of Russian Realism, and his novel Fathers and Sons (1862) is regarded as one of the major works of 19th-century fiction. Life Ivan Sergeyevich Turgenev was born into a family of Russian land-owners in Oryol, Russia, on November 9, 1818 (October 28 Old Style)."
p5058
aS'His father, Sergei Nikolaevich Turgenev, a colonel in the Russian cavalry, was a chronic philanderer.'
p5059
aS"Ivan's mother, Varvara Petrovna Lutovinova, was a wealthy heiress, who had an unhappy childhood and suffered in her marriage."
p5060
aS"Ivan's father died when Ivan was sixteen, leaving him and his brother Nicolas to be brought up by their abusive mother."
p5061
aS"Ivan's childhood was a lonely one, in constant fear of his mother who beat him often."
p5062
aS'After the standard schooling for a son of a gentleman, Turgenev studied for one year at the University of Moscow and then moved to the University of Saint_Petersburg from 1834 to 1837, focusing on Classics, Russian literature, and philology.'
p5063
aS'From 1838 until 1841 he studied philosophy, particularly Hegel, and history at the University of Berlin.'
p5064
aS'It follows the Saxon protagonist, Sir Wilfred of Ivanhoe, who is out of favour with his father for his allegiance to the Norman king Richard the Lionheart.'
p5065
aS'The story is set in 1194, after the failure of the Third Crusade, when many of the Crusaders were still returning to their homes in Europe.'
p5066
aS'King Richard, who had been captured by Leopold of Austria on his return journey to England, was believed to be still in captivity.The legendary Robin Hood, initially under the name of Locksley, is also a character in the story, as are his "merry men".'
p5067
aS"The character that Scott gave to Robin Hood in Ivanhoe helped shape the modern notion of this figure as a cheery noble outlaw.Other major characters include Ivanhoe's intractable father, Cedric, one of the few remaining Saxon lords; various Knights Templar, most notable of which is Brian de Bois-Guilbert, Ivanhoe's main rival; a number of clergymen; the loyal serfs Gurth the swineherd and the jester Wamba, whose observations punctuate much of the action; and the Jewish moneylender, Isaac of York, who is equally passionate about his people and his beautiful (Jewish) daughter, Rebecca."
p5068
aS"The book was written and published during a period of increasing struggle for the emancipation of the Jews in England, and there are frequent references to injustices against them. Plot summary  Opening Wilfred of Ivanhoe is disinherited by his father Cedric of Rotherwood for supporting the Norman King Richard and for falling in love with the Lady Rowena, Cedric's ward and a descendant of the Saxon Kings of England."
p5069
aS'Cedric had planned to marry her to the powerful Lord Aethelstane, pretender to the Crown of England through his descent from the last Saxon King, Harold_Godwinson, thus cementing a Saxon political alliance between two rivals for the same claim.'
p5070
aS'Ivanhoe accompanies King Richard on the Crusades, where he is said to have played a notable role in the Siege of Acre by enduring with great fortitude the privations of life in the city and Christian camp after their containment by Saladin; Ivanhoe also tends to Louis of Thuringia who suffers from malaria.The book opens with a scene of Norman knights and prelates seeking the hospitality of Cedric.'
p5071
aS'Peirithoos was his son (or stepson, if Zeus were his father, as the sky-god claims to Hera in Iliad 14). Background Ixion married Dia, a daughter of Deioneus (or Eioneus) and promised his father-in-law a valuable present.'
p5072
aS"However, he did not pay the bride price, so Deioneus stole some of Ixion's horses in retaliation."
p5073
aS'Ixion concealed his resentment and invited his father-in-law to a feast at Larissa.'
p5074
aS'When Deioneus arrived, Ixion pushed him into a bed of burning coals and wood.'
p5075
aS'These circumstances are secondary to the fact of Ixion\'s primordial act of murder; it could be accounted for quite differently: in the Greek Anthology (iii.12), among a collection of inscriptions from a temple in Cyzicus is an epigrammatic description of Ixion slaying Phorbas and Polymelos, who had slain his mother, Megara, the "great one".Ixion went mad, defiled by his act; the neighboring princes were so offended by this act of treachery and violation of xenia that they refused to perform the rituals that would cleanse Ixion of his guilt (see catharsis).'
p5076
aS'Thereafter, Ixion lived as an outlaw and was shunned.'
p5077
aS'By killing his father-in-law, Ixion was reckoned the first man guilty of kin-slaying in Greek mythology.'
p5078
aS'He published his final original work in 1965 and gave his last interview in 1980.Salinger was raised in Manhattan and began writing while in secondary school.'
p5079
aS'Several were published in Story magazine in the early 1940s before he began serving in World_War_II.'
p5080
aS'In 1948, his critically acclaimed story "A Perfect Day for Bananafish" appeared in The New Yorker magazine, which became home to much of his later work.'
p5081
aS'In 1951, his novel The Catcher in the Rye was an immediate popular success.'
p5082
aS'His depiction of adolescent alienation and loss of innocence in the protagonist Holden_Caulfield was influential, especially among adolescent readers.'
p5083
aS'The novel remains widely read and controversial, selling around 250,000 copies a year.The success of The Catcher in the Rye led to public attention and scrutiny.'
p5084
aS'Salinger became reclusive, publishing new work less frequently.'
p5085
aS'Regarded as reclusive, he had a volatile personality, and struggled with alcoholism for most of his life.'
p5086
aS'In 1945, he married the artist Lee Krasner, who became an important influence on his career and on his legacy.Pollock died at the age of 44 in an alcohol-related single-car accident when he was driving.'
p5087
aS'In December 1956, several months after his death, Pollock was given a memorial retrospective exhibition at the Museum of Modern Art (MoMA) in New_York_City.'
p5088
aS'A larger, more comprehensive exhibition of his work was held there in 1967.'
p5089
aS'In 1998 and 1999, his work was honored with large-scale retrospective exhibitions at MoMA and at The Tate in London. Early life Pollock was born in Cody, Wyoming, in 1912, the youngest of five sons.'
p5090
aS'His parents, Stella May (nee McClure) and LeRoy Pollock, were born and grew up in Tingley, Iowa and were educated at Tingley High School.'
p5091
aS"Pollock's mother is interred at Tingley Cemetery, Ringgold County, Iowa."
p5092
aS'The revolt, which was suppressed after a few weeks of violence, centered in the valley of the Oise north of Paris.'
p5093
aS'This rebellion became known as "the Jacquerie" because the nobles derided peasants as "Jacques" or "Jacques Bonhomme" for their padded surplice called a "jacque".'
p5094
aS'Their revolutionary leader, Guillaume Cale, was referred to by the aristocratic chronicler Jean Froissart as Jacques Bonhomme ("Jack Goodfellow") or Callet.'
p5095
aS'The word jacquerie became a synonym of peasant uprisings in general in both English and French Background After the capture of the French king (John II, Froissart\'s bon roi Jean "John the Good") by the English during the Battle of Poitiers in September 1356, power in France devolved fruitlessly among the Estates-General, King Charles II of Navarre and John\'s son, the Dauphin, later Charles V.However, the Estates-General was too divided to provide effective government and the disputes between the two rulers provoked disunity amongst the nobles.'
p5096
aS'Consequently, the prestige of the French nobility--which had begun the century at Courtrai (the "Battle of the Golden Spurs") by fleeing the field and leaving their infantry to be hacked to pieces and had given up their king at Poitiers--had sunk to a new low.'
p5097
aS'To secure their rights, the French privileged classes, the nobility, the merchant elite and the clergy, forced the peasantry to pay ever-increasing taxes (for example, the taille) and to repair their war-damaged properties under corvee--without compensation.'
p5098
aS'The passage of a law that required the peasants to defend the chateaux that were emblems of their oppression was the immediate cause of the spontaneous uprising.'
p5099
aS'He is one of the major figures associated with post-structuralism and postmodern philosophy.During his career Derrida published more than 40 books, together with hundreds of essays and public presentations.'
p5100
aS'He had a significant influence upon the humanities and social sciences, including--in addition to philosophy and literature--law, anthropology, historiography, linguistics, sociolinguistics, psychoanalysis, political theory, feminism, and gay and lesbian studies.'
p5101
aS'His work still has a major influence in the academe of Continental Europe, South America and all other countries where continental philosophy is predominant, particularly in debates around ontology, epistemology (especially concerning social sciences), ethics, aesthetics, hermeneutics, and the philosophy of language.'
p5102
aS'He also influenced architecture (in the form of deconstructivism), music, art, and art critics.Particularly in his later writings, Derrida frequently addressed ethical and political themes in his work.'
p5103
aS'These writings influenced various activists and political movements.'
p5104
aS'He became a well-known and influential public figure, while his approach to philosophy and the notorious difficulty of his work made him controversial. Life Derrida was born at daybreak on July 15, 1930, in a summer home in El Biar (Algiers), Algeria, into a Sephardic Jewish family (originally from Toledo) that became French in 1870 when the Cremieux Decree granted full French citizenship to the indigenous Arabic-speaking Jews of Algeria.'
p5105
aS'His parents, Haim Aaron Prosper Charles (Aime) Derrida (1896-1970) and Georgette Sultana Esther Safar (1901-1991), named him "Jackie", "which they considered to be an American name", though he would later adopt a more "correct" version of his first name when he moved to Paris; some reports indicate that he was named Jackie after the American child actor Jackie Coogan, who had become well-known around the world via his role in the 1921 Charlie Chaplin film The Kid.'
p5106
aS'He was a powerful influence on later composers of the operetta genre, particularly Johann Strauss, Jr. and Arthur Sullivan.'
p5107
aS'His best-known works were continually revived during the 20th century, and many of his operettas continue to be staged in the 21st.'
p5108
aS'The Tales of Hoffman remains part of the standard opera repertory.Born in Cologne, the son of a synagogue cantor, Offenbach showed early musical talent.'
p5109
aS'At the age of 14, he was accepted as a student at the Paris Conservatoire but found academic study unfulfilling and left after a year.'
p5110
aS'From 1835 to 1855 he earned his living as a cellist, achieving international fame, and as a conductor.'
p5111
aS'His ambition, however, was to compose comic pieces for the musical theatre.'
p5112
aS"Finding the management of Paris's Opera-Comique company uninterested in staging his works, in 1855 he leased a small theatre in the Champs-Elysees."
p5113
aS'The Jahn-Teller theorem essentially states that any nonlinear molecule with a spatially degenerate electronic ground state will undergo a geometrical distortion that removes that degeneracy, because the distortion lowers the overall energy of the species.'
p5114
aS'For a description of another type of geometrical distortion that occurs in crystals with substitutional impurities see article off-center ions. Transition metal chemistry The Jahn-Teller_effect is most often encountered in octahedral complexes of the transition metals.'
p5115
aS'The phenomenon is very common in six-coordinate copper(II) complexes.'
p5116
aS'The d9 electronic configuration of this ion gives three electrons in the two degenerate eg orbitals, leading to a doubly degenerate electronic ground state.'
p5117
aS'Such complexes distort along one of the molecular fourfold axes (always labelled the z axis), which has the effect of removing the orbital and electronic degeneracies and lowering the overall energy.'
p5118
aS'The distortion normally takes the form of elongating the bonds to the ligands lying along the z axis, but occasionally occurs as a shortening of these bonds instead (the Jahn-Teller theorem does not predict the direction of the distortion, only the presence of an unstable geometry).'
p5119
aS'When such an elongation occurs, the effect is to lower the electrostatic repulsion between the electron-pair on the Lewis basic ligand and any electrons in orbitals with a z component, thus lowering the energy of the complex.'
p5120
aS'Practitioners believe noninjury and self-control are means to liberation from the cycle of births and deaths.'
p5121
aS'Parasparopagraho Jivanam is the motto of Jainism.The word "Jain" derives from the Sanskrit word Jina (meaning victor).'
p5122
aS'A human being who has conquered all inner passions like attachment, desire, anger, pride, greed, etc.'
p5123
aS'and therefore, possesses pure infinite knowledge (Kevala Jnana) is called Jina.'
p5124
aS'Followers of the path practised and preached by Jinas are known as Jains.Jains trace their history through a succession of twenty-four teachers and revivers of Jain teachings known as tirthankaras, with Rishabha as the first and Mahavira as the last of the current era. Doctrine  Non-injury (ahimsa) The principle of ahimsa is the most fundamental and well known aspect of Jainism.'
p5125
aS'In Jainism, killing any living being out of passions is himsa (injury) and abstaining from such act is Ahimsa (noninjury or nonviolence).'
p5126
aS'The everyday implementation of ahimsa is more comprehensive than in other religions and is the hallmark for Jain identity.'
p5127
aS'His famous signature for his paintings was in the shape of a stylized butterfly possessing a long stinger for a tail.'
p5128
aS'The symbol was apt, for it combined both aspects of his personality--his art was characterized by a subtle delicacy, while his public persona was combative.'
p5129
aS'Finding a parallel between painting and music, Whistler entitled many of his paintings "arrangements", "harmonies", and "nocturnes", emphasizing the primacy of tonal harmony.'
p5130
aS'His most famous painting is "Arrangement in Grey and Black No.'
p5131
aS'1" (1871), commonly known as Whistler\'s Mother, the revered and oft-parodied portrait of motherhood.'
p5132
aS'Whistler influenced the art world and the broader culture of his time with his artistic theories and his friendships with leading artists and writers. Early life  New England James Abbott Whistler was born in Lowell, Massachusetts, on July 10, 1834, the first child of Anna Matilda McNeill and George_Washington Whistler.'
p5133
aS'His father was a railroad engineer, and Anna was his second wife.'
p5134
aS"Some Baldwin essays are book-length, for instance The Fire Next Time (1963), No Name in the Street (1972), and The Devil Finds Work (1976).Baldwin's novels and plays fictionalize fundamental personal questions and dilemmas amid complex social and psychological pressures thwarting the equitable integration of not only blacks, but also of gay and bisexual men, while depicting some internalized obstacles to such individuals' quests for acceptance."
p5135
aS"Such dynamics are prominent in Baldwin's second novel, written well before gay equality was widely espoused in America: Giovanni's Room (1956)."
p5136
aS"Baldwin's first novel, Go Tell It on the Mountain, is said to be his best-known work. Early life When Baldwin was an infant, his mother, Emma Berdis Jones, divorced his father amid his drug abuse and moved to the Harlem section of Manhattan in New_York_City."
p5137
aS'There, she married a preacher, David Baldwin.'
p5138
aS'The family was very poor.James spent much time caring for his several younger brothers and sisters.'
p5139
aS'At the age of ten, he was beaten by a gang of police officers.'
p5140
aS"His adoptive father, whom James in essays called simply his father, appears to have treated James--versus James's siblings--with singular harshness.His stepfather died of tuberculosis in summer of 1943 soon before James turned 19."
p5141
aS'Maxwell\'s equations for electromagnetism have been called the "second great unification in physics" after the first one realised by Isaac_Newton.With the publication of A Dynamical Theory of the Electromagnetic Field in 1865, Maxwell demonstrated that electric and magnetic fields travel through space as waves moving at the speed of light.'
p5142
aS'Maxwell proposed that light is an undulation in the same medium that is the cause of electric and magnetic phenomena.'
p5143
aS'The unification of light and electrical phenomena led to the prediction of the existence of radio waves.Maxwell helped develop the Maxwell-Boltzmann distribution, a statistical means of describing aspects of the kinetic theory of gases.'
p5144
aS'He is also known for presenting the first durable colour photograph in 1861 and for his foundational work on analysing the rigidity of rod-and-joint frameworks (trusses) like those in many bridges.His discoveries helped usher in the era of modern physics, laying the foundation for such fields as special relativity and quantum mechanics.'
p5145
aS'Many physicists regard Maxwell as the 19th-century scientist having the greatest influence on 20th-century physics.'
p5146
aS'His contributions to the science are considered by many to be of the same magnitude as those of Isaac_Newton and Albert Einstein.'
p5147
aS'In the millennium poll--a survey of the 100 most prominent physicists--Maxwell was voted the third greatest physicist of all time, behind only Newton and Einstein.'
p5148
aS'He lived most of his life in Cooperstown, New York, which was founded by his father William on property he owned.'
p5149
aS'Cooper was a lifelong member of the Episcopal Church and in his later years contributed generously to it.'
p5150
aS'He attended Yale University for three years, where he was a member of the Linonian Society, but was expelled for misbehaviour.Before embarking on his career as a writer he served in the U.S. Navy as a Midshipman, which greatly influenced many of his novels and other writings.'
p5151
aS'The novel that launched his career was The Spy, a tale about counterespionage set during the Revolutionary War and published in 1821.'
p5152
aS'He also wrote numerous sea stories and his best known works are five historical novels of the frontier period known as the Leatherstocking Tales.'
p5153
aS"Among naval historians Cooper's works on the early U.S. Navy have been well received, but they were sometimes criticized by his contemporaries."
p5154
aS'Among his most famous works is the Romantic novel The_Last_of_the_Mohicans, often regarded as his masterpiece. Early life and family James_Fenimore_Cooper was born in Burlington, New Jersey in 1789, to William Cooper and Elizabeth (Fenimore) Cooper, the eleventh child of twelve children, most of whom died during infancy or childhood.'
p5155
aS'In the general election, he was narrowly defeated by Democrat Grover Cleveland.'
p5156
aS'Blaine was one of the late 19th century\'s leading Republicans and champion of the moderate reformist faction of the party known as the "Half-Breeds".Blaine was born in the western Pennsylvania town of West Brownsville and after college moved to Maine where he became a newspaper editor.'
p5157
aS'Nicknamed "the Magnetic Man", he was a charismatic speaker in an era that prized oratory.'
p5158
aS'He began his political career as an early supporter of Abraham Lincoln and the Union war effort in the American Civil War.'
p5159
aS'In Reconstruction, Blaine was a supporter of black suffrage, but opposed some of the more coercive measures of the Radical Republicans.'
p5160
aS'Initially a protectionist, he later worked for a reduction in the tariff and an expansion of American trade with foreign countries.'
p5161
aS'Railroad promotion and construction were important issues in his time, and as a result of his interest and support Blaine was widely suspected of corruption in the awarding of railroad charters; these allegations plagued his 1884 presidential candidacy.As Secretary of State, Blaine was a transitional figure, marking the end of an isolationist era in foreign policy and foreshadowing the rise of the American Century that would begin with the Spanish-American War.'
p5162
aS'Frazer posited that human belief progressed through three stages: primitive magic, replaced by religion, in turn replaced by science. Biography Born in Glasgow, Scotland, Frazer attended school at Springfield Academy and Larchfield Academy in Helensburgh.'
p5163
aS"He studied at the University of Glasgow and Trinity College, Cambridge, where he graduated with honours in Classics (his dissertation was published years later as The Growth of Plato's Ideal Theory) and remained a Classics Fellow all his life."
p5164
aS"From Trinity, he went on to study law at the Middle Temple, but never practised.Four times elected to Trinity's Title Alpha Fellowship, he was associated with the college for most of his life, except for a year, 1907-1908, spent at the University of Liverpool."
p5165
aS'He was knighted in 1914, and a public lectureship in social anthropology at the universities of Cambridge, Oxford, Glasgow and Liverpool was established in his honour in 1921.'
p5166
aS'He was, if not blind, then severely visually impaired from 1930 on.'
p5167
aS'He and his wife, Lily, died within a few hours of each other.'
p5168
aS'They are buried at the Ascension Parish Burial Ground in Cambridge, England.The study of myth and religion became his areas of expertise.'
p5169
aS"His other writings include three books of poetry, a play, occasional journalism, and his published letters.Joyce was born in 41 Brighton Square, Rathgar, Dublin--about half a mile from his mother's birthplace in Terenure--into a middle-class family on the way down."
p5170
aS"A brilliant student, he excelled at the Jesuit schools Clongowes and Belvedere, despite the chaotic family life imposed by his father's alcoholism and unpredictable finances."
p5171
aS'He went on to attend University College Dublin.In 1904, in his early twenties he emigrated permanently to continental Europe with his partner Nora Barnacle.'
p5172
aS'They lived in Trieste, Paris, and Zurich.'
p5173
aS"Though most of his adult life was spent abroad, Joyce's fictional universe centres on Dublin, and is populated largely by characters who closely resemble family members, enemies and friends from his time there; Ulysses in particular is set with precision in the streets and alleyways of the city."
p5174
aS'Shortly after the publication of Ulysses he elucidated this preoccupation somewhat, saying, "For myself, I always write about Dublin, because if I can get to the heart of Dublin I can get to the heart of all the cities of the world.'
p5175
aS'In the particular is contained the universal.'
p5176
aS'Born in Westmoreland County, Virginia, Monroe was of the planter class and fought in the American Revolutionary War.'
p5177
aS'He was wounded in the Battle_of_Trenton with a musket ball to his shoulder.'
p5178
aS'After studying law under Thomas Jefferson from 1780 to 1783, he served as a delegate in the Continental Congress.'
p5179
aS'As an anti-federalist delegate to the Virginia convention that considered ratification of the United_States Constitution, Monroe opposed ratification, claiming it gave too much power to the central government.'
p5180
aS'He took an active part in the new government, and in 1790 he was elected to the Senate of the first United_States Congress, where he joined the Jeffersonians.'
p5181
aS'He gained experience as an executive as the Governor of Virginia and rose to national prominence as a diplomat in France, when he helped negotiate the Louisiana Purchase in 1803.'
p5182
aS'During the War_of_1812, Monroe held the critical roles of Secretary of State and the Secretary of War under President James Madison.Facing little opposition from the fractured Federalist Party, Monroe was easily elected president in 1816, winning over 80 percent of the electoral vote and becoming the last president during the First Party System era of American politics.'
p5183
aS'James succeeded to the Scottish throne at the age of thirteen months, after his mother Mary was compelled to abdicate in his favour.'
p5184
aS'Four different regents governed during his minority, which ended officially in 1578, though he did not gain full control of his government until 1583.'
p5185
aS'In 1603, he succeeded the last Tudor monarch of England and Ireland, Elizabeth I, who died without issue.'
p5186
aS'He continued to reign in all three kingdoms for 22 years, a period known as the Jacobean era after him, until his death in 1625 at the age of 58.'
p5187
aS'After the Union of the Crowns, he based himself in England (the largest of the three realms) from 1603, only returning to Scotland once in 1617, and styled himself "King of Great Britain and Ireland".'
p5188
aS'He was a major advocate of a single parliament for both England and Scotland.'
p5189
aS"In his reign, the Plantation of Ulster and British colonisation of the Americas began.At 57 years and 246 days, James's reign in Scotland was longer than those of any of his predecessors."
p5190
aS'Established by the Virginia Company of London as "James Fort" on May 4, 1607 (O.S., May 14, 1607 N.S.'
p5191
aS'), and considered permanent after brief abandonment in 1610, it followed several earlier failed attempts, including the Lost Colony of Roanoke.'
p5192
aS'Jamestown served as the capital of the colony for 83 years, from 1616 until 1699.The settlement was located within the country of Tsenacommacah, which was administered by the Powhatan Confederacy, and specifically in that of the Paspahegh tribe.'
p5193
aS'The natives initially welcomed and provided crucial provisions and support for the colonists, who were not agriculturally inclined.'
p5194
aS'Relations with the newcomers soured fairly early on, leading to the total annihilation of the Paspahegh in warfare within 3 years.'
p5195
aS'Mortality at Jamestown itself was very high due to disease and starvation, with over 80% of the colonists perishing in 1609-1610 in what became known as the "Starving Time".In 1608, in the Second Supply, the Virginia Company brought eight Polish and German colonists, of whom some built a small glass factory, although the Germans and a few others soon defected to the Powhatans with weapons and supplies from the settlement.'
p5196
aS'The Second Supply also brought the first two European women to the settlement.'
p5197
aS'The first American edition was published the following year by Harper & Brothers of New York.Primarily of the bildungsroman genre, Jane_Eyre follows the emotions and experiences of its title character, including her growth to adulthood, and her love for Mr. Rochester, the byronic master of fictitious Thornfield Hall.'
p5198
aS"In its internalisation of the action--the focus is on the gradual unfolding of Jane's moral and spiritual sensibility, and all the events are coloured by a heightened intensity that was previously the domain of poetry--Jane_Eyre revolutionised the art of fiction."
p5199
aS"Charlotte Bronte has been called the 'first historian of the private consciousness' and the literary ancestor of writers like Joyce and Proust."
p5200
aS"The novel contains elements of social criticism, with a strong sense of morality at its core, but is nonetheless a novel many consider ahead of its time given the individualistic character of Jane and the novel's exploration of classism, sexuality, religion, and proto-feminism. Plot  Introduction The novel Jane_Eyre is a first-person narrative of the title character."
p5201
aS"The novel is set somewhere in the north of England, during the reign of George III (1760-1820), and goes through five distinct stages: Jane's childhood at Gateshead Hall, where she is emotionally and physically abused by her aunt and cousins; her education at Lowood School, where she acquires friends and role models but also suffers privations and oppression; her time as governess at Thornfield Hall, where she falls in love with her Byronic employer, Edward Rochester; her time with the Rivers family, during which her earnest but cold clergyman cousin, St. John Rivers, proposes to her; and the finale with her reunion with, and marriage to, her beloved Rochester."
p5202
aS'During these sections the novel provides perspectives on a number of important social issues and ideas, many of which are critical of the status quo (see the Themes section below).'
p5203
aS'Literary critic Jerome Beaty opines that the close first person perspective leaves the reader "too uncritically accepting of her worldview", and often leads reading and conversation about the novel towards supporting Jane, regardless of how irregular her ideas or perspectives.Jane_Eyre is divided into 38 chapters, and most editions are at least 400 pages long.'
p5204
aS"It was first popularized by Jansen's friend Abbot Jean Duvergier de Hauranne, of Saint-Cyran-en-Brenne Abbey, and after Duvergier's death in 1643, was led by Antoine Arnauld."
p5205
aS'Through the 17th and into the 18th centuries, Jansenism was a distinct movement within the Catholic Church.'
p5206
aS'The theological centre of the movement was the convent of Port-Royal Abbey, Paris, which was a haven for writers including Duvergier, Arnauld, Pierre Nicole, Blaise Pascal, and Jean_Racine.Jansenism was opposed by many in the Catholic hierarchy, especially the Jesuits.'
p5207
aS'Although the Jansenists identified themselves only as rigorous followers of Augustine_of_Hippo\'s teachings, Jesuits coined the term "Jansenism" to identify them as having Calvinist affinities.'
p5208
aS'The apostolic constitution Cum occasione promulgated by Pope Innocent X in 1653, condemned five cardinal doctrines of Jansenism as heresy--especially the relationship between human free will and efficacious grace, wherein the teachings of Augustine, as presented by the Jansenists, contradicted the teachings of the Jesuit School.'
p5209
aS"Jansenist leaders endeavored to accommodate the pope's pronouncements while retaining their uniqueness, and enjoyed a measure of peace in the late 17th century under Pope Clement IX."
p5210
aS'However, further controversy led to the apostolic constitution Unigenitus Dei Filius, promulgated by Pope Clement XI in 1713, which marked the end of Catholic toleration of Jansenist doctrine. Origins The origins of Jansenism lie in the friendship of Jansen and Duvergier, who met in the early 17th century when both were studying theology at the University of Leuven.'
p5211
aS'The kanji that make up Japan\'s name mean "sun origin", and Japan is often called the "Land of the Rising Sun".Japan is a stratovolcanic archipelago of 6,852 islands.'
p5212
aS"The four largest are Honshu, Hokkaido, Kyushu, and Shikoku, which make up about ninety-seven percent of Japan's land area."
p5213
aS"Japan's population of 126 million is the world's tenth largest."
p5214
aS'Approximately 9.1 million people live in Tokyo, the capital city of Japan, which is the second largest city proper in the OECD.'
p5215
aS"The Greater Tokyo Area, which includes Tokyo and several surrounding prefectures, is the world's largest metropolitan area with over 35 million residents and the world's largest urban agglomeration economy.Archaeological research indicates that Japan was inhabited as early as the Upper Paleolithic period."
p5216
aS'The first written mention of Japan is in Chinese history texts from the 1st century AD.'
p5217
aS"Influence from other regions, mainly Imperial China, followed by periods of isolation, later from Western European influence, has characterized Japan's history."
p5218
aS'He was married to the sorceress Medea.'
p5219
aS'Because he belongs to mythology, he may have existed before the Greek Dark Ages (1100-800 BC.)'
p5220
aS'The people who wrote about Jason lived around 300 BC.Jason appeared in various literary works in the classical world of Greece and Rome, including the epic poem Argonautica and the tragedy Medea.'
p5221
aS'In the modern world, Jason has emerged as a character in various adaptations of his myths, such as the 1963 film Jason and the Argonauts and the 2000 TV miniseries of the same name.'
p5222
aS"Jason is also the main character in the British TV series Atlantis.Jason has connections outside the classical world, being the mythical founder of the city of Ljubljana, the capital of Slovenia. Early yearsEdit  FamilyEdit Jason's father is invariably Aeson, but there is great variation as to his mother's name."
p5223
aS"According to various authors, she could be:Alcimede, daughter of PhylacusPolymede, or Polymele, or Polypheme, a daughter of AutolycusAmphinomeTheognete, daughter of LaodicusRhoeoArne or ScarpheJason was also said to have had a younger brother Promachus and a sister Hippolyte, who married Acastus (see Astydameia). Prosecution by PeliasEdit Pelias (Aeson's half-brother) was power-hungry and wished to gain dominion over all of Thessaly."
p5224
aS'Pelias was the product of a union between their shared mother, Tyro ("high born Tyro") the daughter of Salmoneus, and the sea god Poseidon.'
p5225
aS'The Indonesian capital city, Jakarta, is located on western Java.'
p5226
aS'Much of Indonesian history took place on Java.'
p5227
aS'It was the center of powerful Hindu-Buddhist empires, the Islamic sultanates, and the core of the colonial Dutch East Indies.'
p5228
aS'Java was also the center of the Indonesian struggle for independence during the 1930s and 1940s.'
p5229
aS'Java dominates Indonesia politically, economically and culturally.Formed mostly as the result of volcanic eruptions, Java is the 13th largest island in the world and the fifth largest in Indonesia.'
p5230
aS'A chain of volcanic mountains forms an east-west spine along the island.'
p5231
aS'Three main languages are spoken on the island, with Javanese being the dominant; it is the native language of about 60 million people in Indonesia, most of whom live on Java.'
p5232
aS'He is considered to be the architect of the modern Indian nation-state: a sovereign, socialist, secular, and democratic republic.'
p5233
aS'During his lifetime, he was popularly known as Pandit Nehru ("Scholar Nehru") or as Panditji ("Respected Scholar"), while many Indian children knew him as "Uncle Nehru" (Chacha Nehru).The son of Motilal Nehru, a prominent lawyer and nationalist statesman and Swaroop Rani, Nehru was a graduate of Trinity College, Cambridge and the Inner Temple, where he trained to be a barrister.'
p5234
aS'Upon his return to India, he enrolled at the Allahabad High Court, and took an interest in national politics, which eventually replaced his legal practice.'
p5235
aS'A committed nationalist since his teenage years, he became a rising figure in Indian politics during the upheavals of the 1910s.'
p5236
aS'He became the prominent leader of the left-wing factions of the Indian National Congress during the 1920s, and eventually of the entire Congress, with the tacit approval of his mentor, Gandhi.'
p5237
aS"As Congress President in 1929, Nehru called for complete independence from the British Raj and instigated the Congress's decisive shift towards the left.Nehru and the Congress dominated Indian politics during the 1930s as the country moved towards independence."
p5238
aS'His idea of a secular nation-state was seemingly validated when the Congress, under his leadership, swept the 1937 provincial elections and formed the government in several provinces; on the other hand, the separatist Muslim League fared much poorer.'
p5239
aS'As the Director of the International Bureau of Education, he declared in 1934 that "only education is capable of saving our societies from possible collapse, whether violent, or gradual."'
p5240
aS"Piaget's theory and research influenced several educational practices."
p5241
aS'His theory of child development is studied in pre-service education programs.'
p5242
aS'Educators continue to incorporate contructivist-based strategies.Piaget created the International Center for Genetic Epistemology in Geneva in 1955 while on the faculty of the University of Geneva and directed the Center until his death in 1980.'
p5243
aS'The number of collaborations that its founding made possible, and their impact, ultimately led to the Center being referred to in the scholarly literature as "Piaget\'s factory.'
p5244
aS'"According to Ernst von Glasersfeld, Jean_Piaget was "the great pioneer of the constructivist theory of knowing."'
p5245
aS'However, his ideas did not become widely popularized until the 1960s.'
p5246
aS"The linguistic effects of Racine's poetry are widely considered to be untranslatable, although many eminent poets have attempted to do so, including Lowell, Ted Hughes, and Derek Mahon into English, and Schiller into German."
p5247
aS"The latest attempt to translate Racine's plays into English earned a 2011 American Book Award for the poet Geoffrey Argent."
p5248
aS"Racine's dramaturgy is marked by his psychological insight, the prevailing passion of his characters, and the nakedness of both the plot and stage. Biography Racine was born on 22 December 1639 in La Ferte-Milon (Aisne), in the province of Picardy in northern France."
p5249
aS'Orphaned by the age of four (his mother died in 1641 and his father in 1643), he came into the care of his grandparents.'
p5250
aS'At the death of his grandfather in 1649, his grandmother, Marie des Moulins, went to live in the convent of Port-Royal and took her grandson with her.'
p5251
aS'He received a classical education at the Petites ecoles de Port-Royal, a religious institution which would greatly influence other contemporary figures including Blaise Pascal.'
p5252
aS'Port-Royal was run by followers of Jansenism, a theology condemned as heretical by the French bishops and the Pope.'
p5253
aS"In addition to his symphonies, Sibelius's best-known compositions include Finlandia, the Karelia Suite, Valse triste, the Violin Concerto, the choral symphony Kullervo, and The Swan of Tuonela (from the Lemminkainen Suite)."
p5254
aS'Other works include pieces inspired by the Finnish national epic, the Kalevala, over a hundred songs for voice and piano, incidental music for numerous plays, the opera Jungfrun i tornet (The Maiden in the Tower), chamber music, piano music, Masonic ritual music, and 21 publications of choral music.'
p5255
aS"Throughout his career, the composer found inspiration in nature and Nordic mythology, especially the heroic legends of the national epic, the Kalevala.Sibelius composed prolifically until the mid-1920s but after completing his Seventh Symphony (1924), the incidental music to The_Tempest (1926), and the tone poem Tapiola (1926), he failed to produce any major works in his last thirty years, a stunning and perplexing decline commonly referred to as 'The Silence of Jarvenpaa', the location of his home."
p5256
aS'Although he is reputed to have stopped composing, he attempted to continue writing, including abortive efforts on an eighth symphony.'
p5257
aS'In later life, he wrote Masonic music and re-edited some earlier works while retaining an active but not always favourable interest in new developments in music.The Finnish 100 mark bill featured his image until 2002 when the euro was adopted.'
p5258
aS'Since 2011, Finland has celebrated a Flag Day on 8 December, the composer\'s birthday, also known as the "Day of Finnish Music".'
p5259
aS"In 2015, the 150th anniversary of the composer's birth, a number of special concerts and events have been planned, especially in the city of Helsinki. Life  Early years Sibelius was born on 8 December 1865 in Hameenlinna in the Grand Duchy of Finland, an autonomous part of the Russian Empire."
p5260
aS'His sentimental novel Julie, or the New Heloise was of importance to the development of pre-romanticism and romanticism in fiction.'
p5261
aS"Rousseau's autobiographical writings -- his Confessions, which initiated the modern autobiography, and his Reveries of a Solitary Walker -- exemplified the late 18th-century movement known as the Age of Sensibility, and featured an increased focus on subjectivity and introspection that later characterized modern writing."
p5262
aS'His Discourse on Inequality and The Social Contract are cornerstones in modern political and social thought.Rousseau was a successful composer of music, who wrote seven operas as well as music in other forms, and made contributions to music as a theorist.'
p5263
aS'As a composer, his music was a blend of the late Baroque style and the emergent Classical fashion, and he belongs to the same generation of transitional composers as Christoph_Willibald_Gluck and C. P. E. Bach.'
p5264
aS'One of his more well-known works is the one-act opera Le devin du village, containing the duet "Non, Colette n\'est point trompeuse" which was later rearranged as a standalone song by Beethoven.During the period of the French Revolution, Rousseau was the most popular of the philosophes among members of the Jacobin Club.'
p5265
aS'Rousseau was interred as a national hero in the Pantheon in Paris, in 1794, 16 years after his death. Biography  Youth Rousseau was born in Geneva, which was at the time a city-state and a Protestant associate of the Swiss Confederacy.'
p5266
aS'Since 1536, Geneva had been a Huguenot republic and the seat of Calvinism.'
p5267
aS'Sartre has also been noted for his open relationship with the prominent feminist theorist Simone_de_Beauvoir.He was awarded the 1964 Nobel Prize in Literature but refused it, saying that he always declined official honors and that "a writer should not allow himself to be turned into an institution". Biography  Early life Jean-Paul_Sartre was born in Paris as the only child of Jean-Baptiste Sartre, an officer of the French Navy, and Anne-Marie Schweitzer.'
p5268
aS'His mother was of Alsatian origin and the first cousin of Nobel Prize laureate Albert Schweitzer.'
p5269
aS"(Her father, Charles Schweitzer, was the older brother of Albert Schweitzer's father, Louis Theophile.)"
p5270
aS'When Sartre was two years old, his father died of a fever.'
p5271
aS"Anne-Marie moved back to her parents' house in Meudon, where she raised Sartre with help from her father, a teacher of German who taught Sartre mathematics and introduced him to classical literature at a very early age."
p5272
aS"When he was twelve, Sartre's mother remarried, and the family moved to La Rochelle, where he was frequently bullied.As a teenager in the 1920s, Sartre became attracted to philosophy upon reading Henri Bergson's essay Time and Free Will: An Essay on the Immediate Data of Consciousness."
p5273
aS'He attended the Cours Hattemer, a private school in Paris.'
p5274
aS'He was almost 50 before he embarked on the operatic career on which his reputation chiefly rests today.'
p5275
aS"His debut, Hippolyte et Aricie (1733), caused a great stir and was fiercely attacked by the supporters of Lully's style of music for its revolutionary use of harmony."
p5276
aS'Nevertheless, Rameau\'s pre-eminence in the field of French opera was soon acknowledged, and he was later attacked as an "establishment" composer by those who favoured Italian opera during the controversy known as the Querelle des Bouffons in the 1750s.'
p5277
aS"Rameau's music had gone out of fashion by the end of the 18th century, and it was not until the 20th that serious efforts were made to revive it."
p5278
aS"Today, he enjoys renewed appreciation with performances and recordings of his music ever more frequent. Life The details of Rameau's life are generally obscure, especially concerning his first forty years, before he moved to Paris for good."
p5279
aS"He was a secretive man, and even his wife knew nothing of his early life, which explains the scarcity of biographical information available. Early years, 1683-1732 Rameau's early years are particularly obscure."
p5280
aS'He was born on 25 September 1683 in Dijon, and baptised the same day.'
p5281
aS"His diplomatic efforts failed to gain recognition from any foreign country, and at home, the collapsing Confederate economy forced his government to print more and more paper money to cover the war's expenses, leading to runaway inflation and devaluation of the Confederate dollar.Davis was born in Kentucky to a moderately prosperous farmer, and grew up on his older brother Joseph's large cotton plantations in Mississippi and Louisiana."
p5282
aS'Joseph Davis also secured his appointment to the U.S. Military Academy at West Point.'
p5283
aS'After graduating, Jefferson_Davis served six years as a lieutenant in the United_States Army.'
p5284
aS'He fought in the Mexican-American War (1846-1848), as the colonel of a volunteer regiment.'
p5285
aS'He served as the U.S. Secretary of War from 1853 to 1857 under President Franklin Pierce, and as a Democratic U.S. senator from Mississippi.'
p5286
aS'Operating a large cotton plantation in Mississippi and owning more than 100 slaves, he was well known in the Senate for his support of slavery.'
p5287
aS'Although Davis argued against secession, he believed that each state was sovereign and had an unquestionable right to secede from the Union.Davis lost his first wife, Sarah Knox Taylor, to malaria after three months of marriage, and also struggled with recurring bouts of the disease.'
p5288
aS"Jehovah's_Witnesses are directed by the Governing Body of Jehovah's_Witnesses, a group of elders in Brooklyn, New York, which establishes all doctrines based on its interpretations of the Bible."
p5289
aS'They prefer to use their own translation, the New World Translation of the Holy Scriptures, although their literature occasionally cites other translations.'
p5290
aS"They believe that the destruction of the present world system at Armageddon is imminent, and that the establishment of God's kingdom over the earth is the only solution for all problems faced by humanity.The group emerged from the Bible Student movement, founded in the late 1870s by Charles Taze Russell with the formation of Zion's Watch Tower Tract Society, with significant organizational and doctrinal changes under the leadership of Joseph Franklin Rutherford."
p5291
aS"The name Jehovah's witnesses was adopted in 1931 to distinguish themselves from other Bible Student groups and symbolize a break with the legacy of Russell's traditions.Jehovah's_Witnesses are best known for their door-to-door preaching, distributing literature such as The Watchtower and Awake!, and refusing military service and blood transfusions."
p5292
aS'They consider use of the name Jehovah vital for proper worship.'
p5293
aS'They reject Trinitarianism, inherent immortality of the soul, and hellfire, which they consider to be unscriptural doctrines.'
p5294
aS'They do not observe Christmas, Easter, birthdays, or other holidays and customs they consider to have pagan origins incompatible with Christianity.'
p5295
aS'He is regarded as the founder of modern utilitarianism.Bentham became a leading theorist in Anglo-American philosophy of law, and a political radical whose ideas influenced the development of welfarism.'
p5296
aS'He advocated individual and economic freedom, the separation of church and state, freedom of expression, equal rights for women, the right to divorce, and the decriminalising of homosexual acts.'
p5297
aS'He called for the abolition of slavery, the abolition of the death penalty, and the abolition of physical punishment, including that of children.'
p5298
aS'He has also become known in recent years as an early advocate of animal rights.'
p5299
aS'Though strongly in favour of the extension of individual legal rights, he opposed the idea of natural law and natural rights, calling them "nonsense upon stilts".Bentham\'s students included his secretary and collaborator James Mill, the latter\'s son, John_Stuart_Mill, the legal philosopher John Austin, as well as Robert Owen, one of the founders of utopian socialism.'
p5300
aS'Bentham has been described as the "spiritual founder" of University College London, though he played little direct part in its foundation. Life Bentham was born in Houndsditch, London, to a wealthy family that supported the Tory party.'
p5301
aS"He was reportedly a child prodigy: he was found as a toddler sitting at his father's desk reading a multi-volume history of England, and he began to study Latin at the age of three."
p5302
aS'Most scholars agree that Jesus was a Galilean, Jewish rabbi who preached his message orally, was baptized by John the Baptist, and was crucified in Jerusalem on the orders of the Roman prefect, Pontius Pilate.'
p5303
aS'In the current mainstream view, Jesus was an apocalyptic preacher and the founder of a restoration movement within Judaism, although some prominent scholars argue that he was not apocalyptic.'
p5304
aS"After Jesus' death, his followers became convinced he was alive, and the community they formed eventually became the Christian church."
p5305
aS'The widely accepted calendar era (abbreviated as "AD", sometimes alternatively referred to as "CE") honors the birth of Jesus.Christians believe that Jesus has a "unique significance" in the world.'
p5306
aS'Christian doctrines include the beliefs that Jesus was conceived by the Holy Spirit, was born of a virgin, performed miracles, founded the Church, died by crucifixion as a sacrifice to achieve atonement, rose from the dead, and ascended into Heaven, whence he will return.'
p5307
aS"Most Christians believe Jesus enables humans to be reconciled to God, and will judge the dead either before or after their bodily resurrection, an event tied to the Second Coming of Jesus in Christian eschatology; though some believe Jesus's role as savior has more existential or societal concerns than the afterlife, and a few notable theologians have suggested that Jesus will bring about a universal reconciliation."
p5308
aS'The great majority of Christians worship Jesus as the incarnation of God the Son, the second of three persons of a Divine Trinity.'
p5309
aS'In numerous interviews dating from the 1930s onwards, Miro expressed contempt for conventional painting methods as a way of supporting bourgeois society, and famously declared an "assassination of painting" in favour of upsetting the visual elements of established painting. BiographyEdit Born into the families of a goldsmith and a watch maker, Miro grew up in the Barri Gotic neighborhood of Barcelona.'
p5310
aS'His father was Miquel Miro Adzerias and his mother was Dolors Ferra.'
p5311
aS'He began drawing classes at the age of seven at a private school at Carrer del Regomir 13, a medieval mansion.'
p5312
aS'In 1907 he enrolled at the fine art academy at La Llotja, to the dismay of his father.'
p5313
aS'He studied at the Cercle Artistic de Sant Lluc and he had his first solo show in 1918 at the Dalmau Gallery, where his work was ridiculed and defaced.'
p5314
aS'Inspired by Cubist and surrealist exhibitions from abroad, Miro was drawn towards the arts community that was gathering in Montparnasse and in 1920 moved to Paris, but continued to spend his summers in Catalonia. CareerEdit Miro initially went to business school as well as art school.'
p5315
aS'He began his working career when he was a teenager as a clerk, although he abandoned the business world completely for art after suffering a nervous breakdown.'
p5316
aS"In rabbinical literature, Iyov (iy'vob) is called one of the prophets of the Gentiles.Job is presented as a good and prosperous family man who is beset with horrendous disasters that take away all that he holds dear, including his offspring, his health, and his property."
p5317
aS'He struggles to understand his situation and begins a search for the answers to his difficulties.'
p5318
aS"God rewards Job's obedience during his travails by restoring his health, doubling his original wealth and giving him seven new sons and three new daughters, which bore his great grandchildren before he died, 140 years later. Book of Job The Book of Job begins with an introduction to Job's character--he is described as a blessed man who lived righteously in the Land of Uz."
p5319
aS"The Lord's praise of Job prompted Satan/Accuser to challenge Job's integrity, suggesting that Job served God simply because God protected him."
p5320
aS"God removed Job's protection, allowing Satan/Accuser to take his wealth, his children, and his physical health (but not his life) in order to test Job's character."
p5321
aS'Despite his difficult circumstances, he did not curse God, but rather cursed the day of his birth.'
p5322
aS"And although he anguished over his plight, he stopped short of accusing God of injustice.Most of the book consists of a debate between Job and his three friends concerning Job's condition; they argue whether it was justified, and they debate solutions to his problems."
p5323
aS'Recently, philosophers and scholars have begun to appreciate Fichte as an important philosopher in his own right due to his original insights into the nature of self-consciousness or self-awareness.'
p5324
aS'Like Descartes and Kant before him, he was motivated by the problem of subjectivity and consciousness.'
p5325
aS'Fichte also wrote works of political philosophy; he has a reputation as one of the fathers of German nationalism. Biography  Origins Fichte was born in Rammenau, Upper Lusatia.'
p5326
aS'The son of a ribbon weaver, he came of peasant stock which had lived in the region for many generations.'
p5327
aS'The family was noted in the neighborhood for its probity and piety.'
p5328
aS"Christian Fichte, Johann Gottlieb's father, married somewhat above his station."
p5329
aS'It has been suggested that a certain impatience which Fichte himself displayed throughout his life was an inheritance from his mother.Young Fichte received the rudiments of his education from his father.'
p5330
aS'He enriched established German styles through his skill in counterpoint, harmonic and motivic organisation, and the adaptation of rhythms, forms, and textures from abroad, particularly from Italy and France.'
p5331
aS"Bach's compositions include the Brandenburg Concertos, the Goldberg_Variations, the Mass in B minor, two Passions, and over three hundred cantatas of which nearly two hundred survive."
p5332
aS'His music is revered for its technical command, artistic beauty, and intellectual depth.Bach was born in Eisenach, in the duchy of Saxe-Eisenach, into a great musical family.'
p5333
aS'His father, Johann Ambrosius Bach, was the director of the town musicians, and all of his uncles were professional musicians.'
p5334
aS'His father probably taught him to play the violin and harpsichord, and his brother, Johann Christoph Bach, taught him the clavichord and exposed him to much contemporary music.'
p5335
aS"Apparently at his own initiative, Bach attended St. Michael's School in Luneburg for two years."
p5336
aS'After graduating, he held several musical posts across Germany: he served as Kapellmeister (director of music) to Leopold, Prince of Anhalt-Kothen, Thomaskantor in Leipzig, a position of music director at the main Lutheran churches and educator at the Thomasschule, where he served from 1723 to his death.'
p5337
aS"In his lifetime, Brahms's popularity and influence were considerable."
p5338
aS'He is sometimes grouped with Johann_Sebastian_Bach and Ludwig_van_Beethoven as one of the "Three Bs", a comment originally made by the nineteenth-century conductor Hans von Bulow.Brahms composed for piano, chamber ensembles, symphony orchestra, and for voice and chorus.'
p5339
aS'A virtuoso pianist, he premiered many of his own works.'
p5340
aS'He worked with some of the leading performers of his time, including the pianist Clara Schumann and the violinist Joseph Joachim (the three were close friends).'
p5341
aS'Many of his works have become staples of the modern concert repertoire.'
p5342
aS'Brahms, an uncompromising perfectionist, destroyed some of his works and left others unpublished.Brahms is often considered both a traditionalist and an innovator.'
p5343
aS'His music is firmly rooted in the structures and compositional techniques of the Baroque and Classical masters.'
p5344
aS"These works also provided one of the foundations for Isaac_Newton's theory of universal gravitation.During his career, Kepler was a mathematics teacher at a seminary school in Graz, Austria, where he became an associate of Prince Hans Ulrich von Eggenberg."
p5345
aS'Later he became an assistant to astronomer Tycho Brahe, and eventually the imperial mathematician to Emperor Rudolf II and his two successors Matthias and Ferdinand II.'
p5346
aS'He was also a mathematics teacher in Linz, Austria, and an adviser to General Wallenstein.'
p5347
aS'Additionally, he did fundamental work in the field of optics, invented an improved version of the refracting telescope (the Keplerian Telescope), and mentioned the telescopic discoveries of his contemporary Galileo Galilei.Kepler lived in an era when there was no clear distinction between astronomy and astrology, but there was a strong division between astronomy (a branch of mathematics within the liberal arts) and physics (a branch of natural philosophy).'
p5348
aS'Kepler also incorporated religious arguments and reasoning into his work, motivated by the religious conviction and belief that God had created the world according to an intelligible plan that is accessible through the natural light of reason.'
p5349
aS'Kepler described his new astronomy as "celestial physics", as "an excursion into Aristotle\'s Metaphysics", and as "a supplement to Aristotle\'s On the Heavens", transforming the ancient tradition of physical cosmology by treating astronomy as part of a universal mathematical physics. Early years Johannes_Kepler was born on December 27, the feast day of St. John the Evangelist, 1571, at the Free Imperial City of Weil der Stadt (now part of the Stuttgart Region in the German state of Baden-Wurttemberg, 30 km west of Stuttgart\'s center).'
p5350
aS'His grandfather, Sebald Kepler, had been Lord Mayor of that town but, by the time Johannes was born, he had two brothers and one sister and the Kepler family fortune was in decline.'
p5351
aS'He seems never to have been particularly wealthy, leaving his wife and children in debt at his death, perhaps because he produced relatively few paintings.Vermeer worked slowly and with great care, and frequently used very expensive pigments.'
p5352
aS'He is particularly renowned for his masterly treatment and use of light in his work.Vermeer painted mostly domestic interior scenes.'
p5353
aS'"Almost all his paintings are apparently set in two smallish rooms in his house in Delft; they show the same furniture and decorations in various arrangements and they often portray the same people, mostly women.'
p5354
aS'"Recognized during his lifetime in Delft and The Hague, his modest celebrity gave way to obscurity after his death; he was barely mentioned in Arnold Houbraken\'s major source book on 17th-century Dutch painting (Grand Theatre of Dutch Painters and Women Artists), and was thus omitted from subsequent surveys of Dutch art for nearly two centuries.'
p5355
aS'In the 19th century, Vermeer was rediscovered by Gustav Friedrich Waagen and Theophile Thore-Burger, who published an essay attributing 66 pictures to him, although only 34 paintings are universally attributed to him today.'
p5356
aS"Since that time, Vermeer's reputation has grown, and he is now acknowledged as one of the greatest painters of the Dutch Golden Age. Life For a long time, relatively little was known about Vermeer's life."
p5357
aS'He seems to have been devoted exclusively to his art, living out his life in the city of Delft.'
p5358
aS'Macdonald served 19 years as Canadian Prime Minister; only William Lyon Mackenzie King served longer.Macdonald was born in Scotland; when he was a boy his family immigrated to Kingston in the colony of Upper Canada (today in eastern Ontario).'
p5359
aS'As a lawyer he was involved in several high-profile cases and quickly became prominent in Kingston, which elected him in 1844 to the legislature of the colonial United Province of Canada.'
p5360
aS"By 1857 had become premier under the colony's unstable political system.When in 1864 no party proved capable of governing for long, Macdonald agreed to a proposal from his political rival, George Brown, that the parties unite in a Great Coalition to seek federation and political reform."
p5361
aS'Macdonald was the leading figure in the subsequent discussions and conferences, which resulted in the British North America Act and the birth of Canada as a nation on 1 July 1867.Macdonald was the first Prime Minister of the new nation, and served in that capacity for most of the remainder of his life.'
p5362
aS'The interruption for five years came in the 1870s, after he was involved in the Pacific Scandal.'
p5363
aS'After regaining the position, he saw the railroad through to completion in 1885.'
p5364
aS'It became the means of passenger and freight transportation that helped unite Canada.'
p5365
aS"The opera has drawn controversy, including allegations by some (including Klinghoffer's two daughters) that the opera is antisemitic and glorifies terrorism."
p5366
aS"The work's creators and others have disputed these criticisms. Life and career  Before 1977 John Coolidge Adams was born in Worcester, Massachusetts, in 1947."
p5367
aS"He was raised in various New England states, where he was greatly influenced by New England's musical culture."
p5368
aS'He graduated from Concord High School in Concord, New Hampshire.Adams began composing at the age of ten and first heard his music performed around the age of 13 or 14.'
p5369
aS'After he matriculated at Harvard University in 1965 he studied composition under Leon Kirchner, Roger Sessions, Earl Kim, and David Del Tredici.'
p5370
aS'He earned two degrees from Harvard University (BA 1969, MA 1972).'
p5371
aS'His piece "American Standard" was recorded and released on Obscure Records in 1975.'
p5372
aS'An American Founding Father, Adams was a statesman, diplomat, and a leading advocate of American independence from Great Britain.'
p5373
aS'Well educated, he was an Enlightenment political theorist who promoted republicanism, as well as a strong central government, and wrote prolifically about his often seminal ideas--both in published works and in letters to his wife and key adviser Abigail Adams.'
p5374
aS'Throughout his life, Adams was opposed to slavery, never owned a slave, and was quite proud of the fact.'
p5375
aS'After the Boston_Massacre, with anti-British feelings in Boston at a boiling point, he provided a principled, controversial, and successful legal defense of the accused British soldiers, because he believed in the right to counsel and the "protect[ion] of innocence".Adams came to prominence in the early stages of the American Revolution.'
p5376
aS'A cousin of revolutionary leader Samuel Adams, John_Adams was a lawyer and public figure in Boston.'
p5377
aS'As a delegate from Massachusetts to the Continental Congress, Adams played a leading role in persuading Congress to declare independence.'
p5378
aS'He assisted Thomas Jefferson in drafting the Declaration of Independence in 1776, and was its primary advocate in the Congress.'
p5379
aS'Through his behaviorist approach, Watson conducted research on animal behavior, child rearing, and advertising.'
p5380
aS'In addition, he conducted the controversial "Little Albert" experiment.'
p5381
aS'He was also editor of Psychological Review from 1910 to 1915.'
p5382
aS'A Review of General Psychology survey, published in 2002, ranked Watson as the 17th most cited psychologist of the 20th century. Early life Watson was born in Travelers Rest, South Carolina, to Pickens Butler and Emma K. (Roe) Watson.'
p5383
aS'His mother, Emma Watson, a very religious woman who adhered to prohibitions against drinking, smoking, and dancing, named Watson after a prominent Baptist minister in hopes that it would help him receive the call to preach the Gospel.'
p5384
aS'In bringing him up, she subjected Watson to harsh religious training that later led him to develop a lifelong antipathy toward all forms of religion and to become an atheist.'
p5385
aS'His alcoholic father left the family to live with two Indian women when Watson was 13 years old (a transgression which Watson never forgave).'
p5386
aS"Brown's followers also killed five slavery supporters at Pottawatomie."
p5387
aS'In 1859, Brown led an unsuccessful raid on the federal armory at Harpers Ferry that ended with his capture.'
p5388
aS"Brown's trial resulted in his conviction and a sentence of death by hanging.Brown's attempt in 1859 to start a liberation movement among enslaved African Americans in Harpers Ferry, Virginia, electrified the nation."
p5389
aS'He was tried for treason against the Commonwealth of Virginia, the murder of five men and inciting a slave insurrection.'
p5390
aS'He was found guilty on all counts and was hanged.'
p5391
aS'Southerners alleged that his rebellion was the tip of the abolitionist iceberg and represented the wishes of the Republican Party to end slavery.'
p5392
aS'Historians agree that the Harpers Ferry raid in 1859 escalated tensions that, a year later, led to secession and the American Civil War.Brown first gained attention when he led small groups of volunteers during the Bleeding Kansas crisis.'
p5393
aS'In these areas Calvin was influenced by the Augustinian tradition.'
p5394
aS'Various Congregational, Reformed and Presbyterian churches, which look to Calvin as the chief expositor of their beliefs, have spread throughout the world.Calvin was a tireless polemic and apologetic writer who generated much controversy.'
p5395
aS'He also exchanged cordial and supportive letters with many reformers, including Philipp Melanchthon and Heinrich Bullinger.'
p5396
aS'In addition to his seminal work Institutes of the Christian Religion, he wrote commentaries on most books of the Bible, as well as theological treatises and confessional documents.Originally trained as a humanist lawyer, he broke from the Roman Catholic Church around 1530.'
p5397
aS'After religious tensions provoked a violent uprising against Protestantism in France, Calvin fled to Basel, Switzerland, where he published the first edition of the Institutes in 1536.'
p5398
aS'In that year, Calvin was recruited by William Farel to help reform the church in Geneva, where he regularly preached sermons throughout the week.'
p5399
aS"The city council resisted the implementation of Calvin's and Farel's ideas, and both men were expelled."
p5400
aS'He organized at least fifty recording sessions as a leader during his career, and appeared as a sideman on many other albums, notably with trumpeter Miles_Davis and pianist Thelonious_Monk.As his career progressed, Coltrane and his music took on an increasingly spiritual dimension.'
p5401
aS'His second wife was pianist Alice Coltrane and their son Ravi Coltrane is also a saxophonist.'
p5402
aS'Coltrane influenced innumerable musicians, and remains one of the most significant saxophonists in music history.'
p5403
aS"He received many posthumous awards and recognitions, including canonization by the African Orthodox Church as Saint John William Coltrane and a special Pulitzer Prize in 2007. Biography  Early life and career (1926-1954) Coltrane was born in his parents' apartment at 200 Hamlet Avenue, Hamlet, North Carolina on September 23, 1926."
p5404
aS'His father was John R. Coltrane and his mother was Alice Blair.'
p5405
aS'He grew up in High Point, North Carolina, attending William Penn High School (now Penn-Griffin School for the Arts).'
p5406
aS"Beginning in December 1938 Coltrane's aunt, grandparents, and father all died within a few months of one another, leaving John to be raised by his mother and a close cousin."
p5407
aS'"I should paint my own places best", he wrote to his friend John Fisher in 1821, "painting is but another word for feeling".His most famous paintings include Wivenhoe Park of 1816,Dedham Vale of 1802 and The_Hay_Wain of 1821.'
p5408
aS'Although his paintings are now among the most popular and valuable in British art, Constable was never financially successful.'
p5409
aS'He did not become a member of the establishment until he was elected to the Royal Academy at the age of 52.'
p5410
aS'His work was embraced in France, where he sold more works than in his native England and inspired the Barbizon school. Early career John_Constable was born in East Bergholt, a village on the River Stour in Suffolk, to Golding and Ann (Watts) Constable.'
p5411
aS'His father was a wealthy corn merchant, owner of Flatford Mill in East Bergholt and, later, Dedham Mill in Essex.'
p5412
aS'Golding Constable owned a small ship, The Telegraph, which he moored at Mistley on the Stour estuary, and used to transport corn to London.'
p5413
aS'He was a cousin of the London tea merchant, Abram Newman.'
p5414
aS'A Review of General Psychology survey, published in 2002, ranked Dewey as the 93rd most cited psychologist of the 20th century, tied with Edwin Boring, Amos Tversky, and Wilhelm_Wundt.'
p5415
aS'A well-known public intellectual, he was also a major voice of progressive education and liberalism.'
p5416
aS"Although Dewey is known best for his publications about education, he also wrote about many other topics, including epistemology, metaphysics, aesthetics, art, logic, social theory, and ethics.The overriding theme of Dewey's works was his profound belief in democracy, be it in politics, education or communication and journalism."
p5417
aS'As Dewey himself stated in 1888, while still at the University of Michigan, "Democracy and the one, ultimate, ethical ideal of humanity are to my mind synonymous.'
p5418
aS'"Known for his advocacy of democracy, Dewey considered two fundamental elements--schools and civil society--to be major topics needing attention and reconstruction to encourage experimental intelligence and plurality.'
p5419
aS'Dewey asserted that complete democracy was to be obtained not just by extending voting rights but also by ensuring that there exists a fully formed public opinion, accomplished by communication among citizens, experts, and politicians, with the latter being accountable for the policies they adopt. Life and worksEdit Dewey was born in Burlington, Vermont, to a family of modest means.'
p5420
aS'Dewey was one of four boys born to Archibald Sprague Dewey and Lucina Artemisia Rich Dewey.'
p5421
aS'1 May] 1700) was an English poet, literary critic, translator, and playwright who was made Poet Laureate in 1668.He is seen as dominating the literary life of Restoration England to such a point that the period came to be known in literary circles as the Age of Dryden.'
p5422
aS'Walter_Scott called him "Glorious John.'
p5423
aS'" Early life Dryden was born in the village rectory of Aldwincle near Thrapston in Northamptonshire, where his maternal grandfather was Rector of All Saints.'
p5424
aS'He was the eldest of fourteen children born to Erasmus Dryden and wife Mary Pickering, paternal grandson of Sir Erasmus Dryden, 1st Baronet (1553-1632) and wife Frances Wilkes, Puritan landowning gentry who supported the Puritan cause and Parliament.'
p5425
aS'He was a second cousin once removed of Jonathan_Swift.'
p5426
aS'As a boy Dryden lived in the nearby village of Titchmarsh, Northamptonshire where it is likely that he received his first education.'
p5427
aS"In 1644 he was sent to Westminster School as a King's Scholar where his headmaster was Dr. Richard Busby, a charismatic teacher and severe disciplinarian."
p5428
aS'Millais became the most famous exponent of the style, his painting Christ in the House of His Parents (1850) generating considerable controversy.'
p5429
aS'By the late 1850s Millais was moving away from the Pre-Raphaelite style.'
p5430
aS'His later works were enormously successful, making Millais one of the wealthiest artists of his day.'
p5431
aS'However, they have typically been viewed by 20th-century critics as failures.'
p5432
aS"This view has changed in recent decades, as his later works have come to be seen in the context of wider changes in the art world.Millais' personal life has also played a significant role in his reputation."
p5433
aS"His wife Effie was formerly married to the critic John Ruskin, who had supported Millais' early work."
p5434
aS'The annulment of the marriage and her marriage to Millais have sometimes been linked to his change of style. Early life Millais was born in Southampton, England in 1829, of a prominent Jersey-based family.'
p5435
aS'He negotiated numerous treaties and alliances that reflected this point of view.'
p5436
aS'He advocated support of the French in their war against the Viet Minh in Indochina but rejected the Geneva Accords that France and the Communists agreed to, and instead supported South Vietnam after the Geneva Conference in 1954. Early life Born in Washington, D.C., he was one of five children and the eldest son born to Presbyterian minister Allen Macy Dulles and his wife, Edith (nee Foster).'
p5437
aS'His paternal grandfather, John Welsh Dulles, had been a Presbyterian missionary in India.'
p5438
aS'His maternal grandfather, John W. Foster doted on Dulles and his brother Allen, who would later become the director of the CIA.'
p5439
aS'The brothers attended public schools in Watertown, New York.Dulles attended Princeton University and graduated as a member of Phi Beta Kappa in 1908.'
p5440
aS'At Princeton, Dulles competed on the American Whig-Cliosophic Society debate team.'
p5441
aS'He then attended The George_Washington University Law School in Washington, D.C. Marriage and family relationships Both his grandfather Foster and his uncle Robert Lansing, the husband of Eleanor Foster, had held the position of Secretary of State.'
p5442
aS'He had a significant influence on a diverse range of poets and writers.'
p5443
aS'Jorge_Luis_Borges stated that his first encounter with Keats was the most significant literary experience of his life.The poetry of Keats is characterised by sensual imagery, most notably in the series of odes.'
p5444
aS'Today his poems and letters are some of the most popular and most analysed in English literature. Biography  Early life John_Keats was born in Moorgate, London, on 31 October 1795 to Thomas Keats and his wife, born Frances Jennings.'
p5445
aS'There is no clear evidence of his exact birthplace.'
p5446
aS'Although Keats and his family seem to have marked his birthday on 29 October, baptism records give the date as the 31st.'
p5447
aS'He was the eldest of four surviving children; his younger siblings were George (1797-1841), Thomas (1799-1818), and Frances Mary "Fanny" (1803-1889) who eventually married Spanish author Valentin Llanos Gutierrez.'
p5448
aS'Another son was lost in infancy.'
p5449
aS'As an economist, he leaned toward Post-Keynesian economics from an institutionalist perspective.Galbraith was a long-time Harvard faculty member and stayed with Harvard University for half a century as a professor of economics.'
p5450
aS'He was a prolific author and wrote four dozen books, including several novels, and published more than a thousand articles and essays on various subjects.'
p5451
aS'Among his most famous works was a popular trilogy on economics, American Capitalism (1952), The_Affluent_Society (1958), and The New Industrial State (1967).Galbraith was active in Democratic Party politics, serving in the administrations of Franklin D. Roosevelt, Harry S. Truman, John F. Kennedy, and Lyndon B. Johnson.'
p5452
aS'He served as United_States Ambassador to India under the Kennedy administration.'
p5453
aS'His prodigious literary output and outspokenness made him, arguably, "the best-known economist in the world" during his lifetime.'
p5454
aS'Galbraith was one of few recipients both of the Medal of Freedom (1946) and the Presidential Medal of Freedom (2000) for his public service and contribution to science.'
p5455
aS'The government of France made him a Commandeur de la Legion d\'honneur. Life  Early life Galbraith was born to Canadians of Scottish descent, Sarah Catherine Kendall and Archibald "Archie" Galbraith, in Iona Station, Ontario, Canada, and was raised in Dunwich Township, Ontario.'
p5456
aS'His ideas are the basis for the school of thought known as Keynesian economics and its various offshoots.In the 1930s, Keynes spearheaded a revolution in economic thinking, challenging the ideas of neoclassical economics that held that free markets would, in the short to medium term, automatically provide full employment, as long as workers were flexible in their wage demands.'
p5457
aS'He instead argued that aggregate demand determined the overall level of economic activity and that inadequate aggregate demand could lead to prolonged periods of high unemployment.'
p5458
aS'According to Keynesian economics, state intervention was necessary to moderate "boom and bust" cycles of economic activity.'
p5459
aS'Keynes advocated the use of fiscal and monetary policies to mitigate the adverse effects of economic recessions and depressions.'
p5460
aS"Following the outbreak of World_War_II, Keynes' ideas concerning economic policy were adopted by leading Western economies."
p5461
aS'In 1942, Keynes was awarded a hereditary peerage as Baron Keynes of Tilton in the County of Sussex.'
p5462
aS"Keynes died in 1946; but, during the 1950s and 1960s, the success of Keynesian economics resulted in almost all capitalist governments adopting its policy recommendations.Keynes's influence waned in the 1970s, partly as a result of problems with inflation that began to afflict the Anglo-American economies from the start of the decade and partly because of critiques from Milton Friedman and other economists who were pessimistic about the ability of governments to regulate the business cycle with fiscal policy."
p5463
aS"He is best known for his play The_Playboy_of_the_Western_World, which caused riots in Dublin during its opening run at the Abbey Theatre.Although he came from an Anglo-Irish background, Synge's writings are mainly concerned with the world of the Roman Catholic peasants of rural Ireland and with what he saw as the essential paganism of their world view.Synge suffered from Hodgkin's disease, a form of cancer that was untreatable at the time."
p5464
aS'He died weeks short of his 38th birthday as he was trying to complete his last play, Deirdre of the Sorrows. Biography  Early life Synge was born in Newtown Villas, Rathfarnham, County Dublin on 16 April 1871.'
p5465
aS'He was the youngest son in a family of eight children.'
p5466
aS'His parents were members of the Protestant upper middle class: his father, John Hatch Synge, who was a barrister, came from a family of landed gentry in Glanmore Castle, County Wicklow.'
p5467
aS"Synge's grandfather, also named John Hatch Synge, was an admirer of the educator Johann Heinrich Pestalozzi and founded an experimental school on the family estate."
p5468
aS"Synge's mother had a private income from lands in County Galway, although her father, Robert Traill, had been a Church of Ireland rector in Schull, County Cork, and a member of the Schull Relief Committee during the Great Irish Famine (1845-1849).Synge's father contracted smallpox and died in 1872 at the age of 49."
p5469
aS"Synge's mother moved the family to the house next door to her mother's house in Rathgar, County Dublin."
p5470
aS'He was a member of the Federalist, Democratic-Republican, National Republican, and later Anti-Masonic and Whig parties.In his biography, Samuel Flagg Bemis argues that Adams was able to: "gather together, formulate, and practice the fundamentals of American foreign-policy - self-determination, independence, noncolonization, nonintervention, nonentanglement in European politics, Freedom of the Seas, [and] freedom of commerce.'
p5471
aS'"Quincy Adams was the son of former President John_Adams and Abigail Adams.'
p5472
aS'As a diplomat, Adams played an important role in negotiating key treaties, most notably the Treaty of Ghent, which ended the War_of_1812.'
p5473
aS"As Secretary of State, he negotiated with Britain over the United_States' northern border with Canada, negotiated with Spain the annexation of Florida, and drafted the Monroe Doctrine."
p5474
aS'Historians agree he was one of the greatest diplomats and secretaries of state in American history.As president he sought to modernize the American economy and promote education.'
p5475
aS'Adams enacted a part of his agenda and paid off much of the national debt.'
p5476
aS'However he was stymied time and again by a Congress controlled by his enemies, and his lack of patronage networks helped politicians eager to undercut him.'
p5477
aS'Rawls received both the Schock Prize for Logic and Philosophy and the National Humanities Medal in 1999, the latter presented by President Bill Clinton, in recognition of how Rawls\'s work "helped a whole generation of learned Americans revive their faith in democracy itself.'
p5478
aS'"His magnum opus, A Theory of Justice (1971), was said at the time of its publication to be "the most important work in moral philosophy since the end of World_War_II" and is now regarded as "one of the primary texts in political philosophy".'
p5479
aS'His work in political philosophy, dubbed Rawlsianism, takes as its starting point the argument that "the most reasonable principles of justice are those everyone would accept and agree to from a fair position".'
p5480
aS'Rawls attempts to determine the principles of social justice by employing a number of thought experiments such as the famous original position in which everyone is impartially situated as equals behind a veil of ignorance.'
p5481
aS'He is one of the major thinkers in the tradition of liberal political philosophy.'
p5482
aS'According to English philosopher Jonathan Wolff, while there could be a "dispute about the second most important [American analytic] political philosopher of the 20th century, there could be no dispute about the most important: John_Rawls". Biography  Early life John_Rawls was born in Baltimore, Maryland to William Lee Rawls, "one of the most prominent attorneys in Baltimore", and Anna Abell Stump Rawls.'
p5483
aS'The second of five sons, tragedy struck Rawls at a young age.Two of his brothers died in childhood because they had contracted fatal illnesses from him....'
p5484
aS'His oeuvre documents worldwide travel, from Venice to the Tyrol, Corfu, the Middle East, Montana, Maine, and Florida.His parents were American, but he was trained in Paris prior to moving to London.'
p5485
aS'Sargent enjoyed international acclaim as a portrait painter, although not without controversy and some critical reservation; an early submission to the Paris Salon, his "Portrait_of_Madame_X", was intended to consolidate his position as a society painter, but it resulted in scandal instead.'
p5486
aS'From the beginning his work was characterized by remarkable technical facility, particularly in his ability to draw with a brush, which in later years inspired admiration as well as criticism for a supposed superficiality.'
p5487
aS'His commissioned works were consistent with the grand manner of portraiture, while his informal studies and landscape paintings displayed a familiarity with Impressionism.'
p5488
aS'In later life Sargent expressed ambivalence about the restrictions of formal portrait work, and devoted much of his energy to mural painting and working en plein air.'
p5489
aS"He lived most of his life in Europe. Early life Before Sargent's birth, his father, FitzWilliam (b."
p5490
aS'1820 Gloucester, Massachusetts), was an eye surgeon at the Wills Eye Hospital in Philadelphia 1844-1854.'
p5491
aS"The Pulitzer Prize-winning The Grapes of Wrath (1939), widely attributed to be part of the American literary canon, is considered Steinbeck's masterpiece."
p5492
aS'In the first 75 years since it was published, it sold 14 million copies.The winner of the 1962 Nobel Prize in Literature, he has been called "a giant of American letters".'
p5493
aS"His works are widely read abroad and many of his works are considered classics of Western literature.Most of Steinbeck's work is set in southern and central California, particularly in the Salinas Valley and the California Coast Ranges region."
p5494
aS'His works frequently explored the themes of fate and injustice, especially as applied to downtrodden or everyman protagonists. Early life John Jr. was born on February 27, 1902, in Salinas, California.'
p5495
aS'He was of German, English, and Irish descent.'
p5496
aS"Johann Adolf Grosssteinbeck, Steinbeck's paternal grandfather, had shortened the family name to Steinbeck when he emigrated to the United_States."
p5497
aS'The family farm in Heiligenhaus, Mettmann, North Rhine-Westphalia, Germany, is still today named "Grosssteinbeck.'
p5498
aS'He has been called "the most influential English-speaking philosopher of the nineteenth century".'
p5499
aS"Mill's conception of liberty justified the freedom of the individual in opposition to unlimited state control.Mill expresses his view on freedom by illustrating how an individual's drive to better their station, and for self-improvement, is the sole source of true freedom."
p5500
aS'Only when an individual is able to attain such improvements, without impeding others in their own efforts to do the same, can true freedom prevail.'
p5501
aS"Mill's linking of freedom and self-improvement, has inspired many."
p5502
aS'By establishing that individual efforts to excel have worth, Mill was able to show how they should achieve self-improvement without harming others, or society at large.He was a proponent of utilitarianism, an ethical theory developed by Jeremy_Bentham.'
p5503
aS'He worked on the theory of the scientific method.'
p5504
aS'Mill was also a Member of Parliament and an important figure in liberal political philosophy. Biography John_Stuart_Mill was born on Rodney Street in the Pentonville area of London, the eldest son of the Scottish philosopher, historian and economist James Mill, and Harriet Burrow.'
p5505
aS"Tyler was known as a supporter of states' rights, which endeared him to his fellow Virginians, yet his acts as president showed that he was willing to support nationalist policies as long as they did not infringe on the rights of the states."
p5506
aS'Still, the circumstances of his unexpected rise to the presidency and his possible threat to the ambitions of other potential presidential candidates left him estranged from both major parties in Washington.'
p5507
aS'A firm believer in manifest destiny, President Tyler sought to strengthen and preserve the Union through territorial expansion, most notably the annexation of the independent Republic of Texas in his last days in office.Tyler, born to an aristocratic Virginia family, came to national prominence at a time of political upheaval.'
p5508
aS"In the 1820s the nation's only political party, the Democratic-Republicans, split into factions."
p5509
aS'Though initially a Democrat, his opposition to Andrew_Jackson and Martin Van Buren led him to ally with the Whig Party.'
p5510
aS'Tyler served as a Virginia state legislator, governor, U.S. representative, and U.S. senator before his election as vice president in the presidential election of 1840.'
p5511
aS"He was put on the ticket to attract states' rights Southerners to what was then a Whig coalition to defeat Van Buren's re-election bid.Harrison's death made Tyler the first vice president to succeed to the presidency without being elected to the office."
p5512
aS'Updike is one of only three authors (the others were Booth Tarkington and William_Faulkner) to win the Pulitzer Prize for Fiction more than once.'
p5513
aS"He published more than twenty novels and more than a dozen short story collections, as well as poetry, art criticism, literary criticism and children's books."
p5514
aS'Hundreds of his stories, reviews, and poems appeared in The New Yorker starting in 1954.'
p5515
aS'He also wrote regularly for The New York Review of Books.Describing his subject as "the American small town, Protestant middle class," Updike was well recognized for his careful craftsmanship, his unique prose style, and his prolificity.'
p5516
aS'He wrote on average a book a year.'
p5517
aS'Updike populated his fiction with characters who "frequently experience personal turmoil and must respond to crises relating to religion, family obligations, and marital infidelity."'
p5518
aS'His fiction is distinguished by its attention to the concerns, passions, and suffering of average Americans; its emphasis on Christian theology; and its preoccupation with sexuality and sensual detail.'
p5519
aS"He was a pioneer of the application of operator theory to quantum mechanics, in the development of functional analysis, a principal member of the Manhattan Project and the Institute for Advanced Study in Princeton (as one of the few originally appointed), and a key figure in the development of game theory and the concepts of cellular automata, the universal constructor, and the digital computer.Von Neumann's mathematical analysis of the structure of self-replication preceded the discovery of the structure of DNA."
p5520
aS'In a short list of facts about his life he submitted to the National Academy of Sciences, he stated "The part of my work I consider most essential is that on quantum mechanics, which developed in Gottingen in 1926, and subsequently in Berlin in 1927-1929.'
p5521
aS'Also, my work on various forms of operator theory, Berlin 1930 and Princeton 1935-1939; on the ergodic theorem, Princeton, 1931-1932."'
p5522
aS'Along with theoretical physicist Edward Teller and mathematician Stanislaw Ulam, von Neumann worked out key steps in the nuclear physics involved in thermonuclear reactions and the hydrogen bomb.Von Neumann wrote 150 published papers in his life; 60 in pure mathematics, 20 in physics, and 60 in applied mathematics.'
p5523
aS"His last work, an unfinished manuscript written while in the hospital and later published in book form as The Computer and the Brain, gives an indication of the direction of his interests at the time of his death. Early life and education Von Neumann was born Neumann Janos Lajos (Hungarian pronunciation: ['nojman 'ja:noS 'lajoS]; in Hungarian the family name comes first) Hebrew name Yonah, in Budapest, Austro-Hungarian Empire, to wealthy Jewish parents of the Haskalah."
p5524
aS'He was the eldest of three brothers.'
p5525
aS'His father, Neumann Miksa (Max Neumann) was a banker, who held a doctorate in law.'
p5526
aS"The baronial revolt at the end of John's reign led to the sealing of the Magna_Carta, a document sometimes considered to be an early step in the evolution of the constitution of the United Kingdom.John, the youngest of five sons of King Henry_II_of_England and Eleanor of Aquitaine, was at first not expected to inherit significant lands."
p5527
aS"Following the failed rebellion of his elder brothers between 1173 and 1174, however, John became Henry's favourite child."
p5528
aS'He was appointed the Lord of Ireland in 1177 and given lands in England and on the continent.'
p5529
aS"John's elder brothers William, Henry and Geoffrey died young; by the time Richard I became king in 1189, John was a potential heir to the throne."
p5530
aS"John unsuccessfully attempted a rebellion against Richard's royal administrators whilst his brother was participating in the Third Crusade."
p5531
aS"Despite this, after Richard died in 1199, John was proclaimed King of England, and came to an agreement with Philip II of France to recognise John's possession of the continental Angevin lands at the peace treaty of Le Goulet in 1200.When war with France broke out again in 1202, John achieved early victories, but shortages of military resources and his treatment of Norman, Breton and Anjou nobles resulted in the collapse of his empire in northern France in 1204."
p5532
aS'John spent much of the next decade attempting to regain these lands, raising huge revenues, reforming his armed forces and rebuilding continental alliances.'
p5533
aS"The biblical story of Jonah is repeated, with a few notable differences, in the Qur'an. Story of Jonah Jonah is identified as the son of Amittai, and he appears in 2 Kings aka 4 Kings as a prophet from Gath-Hepher, a few miles north of Nazareth."
p5534
aS'He is therein described as being active during the reign of the second King Jeroboam (c.786-746 BC), and as predicting that Jeroboam will recover certain lost territories.Jonah is the central character in the Book of Jonah.'
p5535
aS'Commanded by God to go to the city of Nineveh to prophesy against it "for their great wickedness is come up before me," Jonah instead seeks to flee from "the presence of the Lord" by going to Jaffa, identified as Joppa or Joppe, and sailing to Tarshish, which, geographically, is in the opposite direction.'
p5536
aS'A huge storm arises and the sailors, realizing that it is no ordinary storm, cast lots and discover that Jonah is to blame.'
p5537
aS'Jonah admits this and states that if he is thrown overboard, the storm will cease.'
p5538
aS'The sailors try to dump as much cargo as possible before giving up, but feel forced to throw him overboard, at which point the sea calms.'
p5539
aS'The sailors then offer sacrifices to God.'
p5540
aS'He originally published all of his works under pseudonyms - such as Lemuel Gulliver, Isaac Bickerstaff, MB Drapier - or anonymously.'
p5541
aS'He is also known for being a master of two styles of satire, the Horatian and Juvenalian styles. Biography  Youth Jonathan_Swift was born in Dublin, Ireland.'
p5542
aS'He was the second child and only son of Jonathan_Swift (1640-1667) and his wife Abigail Erick (or Herrick), of Frisby on the Wreake.'
p5543
aS"His father, a native of Goodrich, Herefordshire, accompanied his brothers to Ireland to seek their fortunes in law after their Royalist father's estate was brought to ruin during the English Civil War."
p5544
aS"Swift's father died in Dublin about seven months before he was born, and his mother returned to England."
p5545
aS"He was left in the care of his influential uncle, Godwin, a close friend and confidant of Sir John Temple, whose son later employed Swift as his secretary.Swift's family had several interesting literary connections: his grandmother, Elizabeth (Dryden) Swift, was the niece of Sir Erasmus Dryden, grandfather of the poet John_Dryden."
p5546
aS"The same grandmother's aunt, Katherine (Throckmorton) Dryden, was a first cousin of Elizabeth, wife of Sir Walter Raleigh."
p5547
aS'His work reflects the image of a mestizo Brazil and is marked by religious syncretism.'
p5548
aS'He depicted a cheerful and optimistic country that was beset, at the same time, with deep social and economic differences.He occupied the 23rd chair of the Brazilian Academy of Letters from 1961 until his death in 2001. Biography Amado was born in a fazenda ("farm") in the inland of the city of Itabuna, in the southern part of the Brazilian state of Bahia, son of Joao Amado de Faria and D. Eulalia Leal.'
p5549
aS'The farm Amado was born in was precisely located on the village of Ferradas, which though today is a district of Itabuna, at the time was administered by the town of Ilheus.'
p5550
aS'That is why he considered himself a citizen of Ilheus.'
p5551
aS'In the large cocoa plantation, Amado knew the misery and the struggles of the people working the earth, living in almost slave conditions, which were to be a theme always present in his later works (for example, the notable The Violent Land of 1944).When he was only one year old, his family moved to Ilheus, a coastal city, where he spent his childhood.'
p5552
aS'He attended high school in Salvador, the capital of the state.'
p5553
aS'During that period Amado began to collaborate with several magazines and took part in literary life, as one of the founders of the Modernist "Rebels\' Academy".Amado published his first novel, The Country of Carnival, in 1931, at age 18.'
p5554
aS"His best-known books, Ficciones (Fictions) and El Aleph (The Aleph), published in the 1940s, are compilations of short stories interconnected by common themes, including dreams, labyrinths, libraries, mirrors, fictional writers, philosophy, and religion.Borges's works have contributed to philosophical literature and also to the fantasy genre."
p5555
aS"Critic Angel Flores, the first to use the term magical realism to define a genre that reacted against the dominant realism and naturalism of the 19th century, considers the beginning of the movement to be the release of Borges's A Universal History of Infamy (Historia universal de la infamia)."
p5556
aS'However, some critics would consider Borges to be a predecessor and not actually a magical realist.'
p5557
aS'His late poems dialogue with such cultural figures as Spinoza, Camoes, and Virgil.In 1914 his family moved to Switzerland, where he studied at the College de Geneve.'
p5558
aS'The family travelled widely in Europe, including stays in Spain.'
p5559
aS'On his return to Argentina in 1921, Borges began publishing his poems and essays in surrealist literary journals.'
p5560
aS'He also worked as a librarian and public lecturer.'
p5561
aS'Mostly influenced by Symbolism, he was also a genre painter and lithographer.'
p5562
aS'Between 1922 and 1948, Orozco painted murals in Mexico City, Orizaba, Claremont, California, New_York_City, Hanover, New Hampshire, Guadalajara, Jalisco, and Jiquilpan, Michoacan.'
p5563
aS'His drawings and paintings are exhibited by the Carrillo Gil Museum in Mexico City, and the Orozco Workshop-Museum in Guadalajara.'
p5564
aS'Orozco was known for being a politically committed artist.'
p5565
aS'He promoted the political causes of peasants and workers. Life Jose_Clemente_Orozco was born in 1883 in Zapotlan el Grande (now Ciudad Guzman), Jalisco to Rosa de Flores Orozco.'
p5566
aS'He married Margarita Valladares, and had three children.'
p5567
aS'At the age of 21, Orozco lost his left hand while working with gunpowder to make fireworks.Jose Guadalupe Posada, a satirical illustrator whose engravings about Mexican culture and politics challenged Mexicans to think differently about post-revolutionary Mexico, worked in full view of the public in shop windows located on the way Orozco went to school.'
p5568
aS'Through his writings and political activity, he became a symbol for Cuba\'s bid for independence against Spain in the 19th century, and is referred to as the "Apostle of Cuban Independence."'
p5569
aS'He also wrote about the threat of Spanish and US expansionism into Cuba.'
p5570
aS'From adolescence, he dedicated his life to the promotion of liberty, political independence for Cuba, and intellectual independence for all Spanish Americans; his death was used as a cry for Cuban independence from Spain by both the Cuban revolutionaries and those Cubans previously reluctant to start a revolt.Born in Havana, Marti began his political activism at an early age.'
p5571
aS'He would travel extensively in Spain, Latin America, and the United_States, raising awareness and support for the cause of Cuban independence.'
p5572
aS'His unification of the Cuban emigre community, particularly in Florida, was crucial to the success of the Cuban War of Independence against Spain.'
p5573
aS'He was a key figure in the planning and execution of this war, as well as the designer of the Cuban Revolutionary Party and its ideology.'
p5574
aS'He died in military action during the Battle of Dos Rios on May 19, 1895.Marti is considered one of the great turn-of-the-century Latin American intellectuals.'
p5575
aS'Though he did not speak English fluently until he was in his twenties (and always with a marked accent), he was a master prose stylist who brought a distinctly non-English sensibility into English literature.'
p5576
aS'He wrote stories and novels, many with a nautical setting, that depict trials of the human spirit.Joseph_Conrad is considered an early modernist, though his works still contain elements of nineteenth-century realism.'
p5577
aS'His narrative style and anti-heroic characters have influenced many authors, including T.S.'
p5578
aS'Eliot, William_Faulkner, Graham_Greene, and more recently Salman Rushdie.'
p5579
aS"Many films have been adapted from, or inspired by, Conrad's works.Writing in the heyday of the British Empire, Conrad drew on his Polish heritage and on his experiences in the French and British merchant navies to create short stories and novels that reflect aspects of a European-dominated world, while profoundly exploring human psychology."
p5580
aS'Appreciated early on by literary critics, his fiction and nonfiction have since been seen as almost prophetic, in the light of subsequent national and international disasters of the 20th and 21st centuries. Life  Early years Joseph_Conrad was born on 3 December 1857 in Berdychiv, in a part of Ukraine that had belonged to the Kingdom of Poland before 1793 and was at the time of his birth under Russian rule.'
p5581
aS'He was the only child of Apollo Korzeniowski and his wife Ewa Bobrowska.'
p5582
aS'Until the later part of his life, this isolated him from other composers and trends in music so that he was, as he put it, "forced to become original".'
p5583
aS'At the time of his death, aged 77, he was one of the most celebrated composers in Europe.Joseph_Haydn was the brother of Michael Haydn - himself a highly regarded composer - and Johann Evangelist Haydn, a tenor.'
p5584
aS'He was also a friend of Mozart and a teacher of Beethoven. Biography  Early life Joseph_Haydn was born in Rohrau, Austria, a village that at that time stood on the border with Hungary.'
p5585
aS'His father was Mathias Haydn, a wheelwright who also served as "Marktrichter", an office akin to village mayor.'
p5586
aS"Haydn's mother Maria, nee Koller, had previously worked as a cook in the palace of Count Harrach, the presiding aristocrat of Rohrau."
p5587
aS'Neither parent could read music; however, Mathias was an enthusiastic folk musician, who during the journeyman period of his career had taught himself to play the harp.'
p5588
aS"According to Haydn's later reminiscences, his childhood family was extremely musical, and frequently sang together and with their neighbors.Haydn's parents had noticed that their son was musically gifted and knew that in Rohrau he would have no chance to obtain serious musical training."
p5589
aS'He was thus the first ruler in the Austrian dominions of the House of Lorraine, styled Habsburg-Lorraine (von Habsburg-Lothringen in German).'
p5590
aS'Joseph was a proponent of enlightened absolutism; however, his commitment to modernizing reforms subsequently engendered significant opposition, which eventually culminated in an ultimate failure to fully implement his programmes.'
p5591
aS'He has been ranked, with Catherine II of Russia and Frederick II of Prussia, as one of the three great Enlightenment monarchs.'
p5592
aS'His policies are now known as Josephinism.'
p5593
aS'He died with no sons and was succeeded by his younger brother, Leopold. Early life Joseph was born in the midst of the early upheavals of the War_of_the_Austrian_Succession.'
p5594
aS'His real education was given to him through the writings of Voltaire and the Encyclopedistes, and by the example of King Frederick II of Prussia.'
p5595
aS'His useful training was conferred by government officials, who were directed to instruct him in the mechanical details of the administration of the numerous states composing the Austrian dominions and the Holy Roman Empire. Marriages and children He married Princess Isabella of Parma in October 1760, a union fashioned to bolster the 1756 defensive pact between France and Austria.'
p5596
aS'Beginning in 1950, McCarthy became the most visible public face of a period in which Cold War tensions fueled fears of widespread Communist subversion.'
p5597
aS'He was noted for making claims that there were large numbers of Communists and Soviet spies and sympathizers inside the United_States federal government and elsewhere.'
p5598
aS"Ultimately, his tactics and inability to substantiate his claims led him to be censured by the United_States Senate.The term McCarthyism, coined in 1950 in reference to McCarthy's practices, was soon applied to similar anti-communist activities."
p5599
aS'Today the term is used more generally in reference to demagogic, reckless, and unsubstantiated accusations, as well as public attacks on the character or patriotism of political opponents.McCarthy was born in 1908 in Grand Chute Township Wisconsin, and attended Marquette University, eventually earning an ll.b.'
p5600
aS'degree from Marquette University Law School.'
p5601
aS'At age 33, McCarthy volunteered for the United_States Marine Corps and served during World_War_II.'
p5602
aS'He successfully ran for the United_States Senate in 1946, defeating Robert M. La Follette Jr. After three largely undistinguished years in the Senate, McCarthy rose suddenly to national fame in February 1950 when he asserted in a speech that he had a list of "members of the Communist Party and members of a spy ring" who were employed in the State Department.In succeeding years after his 1950 speech, McCarthy made additional accusations of Communist infiltration into the State Department, the administration of President Harry S. Truman, the Voice of America, and the United_States Army.'
p5603
aS'The weak link can consist of a thin insulating barrier (known as a superconductor-insulator-superconductor junction, or S-I-S), a short section of non-superconducting metal (S-N-S), or a physical constriction that weakens the superconductivity at the point of contact (S-s-S).The Josephson_effect is an example of a macroscopic quantum phenomenon.'
p5604
aS'It is named after the British physicist Brian David Josephson, who predicted in 1962 the mathematical relationships for the current and voltage across the weak link.'
p5605
aS'The DC Josephson_effect had been seen in experiments prior to 1962, but had been attributed to "super-shorts" or breaches in the insulating barrier leading to the direct conduction of electrons between the superconductors.'
p5606
aS"The first paper to claim the discovery of Josephson's effect, and to make the requisite experimental checks, was that of Philip Anderson and John Rowell."
p5607
aS"These authors were awarded patents on the effects that were never enforced, but never challenged.Before Josephson's prediction, it was only known that normal (i.e."
p5608
aS'non-superconducting) electrons can flow through an insulating barrier, by means of quantum tunneling.'
p5609
aS'Josephson was the first to predict the tunneling of superconducting Cooper_pairs.'
p5610
aS'He received the B.A.'
p5611
aS'from the University of California, Berkeley (which moved from Oakland to Berkeley during his matriculation) in 1875 where he later accepted an instructorship teaching English composition, literature, and rhetoric.'
p5612
aS'After some time in Germany, where he studied with Hermann Lotze, the new Johns Hopkins University awarded him in 1878 one of its first four doctorates, in philosophy.'
p5613
aS'At Johns Hopkins he taught a course on the history of German thought, which was "one of his chief interests" because he was able to give consideration to the philosophy of history.'
p5614
aS"After four years at the University of California, Berkeley, he went to Harvard in 1882 as a sabbatical replacement for William James, who was at once Royce's friend and philosophical antagonist."
p5615
aS"Royce's position at Harvard was made permanent in 1884 and he remained there until his death, on September 14, 1916. Historiography Royce stands out starkly in the philosophical crowd because he was the only major American philosopher who spent a significant period of his life studying and writing history, specifically of the American West."
p5616
aS'"As one of the four giants in American philosophy of his time [...] Royce overshadowed himself as historian, in both reputation and output" (Pomeroy, 2).'
p5617
aS'Together with James_Clerk_Maxwell and Ludwig Boltzmann, he created statistical mechanics (a term that he coined), explaining the laws of thermodynamics as consequences of the statistical properties of large ensembles of particles.'
p5618
aS"Gibbs also worked on the application of Maxwell's equations to problems in physical optics."
p5619
aS'As a mathematician, he invented modern vector calculus (independently of the British scientist Oliver Heaviside, who carried out similar work during the same period).In 1863, Yale awarded Gibbs the first American doctorate in engineering.'
p5620
aS'After a three-year sojourn in Europe, Gibbs spent the rest of his career at Yale, where he was professor of mathematical physics from 1871 until his death.'
p5621
aS'Working in relative isolation, he became the earliest theoretical scientist in the United_States to earn an international reputation and was praised by Albert Einstein as "the greatest mind in American history".'
p5622
aS'In 1901 Gibbs received what was then considered the highest honor awarded by the international scientific community, the Copley Medal of the Royal Society of London, "for his contributions to mathematical physics".Commentators and biographers have remarked on the contrast between Gibbs\'s quiet, solitary life in turn of the century New England and the great international impact of his ideas.'
p5623
aS"Though his work was almost entirely theoretical, the practical value of Gibbs's contributions became evident with the development of industrial chemistry during the first half of the 20th century."
p5624
aS'While his presidency has been criticized as authoritarian, Tito was "seen by most as a benevolent dictator" due to his economic and diplomatic policies.'
p5625
aS'He was a popular public figure both in Yugoslavia and abroad.'
p5626
aS'Viewed as a unifying symbol, his internal policies maintained the peaceful coexistence of the nations of the Yugoslav federation.'
p5627
aS'He gained further international attention as the chief leader of the Non-Aligned Movement, working with Jawaharlal_Nehru of India, Gamal_Abdel_Nasser of Egypt and Sukarno of Indonesia.'
p5628
aS'Orson_Welles once called him "the greatest man in the world today.'
p5629
aS'"He was General Secretary (later Chairman of the Presidium) of the League of Communists of Yugoslavia (1939-80), and went on to lead the World_War_II Yugoslav guerrilla movement, the Partisans (1941-45).'
p5630
aS'After the war, he was the Prime Minister (1944-63), President (later President for Life) (1953-80) of the Socialist Federal Republic of Yugoslavia (SFRY).'
p5631
aS"His reputation is markedly different in Anglophone regions, where he has often been labeled a writer of genre fiction or children's books, not least because of the highly abridged and altered translations in which his novels are often reprinted.Verne has been the second most-translated author in the world since 1979, ranking between the English-language writers Agatha Christie and William_Shakespeare; he probably was the most-translated during the 1960s and 1970s."
p5632
aS'He has been called "The Father of Science Fiction", a title also often given to H. G. Wells and Hugo Gernsback. Life  Early life Jules Gabriel Verne was born on 8 February 1828 on Ile Feydeau, a small artificial island on the Loire River within the town of Nantes, in No.'
p5633
aS'4 Rue de Clisson, the house of his maternal grandmother Dame Sophie Allotte de la Fuye.'
p5634
aS'His parents were Pierre Verne, an attorney originally from Provins, and Sophie Allote de la Fuye, a Nantes woman from a local family of navigators and shipowners, of distant Scottish descent.'
p5635
aS'In 1829, the Verne family moved some hundred meters away to No.'
p5636
aS"2 Quai Jean-Bart, where Verne's brother Paul was born the same year."
p5637
aS'Three sisters, Anna, Mathilde, and Marie, would follow (in 1836, 1839, and 1842, respectively).In 1834, at the age of six, Verne was sent to boarding school at 5 Place du Bouffay in Nantes.'
p5638
aS'Most notable was his crushing victory over the Alamanni in 357 at the Battle of Argentoratum despite being outnumbered.'
p5639
aS'In 360 in Lutetia (Paris) he was proclaimed Augustus by his soldiers, sparking a civil war between Julian and Constantius.'
p5640
aS'Before the two could face each other in battle, however, Constantius died, after naming Julian as his rightful successor.'
p5641
aS'In 363, Julian embarked on an ambitious campaign against the Sassanid Empire.'
p5642
aS'Though initially successful, Julian was mortally wounded in battle and died shortly thereafter.Julian was a man of unusually complex character: he was "the military commander, the theosophist, the social reformer, and the man of letters".'
p5643
aS'He was the last non-Christian ruler of the Roman Empire, and it was his desire to bring the Empire back to its ancient Roman values in order to, as he saw it, save it from dissolution.'
p5644
aS'He purged the top-heavy state bureaucracy and attempted to revive traditional Roman religious practices at the cost of Christianity.'
p5645
aS'He has been called both a "modern master of the short story" and, by Carlos Fuentes, "the Simon_Bolivar of the novel.'
p5646
aS'" Early life Julio_Cortazar was born on August 26, 1914, in Ixelles, a borough of Brussels, Belgium.'
p5647
aS"According to biographer Miguel Herraez, his parents, Julio Jose Cortazar and Maria Herminia Descotte, were Argentine citizens, and his father was attached to the Argentine diplomatic service in Belgium.At the time of Cortazar's birth Belgium was occupied by the German troops of Kaiser Wilhelm II."
p5648
aS"After the irruption of German troops in Belgium, Cortazar and his family moved to Zurich where Maria Herminia's parents, Victoria Gabel and Louis Descotte (a French National), were waiting in neutral territory."
p5649
aS'The family group spent the next two years in Switzerland, first in Zurich, then in Geneva, before moving for a short period to Barcelona.'
p5650
aS"The Cortazars settled outside Buenos_Aires by the end of 1919.Cortazar's father deserted his wife when Julio was six, and the family had no further contact with him."
p5651
aS'Cortazar spent most of his childhood in Banfield, a suburb south of Buenos_Aires, with his mother and younger sister.'
p5652
aS'Nyerere received his higher education at Makerere University in Kampala and the University of Edinburgh.'
p5653
aS'After he returned to Tanganyika, he worked as a teacher.'
p5654
aS'In 1954, he helped form the Tanganyika African National Union.When Tanganyika was granted responsible government in 1960, Nyerere became Chief Minister.'
p5655
aS"He led Tanganyika to independence a year later and became the new country's first Prime Minister."
p5656
aS"The country became a republic in 1962, with Nyerere as the country's first president."
p5657
aS'During the first years, Nyerere created a single-party system and used "preventive detention" to eliminate trade unions and opposition.'
p5658
aS'In 1964, Tanganyika became politically united with Zanzibar and was renamed Tanzania, with Nyerere as president of the unified country.'
p5659
aS'The book was notably banned in South Africa after its publication. Plot The novel is set during a fictional civil war in which black South Africans have violently overturned the system of apartheid.'
p5660
aS'The story follows the Smales, a liberal White South African family who were forced to flee Johannesburg to the native village of their black servant, July.'
p5661
aS'Maureen tries working with the women in the fields, digging up leaves and roots.'
p5662
aS'Afterward, she goes to see July, who is working on the bakkie.When July says she should not work with the women, she asks if he fears she will tell his wife about Ellen.'
p5663
aS'He angrily asserts that she can only tell Martha that he has always been a good servant.'
p5664
aS'Maureen, frightened, realizes that the dignity she thought she had always conferred upon him was actually humiliating to him.'
p5665
aS"He informs her that he and the Smales have been summoned to the chief's village."
p5666
aS'The start of the period is marked by the major Triassic-Jurassic extinction event.'
p5667
aS'Two other extinction events occurred during the period: the Late Pliensbachian/Early Toarcian event in the Early Jurassic, and the Late Tithonian event at the end; however, neither event ranks among the "Big Five" mass extinctions.'
p5668
aS'The Jurassic is named after the Jura Mountains within the European Alps, where limestone strata from the period were first identified.'
p5669
aS'By the beginning of the Jurassic, the supercontinent Pangaea had begun rifting into two landmasses, Laurasia to the north and Gondwana to the south.'
p5670
aS'This created more coastlines and shifted the continental climate from dry to humid, and many of the arid deserts of the Triassic were replaced by lush rainforests.'
p5671
aS'On land, the fauna transitioned from the Triassic fauna, dominated by both dinosauromorph and crocodylomorph archosaurs, to one dominated by dinosaurs alone.'
p5672
aS'The first birds also appeared during the Jurassic, having evolved from a branch of theropod dinosaurs.'
p5673
aS"Global polls consistently find that Habermas is widely recognized as one of the world's leading intellectuals.Associated with the Frankfurt School, Habermas's work focuses on the foundations of social theory and epistemology, the analysis of advanced capitalistic societies and democracy, the rule of law in a critical social-evolutionary context, and contemporary politics, particularly German politics."
p5674
aS"Habermas's theoretical system is devoted to revealing the possibility of reason, emancipation, and rational-critical communication latent in modern institutions and in the human capacity to deliberate and pursue rational interests."
p5675
aS'Habermas is known for his work on the concept of modernity, particularly with respect to the discussions of rationalization originally set forth by Max_Weber.'
p5676
aS'He has been influenced by American pragmatism, action theory, and even poststructuralism.Jurgen_Habermas is also the father of Rebekka Habermas, historian of German social and cultural history and professor of modern history in Gottingen. Biography Habermas was born in Dusseldorf, Rhine Province, in 1929, to a middle class and rather traditional family.'
p5677
aS'A cleft palate made it difficult for him to speak clearly and form social relationships, as he was often met with rejection.'
p5678
aS'He received corrective surgery twice during childhood.'
p5679
aS'Habermas argues that his speech disability made him think differently about the importance of communication and prefer writing over the spoken word as a medium.As a young teenager, he was profoundly affected by World_War_II.'
p5680
aS"One of the most important figures of late antiquity and possibly the last Roman emperor to speak Latin as a first language, Justinian's rule constitutes a distinct epoch in the history of the Later Roman empire."
p5681
aS'The impact of his administration extended far beyond the boundaries of his time and domain.'
p5682
aS'Justinian\'s reign is marked by the ambitious but only partly realized renovatio imperii, or "restoration of the Empire".Because of his restoration activities, Justinian has sometimes been called the "last Roman" in modern historiography.'
p5683
aS'This ambition was expressed by the partial recovery of the territories of the defunct western Roman empire.'
p5684
aS'His general, Belisarius, swiftly conquered the Vandal kingdom in North Africa, re-extending Roman control to the Atlantic Ocean.'
p5685
aS'Subsequently Belisarius, Narses, and other generals conquered the Ostrogothic kingdom, restoring Dalmatia, Sicily, Italy, and Rome to the empire after more than half a century of rule by the Ostrogoths.'
p5686
aS'The prefect Liberius reclaimed most of southern Iberia, establishing the province of Spania.'
p5687
aS'The first three were members of the Minamoto clan.'
p5688
aS'The next two were members of the Fujiwara clan.'
p5689
aS'The last six were minor Imperial princes.These years are known as the Kamakura period.'
p5690
aS'The period takes its name from the city where the Minamoto shoguns lived.After 1203, the Hojo clan held the office of Shikken.'
p5691
aS'In effect, the shikken governed in the name of the shoguns. History  Establishment Before the establishment of the Kamakura_shogunate, civil power in Japan was primarily held by the ruling emperors and their regents, typically appointed from the ranks of the imperial court and the aristocratic clans that vied there.'
p5692
aS'Military affairs were handled under the auspices of the civil government.'
p5693
aS'However, after defeating the Taira clan in the Genpei War, Minamoto no Yoritomo seized certain powers from the aristocracy.'
p5694
aS'The tribe\'s name (natively kka:ze) is often said to mean "people of the wind" or "people of the south wind," although this was probably not the term\'s original meaning.'
p5695
aS'Residents of Kansas are called "Kansans".'
p5696
aS'For thousands of years, what is now Kansas was home to numerous and diverse Native American tribes.'
p5697
aS'Tribes in the Eastern part of the state generally lived in villages along the river valleys.'
p5698
aS'Tribes in the Western part of the state were semi-nomadic and hunted large herds of bison.'
p5699
aS'Kansas was first settled by European Americans in the 1830s, but the pace of settlement accelerated in the 1850s, in the midst of political wars over the slavery issue.When it was officially opened to settlement by the U.S. government in 1854, abolitionist Free-Staters from New England and pro-slavery settlers from neighboring Missouri rushed to the territory to determine whether Kansas would become a free state or a slave state.'
p5700
aS'Thus, the area was a hotbed of violence and chaos in its early days as these forces collided, and was known as Bleeding Kansas.'
p5701
aS'He was often viewed as a major exponent of existentialism in Germany, though he did not accept this label. Biography Jaspers was born in Oldenburg in 1883 to a mother from a local farming community, and a jurist father.'
p5702
aS"He showed an early interest in philosophy, but his father's experience with the legal system undoubtedly influenced his decision to study law at Heidelberg University."
p5703
aS'It soon became clear that Jaspers did not particularly enjoy law, and he switched to studying medicine in 1902 with a thesis about criminology.'
p5704
aS'In 1910 he married Gertrud Mayer (1879-1974), the sister of his close friends Gustav and Ernst Mayer.Jaspers graduated from Heidelberg University medical school in 1908 and began work at a psychiatric hospital in Heidelberg under Franz Nissl, successor of Emil Kraepelin and Karl Bonhoeffer, and Karl Wilmans.'
p5705
aS'Jaspers became dissatisfied with the way the medical community of the time approached the study of mental illness and set himself the task of improving the psychiatric approach.'
p5706
aS'In 1913 Jaspers habilitated at the philosophical faculty of the Heidelberg University and gained there in 1914 a post as a psychology teacher.'
p5707
aS'The post later became a permanent philosophical one, and Jaspers never returned to clinical practice.'
p5708
aS"Marx's work in economics laid the basis for much of the current understanding of labour and its relation to capital, and subsequent economic thought."
p5709
aS'He published numerous books during his lifetime, the most notable being The_Communist_Manifesto (1848) and Das_Kapital (1867-1894).Born into a wealthy middle-class family in Trier in the Prussian Rhineland, Marx studied at the universities of Bonn and Berlin where he became interested in the philosophical ideas of the Young Hegelians.'
p5710
aS'After his studies he wrote for Rheinische Zeitung, a radical newspaper in Cologne, and began to work out the theory of the materialist conception of history.'
p5711
aS'He moved to Paris in 1843, where he began writing for other radical newspapers and met Friedrich Engels, who would become his lifelong friend and collaborator.'
p5712
aS'In 1849 he was exiled and moved to London together with his wife and children, where he continued writing and formulating his theories about social and economic activity.'
p5713
aS"He also campaigned for socialism and became a significant figure in the International Workingmen's Association.Marx's theories about society, economics and politics--the collective understanding of which is known as Marxism--hold that human societies progress through class struggle: a conflict between an ownership class that controls production and a dispossessed labouring class that provides the labour for production."
p5714
aS'States, Marx believed, were run on behalf of the ruling class and in their interest while representing it as the common interest of all; and he predicted that, like previous socioeconomic systems, capitalism produced internal tensions which would lead to its self-destruction and replacement by a new system: socialism.'
p5715
aS'If the outcome of an experiment contradicts the theory, one should refrain from ad hoc manoeuvres that evade the contradiction merely by making it less falsifiable.'
p5716
aS'Popper is also known for his opposition to the classical justificationist account of knowledge which he replaced with critical rationalism, "the first non-justificational philosophy of criticism in the history of philosophy.'
p5717
aS'"In political discourse, he is known for his vigorous defence of liberal democracy and the principles of social criticism that he came to believe made a flourishing "open society" possible.'
p5718
aS'His political philosophy embraces ideas from all major democratic political ideologies and attempts to reconcile them: social democracy, classical liberalism and conservatism, more explicitly so in his later years. Personal life  Family and training Karl_Popper was born in Vienna (then in Austria-Hungary) in 1902, to upper middle-class parents.'
p5719
aS"All of Karl_Popper's grandparents were Jewish, but the Popper family converted to Lutheranism before Karl was born, and so he received Lutheran baptism."
p5720
aS'They understood this as part of their cultural assimilation, not as an expression of devout belief.'
p5721
aS"Karl's father Simon Siegmund Carl Popper was a lawyer from Bohemia and a doctor of law at the Vienna University, and mother Jenny Schiff was of Silesian and Hungarian descent."
p5722
aS'Her major works were two short story collections, Bayou Folk (1894) and A Night in Acadie (1897).'
p5723
aS'Her important short stories included "Desiree\'s Baby," a tale of miscegenation in antebellum Louisiana (published in 1893), "The Story of an Hour" (1894), and "The Storm"(1898).'
p5724
aS'"The Storm" is a sequel to "The \'Cadian Ball," which appeared in her first collection of short stories, Bayou Folk.'
p5725
aS'Chopin also wrote two novels: At Fault (1890) and The Awakening (1899), which are set in New_Orleans and Grand Isle, respectively.'
p5726
aS'The people in her stories are usually inhabitants of Louisiana.'
p5727
aS'Many of her works are set in Natchitoches in north central Louisiana.Within a decade of her death, Chopin was widely recognized as one of the leading writers of her time.'
p5728
aS'In 1915, Fred Lewis Pattee wrote, "some of [Chopin\'s] work is equal to the best that has been produced in France or even in America.'
p5729
aS'She is known for her penetrating insight; her work deals with dark themes such as betrayal, death and the origin of human evil.'
p5730
aS'In 1990, Recorded Texas Historic Landmark number 2905 was placed in Brown County, Texas, to honor the life and career of Porter. Biography Katherine_Anne_Porter was born Callie Russel Porter to Harrison Boone Porter and Mary Alice (Jones) Porter.'
p5731
aS"Her family tree can be traced back to American frontiersman Daniel Boone and the writer O. Henry (whose real name was William Sydney Porter), her father's second cousin.In 1892, when Porter was two years old, her mother died two months after giving birth to her last child."
p5732
aS"Porter's father took his four surviving children (an older brother had died in infancy) to live with his mother, Catherine Ann Porter, in Kyle, Texas."
p5733
aS"The depth of her grandmother's influence can be inferred from Porter's later adoption of her name."
p5734
aS"Her grandmother died while taking eleven-year-old Callie to visit relatives in Marfa, Texas.After her grandmother's death, the family lived in several towns in Texas and Louisiana, staying with relatives or living in rented rooms."
p5735
aS'She was enrolled in free schools wherever the family was living, and for a year in 1904 she attended the Thomas School, a private Methodist school in San Antonio, Texas.'
p5736
aS'Perry signed with Red Hill Records and released her debut studio album Katy Hudson in 2001, which was commercially unsuccessful.'
p5737
aS'She moved to Los Angeles the following year to venture into secular music after Red Hill ceased operations.'
p5738
aS'After being dropped by The Island Def Jam Music Group and Columbia Records, Perry signed a recording contract with Capitol Records in April 2007.Perry rose to fame in 2008 with the release of the singles "I Kissed a Girl" - which had attention-grabbing and somewhat controversial lyrics - and "Hot n Cold" from her second album, a pop rock record titled One of the Boys.'
p5739
aS'Her third album, Teenage Dream (2010), ventured into disco, and contained the U.S.'
p5740
aS'Billboard Hot 100 chart-topping singles "California Gurls", "Teenage Dream", "Firework", "E.T.'
p5741
aS'", and "Last Friday Night (T.G.I.F.)"'
p5742
aS'as well as the number-three single "The One That Got Away".'
p5743
aS'His parents, Ludwika and Seweryn Malewicz, were Roman Catholic like most ethnic Poles.'
p5744
aS'They both had fled from the former eastern territories of the Commonwealth (present-day Kopyl Region of Belarus) to Kiev in the aftermath of the failed Polish January Uprising of 1863 against the tsarist army.'
p5745
aS"His native languages were Polish and Russian.Kazimir's father managed a sugar factory."
p5746
aS'Kazimir was the first of fourteen children, only nine of whom survived into adulthood.'
p5747
aS'His family moved often and he spent most of his childhood in the villages of Ukraine, amidst sugar-beet plantations, far from centers of culture.'
p5748
aS'Until age twelve he knew nothing of professional artists, although art had surrounded him in childhood.'
p5749
aS'He delighted in peasant embroidery, and in decorated walls and stoves.'
p5750
aS'Originally a part of Virginia, in 1792 Kentucky became the 15th state to join the Union.'
p5751
aS'Kentucky is the 37th most extensive and the 26th most populous of the 50 United_States.Kentucky is known as the "Bluegrass State", a nickname based on the bluegrass found in many of its pastures due to the fertile soil.'
p5752
aS'One of the major regions in Kentucky is the Bluegrass Region in central Kentucky which houses two of its major cities, Louisville and Lexington.'
p5753
aS"It is a land with diverse environments and abundant resources, including the world's longest cave system, Mammoth Cave National Park, the greatest length of navigable waterways and streams in the contiguous United_States, and the two largest man-made lakes east of the Mississippi River.Kentucky is also home to the highest per capita number of deer and turkey in the United_States, the largest free-ranging elk herd east of the Mississippi River, and the nation's most productive coalfield."
p5754
aS'Kentucky is also known for horse racing, bourbon distilleries, automobile manufacturing, tobacco, bluegrass music, college basketball, and Kentucky Fried Chicken. Etymology In 1776, the counties of Virginia beyond the Appalachian Mountains became known as Kentucky County, named for the Kentucky River.'
p5755
aS'The precise etymology of the name is uncertain, but likely based on an Iroquoian name meaning "(on) the meadow" or "(on) the prairie" (cf.'
p5756
aS'Mohawk kenhta:ke, Seneca geda\'geh (phonemic /keta?keh/), "at the field"). Geography Kentucky is situated in the Upland South.'
p5757
aS'It is the key structural component of hair and nails, and it provides the necessary strength and toughness for masticatory organs, such as the tongue and the hard palate.'
p5758
aS'Keratin monomers assemble into bundles to form intermediate filaments, which are tough and form strong unmineralized tissues found in reptiles, birds, amphibians, and mammals.'
p5759
aS'The only other biological matter known to approximate the toughness of keratinized tissue is chitin. EtymologyEdit Keratin derives from Greek keratine from Greek keras (keras) (genitive keratos, keratos) meaning "horn" originating from the Proto-Indo-European *ker- of the same meaning.'
p5760
aS'Its Greek root is composed of "horn like", i.e., kerato (Greek kerato) to which the chemical suffix -in is appended. Examples of usesEdit Keratin filaments are abundant in keratinocytes in the cornified layer of the epidermis; these are cells which have undergone keratinization.'
p5761
aS'In addition, keratin filaments are present in epithelial cells in general.'
p5762
aS'For example, mouse thymic epithelial cells (TECs) are known to react with antibodies for keratin 5, keratin 8, and keratin 14.'
p5763
aS'These antibodies are used as fluorescent markers to distinguish subsets of TECs in genetic studies of the thymus.the a-keratins in the hair (including wool), horns, nails, claws and hooves of mammalsthe harder b-keratins found in nails and in the scales and claws of reptiles, their shells (Testudines, such as tortoise, turtle, terrapin), and in the feathers, beaks, claws of birds and quills of porcupines.'
p5764
aS'They are considered "simple" because they do not have reactive groups like -OH or -Cl attached directly to the carbon atom in the carbonyl group, as in carboxylic acids containing -COOH.'
p5765
aS'Many ketones are known and many are of great importance in industry and in biology.'
p5766
aS'Examples include many sugars (ketoses) and the industrial solvent acetone. Nomenclature and etymology The word ketone derives its name from Aketon, an old German word for acetone.According to the rules of IUPAC nomenclature, ketones are named by changing the suffix -ane of the parent alkane to -anone.'
p5767
aS'The position of the carbonyl group is usually denoted by a number.'
p5768
aS'For the most important ketones, however, traditional nonsystematic names are still generally used, for example acetone and benzophenone.'
p5769
aS'These nonsystematic names are considered retained IUPAC names, although some introductory chemistry textbooks use systematic names such as "2-propanone" or "propan-2-one" for the simplest ketone (CH3-CO-CH3) instead of "acetone".The common names of ketones are obtained by writing separately the names of the two alkyl groups attached to the carbonyl group, followed by "ketone" as a separate word.'
p5770
aS'The names of the alkyl groups are written alphabetically.'
p5771
aS'Having gained this energy during its acceleration, the body maintains this kinetic energy unless its speed changes.'
p5772
aS'The same amount of work is done by the body in decelerating from its current speed to a state of rest.In classical mechanics, the kinetic energy of a non-rotating object of mass m traveling at a speed v is .'
p5773
aS'In relativistic mechanics, this is a good approximation only when v is much less than the speed of light.The standard unit of kinetic energy is the joule. History and etymology The adjective kinetic has its roots in the Greek word kinesis kinesis, meaning "motion".'
p5774
aS"The dichotomy between kinetic energy and potential energy can be traced back to Aristotle's concepts of actuality and potentiality.The principle in classical mechanics that E [?]"
p5775
aS'mv2 was first developed by Gottfried Leibniz and Johann Bernoulli, who described kinetic energy as the living force, vis viva.'
p5776
aS"Willem 's Gravesande of the Netherlands provided experimental evidence of this relationship."
p5777
aS"By dropping weights from different heights into a block of clay, Willem 's Gravesande determined that their penetration depth was proportional to the square of their impact speed."
p5778
aS'The war continued in the most northern reaches of New England until the signing of the Treaty of Casco Bay in April 1678.Metacom (c. 1638-1676) was the second son of Wampanoag chief Massasoit, who had coexisted peacefully with the Pilgrims.'
p5779
aS"Metacom succeeded his father in 1662 and reacted against the European settlers' continued encroaching onto Wampanoag lands."
p5780
aS'At Taunton in 1671, he was humiliated when colonists forced him to sign a new peace agreement that included the surrender of Indian guns.'
p5781
aS"When officials in Plymouth Colony hanged three Wampanoags in 1675 for the murder of a Christianized Indian, Metacom's alliance launched a united assault on colonial towns throughout the region."
p5782
aS"Metacom's forces enjoyed initial victories in the first year, but then the Native American alliance began to unravel."
p5783
aS'By the end of the conflict, the Wampanoags and their Narragansett allies were almost completely destroyed.'
p5784
aS'Metacom anticipated their defeat and returned to his ancestral home at Mt.'
p5785
aS'According to his biographer, Zachary Leader, Amis was "the finest English comic novelist of the second half of the twentieth century."'
p5786
aS"He is the father of British novelist Martin Amis.In 2008, The Times ranked Kingsley_Amis ninth on their list of the 50 greatest British writers since 1945. Life and career Kingsley_Amis was born in Clapham, south London, the son of William Robert Amis, a mustard manufacturer's clerk in the City of London and his wife, Rosa Annie (nee Lucas)."
p5787
aS'He was raised in Norbury - in his later estimation "not really a place, it\'s an expression on a map [-] really I should say I came from Norbury station".'
p5788
aS"He was educated at the City of London School on a scholarship, after his first year, and in April 1941 was admitted to St. John's College, Oxford, also on a scholarship, where he read English."
p5789
aS'It was there that he met Philip Larkin, with whom he formed the most important friendship of his life.'
p5790
aS'While at Oxford, in June 1941, Amis joined the Communist Party of Great Britain.'
p5791
aS'After only a year, in July 1942, he was called up for national service.'
p5792
aS'The_Knights promoted the social and cultural uplift of the workingman, rejected socialism and anarchism, demanded the eight-hour day, and promoted the producers ethic of republicanism.'
p5793
aS'In some cases it acted as a labor union, negotiating with employers, but it was never well organized, and after a rapid expansion in the mid-1880s, it suddenly lost its new members and became a small operation again.It was established in 1869, reached 28,000 members in 1880, then jumped to 100,000 in 1884.'
p5794
aS'By 1886 20% of all workers were affiliated with the KOL, ballooning to nearly 800,000 members.'
p5795
aS'Its frail organizational structure could not cope as it was battered by charges of failure and violence and calumnies of the association with the Haymarket Square riot.'
p5796
aS'Most members abandoned the movement in 1886-87, leaving at most 100,000 in 1890.'
p5797
aS'Many of them chose to join groups that helped to identify their specific need, instead of the KOL that addressed many different types of issues.'
p5798
aS"Furthermore, the Panic of 1893 terminated the Knights_of_Labor's importance."
p5799
aS'In philosophy, the study of knowledge is called epistemology; the philosopher Plato famously defined knowledge as "justified true belief", though "well-justified true belief" is more complete as it accounts for the Gettier problems.'
p5800
aS'However, several definitions of knowledge and theories to explain it exist.Knowledge acquisition involves complex cognitive processes: perception, communication, and reasoning; while knowledge is also said to be related to the capacity of acknowledgment in human beings. Theories of knowledge The definition of knowledge is a matter of ongoing debate among philosophers in the field of epistemology.'
p5801
aS'The classical definition, described but not ultimately endorsed by Plato, specifies that a statement must meet three criteria in order to be considered knowledge: it must be justified, true, and believed.'
p5802
aS'Some claim that these conditions are not sufficient, as Gettier case examples allegedly demonstrate.'
p5803
aS"There are a number of alternatives proposed, including Robert Nozick's arguments for a requirement that knowledge 'tracks the truth' and Simon Blackburn's additional requirement that we do not want to say that those who meet any of these conditions 'through a defect, flaw, or failure' have knowledge."
p5804
aS'Richard Kirkham suggests that our definition of knowledge requires that the evidence for the belief necessitates its truth.In contrast to this approach, Ludwig_Wittgenstein observed, following Moore\'s paradox, that one can say "He believes it, but it isn\'t so," but not "He knows it, but it isn\'t so."'
p5805
aS'He goes on to argue that these do not correspond to distinct mental states, but rather to distinct ways of talking about conviction.'
p5806
aS'Krishna is the principal protagonist with Arjuna in the Bhagavad Gita also known as the Song of God, which depicts the conversation between the Royal Prince Arjuna and Krishna during the great battle of Kurukshetra 5000 years ago where Arjuna discovers that Krishna is God and then comprehends his nature and will for him and for mankind.'
p5807
aS'In present age Krishna is one of the most widely revered and most popular of all Indian divinities.Krishna is often described and portrayed as an infant eating butter, a young boy playing a flute as in the Bhagavata Purana, or as an elder giving direction and guidance as in the Bhagavad Gita.'
p5808
aS'The stories of Krishna appear across a broad spectrum of Hindu philosophical and theological traditions.'
p5809
aS'They portray him in various perspectives: a god-child, a prankster, a model lover, a divine hero, and the Supreme Being.'
p5810
aS"The principal scriptures discussing Krishna's story are the Mahabharata, the Harivamsa, the Bhagavata Purana, and the Vishnu Purana.Krishna's disappearance marks the end of Dvapara Yuga and the start of Kali Yuga (present age), which is dated to February 17/18, 3102 BCE."
p5811
aS'Worship of the deity Krishna, either in the form of deity Krishna or in the form of Vasudeva, Bala Krishna or Gopala can be traced to as early as 4th century BC.'
p5812
aS'Worship of Krishna as Svayam Bhagavan, or the supreme being, known as Krishnaism, arose in the Middle Ages in the context of the Bhakti movement.'
p5813
aS'Kransen and Husfrue were translated from the original Norwegian as The Bridal Wreath and The Mistress of Husaby, respectively, in the first English translation by Charles Archer and J. S. Scott.This work formed the basis of Undset receiving the 1928 Nobel Prize in Literature, which was awarded to her "principally for her powerful descriptions of Northern life during the Middle Ages".'
p5814
aS'Her work is much admired for its historical and ethnological accuracy. Plot The cycle follows the life of Kristin_Lavransdatter, a fictitious Norwegian woman living in the 14th century.'
p5815
aS'Kristin grows up in Sil in Gudbrandsdalen, the daughter of a well-respected and affluent farmer.'
p5816
aS'She experiences a number of conflicts in her relationships with her parents, and her husband Erlend, in medieval Norway.'
p5817
aS'She finds comfort and conciliation in her Catholic faith. The Wreath Kristin_Lavransdatter is the daughter of Lavrans, a charismatic, respected nobleman in a rural area of Norway, and his wife Ragnfrid, who suffers from depression after the loss of three infant sons and the crippling of her younger daughter Ulvhild in an accident.'
p5818
aS'Raised in a loving and devoutly religious family, Kristin develops a sensitive but willful character, defying her family in small and large ways.'
p5819
aS'At an early age, she is exposed to various tragedies.'
p5820
aS'Upon waking, he set about writing lines of poetry that came to him from the dream until he was interrupted by a person from Porlock.'
p5821
aS'The poem could not be completed according to its original 200-300 line plan as the interruption caused him to forget the lines.'
p5822
aS"He left it unpublished and kept it for private readings for his friends until 1816 when, at the prompting of Lord Byron, it was published.Some of Coleridge's contemporaries denounced the poem and questioned his story of its origin."
p5823
aS'It was not until years later that critics began to openly admire the poem.'
p5824
aS'Most modern critics now view "Kubla_Khan" as one of Coleridge\'s three great poems, along with The Rime of the Ancient Mariner and Christabel.'
p5825
aS'The poem is considered one of the most famous examples of Romanticism in English poetry.'
p5826
aS'A copy of the manuscript is a permanent exhibit at the British Museum in London. Background  Writing In September 1797, Coleridge lived in Nether Stowey in the south west of England and spent much of his time walking through the nearby Quantock Hills with his fellow poet William_Wordsworth and Wordsworth\'s sister Dorothy; (His route today is memorialised as the "Coleridge Way".)'
p5827
aS'He succeeded his older brother Mongke as Khagan in 1260, but had to defeat his younger brother Ariq Boke in the Toluid Civil War lasting until 1264.'
p5828
aS'This episode marked the beginning of disunity in the empire.'
p5829
aS"Kublai's real power was limited to China and Mongolia, though as Khagan he still had influence in the Ilkhanate and, to a far lesser degree, in the Golden_Horde."
p5830
aS"If one counts the Mongol Empire at that time as a whole, his realm reached from the Pacific to the Black_Sea, from Siberia to modern day Afghanistan - one fifth of the world's inhabited land area.In 1271, Kublai established the Yuan dynasty, which ruled over present-day Mongolia, China, Korea, and some adjacent areas, and assumed the role of Emperor of China."
p5831
aS'By 1279, the Yuan forces had overcome the last resistance of the Southern Song dynasty, and Kublai became the first non-Han Emperor to conquer all of China. Early years Kublai was the fourth son of Tolui, and his second son with Sorghaghtani Beki.'
p5832
aS"As his grandfather Genghis_Khan advised, Sorghaghtani chose a Buddhist Tangut woman as her son's nurse, whom Kublai later honored highly."
p5833
aS'On his way home after the conquest of the Khwarizmian Empire, Genghis_Khan performed a ceremony on his grandsons Mongke and Kublai after their first hunt in 1224 near the Ili River.'
p5834
aS"Like the asteroid belt, it consists mainly of small bodies, or remnants from the Solar System's formation."
p5835
aS'Although many asteroids are composed primarily of rock and metal, most Kuiper_belt objects are composed largely of frozen volatiles (termed "ices"), such as methane, ammonia and water.'
p5836
aS'The Kuiper_belt is home to three officially recognized dwarf planets: Pluto, Haumea, and Makemake.'
p5837
aS"Some of the Solar System's moons, such as Neptune's Triton and Saturn's Phoebe, are also believed to have originated in the region.The Kuiper_belt was named after Dutch-American astronomer Gerard Kuiper, though he did not actually predict its existence."
p5838
aS'In 1992, 1992 QB1 was discovered, the first Kuiper_belt object (KBO) since Pluto.'
p5839
aS'Since its discovery, the number of known KBOs has increased to over a thousand, and more than 100,000 KBOs over 100 km (62 mi) in diameter are believed to exist.'
p5840
aS'The Kuiper_belt was initially thought to be the main repository for periodic comets, those with orbits lasting less than 200 years.'
p5841
aS'He is most famous for his darkly satirical, best-selling novel Slaughterhouse-Five, which tells of the life of Billy Pilgrim.Born in Indianapolis, Indiana, Vonnegut attended Cornell University, but dropped out in January 1943 and enlisted in the United_States Army.'
p5842
aS'He was deployed to Europe to fight in the Second World War, and lived through the Allied bombing of Dresden while bunkering in a meat locker.'
p5843
aS'Afterwards, Vonnegut married Jane Marie Cox, with whom he had three children.'
p5844
aS"He later adopted his sister's three children, after she died of cancer and her husband died in a train accident.Vonnegut published his first novel, Player Piano, in 1952."
p5845
aS'The novel was reviewed positively, but was not commercially successful.'
p5846
aS"In the nearly twenty years that followed, Vonnegut published several novels which were only tepidly successful, such as Cat's_Cradle (1963) and God Bless You, Mr. Rosewater (1964)."
p5847
aS"Vonnegut's magnum opus, however, was his immediately successful sixth novel, Slaughterhouse-Five."
p5848
aS"He became the first Prime Minister of the Gold Coast in 1951, and led it to independence as Ghana in 1957, becoming the new country's first Prime Minister."
p5849
aS'After Ghana became a republic in 1960, Nkrumah became President.'
p5850
aS'An influential 20th-century advocate of Pan-Africanism, he was a founding member of the Organization of African Unity and was the winner of the Lenin Peace Prize in 1963.'
p5851
aS'He saw himself as an African Lenin. Early life and education  Gold Coast Kwame_Nkrumah was born as Francis Nwia Kofi Ngonloma in 1909 in Nkroful, Gold Coast.'
p5852
aS'He attended a nearby Roman Catholic missionary school, where on September 21 he was baptized.'
p5853
aS'His family came from the Nzema ethnic group, one of the Akan peoples of the coast, known for powerful witchcraft.At age sixteen or seventeen, he became a pupil-teacher at a school in Half Assini, where he was discovered by Reverend Alec Garden Fraser and recommended for Government Training College at Achimota School in Accra.'
p5854
aS'There he studied to be a teacher from 1926 to 1930.'
p5855
aS'The original was written by Keats in 1819.'
p5856
aS'He used the title of a 15th century poem by Alain Chartier, though the plots of the two poems are different.'
p5857
aS"The poem is considered an English classic, stereotypical to other of Keats' works."
p5858
aS'It avoids simplicity of interpretation despite simplicity of structure.'
p5859
aS"At only a short twelve stanzas, of only four lines each, with a simple ABCB rhyme scheme, the poem is nonetheless full of enigmas, and has been the subject of numerous interpretations. Poem O what can ail thee, knight-at-arms,Alone and palely loitering?The sedge has withered from the lake,And no birds sing.O what can ail thee, knight-at-arms,So haggard and so woe-begone?The squirrel's granary is full,And the harvest's done.I see a lily on thy brow,With anguish moist and fever-dew,And on thy cheeks a fading roseFast withereth too.I met a lady in the meads,Full beautiful--a faery's child,Her hair was long, her foot was light,And her eyes were wild.I made a garland for her head,And bracelets too, and fragrant zone;She looked at me as she did love,And made sweet moanI set her on my pacing steed,And nothing else saw all day long,For sidelong would she bend, and singA faery's song.She found me roots of relish sweet,And honey wild, and manna-dew,And sure in language strange she said--'I love thee true'.She took me to her Elfin grot,And there she wept and sighed full sore,And there I shut her wild wild eyesWith kisses four.And there she lulled me asleep,And there I dreamed--Ah!"
p5860
aS"woe betide!--The latest dream I ever dreamtOn the cold hill side.I saw pale kings and princes too,Pale warriors, death-pale were they all;They cried--'La_Belle_Dame_sans_MerciHath thee in thrall!"
p5861
aS'\'I saw their starved lips in the gloam,With horrid warning gaped wide,And I awoke and found me here,On the cold hill\'s side.And this is why I sojourn here,Alone and palely loitering,Though the sedge is withered from the lake,And no birds sing. Analysis "La_Belle_Dame_sans_Merci" is a popular form given an artistic sheen by the Romantic poets.'
p5862
aS'The opera was originally entitled Violetta, after the main character.'
p5863
aS'It was first performed on 6 March 1853 at the La Fenice opera house in Venice.Piave and Verdi wanted to follow Dumas in giving the opera a contemporary setting, but the authorities at La Fenice insisted that it be set in the past, "c. 1700".'
p5864
aS'It was not until the 1880s that the composer and librettist\'s original wishes were carried out and "realistic" productions were staged. Composition history For Verdi, the years 1851 to 1853 were filled with operatic activity.'
p5865
aS'First, he had agreed with the librettist Salvadore Cammarano on a subject for what would become Il_trovatore, but work on this opera could not proceed while the composer was writing Rigoletto, which premiered in Venice in March 1851.'
p5866
aS"In addition, personal affairs in his home town limited his activities that spring, but after Rigoletto's success in Venice, an additional commission was offered by Brenna, the secretary of La Fenice."
p5867
aS"After Verdi's return from Paris a contract was signed in May 1852, with performances scheduled for March 1853, although no subject was chosen at that time.Verdi sees The Lady of the Camellias playVerdi and Giuseppina Strepponi had visited Paris from late 1851 and into March 1852."
p5868
aS"In February the couple attended a performance of Alexander Dumas fils's The Lady of the Camellias."
p5869
aS"Like many of Wilde's comedies, it bitingly satirizes the morals of society.The story concerns Lady Windermere, who suspects that her husband is having an affair with another woman."
p5870
aS"She confronts him with it but although he denies it, he invites the other woman, Mrs Erlynne, to his wife's birthday ball."
p5871
aS"Angered by her husband's supposed unfaithfulness, Lady Windermere decides to leave her husband for another lover."
p5872
aS'After discovering what has transpired, Mrs Erlynne follows Lady Windermere and attempts to persuade her to return to her husband and in the course of this, Mrs Erlynne is discovered in a compromising position.'
p5873
aS"It is then revealed Mrs Erlynne is Lady Windermere's mother, who abandoned her family twenty years before the time the play is set."
p5874
aS"Mrs Erlynne sacrifices herself and her reputation to save her daughter's marriage."
p5875
aS'The best known line of the play sums up the central theme:We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars. Composition By the summer of 1891 Wilde had already written three plays, Vera; or, The Nihilists and The Duchess of Padua had found little success, and Salome had been censored.'
p5876
aS'It is used primarily as a key component in the Euler-Lagrange equations to find the path of a particle according to the principle of least action.The Lagrangian is named after Italian mathematician and astronomer Joseph Louis Lagrange.'
p5877
aS'The concept of a Lagrangian was introduced in a reformulation of classical mechanics introduced by Lagrange known as Lagrangian mechanics in 1788.'
p5878
aS"This reformulation was needed in order to explore mechanics in alternative systems to cartesian coordinates such as polar, cylindrical and spherical coordinates, and where the coordinates do not necessarily refer to position, for which Newton's formulation of classical mechanics is not convenient.The Lagrangian has since been used in a method to find the acceleration of a particle in a Newtonian gravitational field and to derive the Einstein field equations."
p5879
aS'This led to its use in applying electromagnetism to curved spacetime and in describing charged black holes.'
p5880
aS'It also has additional uses in Mathematical formalism to find the functional derivative of an action, and in engineering for the analysis and optimisation of dynamic systems. Definition In classical mechanics, the natural form of the Lagrangian is defined as the kinetic energy, T, of the system minus its potential energy, V. In symbols,If the Lagrangian of a system is known, then the equations of motion of the system may be obtained by a direct substitution of the expression for the Lagrangian into the Euler-Lagrange equation.'
p5881
aS'The Lagrangian of a given system is not unique, and two Lagrangians describing the same system can differ by the total derivative with respect to time of some function , but solving any equivalent Lagrangians will give the same equations of motion. The Lagrangian formulation  Simple example The trajectory of a thrown ball is characterized by the sum of the Lagrangian values at each time being a (local) minimum.The Lagrangian L can be calculated at several instants of time t, and a graph of L against t can be drawn.'
p5882
aS'The area under the curve is the action.'
p5883
aS'Kossuth\'s bronze bust can be found in the United_States Capitol with the inscription: "Father of Hungarian Democracy, Hungarian Statesman, Freedom Fighter, 1848-1849". Biography  Family Lajos_Kossuth was born in Monok, Kingdom of Hungary, a small town in the county of Zemplen, as the oldest of four children in a Protestant noble family.'
p5884
aS'His father, Laszlo Kossuth (1762-1839), belonged to the lower nobility, had a small estate and was a lawyer by profession.'
p5885
aS'Laszlo Kossuth had two brothers (Simon Kossuth and Gyorgy Kossuth) and one sister (Jana).'
p5886
aS'The ancestors of the Kossuth family had lived in the county of Turoc (now Slovak: Turiec, northwest Slovakia) in the north of Hungary since the 13th century.'
p5887
aS'The mother of Lajos_Kossuth, Karolina Weber (1770-1853) was born to a Lutheran family of partial German descent living in Upper Hungary (today Slovakia). Early years His mother raised the children as strict Lutherans.'
p5888
aS'Kossuth studied at the Piarist college of Satoraljaujhely and one year in the Calvinist college of Sarospatak and the University of Pest (now Budapest).'
p5889
aS"Aged nineteen, he entered his father's legal practice."
p5890
aS"At 1,642 m (5,387 ft), Baikal is the world's deepest lake."
p5891
aS"It is considered among the world's clearest lakes and is considered the world's oldest lake -- at 25 million years."
p5892
aS'It is the seventh-largest lake in the world by surface area.'
p5893
aS'With 23,615.39 km3 (5,700 cu mi) of fresh water, it contains more water than all the Great Lakes combined.Like Lake_Tanganyika, Lake_Baikal was formed as an ancient rift valley, having the typical long crescent shape with a surface area of 31,722 km2 (12,248 sq mi).'
p5894
aS'Baikal is home to more than 1,700 species of plants and animals, two-thirds of which can be found nowhere else in the world.'
p5895
aS'The lake was declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site in 1996.'
p5896
aS"It is also home to Buryat tribes who reside on the eastern side of Lake_Baikal, rearing goats, camels, cattle, and sheep, where the mean temperature varies from a winter minimum of -19 degC (-2 degF) to a summer maximum of 14 degC (57 degF). Geography and hydrography Lake_Baikal is in a rift valley, created by the Baikal Rift Zone, where the Earth's crust is slowly pulling apart."
p5897
aS'Lake_Chad is economically important, providing water to more than 68 million people living in the four countries surrounding it (Chad, Cameroon, Niger, and Nigeria) on the edge of the Sahara Desert.'
p5898
aS'It is the largest lake in the Chad Basin. Geography and hydrology Lake_Chad is located mainly in the far west of Chad, bordering on northeastern Nigeria.'
p5899
aS"The Chari River, fed by its tributary the Logone, provides over 90% of Lake_Chad's water, with a small amount coming from the Yobe River in Nigeria/Niger."
p5900
aS'Despite high levels of evaporation, the lake is fresh water.'
p5901
aS"Over half of the lake's area is taken up by its many small islands (including Bogomerom archipelago), reedbeds and mud banks, and a belt of swampland across the middle divides the northern and southern halves while the shorelines are largely composed of marshes.Because Lake_Chad is very shallow--only 10.5 metres (34 ft) at its deepest--its area is particularly sensitive to small changes in average depth, and consequently it also shows seasonal fluctuations in size of about 1 m every year."
p5902
aS'Lake_Chad has no apparent outlet, but its waters percolate into the Soro and Bodele depressions.'
p5903
aS'The climate is dry most of the year, with occasional rains from June to December. History Lake_Chad gave its name to the country of Chad.'
p5904
aS"Ladoga; IPA: ['lad@g@]; Finnish: Laatokka [earlier in Finnish Nevajarvi]; Livvi-Karelian: Luadogu; Veps: Ladog, Ladoganjarv) is a freshwater lake located in the Republic of Karelia and Leningrad Oblast in northwestern Russia just outside the outskirts of Saint_Petersburg."
p5905
aS'It is the largest lake in Europe, and the 15th largest freshwater lake by area in the world.'
p5906
aS'Ladoga Lacus, a methane lake on Saturn\'s moon Titan, is named after the lake. Etymology In one of Nestor\'s chronicles from the 12th century he mentions a lake called "the Great Nevo" (a clear link to the Neva River; also compare Finnish: neva "bog, quagmire").'
p5907
aS'In ancient Norse sagas and Hanseatic treaties they mention a city made of lakes called Aldoga (compare Finnish: aalto - wave).Since the beginning of the 14th century the name of the lake was commonly called Ladoga, which was named after the city of Ladoga which in turn was named after the eponymous inflow in the lower reaches of the Volkhov River (Finnish: Alodejoki - river in the low areas).'
p5908
aS'Other theories about the origin of the name comes from Karelian: Aalto - wave, here Karelian: Aaltokas - wavy; from the Russian dialectal word alod\', meaning open lake, extensive water field.According to Jackson, T.N., "So far it can be considered that almost for granted, that the name of Ladoga first referred to the river, then the city, and only then the lake."'
p5909
aS'Therefore, it considers the primary hydronym Ladoga, from Finnish: *Alode-jogi (joki) "the lower river".'
p5910
aS'From the river was the city Old Norse: Aldeigja, and already it was borrowed Slavic population and transformed using metathesis ald - lad from Old East Slavic: Ladoga.'
p5911
aS'It is home to more species of fish than any other lake, including about 1000 species of cichlids.'
p5912
aS'The Mozambique portion of the lake was officially declared a reserve by the Government of Mozambique on June 10, 2011, and in Malawi a portion of the lake is included in the Lake_Malawi National Park.'
p5913
aS'Lake_Malawi is a meromictic lake; permanent stratification and the oxic-anoxic boundary are maintained by moderately small chemical and thermal gradients. Geography Lake_Malawi is between 560 kilometres (350 mi) and 580 kilometres (360 mi) long, and about 75 kilometres (47 mi) wide at its widest point.'
p5914
aS'The total surface area of the lake is about 29,600 square kilometres (11,400 sq mi).'
p5915
aS'The lake has shorelines on western Mozambique, eastern Malawi, and southern Tanzania.'
p5916
aS'The largest river flowing into it is the Ruhuhu River, and there is an outlet at its southern end, the Shire River, a tributary that flows into the very large Zambezi River in Mozambique.The lake lies in a valley formed by the opening of the East African Rift, where the African tectonic plate is being split into two pieces.'
p5917
aS'This is called a divergent plate tectonics boundary.'
p5918
aS'With an elevation of 32.7 metres (107 ft) above sea level, the lake reaches a depth of 26 metres (85 ft).'
p5919
aS'It is intermittently joined by the Tipitapa River to Lake Managua.The lake drains to the Caribbean Sea via the San Juan River, historically making the lakeside city of Granada, Nicaragua, an Atlantic port although Granada (as well as the entire lake) is closer to the Pacific ocean geographically.'
p5920
aS'The Pacific is near enough to be seen from the mountains of Ometepe (an island in the lake).'
p5921
aS'The lake has a history of Caribbean pirates who assaulted Granada on three occasions.'
p5922
aS"Before construction of the Panama Canal, a stagecoach line owned by Cornelius Vanderbilt's Accessory Transit Company connected the lake with the Pacific across the low hills of the narrow Isthmus of Rivas."
p5923
aS'Plans were made to take advantage of this route to build an interoceanic canal, the Nicaragua Canal, but the Panama Canal was built instead.'
p5924
aS'In order to quell competition with the Panama Canal, the U.S. secured all rights to a canal along this route in the Bryan-Chamorro Treaty of 1916.'
p5925
aS'The lake is divided among four countries - Tanzania, Democratic Republic of the Congo, Burundi, and Zambia, with Tanzania (46%) and DRC (40%) possessing the majority of the lake.'
p5926
aS'The water flows into the Congo River system and ultimately into the Atlantic Ocean.The name apparently refers to "Tanganika, \'the great lake spreading out like a plain\', or \'plain-like lake\'.'
p5927
aS'" GeographyEdit Lake_Tanganyika is situated within the Albertine Rift, the western branch of the East African Rift, and is confined by the mountainous walls of the valley.'
p5928
aS'It is the largest rift lake in Africa and the second largest lake by volume in the world.'
p5929
aS"It is the deepest lake in Africa and holds the greatest volume of fresh water; accounting for 18% of the world's available fresh water."
p5930
aS'It extends for 676 km (420 mi) in a general north-south direction and averages 50 km (31 mi) in width.'
p5931
aS'The lake covers 32,900 km2 (12,700 sq mi), with a shoreline of 1,828 km (1,136 mi), a mean depth of 570 m (1,870 ft) and a maximum depth of 1,470 m (4,820 ft) (in the northern basin).'
p5932
aS"Speke accomplished this in 1858, while on an expedition with Richard Francis Burton to locate the source of the Nile River.With a surface area of 68,800 square kilometres (26,600 sq mi), Lake_Victoria is Africa's largest lake by area, and is also the largest tropical lake in the world."
p5933
aS"Lake_Victoria is the world's second largest freshwater lake by surface area; only Lake Superior in North America is larger."
p5934
aS"In terms of its volume, Lake_Victoria is the world's ninth largest continental lake, and it contains about 2,750 cubic kilometers (2.2 billion acre-feet) of water.Lake_Victoria receives its water primarily from direct precipitation and thousands of small streams."
p5935
aS"The largest stream flowing into this lake is the Kagera River, the mouth of which lies on the lake's western shore."
p5936
aS"Lake_Victoria is drained solely by the Nile River near Jinja, Uganda, on the lake's northern shore.Lake_Victoria occupies a shallow depression in Africa and has a maximum depth of 84 m (276 ft) and an average depth of 40 m (130 ft)."
p5937
aS'Its catchment area covers 184,000 square kilometers (71,040 sq mi).'
p5938
aS'The lake has a shoreline of 4,828 km (3,000 mi), with islands constituting 3.7% of this length, and is divided among three countries: Kenya (6% or 4,100 km2 or 1,600 sq mi), Uganda (45% or 31,000 km2 or 12,000 sq mi) and Tanzania (49% or 33,700 km2 or 13,000 sq mi). Geology Lake_Victoria during its geological history, went through changes ranging from its present shallow depression, through to what may have been a series of much smaller lakes.'
p5939
aS'Lakes can be contrasted with rivers or streams, which are usually flowing.'
p5940
aS'However most lakes are fed and drained by rivers and streams.Natural lakes are generally found in mountainous areas, rift zones, and areas with ongoing glaciation.'
p5941
aS'Other lakes are found in endorheic basins or along the courses of mature rivers.'
p5942
aS'In some parts of the world there are many lakes because of chaotic drainage patterns left over from the last Ice Age.'
p5943
aS'All lakes are temporary over geologic time scales, as they will slowly fill in with sediments or spill out of the basin containing them.Many lakes are artificial and are constructed for industrial or agricultural use, for hydro-electric power generation or domestic water supply, or for aesthetic or recreational purposes. Etymology, meaning, and usage of "lake" The word lake comes from Middle English lake ("lake, pond, waterway"), from Old English lacu ("pond, pool, stream"), from Proto-Germanic *lako ("pond, ditch, slow moving stream"), from the Proto-Indo-European root *leg- ("to leak, drain").'
p5944
aS'Cognates include Dutch laak ("lake, pond, ditch"), Middle Low German lake ("water pooled in a riverbed, puddle"), German Lache ("pool, puddle"), and Icelandic laekur ("slow flowing stream").'
p5945
aS'Also related are the English words leak and leach.There is considerable uncertainty about defining the difference between lakes and ponds, and no current internationally accepted definition of either term across scientific disciplines or political boundaries exists.'
p5946
aS'Her four hands represent the four goals of human life considered proper in Hindu way of life - dharma, kama, artha, and moksha.'
p5947
aS'Representations of Lakshmi are also found in Jain monuments.'
p5948
aS'In Buddhist sects of Tibet, Nepal and southeast Asia, goddess Vasudhara mirrors the characteristics and attributes of Hindu goddess Lakshmi, with minor iconographic differences.Lakshmi is also called Sri or Thirumagal because she is endowed with six auspicious and divine qualities, or Gunas, and also because she is the source of strength even to Vishnu.'
p5949
aS'When Vishnu incarnated on the Earth as the avatars Rama and Krishna, Lakshmi took incarnation as his consort.'
p5950
aS"Sita (Rama's wife), Radha (Krishna's lover), Rukmini is considered forms of Lakshmi."
p5951
aS'In ancient scriptures of India, all women are declared to be embodiments of Lakshmi.'
p5952
aS'The marriage and relationship between Lakshmi and Vishnu as wife and husband, states Patricia Monaghan, is "the paradigm for rituals and ceremonies for the bride and groom in Hindu weddings".Archeological discoveries and ancient coins suggest the recognition and reverence for goddess Lakshmi, in Scytho-Parthian kingdom and throughout India, by 1st millennium BC.'
p5953
aS'Lambda_calculus is a conceptually simple universal model of computation (Turing showed in 1937 that Turing machines equaled the lambda calculus in expressiveness).'
p5954
aS'The name derives from the Greek letter lambda (l) used to denote binding a variable in a function.'
p5955
aS'The letter itself is arbitrary and has no special meaning.'
p5956
aS'Lambda_calculus is taught and used in computer science because of its usefulness in showcasing functional thinking and iterative reduction.Because of the importance of the notion of variable binding and substitution, there is not just one system of lambda calculus, and in particular there are typed and untyped variants.'
p5957
aS'Historically, the most important system was the untyped lambda calculus, in which function application has no restrictions (so the notion of the domain of a function is not built into the system).'
p5958
aS'In the Church-Turing Thesis, the untyped lambda calculus is claimed to be capable of computing all effectively calculable functions.'
p5959
aS'The typed lambda calculus is a variety that restricts function application, so that functions can be applied only if they are capable of accepting the given input\'s "type" of data.Today, the lambda calculus has applications in many different areas in mathematics, philosophy, linguistics, and computer science.'
p5960
aS'He famously wrote about the period that "the negro was in vogue", which was later paraphrased as "when Harlem was in vogue". Biography  Ancestry and childhood Both of Hughes\' paternal great-grandmothers were African-American and both of his paternal great-grandfathers were white slave owners of Kentucky.'
p5961
aS'According to Hughes, one of these men was Sam Clay, a Scottish-American whiskey distiller of Henry County and supposedly a relative of Henry_Clay, and the other was Silas Cushenberry a Jewish-American slave trader of Clark County.'
p5962
aS"Hughes's maternal grandmother Mary Patterson was of African-American, French, English and Native American descent."
p5963
aS'One of the first women to attend Oberlin College, she first married Lewis Sheridan Leary, also of mixed race.'
p5964
aS"Leary subsequently joined John Brown's raid on Harpers Ferry in 1859 and died from his wounds.In 1869 the widow Mary Patterson Leary married again, into the elite, politically active Langston family."
p5965
aS'Her second husband was Charles Henry Langston, of African-American, Native American, and Euro-American ancestry.'
p5966
aS'He and his younger brother John Mercer Langston worked for the abolitionist cause and helped lead the Ohio Anti-Slavery Society  in 1858.'
p5967
aS'Its population was estimated to be around 6.8 million in July 2014.Laos traces its history to the kingdom of Lan Xang, which existed from the 14th to the 18th century when it split into three kingdoms.'
p5968
aS'In 1893, it became a French protectorate, with the three kingdoms -- Luang Phrabang, Vientiane and Champasak -- uniting to form what is now known as Laos.'
p5969
aS'It briefly gained independence in 1945 after Japanese occupation, but returned to French rule until it was granted autonomy in 1949.'
p5970
aS'Laos became independent in 1953, with a constitutional monarchy under Sisavang Vong.'
p5971
aS'Shortly after independence, a long civil war ended the monarchy, when the Communist Pathet Lao movement came to power in 1975.Laos is a single-party socialist republic.'
p5972
aS'It espouses Marxism and is governed by a single party communist politburo dominated by military generals.'
p5973
aS"The Socialist Republic of Vietnam and the Vietnam People's Army continue to have significant influence in Laos."
p5974
aS'The Laplacian_matrix can be used to find many other properties of the graph.'
p5975
aS"Cheeger's inequality from Riemannian geometry has a discrete analogue involving the Laplacian_matrix; this is perhaps the most important theorem in spectral graph theory and one of the most useful facts in algorithmic applications."
p5976
aS'It approximates the sparsest cut of a graph through the second eigenvalue of its Laplacian. Definition Given a simple graph G with n vertices, its Laplacian_matrix  is defined as:where D is the degree matrix and A is the adjacency matrix of the graph.'
p5977
aS'In the case of directed graphs, either the indegree or outdegree might be used, depending on the application.The elements of  are given bywhere deg(vi) is degree of the vertex i.The symmetric normalized Laplacian_matrix is defined as:,The elements of  are given byThe random-walk normalized Laplacian_matrix is defined as:The elements of  are given by Example Here is a simple example of a labeled graph and its Laplacian_matrix. Properties For an (undirected) graph G and its Laplacian_matrix L with eigenvalues :L is symmetric.L is positive-semidefinite (that is  for all i).'
p5978
aS'This is verified in the incidence matrix section (below).'
p5979
aS'This can also be seen from the fact that the Laplacian is symmetric and diagonally dominant.L is an M-matrix (its off-diagonal entries are nonpositive, yet the real parts of its eigenvalues are nonnegative).Every row sum and column sum of L is zero.'
p5980
aS'Indeed, in the sum, the degree of the vertex is summed with a "-1" for each neighbor.In consequence, , because the vector  satisfies The number of times 0 appears as an eigenvalue in the Laplacian is the number of connected components in the graph.The smallest non-zero eigenvalue of L is called the spectral gap.The second smallest eigenvalue of L is the algebraic connectivity (or Fiedler value) of G.The Laplacian is an operator on the n-dimensional vector space of functions f : V - , where V is the vertex set of G, and n  |V|.When G is k-regular, the normalized Laplacian is: , where A is the adjacency matrix and I is an identity matrix.For a graph with multiple connected components, L is a block diagonal matrix, where each block is the respective Laplacian_matrix for each component, possibly after reordering the vertices (i.e.'
p5981
aS'The first laser was built in 1960 by Theodore H. Maiman at Hughes Laboratories, based on theoretical work by Charles Hard Townes and Arthur Leonard Schawlow.'
p5982
aS'A laser differs from other sources of light in that it emits light coherently.'
p5983
aS'Spatial coherence allows a laser to be focused to a tight spot, enabling applications such as laser cutting and lithography.'
p5984
aS'Spatial coherence also allows a laser beam to stay narrow over great distances (collimation), enabling applications such as laser pointers.'
p5985
aS'Lasers can also have high temporal coherence, which allows them to emit light with a very narrow spectrum, i.e., they can emit a single color of light.'
p5986
aS'Temporal coherence can be used to produce pulses of light as short as a femtosecond.Among their many applications, lasers are used in optical disk drives, laser printers, and barcode scanners; fiber-optic and free-space optical communication; laser surgery and skin treatments; cutting and welding materials; military and law enforcement devices for marking targets and measuring range and speed; and laser lighting displays in entertainment. Fundamentals Lasers are distinguished from other light sources by their coherence.'
p5987
aS'Spatial coherence is typically expressed through the output being a narrow beam, which is diffraction-limited.'
p5988
aS'In the case of NaCl, the lattice energy is the energy released by the reactionNa+ (g) + Cl- (g) - NaCl (s)which would amount to -786 kJ/mol.Some older textbooks define lattice energy with the opposite sign, i.e.'
p5989
aS'the energy required to convert the crystal into infinitely separated gaseous ions, atoms, or molecules in vacuum, an endothermic process.'
p5990
aS'Following this convention, the lattice energy of NaCl would be +786 kJ/mol.'
p5991
aS'The lattice energy for ionic crystals such as sodium chloride, metals such as iron, or covalently linked materials such as diamond is considerably greater in magnitude than for solids such as sugar or iodine, whose neutral molecules interact only by weaker dipole-dipole or van der Waals forces.The precise value of the lattice energy may not be determined experimentally, because of the impossibility of preparing an adequate amount of gaseous ions or atoms and measuring the energy released during their condensation to form the solid.'
p5992
aS'However, the value of the lattice energy may either be derived theoretically from electrostatics or from a thermodynamic cycling reaction, the so-called Born-Haber cycle.The relationship between the molar lattice energy and the molar lattice enthalpy is given by the following equation:, where  is the molar lattice energy,  the molar lattice enthalpy and  the change of the volume per mol.'
p5993
aS'Therefore the lattice enthalpy further takes into account that work has to be performed against an outer pressure . Theoretical treatments  Born-Lande equation In 1918 Born and Lande proposed that the lattice energy could be derived from the electric potential of the ionic lattice and a repulsive potential energy term.whereNA is the Avogadro constant;M is the Madelung constant, relating to the geometry of the crystal;z+ is the charge number of cation;z- is the charge number of anion;qe is the elementary charge, equal to 69811602200000000001.6022x10-19 C;e0 is the permittivity of free space, equal to 69888854000000000008.854x10-12 C2 J-1 m-1;r0 is the distance to closest ion; andn is the Born exponent, a number between 5 and 12, determined experimentally by measuring the compressibility of the solid, or derived theoretically.The Born-Lande equation gives a reasonable fit to the lattice energy.From the Born-Lande equation it can be seen that the lattice energy of a compound is dependent on a number of factorsas the charges on the ions increase the lattice energy increases (becomes more negative),when ions are closer together the lattice energy increases (becomes more negative)Barium oxide (BaO), for instance, which has the NaCl structure and therefore the same Madelung constant, has a bond radius of 275 picometers and a lattice energy of -3054 kJ/mol, while sodium chloride (NaCl) has a bond radius of 283 picometers and a lattice energy of -786 kJ/mol. Kapustinskii equation The Kapustinskii equation can be used as a simpler way of deriving lattice energies where high precision is not required. Effect of polarisation For ionic compounds with ions occupying lattice sites with crystallographic point groups C1, C1h, Cn or Cnv (n  2, 3, 4 or 6) the concept of the lattice energy and the Born-Haber cycle has to be extended.'
p5994
aS'In these cases the polarization energy Epol associated with ions on polar lattice sites has to be included in the Born-Haber cycle and the solid formation reaction has to start from the already polarized species.'
p5995
aS'Sterne died in London after years of fighting consumption. Early life and education Sterne was born in Clonmel, County Tipperary.'
p5996
aS"His father, Roger Sterne, was an ensign in a British regiment recently returned from Dunkirk, which was disbanded on the day of Sterne's birth."
p5997
aS'Within six months the family had returned to Yorkshire, and in July 1715 they moved back to Ireland, having "decamped with Bag & Baggage for Dublin", in Sterne\'s words.The first decade of Sterne\'s life was spent moving from place to place as his father was reassigned throughout Ireland.'
p5998
aS'During this period Sterne never lived in one place for more than a year.'
p5999
aS'In addition to Clonmel and Dublin, his family also lived in, among other places, Wicklow Town, Annamoe (County Wicklow), Drogheda (County Louth), Castlepollard (County Westmeath), and Carrickfergus (County Antrim).'
p6000
aS"In 1724, his father took Sterne to Roger's wealthy brother, Richard, so that Sterne could attend Hipperholme Grammar School near Halifax; Sterne never saw his father again as Roger was ordered to Jamaica where he died of a fever in 1731."
p6001
aS'Sterne was admitted to a sizarship at Jesus College, Cambridge, in July 1733 at the age of 20.'
p6002
aS"Even though it was considered unusual in his era, he decided to study the topic of moral judgment, extending Jean_Piaget's account of children's moral development from twenty-five years earlier."
p6003
aS'In fact, it took Kohlberg five years before he was able to publish an article based on his views.'
p6004
aS"Kohlberg's work reflected and extended not only Piaget's findings but also the theories of philosophers George Herbert Mead and James Mark Baldwin."
p6005
aS'At the same time he was creating a new field within psychology: "moral development".'
p6006
aS"Scholars such as Elliot Turiel and James Rest have responded to Kohlberg's work with their own significant contributions."
p6007
aS'In an empirical study by Haggbloom et al.'
p6008
aS'using six criteria, such as citations and recognition, Kohlberg was found to be the 30th most eminent psychologist of the 20th century. Early life Lawrence_Kohlberg was born in Bronxville, New York.'
p6009
aS'According to music critic Donal Henahan, he was "one of the most prodigiously talented and successful musicians in American history.'
p6010
aS'"His fame derived from his long tenure as the music director of the New York Philharmonic, from his conducting of concerts with most of the world\'s leading orchestras, and from his music for West Side Story, Peter Pan, Candide, Wonderful Town, On the Town, On The Waterfront, his Mass, and a range of other compositions, including three symphonies and many shorter chamber and solo works.Bernstein was the first conductor to give numerous television lectures on classical music, starting in 1954 and continuing until his death.'
p6011
aS'He was a skilled pianist, often conducting piano concertos from the keyboard.As a composer he wrote in many styles encompassing symphonic and orchestral music, ballet, film and theatre music, choral works, opera, chamber music and pieces for the piano.'
p6012
aS'Many of his works are regularly performed around the world, although none has matched the tremendous popular and commercial success of West Side Story. Biography  Early life He was born Louis Bernstein in Lawrence, Massachusetts, the son of Ukrainian Jewish parents Jennie (nee Resnick) and Samuel Joseph Bernstein, a hairdressing supplies wholesaler originating from Rovno (now Ukraine).'
p6013
aS'He was not related to film composer Elmer Bernstein, but the two men were friends, and even shared a certain physical similarity.'
p6014
aS'Within the world of professional music, they were distinguished from each other by the use of the nicknames Bernstein West (Elmer) and Bernstein East (Leonard).His family spent their summers at their vacation home in Sharon, Massachusetts.'
p6015
aS'His grandmother insisted that his first name be Louis, but his parents always called him Leonard, which they preferred.'
p6016
aS'His eighteen-year term as General Secretary was second only to that of Joseph Stalin in duration.'
p6017
aS"During Brezhnev's rule, the global influence of the Soviet Union grew dramatically, in part because of the expansion of the Soviet military during this time."
p6018
aS"His tenure as leader was marked by the beginning of an era of economic and social stagnation in the Soviet Union.Brezhnev was born in Kamenskoe into a Russian worker's family."
p6019
aS'After graduating from the Dniprodzerzhynsk Metallurgical Technicum, he became a metallurgical engineer in the iron and steel industry, in Ukraine.'
p6020
aS'He joined Komsomol in 1923, and in 1929 became an active member of the CPSU.'
p6021
aS'He was drafted into immediate military service during World_War_II and left the army in 1946 with the rank of major general.'
p6022
aS'In 1952 Brezhnev became a member of the Central Committee, and in 1964, Brezhnev succeeded Nikita_Khrushchev as First Secretary, while Alexei Kosygin succeeded Khrushchev in his post as Soviet premier.As a leader, Brezhnev took care to consult his colleagues before acting, but his attempt to govern without meaningful economic reforms led to a national decline by the mid-1970s, a period referred to as the Era of Stagnation.'
p6023
aS'His later, mature works incorporate his earlier studies of national folk music in a modern, highly original synthesis, first evident in the opera Jenufa, which was premiered in 1904 in Brno.'
p6024
aS'The success of Jenufa (often called the "Moravian national opera") at Prague in 1916 gave Janacek access to the world\'s great opera stages.'
p6025
aS"Janacek's later works are his most celebrated."
p6026
aS'They include operas such as Kata Kabanova and The Cunning Little Vixen, the Sinfonietta, the Glagolitic Mass, the rhapsody Taras Bulba, two string quartets, and other chamber works.'
p6027
aS'Along with Antonin_Dvorak and Bedrich_Smetana, he is considered one of the most important Czech composers. Biography  Early life Leos_Janacek, son of schoolmaster Jiri (1815-1866) and Amalie (nee Grulichova) Janackova (1819-1884), was born in Hukvaldy, Moravia (then part of the Austrian Empire).'
p6028
aS'He was a gifted child in a family of limited means, and showed an early musical talent in choral singing.'
p6029
aS"His father wanted him to follow the family tradition, and become a teacher, but deferred to Janacek's obvious musical abilities."
p6030
aS'Each figure is depicted in a disconcerting confrontational manner and none are conventionally feminine.'
p6031
aS'The women appear as slightly menacing and rendered with angular and disjointed body shapes.'
p6032
aS"Three figures on the left exhibit facial features in the Iberian style of Picasso's native Spain, while the two on the right are shown with African mask-like features."
p6033
aS'The racial primitivism evoked in these masks, according to Picasso, moved him to "liberate an utterly original artistic style of compelling, even savage force.'
p6034
aS'"In this adaptation of Primitivism and abandonment of perspective in favor of a flat, two-dimensional picture plane, Picasso makes a radical departure from traditional European painting.'
p6035
aS'This proto-Cubist work is widely considered to be seminal in the early development of both Cubism and Modern art.'
p6036
aS'Les Demoiselles was revolutionary and controversial, and led to wide anger and disagreement, even amongst his closest associates and friends.'
p6037
aS"His accomplishments include the independent co-discovery of the density matrix method in quantum mechanics (alongside John_von_Neumann), the quantum mechanical theory of diamagnetism, the theory of superfluidity, the theory of second-order phase transitions, the Ginzburg-Landau theory of superconductivity, the theory of Fermi liquid, the explanation of Landau damping in plasma physics, the Landau pole in quantum electrodynamics, the two-component theory of neutrinos, and Landau's equations for S matrix singularities."
p6038
aS'He received the 1962 Nobel Prize in Physics for his development of a mathematical theory of superfluidity that accounts for the properties of liquid helium II at a temperature below 70002170000000000002.17 K (7000216999999999995-270.98 degC). Life  Early years Landau was born on January 22, 1908 to Jewish parents in Baku, in what was then the Russian Empire.'
p6039
aS"Landau's father was an engineer with the local oil industry and his mother was a doctor."
p6040
aS'Recognized very early as a child prodigy in mathematics, Landau was quoted as saying in later life that he scarcely remembered a time when he was not familiar with calculus.'
p6041
aS'He learned to differentiate at 12 and to integrate at 13.'
p6042
aS'Landau graduated at 13 from gymnasium.'
p6043
aS'His parents considered him too young to attend university, so for a year he attended the Baku Economical Technicum.'
p6044
aS'The work concerns the structure of society and legitimate government, and is regarded as one of the earliest and most influential examples of social contract theory.'
p6045
aS"Leviathan ranks as a classic western work on statecraft comparable to Machiavelli's The_Prince."
p6046
aS'Written during the English Civil War (1642-1651), Leviathan argues for a social contract and rule by an absolute sovereign.'
p6047
aS'Hobbes wrote that civil war and the brute situation of a state of nature ("the war of all against all") could only be avoided by strong undivided government. Content  Frontispiece After lengthy discussion with Hobbes, the Parisian Abraham Bosse created the etching for the book\'s famous frontispiece in the geometrique style which Bosse himself had refined.'
p6048
aS"It is similar in organisation to the frontispiece of Hobbes' De Cive (1642), created by Jean Matheus."
p6049
aS'The frontispiece has two main elements, of which the upper part is by far the more striking.In it, a giant crowned figure is seen emerging from the landscape, clutching a sword and a crosier, beneath a quote from the Book of Job--"Non est potestas Super Terram quae Comparetur ei.'
p6050
aS'Iob.'
p6051
aS'In literature (e.g., Herman Melville\'s Moby-Dick) it refers to great whales, and in Modern Hebrew, it simply means "whale".'
p6052
aS'It is described extensively in Job 41 and mentioned in Job 3:8, Amos 9:2, Psalm 74:13-24, Psalm 104:26 and Isaiah 27:1. Tanakh The Leviathan is mentioned six times in the Tanakh, with Job 41:1-34 being dedicated to describing him in detail:1 Can you pull in the leviathan with a fishhook or tie down his tongue with a rope?2 Can you put a cord through his nose or pierce his jaw with a hook?3 Will he keep begging you for mercy?'
p6053
aS'Will he speak to you with gentle words?4 Will he make an agreement with you for you to take him as your slave for life?5 Can you make a pet of him like a bird or put him on a leash for your girls?6 Will traders barter for him?'
p6054
aS'Will they divide him up among the merchants?7 Can you fill his hide with harpoons or his head with fishing spears?8 If you lay a hand on him, you will remember the struggle and never do it again!9 Any hope of subduing him is false; the mere sight of him is overpowering.10 No-one is fierce enough to rouse him.'
p6055
aS'Who then is able to stand against me?11 Who has a claim against me that I must pay?'
p6056
aS'Everything under heaven belongs to me.12 I will not fail to speak of his limbs, his strength and his graceful form.13 Who can strip off his outer coat?'
p6057
aS'Who would approach him with a bridle?14 Who dares open the doors of his mouth, ringed about with his fearsome teeth?15 His back has rows of shields tightly sealed together;16 Each is so close to the next that no air can pass between.17 They are joined fast to one another; they cling together and cannot be parted.18 His snorting throws out flashes of light; his eyes are like the rays of dawn.19 Firebrands stream from his mouth; sparks of fire shoot out.20 Smoke pours from his nostrils as from a boiling pot over a fire of reeds.21 His breath sets coals ablaze, and flames dart from his mouth.22 Strength resides in his neck; dismay goes before him.23 The folds of his flesh are tightly joined; they are firm and immovable.24 His chest is hard as rock, hard as a lower millstone.25 When he rises up, the mighty are terrified; they retreat before his thrashing.26 The sword that reaches him has no effect, nor does the spear or the dart or the javelin.27 Iron he treats like straw and bronze like rotten wood.28 Arrows do not make him flee, sling stones are like chaff to him.29 A club seems to him but a piece of straw, he laughs at the rattling of the lance.30 His undersides are jagged potsherds, leaving a trail in the mud like a threshing-sledge.31 He makes the depths churn like a boiling cauldron and stirs up the sea like a pot of ointment.32 Behind him he leaves a glistening wake; one would think the deep had white hair.33 Nothing on earth is his equal--a creature without fear.34 He looks down on all that are haughty; he is king over all that are proud.In Psalm 74 God is said to "break the heads of Leviathan in pieces" before giving his flesh to the people of the wilderness.'
p6058
aS'Senator representing Michigan, and co-founder as well as first Masonic Grand Master of the Grand Lodge of Michigan.'
p6059
aS'He was the losing nominee of the Democratic Party for president in 1848.'
p6060
aS'Cass was nationally famous as a leading spokesman for the controversial Doctrine of Popular Sovereignty, which would have allowed voters in the territories to determine whether to make slavery legal instead of having Congress decide. Early life Cass was born in Exeter, New Hampshire, where he attended Phillips Exeter Academy.'
p6061
aS'His parents were Major Jonathan Cass and Molly Gilman.'
p6062
aS'In 1800 he moved with his family to Marietta, Ohio.'
p6063
aS'On May 26, 1806, he married Elizabeth Spencer.'
p6064
aS'He was initiated an Entered Apprentice of the Freemasons in what is now American Union Lodge No.1 at Marietta on December 5, 1803.'
p6065
aS'Interested in what holds societies together, he proposed the concept that the earliest human domestic institution was the matrilineal clan, not the patriarchal family.Also interested in what leads to social change, he was a contemporary of the European social theorists Karl_Marx and Friedrich Engels, who were influenced by reading his work on social structure and material culture, the influence of technology on progress.'
p6066
aS'Morgan is the only American social theorist to be cited by such diverse scholars as Marx, Charles Darwin, and Sigmund_Freud.'
p6067
aS"Elected as a member of the National Academy of Sciences, Morgan served as president of the American Association for the Advancement of Science in 1879.Morgan was a Republican member of the New York State Assembly (Monroe Co., 2nd D.) in 1861, and of the New York State Senate in 1868 and 1869. Biography  The American Morgans According to Herbert Marshall Lloyd, an attorney and editor of Morgan's works, Lewis was descended from James Morgan, brother of Miles, who were Welsh pioneers of Connecticut and Springfield, Massachusetts, respectively."
p6068
aS'Various sources record that the three sons of William Morgan of Llandaff, Glamorganshire, took passage for Boston in 1636.'
p6069
aS'From there Miles went to Springfield, James to New London, Connecticut and John Morgan to Virginia.'
p6070
aS'Lloyd writes, "From these two brothers [James and Miles] all the Morgans prominent in the annals of New York and New England are believed to be descended."'
p6071
aS'The Morgans to which he refers played a critical part in the foundation of the colonies.'
p6072
aS'Mumford was influenced by the work of Scottish theorist Sir Patrick Geddes and worked closely with his associate the British sociologist Victor Branford.Mumford was also a contemporary and friend of Frank Lloyd Wright, Clarence Stein, Frederic Osborn, Edmund N. Bacon, and Vannevar Bush. Life Mumford was born in Flushing, Queens, New York and graduated from Stuyvesant High School in 1912.'
p6073
aS'He studied at the City College of New York and The New School for Social Research, but became ill with tuberculosis and never finished his degree.'
p6074
aS'In 1918 he joined the navy to serve in World_War_I and was assigned as a radio electrician.'
p6075
aS'He was discharged in 1919 and became associate editor of The Dial, an influential modernist literary journal.'
p6076
aS"He later worked for The New Yorker where he wrote architectural criticism and commentary on urban issues.Mumford's earliest books in the field of literary criticism have had a lasting impact on contemporary American literary criticism."
p6077
aS'The Golden Day contributed to a resurgence in scholarly research on the work of 1850s American transcendentalist authors and Herman Melville: A Study of His Life and Vision effectively launched a revival in the study of the work of Herman Melville.'
p6078
aS'Soon after, with the book The Brown Decades, he began to establish himself as an authority in American architecture and urban life, which he interpreted in a social context.In his early writings on urban life, Mumford was optimistic about human abilities and wrote that the human race would use electricity and mass communication to build a better world for all humankind.'
p6079
aS'Lichens come in many colors, sizes, and forms.'
p6080
aS'The properties are sometimes plant-like, but lichens are not plants.'
p6081
aS'Lichens may have tiny, leafless branches (fruticose), flat leaf-like structures (foliose), flakes that lie on the surface like peeling paint (crustose), or other growth forms.'
p6082
aS'A macrolichen is a lichen that is either bush-like or leafy; all other lichens are termed microlichens.'
p6083
aS'Here, "macro" and "micro" do not refer to size, but to the growth form.'
p6084
aS'Common names for lichens may contain the word "moss" (e.g., "Reindeer moss", "Iceland moss"), and lichens may superficially look like and grow with mosses, but lichens are not related to mosses or any plant.'
p6085
aS'Lichens do not have roots that absorb water and nutrients as plants do but like plants they produce their own food by photosynthesis using sunlight energy, from carbon dioxide, water and minerals in their environment.'
p6086
aS'The description of his encounters with the countryside on the banks of the River Wye grows into an outline of his general philosophy.'
p6087
aS"There has been considerable debate about why evidence of the human presence in the landscape has been downplayed and in what way the poem fits within the 18th century loco-descriptive genre. Background The poem has its roots in Wordsworth's personal history."
p6088
aS'He had previously visited the area as a troubled twenty-three-year-old in August 1793.'
p6089
aS'Since then he had matured and his seminal poetical relationship with Samuel_Taylor_Coleridge had begun.'
p6090
aS'Wordsworth claimed to have composed the poem entirely in his head, beginning it upon leaving Tintern and not jotting down so much as a line until he reached Bristol, by which time it had just reached mental completion.'
p6091
aS'Although the Lyrical_Ballads upon which the two friends had been working was by then already in publication, he was so pleased with what he had just written that he had it inserted at the eleventh hour as the concluding poem.'
p6092
aS"Scholars generally agree that it is apt, for the poem represents the climax of Wordsworth's first great period of creative output and prefigures much of the distinctively Wordsworthian verse that was to follow.The poem is written in tightly-structured decasyllabic blank verse and comprises verse-paragraphs rather than stanzas."
p6093
aS"Equivalently, holomorphic functions on  have dense images.The theorem is considerably improved by Picard's little theorem, which says that every entire function whose image omits at least two complex numbers must be constant. Proof The theorem follows from the fact that holomorphic functions are analytic."
p6094
aS"If f is an entire function, it can be represented by its Taylor series about 0:where (by Cauchy's integral formula)and Cr is the circle about 0 of radius r > 0."
p6095
aS'Suppose f is bounded: i.e.'
p6096
aS'there exists a constant M such that |f(z)| < M for all z.'
p6097
aS'We can estimate directlywhere in the second inequality we have used the fact that |z|r on the circle Cr.'
p6098
aS'But the choice of r in the above is an arbitrary positive number.'
p6099
aS'Therefore, letting r tend to infinity (we let r tend to infinity since f is analytic on the entire plane) gives ak  0 for all k > 1.'
p6100
aS'There are many different types of liquid-crystal phases, which can be distinguished by their different optical properties (such as birefringence).'
p6101
aS'When viewed under a microscope using a polarized light source, different liquid crystal phases will appear to have distinct textures.'
p6102
aS'The contrasting areas in the textures correspond to domains where the liquid-crystal molecules are oriented in different directions.'
p6103
aS'Within a domain, however, the molecules are well ordered.'
p6104
aS'LC materials may not always be in a liquid-crystal phase (just as water may turn into ice or steam).Liquid_crystals can be divided into thermotropic, lyotropic and metallotropic phases.'
p6105
aS'Thermotropic and lyotropic liquid crystals consist of organic molecules.'
p6106
aS'Thermotropic LCs exhibit a phase transition into the liquid-crystal phase as temperature is changed.'
p6107
aS'For real/famous dogs, see List of dogs.'
p6108
aS'For mythological dogs, see Mythological dogs. Literature  Comics  Media  Film  Television  Animation  Radio Boggins in Adam and Joe on BBC 6 Music, 2009, voiced by Adam Buxton. Song Only songs with dog characters are included in this section.'
p6109
aS'Not metaphorical dogs or songs with "dog" in the title.Apollo, from various Coheed & Cambria songs, whose name appears in the titles of their third and fourth albumsArrow, from Harry Nilsson\'s single "Me and My Arrow", also featured in The Point!'
p6110
aS'"Atomic Dog" by George ClintonBingo, from the spelling song of the same name.'
p6111
aS"It's worth noting that the lyrics do not make it clear whether Bingo is the name of the dog or the farmer."
p6112
aS'"Black Shuck", song by The Darkness about the spectral black dog, Black ShuckBoo, from "Me and You and a Dog Named Boo", a 1971 song by Lobo (aka Roland Kent Lavoie)"Bow Wow Wow Wow (Wild Dog on the Prowl)" sung by Mitch Ryder with Was (Not Was)Carlos, "A little chihuahua ... that had some kind of skin disease and was totally blind" in the song "Frank\'s Wild Years" by Tom Waits"Hey Bulldog", a song by The Beatles"Feed Jake" - a song about a dog named Jake by Pirates of the MississippiFido, a talking dog from the Frank Zappa song "Stinkfoot".Frank, in "Classified" by C. W. McCallFronobulax, a large poodle, appears on the Frank Zappa and the Mothers album Roxy and Elsewhere.'
p6113
aS'"Gonna Buy Me A Dog", by The Monkees"(How Much Is) That Doggie in the Window?'
p6114
aS'The liver has a wide range of functions, including detoxification of various metabolites, protein synthesis, and the production of biochemicals necessary for digestion.The liver is a gland and plays a major role in metabolism with numerous functions in the human body, including regulation of glycogen storage, decomposition of red blood cells, plasma protein synthesis, hormone production, and detoxification.'
p6115
aS'It is an accessory digestive gland and produces bile, an alkaline compound which aids in digestion via the emulsification of lipids.'
p6116
aS'The gallbladder, a small pouch that sits just under the liver, stores bile produced by the liver.'
p6117
aS"The liver's highly specialized tissue consisting of mostly hepatocytes regulates a wide variety of high-volume biochemical reactions, including the synthesis and breakdown of small and complex molecules, many of which are necessary for normal vital functions."
p6118
aS"Estimates regarding the organ's total number of functions vary, but textbooks generally cite it being around 500.Terminology related to the liver often starts in hepar- or hepat- from the Greek word for liver, hepar (epar, root hepat-, epat-).There is currently no way to compensate for the absence of liver function in the long term, although liver dialysis techniques can be used in the short term."
p6119
aS'Liver transplantation is the only option for complete liver failure. Structure The liver is a reddish brown wedge-shaped organ with four lobes of unequal size and shape.'
p6120
aS'A human liver normally weighs 1.44-1.66 kg (3.2-3.7 lb).'
p6121
aS'It is part of the Knight of the Swan tradition.The opera has proved inspirational towards other works of art.'
p6122
aS'Among those deeply moved by the fairy-tale opera was the young King Ludwig II of Bavaria.'
p6123
aS'"Der Marchenkonig" ("The Fairy-tale King"), as he was dubbed, later built his ideal fairy-tale castle and dubbed it "New Swan Stone", or "Neuschwanstein", after the Swan Knight.'
p6124
aS'It was King Ludwig\'s patronage that later gave Wagner the means and opportunity to compose, build a theatre for, and stage his epic cycle The Ring of the Nibelung.The most popular and recognizable part of the opera is the Bridal Chorus, better known as "Here Comes the Bride", often played as a processional at weddings in the West. Performance history The first production of Lohengrin was in Weimar, Germany, on 28 August 1850 at the Staatskapelle Weimar under the direction of Franz_Liszt, a close friend and early supporter of Wagner.'
p6125
aS"Liszt chose the date in honour of Weimar's most famous citizen, Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, who was born on 28 August 1749."
p6126
aS'Despite the inadequacies of the lead tenor Karl Beck, it was an immediate popular success.Wagner himself was unable to attend the first performance, having been exiled because of his part in the 1849 May Uprising in Dresden.'
p6127
aS"Although he conducted various extracts in concert in Zurich, London, Paris and Brussels, it was not until 1861 in Vienna that he was able to attend a full performance.The opera's first performance outside German-speaking lands was in Riga on 5 February 1855."
p6128
aS'By the jotunn Angrboda, Loki is the father of Hel, the wolf Fenrir, and the world serpent Jormungandr.'
p6129
aS'By his wife Sigyn, Loki is the father of Narfi and/or Nari.'
p6130
aS'By the stallion Svadilfari, Loki is the mother--giving birth in the form of a mare--to the eight-legged horse Sleipnir.'
p6131
aS"In addition, Loki is referred to as the father of Vali in the Prose Edda.Loki's relation with the gods varies by source; Loki sometimes assists the gods and sometimes behaves in a malicious manner towards them."
p6132
aS"Loki is a shape shifter and in separate incidents he appears in the form of a salmon, a mare, a seal, a fly, and possibly an elderly woman named Thokk (Old Norse 'thanks')."
p6133
aS"Loki's positive relations with the gods end with his role in engineering the death of the god Baldr and Loki is eventually bound by the gods with the entrails of one of his sons."
p6134
aS'In both the Poetic Edda and the Prose Edda, the goddess Skadi is responsible for placing a serpent above him while he is bound.'
p6135
aS'The novel is notable for its controversial subject: the protagonist and unreliable narrator, a 37-to-38-year-old literature professor called Humbert_Humbert, who is obsessed with the 12-year-old Dolores Haze, with whom he becomes sexually involved after he becomes her stepfather.'
p6136
aS'"Lolita" is his private nickname for Dolores.After its publication, Lolita attained a classic status, becoming one of the best-known and most controversial examples of 20th century literature.'
p6137
aS'The novel was adapted to film by Stanley Kubrick in 1962, and again in 1997 by Adrian Lyne.'
p6138
aS'It has also been adapted several times for stage and has been the subject of two operas, two ballets, and an acclaimed but failed Broadway musical.'
p6139
aS'The name "Lolita" has entered pop culture to describe a sexually precocious girl.The Nabokov translation into Russian was published by Phaedra Publishers in New York in 1967.Lolita is included on Time\'s List of the 100 Best Novels in the English language from 1923 to 2005.'
p6140
aS"It is fourth on the Modern Library's 1998 list of the 100 Best Novels of the 20th century."
p6141
aS'It was also included in the Bokklubben World Library, a 2002 collection of the most highly regarded books in history. Plot summary Humbert_Humbert, a European literary scholar, describes the premature death of his childhood sweetheart, Annabel Leigh.'
p6142
aS"London's ancient core, the City of London, largely retains its 1.12-square-mile (2.9 km2) medieval boundaries and in 2011 had a resident population of 7,375, making it the smallest city in England."
p6143
aS'Since at least the 19th century, the term London has also referred to the metropolis developed around this core.'
p6144
aS'The bulk of this conurbation forms Greater London, a region of England governed by the Mayor of London and the London Assembly.'
p6145
aS'The conurbation also covers two English counties: the City of London and the county of Greater London.London is a leading global city, with strengths in the arts, commerce, education, entertainment, fashion, finance, healthcare, media, professional services, research and development, tourism, and transport all contributing to its prominence.'
p6146
aS"It is one of the world's leading financial centres and has the fifth-or sixth-largest metropolitan area GDP in the world depending on measurement."
p6147
aS'London is a world cultural capital.'
p6148
aS"It is the world's most-visited city as measured by international arrivals and has the world's largest city airport system measured by passenger traffic."
p6149
aS'It influenced a large number of intellectuals, and appears by title in many of the major Marxist writings of the day.'
p6150
aS'"It is one of the few books ever published that created almost immediately on its appearance a political mass movement".'
p6151
aS'In the United_States alone, over 162 "Bellamy Clubs" sprang up to discuss and propagate the book\'s ideas.'
p6152
aS'Owing to its commitment to the nationalization of private property, this political movement came to be known as Nationalism, not to be confused with the political concept of nationalism.'
p6153
aS'The novel also inspired several utopian communities. Synopsis The book tells the story of Julian West, a young American who, towards the end of the 19th century, falls into a deep, hypnosis-induced sleep and wakes up one hundred and thirteen years later.'
p6154
aS'He finds himself in the same location (Boston, Massachusetts), but in a totally changed world: It is the year 2000 and, while he was sleeping, the United_States has been transformed into a socialist utopia.'
p6155
aS"The remainder of the book outlines Bellamy's thoughts about improving the future."
p6156
aS"The novel is a reaction to the youth novel The Coral Island by R. M. Ballantyne.Published in 1954, Lord_of_the_Flies was Golding's first novel."
p6157
aS'Although it was not a great success at the time--selling fewer than 3,000 copies in the United_States during 1955 before going out of print--it soon went on to become a best-seller.'
p6158
aS'It has been adapted to film twice in English, in 1963 by Peter Brook and 1990 by Harry Hook, and once in Filipino (1976).In 2005 the novel was chosen by TIME magazine as one of the 100 best English-language novels from 1923 to 2005.'
p6159
aS"It was awarded a place on both lists of Modern Library 100 Best Novels, reaching number 41 on the editor's list, and 25 on the reader's list."
p6160
aS"In 2003, the novel was listed at number 70 on the BBC's survey The Big Read. BackgroundEdit The book indicates that it takes place in the midst of an unspecified nuclear war."
p6161
aS'Some of the marooned characters are ordinary students, while others arrive as a musical choir under an established leader.'
p6162
aS'Most (with the exception of the choirboys) appear never to have encountered one another before.'
p6163
aS'His book of Commentari contains important writing on art, as well as what may be the earliest surviving autobiography by any artist. Life  Early life Ghiberti was born in Pelago, 20 km from Florence.'
p6164
aS'His father was Bartoluccio Ghiberti, an artist and goldsmith, who trained his son in goldsmithing.'
p6165
aS'He then went to work in the Florence workshop of Bartoluccio de Michele, where Brunelleschi also got his training.'
p6166
aS"When the bubonic plague struck Florence in 1400, Ghiberti emigrated to Rimini, where he assisted in the completion of wall frescoes of the castle of Carlo I Malatesta. Florence Baptistery doors Ghiberti's career was dominated by his two successive commissions for pairs of bronze doors to the Florence Baptistery (Battistero di San Giovanni)."
p6167
aS'They are recognized as a major masterpiece of the Early Renaissance, and were famous and influential from their unveiling.'
p6168
aS'Ghiberti first became famous when as a 23-year-old he won the 1401 competition for the first set of bronze doors; Brunelleschi was the runner up.'
p6169
aS'The original plan was for the doors to depict scenes from the Old Testament, and the trial piece was the sacrifice of Isaac, which survives.'
p6170
aS"He was also skilled at scat singing (vocalizing using sounds and syllables instead of actual lyrics).Renowned for his charismatic stage presence and voice almost as much as for his trumpet-playing, Armstrong's influence extends well beyond jazz music, and by the end of his career in the 1960s, he was widely regarded as a profound influence on popular music in general."
p6171
aS'Armstrong was one of the first truly popular African-American entertainers to "cross over", whose skin color was secondary to his music in an America that was severely racially divided.'
p6172
aS'He rarely publicly politicized his race, often to the dismay of fellow African-Americans, but took a well-publicized stand for desegregation during the Little Rock Crisis.'
p6173
aS'His artistry and personality allowed him socially acceptable access to the upper echelons of American society that were highly restricted for black men. Early life Armstrong often stated that he was born on July 4, 1900, a date that has been noted in many biographies.'
p6174
aS'Although he died in 1971, it was not until the mid-1980s that his true birth date of August 4, 1901 was discovered by researcher Tad Jones through the examination of baptismal records.'
p6175
aS'Armstrong was born into a very poor family in New_Orleans, Louisiana, the grandson of slaves.'
p6176
aS'He spent his youth in poverty, in a rough neighborhood, known as "the Battlefield", which was part of the Storyville legal prostitution district.'
p6177
aS'Riel sought to preserve Metis rights and culture as their homelands in the Northwest came progressively under the Canadian sphere of influence.'
p6178
aS'He is regarded by many today as a Canadian folk hero.The first resistance was the Red River Rebellion of 1869-1870.'
p6179
aS'The provisional government established by Riel ultimately negotiated the terms under which the modern province of Manitoba entered the Canadian Confederation.'
p6180
aS'Riel was forced into exile in the United_States due to the controversial execution of Thomas Scott during the rebellion.'
p6181
aS'Despite this, he is frequently referred to as the "Father of Manitoba".'
p6182
aS'While a fugitive, he was elected three times to the Canadian House of Commons, although he never assumed his seat.'
p6183
aS'During these years, he was frustrated by having to remain in exile despite his growing belief that he was a divinely chosen leader and prophet, a belief which would later resurface and influence his actions.'
p6184
aS'Along with Henry Hobson Richardson and Frank Lloyd Wright, Sullivan is one of "the recognized trinity of American architecture".'
p6185
aS'In 1944, he was the second architect in history to posthumously receive the AIA Gold Medal. Early life and career Louis Henry Sullivan was born to an Irish-born father, Patrick Sullivan, and a Swiss-born mother, nee Andrienne List, both of whom had immigrated to the United_States in the late 1840s.'
p6186
aS'After graduating from high school, Sullivan studied architecture briefly at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.'
p6187
aS'Learning that he could both graduate from high school a year early and pass up the first two years at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology by passing a series of examinations, Sullivan entered MIT at the age of sixteen.'
p6188
aS"After one year of study, he moved to Philadelphia and took a job with architect Frank Furness.The Depression of 1873 dried up much of Furness's work, and he was forced to let Sullivan go."
p6189
aS'At that point Sullivan moved on to Chicago in 1873 to take part in the building boom following the Great Chicago Fire of 1871.'
p6190
aS'He worked for William LeBaron Jenney, the architect often credited with erecting the first steel-frame building.'
p6191
aS"An adherent of the concept of the divine right of kings, which advocates the divine origin of monarchical rule, Louis continued his predecessors' work of creating a centralized state governed from the capital."
p6192
aS"He sought to eliminate the remnants of feudalism persisting in parts of France and, by compelling many members of the nobility to inhabit his lavish Palace of Versailles (formerly a hunting lodge belonging to Louis's father), succeeded in pacifying the aristocracy, many members of which had participated in the Fronde rebellion during Louis's minority."
p6193
aS"By these means he became one of the most powerful French monarchs and consolidated a system of absolute monarchical rule in France that endured until the French Revolution.During Louis's reign, France was the leading European power and it fought three major wars: the Franco-Dutch War, the War of the League of Augsburg, and the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession."
p6194
aS'There were also two lesser conflicts: the War of Devolution and the War of the Reunions.'
p6195
aS'Louis encouraged and benefited from the work of prominent political, military, and cultural figures such as Mazarin, Colbert, the Grand Conde, Turenne and Vauban, as well as Moliere, Racine, Boileau, La Fontaine, Lully, Marais, Le Brun, Rigaud, Bossuet, Le Vau, Mansart, Charles and Claude Perrault, and Le Notre.Upon his death just days before his seventy-seventh birthday, Louis was succeeded by his five-year-old great-grandson, Louis XV.'
p6196
aS"All of his intermediate heirs predeceased him: his son Louis, le Grand Dauphin; the Dauphin's eldest son Louis, Duke of Burgundy; and Burgundy's eldest son Louis, Duke of Brittany (the elder brother of Louis XV). Early years Louis XIV was born on 5 September 1638 in the Chateau de Saint-Germain-en-Laye to Louis XIII and Anne of Austria."
p6197
aS'He was named Louis Dieudonne (Louis the God-given) and also bore the traditional title of French heirs apparent: Dauphin.'
p6198
aS'Until he reached maturity in 1723, his kingdom was ruled by Philippe II, Duke of Orleans as Regent of France; the duke was his maternal great-uncle, as well as first cousin twice removed patrilineally.'
p6199
aS"Cardinal Fleury was his chief minister from 1726 until the Cardinal's death in 1743, at which time the young king took sole control of the kingdom.During his reign, Louis returned the Austrian Netherlands; this territory was won at the Battle of Fontenoy of 1745 but given back to Austria by the terms of the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle of 1748."
p6200
aS"Louis also ceded New France in North America to Spain and Great Britain at the conclusion of the Seven Years' War in 1763."
p6201
aS'He incorporated the territories of Lorraine and Corsica into the kingdom of France.'
p6202
aS"He was succeeded by his grandson Louis XVI in 1774.Most scholars believe Louis XV's decisions damaged the power of France, weakened the treasury, discredited the absolute monarchy, and made it more vulnerable to distrust and destruction, as happened in the French Revolution, which broke out 15 years after his death."
p6203
aS'Norman Davies says that after Louis XV took full control in 1723, his reign "was one of debilitating stagnation," characterized by lost wars, endless clashes between the Court and Parliament, and religious feuds.'
p6204
aS'A few scholars defend Louis, arguing that his highly negative reputation was based on propaganda meant to justify the French Revolution.'
p6205
aS'Tarquin was said to have been the son or grandson of Lucius Tarquinius Priscus, the fifth king of Rome, and to have gained the throne through the murders of both his wife and his elder brother, followed by the assassination of his predecessor, Servius Tullius.'
p6206
aS'His reign is described as a tyranny that justified the abolition of the monarchy. Background Tarquin was the son or grandson of Lucius Tarquinius Priscus, the fifth king of Rome, and Tanaquil.'
p6207
aS"Tanaquil had engineered her husband's succession to the Roman kingdom on the death of Ancus Marcius, and when the sons of Marcius arranged the elder Tarquin's assassination in 579 BC, Tanaquil placed Servius Tullius on the throne, in preference to her own sons."
p6208
aS'According to an Etruscan tradition, the hero Macstarna, usually equated with Servius Tullius, defeated and killed a Roman named Gnaeus Tarquinius, and rescued the brothers Caelius and Aulus Vibenna.'
p6209
aS'This may recollect an otherwise forgotten attempt by the sons of Tarquin the elder to reclaim the throne.To forestall further dynastic strife, Tullius married his daughters, known to history as Tullia Major and Tullia Minor, to Lucius Tarquinius, the future king, and his brother Arruns.'
p6210
aS'Their sister, Tarquinia, married Marcus Junius Brutus, and was the mother of Lucius Junius Brutus.The elder Tullia was of mild disposition, yet married the ambitious Lucius Tarquinius.'
p6211
aS'Her younger sister was of fiercer temperament, but her husband Arruns was not, and she came to despise him, and conspired with his brother to bring about the deaths of the elder sister and younger brother.'
p6212
aS'His best-known compositions include 9 symphonies, 5 concertos for piano, 1 violin concerto, 32 piano sonatas, and 16 string quartets.'
p6213
aS'He also composed other chamber music, choral works (including the celebrated Missa solemnis), and songs.Born in Bonn, then the capital of the Electorate of Cologne and part of the Holy Roman Empire, Beethoven displayed his musical talents at an early age and was taught by his father Johann van Beethoven and by Christian Gottlob Neefe.'
p6214
aS'During his first 22 years in Bonn, Beethoven intended to study with Wolfgang_Amadeus_Mozart and befriended Joseph_Haydn.'
p6215
aS'Beethoven moved to Vienna in 1792 and began studying with Haydn, quickly gaining a reputation as a virtuoso pianist.'
p6216
aS'He lived in Vienna until his death.'
p6217
aS'In about 1800 his hearing began to deteriorate, and by the last decade of his life he was almost totally deaf.'
p6218
aS'He gave up conducting and performing in public but continued to compose; many of his most admired works come from this period. BiographyEdit  Background and early lifeEdit Beethoven was the grandson of Lodewijk van Beethoven (1712-73), a musician from Mechelen in the Southern Netherlands (now part of Belgium), who at the age of twenty moved to Bonn.'
p6219
aS"During his lifetime he published just one slim book, the 75-page Tractatus_Logico-Philosophicus (1921), one article, one book review and a children's dictionary."
p6220
aS'His voluminous manuscripts were edited and published posthumously.'
p6221
aS'Philosophical Investigations appeared as a book in 1953 and by the end of the century it was considered an important modern classic.'
p6222
aS'Philosopher Bertrand Russell described Wittgenstein as "the most perfect example I have ever known of genius as traditionally conceived; passionate, profound, intense, and dominating".Born in Vienna into one of Europe\'s richest families, he inherited a large fortune from his father in 1913.'
p6223
aS'He gave some considerable sums to poor artists.'
p6224
aS'In a period of severe personal depression after the first World War, he then gave away his entire fortune to his brothers and sisters.'
p6225
aS'Three of his brothers committed suicide, with Wittgenstein contemplating it too.'
p6226
aS"Pirandello's tragic farces are often seen as forerunners of the Theatre of the Absurd. Biography  Early life Pirandello was born into an upper-class family in a village with the curious name of Kaos (Chaos), a poor suburb of Girgenti (Agrigento, a town in southern Sicily)."
p6227
aS'His father, Stefano, belonged to a wealthy family involved in the sulphur industry, and his mother, Caterina Ricci Gramitto, was also of a well-to-do background, descending from a family of the bourgeois professional class of Agrigento.'
p6228
aS'Both families, the Pirandellos and the Ricci Gramittos, were ferociously anti-Bourbon and actively participated in the struggle for unification and democracy ("Il Risorgimento").'
p6229
aS'Stefano participated in the famous Expedition of the Thousand, later following Garibaldi all the way to the battle of Aspromonte, and Caterina, who had hardly reached the age of thirteen, was forced to accompany her father to Malta, where he had been sent into exile by the Bourbon monarchy.'
p6230
aS'But the open participation in the Garibaldian cause and the strong sense of idealism of those early years were quickly transformed, above all in Caterina, into an angry and bitter disappointment with the new reality created by the unification.'
p6231
aS'Pirandello would eventually assimilate this sense of betrayal and resentment and express it in several of his poems and in his novel The Old and the Young.'
p6232
aS"It is also probable that this climate of disillusion inculcated in the young Luigi the sense of disproportion between ideals and reality which is recognizable in his essay on humorism (L'Umorismo).Pirandello received his elementary education at home but was much more fascinated by the fables and legends, somewhere between popular and magic, that his elderly servant Maria Stella used to recount to him than by anything scholastic or academic."
p6233
aS'Values for luminosity are often given in the terms of the luminosity of the Sun, which has a total power output of 70263846000000000003.846x1026 W. The symbol for solar luminosity is L[?].'
p6234
aS'Luminosity can also be given in terms of magnitude.'
p6235
aS'The absolute bolometric magnitude (Mbol) of an object is a logarithmic measure of its total energy emission. Measuring luminosity In astronomy, luminosity is the amount of electromagnetic energy a body radiates per unit of time.'
p6236
aS'It is most frequently measured in two forms: visual (visible light only) and bolometric (total radiant energy), although luminosities at other wavelengths are increasingly being used as instruments become available to measure them.'
p6237
aS'A bolometer is the instrument used to measure radiant energy over a wide band by absorption and measurement of heating.'
p6238
aS'When not qualified, the term "luminosity" means bolometric luminosity, which is measured either in the SI units, watts, or in terms of solar luminosities.'
p6239
aS"A star also radiates neutrinos, which carry off some energy (about 2% in the case of our Sun), contributing to the star's total luminosity."
p6240
aS'He was unsuccessful in doing so, but he was chosen by Senator John F. Kennedy of Massachusetts to be his running mate.'
p6241
aS'They went on to win the election and Johnson was sworn in as Vice President on January 20, 1961.'
p6242
aS'Two years and ten months later, on November 22, 1963, Johnson succeeded Kennedy as President following his assassination.'
p6243
aS'He ran for a full term in the 1964 election, winning by a large margin over Republican opponent Arizona Senator Barry Goldwater.'
p6244
aS'He is one of four people who have served in both offices of the executive branch, as well as in both houses of Congress.Johnson was strongly supported by the Democratic Party, and as President he designed the "Great_Society" legislation upholding civil rights, public broadcasting, Medicare, Medicaid, aid to education, the arts, urban and rural development, public services, and his "War on Poverty".'
p6245
aS"Assisted in part by a growing economy, the War on Poverty helped millions of Americans rise above the poverty line during Johnson's presidency."
p6246
aS'Civil rights bills signed by Johnson banned racial discrimination in public facilities, interstate commerce, the workplace, and housing; and the voting rights act banned certain requirements in Southern states used to disenfranchise African Americans.'
p6247
aS'For another edition, published in 1802, Wordsworth added an appendix titled Poetic Diction in which he expanded the ideas set forth in the preface. Content Wordsworth and Coleridge set out to overturn what they considered the priggish, learned and highly sculpted forms of 18th century English poetry and bring poetry within the reach of the average person by writing the verses using normal, everyday language.'
p6248
aS'They place an emphasis on the vitality of the living voice that the poor use to express their reality.'
p6249
aS'Using this language also helps assert the universality of human emotions.'
p6250
aS'Even the title of the collection recalls rustic forms of art - the word "lyrical" links the poems with the ancient rustic bards and lends an air of spontaneity, while "ballads" are an oral mode of storytelling used by the common people.In the \'Advertisement\' included in the 1798 edition, Wordsworth explained his poetical concept:The majority of the following poems are to be considered as experiments.'
p6251
aS'They were written chiefly with a view to ascertain how far the language of conversation in the middle and lower classes of society is adapted to the purpose of poetic pleasure.If the experiment with vernacular language was not enough of a departure from the norm, the focus on simple, uneducated country people as the subject of poetry was a signal shift to modern literature.'
p6252
aS'One of the main themes of "Lyrical_Ballads" is the return to the original state of nature, in which people led a purer and more innocent existence.'
p6253
aS"Wordsworth subscribed to Rousseau's belief that humanity was essentially good but was corrupted by the influence of society."
p6254
aS'Lysistrata persuades the women of Greece to withhold sexual privileges from their husbands and lovers as a means of forcing the men to negotiate peace--a strategy, however, that inflames the battle between the sexes.'
p6255
aS'The play is notable for being an early expose of sexual relations in a male-dominated society.'
p6256
aS"The dramatic structure represents a shift away from the conventions of Old Comedy, a trend typical of the author's career."
p6257
aS"It was produced in the same year as the Thesmophoriazusae, another play with a focus on gender-based issues, just two years after Athens' catastrophic defeat in the Sicilian Expedition. Plot                LYSISTRATA    There are a lot of things about us women    That sadden me, considering how men    See us as rascals."
p6258
aS'CALONICE                        As indeed we are!These lines, spoken by Lysistrata and her friend Calonice at the beginning of the play, set the scene for the action that follows.'
p6259
aS'Women, as represented by Calonice, are sly hedonists in need of firm guidance and direction.'
p6260
aS'Lysistrata however is an extraordinary woman with a large sense of individual responsibility.'
p6261
aS'They are known to contain more than 50 different enzymes, which are all optimally active at an acidic environment of about pH 4.5 (about the pH of black coffee).'
p6262
aS'Thus lysosomes act as the waste disposal system of the cell by digesting unwanted materials in the cytoplasm, both from outside of the cell and obsolete components inside the cell.'
p6263
aS'For this function they are popularly referred to as "suicide bags" or "suicide sacs" of the cell.'
p6264
aS'Furthermore, lysosomes are responsible for cellular homeostasis for their involvements in secretion, plasma membrane repair, cell signalling and energy metabolism, which are related to health and diseases.'
p6265
aS'Depending on their functional activity, their sizes can be very different--the biggest ones can be more than 10 times bigger than the smallest ones.'
p6266
aS'They were discovered and named by Belgian biologist Christian de Duve, who eventually received the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine in 1974.Enzymes of the lysosomes are synthesised in the rough endoplasmic reticulum.'
p6267
aS'The enzymes are released from Golgi apparatus in small vesicles which ultimately fuse with acidic vesicles called endosomes, thus becoming full lysosomes.'
p6268
aS'Following the prehistoric breakup of the supercontinent Gondwana, Madagascar split from the Indian peninsula around 88 million years ago, allowing native plants and animals to evolve in relative isolation.'
p6269
aS'Consequently, Madagascar is a biodiversity hotspot; over 90% of its wildlife is found nowhere else on Earth.'
p6270
aS"The island's diverse ecosystems and unique wildlife are threatened by the encroachment of the rapidly growing human population and other environmental threats.Initial human settlement of Madagascar occurred between 350 BC and AD 550 by Austronesian peoples arriving on outrigger canoes from Borneo."
p6271
aS'These were joined around AD 1000 by Bantu migrants crossing the Mozambique Channel from East Africa.'
p6272
aS'Other groups continued to settle on Madagascar over time, each one making lasting contributions to Malagasy cultural life.'
p6273
aS'The Malagasy ethnic group is often divided into 18 or more sub-groups of which the largest are the Merina of the central highlands.Until the late 18th century, the island of Madagascar was ruled by a fragmented assortment of shifting sociopolitical alliances.'
p6274
aS'Beginning in the early 19th century, most of the island was united and ruled as the Kingdom of Madagascar by a series of Merina nobles.'
p6275
aS"After premiering in New York, Belasco's play moved to London, where Puccini saw it in the summer of 1900.The original version of the opera, in two acts, had its premiere on 17 February 1904 at La Scala in Milan."
p6276
aS'It was very poorly received despite the presence of such notable singers as soprano Rosina Storchio, tenor Giovanni Zenatello and baritone Giuseppe De Luca in the lead roles.'
p6277
aS'This was due in large part to the late completion and inadequate time for rehearsals.'
p6278
aS'Puccini revised the opera, splitting the second act into two acts and making other changes.'
p6279
aS"On May 28, 1904, this version was performed in Brescia and was a huge success.Between 1915 and 1920, Japan's best-known opera singer Tamaki Miura won international fame for her performances as Cio-Cio San."
p6280
aS"Her statue, along with that of Puccini, can be found in the Glover Garden in Nagasaki, the city where the opera is set.Madama_Butterfly is a staple of the standard operatic repertoire for companies around the world, ranking 6th in the Operabase list of the most-performed operas worldwide (Puccini's La Boheme and Tosca rank 3rd and 5th resp.)"
p6281
aS'. Production history Puccini wrote five versions of the opera; the original two-act version, which was presented at the world premiere at La Scala on 17 February 1904, was withdrawn after the disastrous premiere.'
p6282
aS"Though the basic plot is rather simple, even archetypal, the novel's true art lies in its details and hidden patterns."
p6283
aS'Flaubert was a notorious perfectionist and claimed always to be searching for le mot juste ("the precise word").When it was first serialized in La Revue de Paris between 1 October 1856 and 15 December 1856, the novel was attacked for obscenity by public prosecutors.'
p6284
aS'The resulting trial, held in January 1857, made the story notorious.'
p6285
aS"After Flaubert's acquittal on 7 February 1857, Madame_Bovary became a bestseller when it was published as a single volume in April 1857."
p6286
aS"The novel is now considered Flaubert's masterpiece, as well as a seminal work of realism and one of the most influential novels ever written."
p6287
aS'The British critic James Wood writes in How Fiction Works: "Flaubert established for good or ill, what most readers think of as modern realist narration and his influence is almost too familiar to be visible". Plot synopsis Madame_Bovary takes place in provincial northern France, near the town of Rouen in Normandy.'
p6288
aS'Charles Bovary is a shy, oddly dressed teenager arriving at a new school where he is ridiculed by his new classmates.'
p6289
aS'The work was considered risque by publishers because of its literary realism and strong themes.'
p6290
aS"Crane - who was 22 years old at the time - financed the book's publication himself, although the original 1893 edition was printed under the pseudonym Johnston Smith."
p6291
aS"After the success of 1895's The Red Badge of Courage, Maggie was reissued in 1896 with considerable changes and re-writing."
p6292
aS"The story is followed by George's Mother. Plot summary The story opens with Jimmie, at this point a young boy, trying by himself to fight a gang of boys from an opposing neighborhood."
p6293
aS'He is saved by his friend, Pete, and comes home to his sister Maggie, his toddling brother Tommie, his brutal and drunken father and mother, Mary Johnson.'
p6294
aS'The parents terrify the children until they are shuddering in the corner.Years pass, the father and Tommie die, and Jimmie hardens into a sneering, aggressive, cynical youth.'
p6295
aS'He gets a job as a teamster, having no regard for anyone but firetrucks who would run him down.'
p6296
aS"Neither side stood behind their commitments, and the charter was annulled by Pope Innocent III, leading to the First Barons' War."
p6297
aS"After John's death, the regency government of his young son, Henry III, reissued the document in 1216, stripped of some of its more radical content, in an unsuccessful bid to build political support for their cause."
p6298
aS'At the end of the war in 1217, it formed part of the peace treaty agreed at Lambeth, where the document acquired the name Magna_Carta, to distinguish it from the smaller Charter of the Forest which was issued at the same time.'
p6299
aS"Short of funds, Henry reissued the charter again in 1225 in exchange for a grant of new taxes; his son, Edward I, repeated the exercise in 1297, this time confirming it as part of England's statute law.The charter became part of English political life and was typically renewed by each monarch in turn, although as time went by and the fledgling English Parliament passed new laws, it lost some of its practical significance."
p6300
aS'At the end of the 16th century there was an upsurge in interest in Magna_Carta.'
p6301
aS'Lawyers and historians at the time believed that there was an ancient English constitution, going back to the days of the Anglo-Saxons, that protected individual English freedoms.'
p6302
aS'They argued that the Norman invasion of 1066 had overthrown these rights, and that Magna_Carta had been a popular attempt to restore them, making the charter an essential foundation for the contemporary powers of Parliament and legal principles such as habeas corpus.'
p6303
aS'The term is used for two distinct but closely related fields denoted by the symbols B and H, where H is measured in units of amperes per meter (symbol: A*m-1 or A/m) in the SI.'
p6304
aS'B is measured in teslas (symbol:T) and newtons per meter per ampere (symbol: N*m-1*A-1 or N/(m*A)) in the SI.'
p6305
aS'B is most commonly defined in terms of the Lorentz force it exerts on moving electric charges.Magnetic_fields can be produced by moving electric charges and the intrinsic magnetic moments of elementary particles associated with a fundamental quantum property, their spin.'
p6306
aS'In special relativity, electric and magnetic fields are two interrelated aspects of a single object, called the electromagnetic tensor; the split of this tensor into electric and magnetic fields depends on the relative velocity of the observer and charge.'
p6307
aS'In quantum physics, the electromagnetic field is quantized and electromagnetic interactions result from the exchange of photons.In everyday life, magnetic fields are most often encountered as a force created by permanent magnets, which pull on ferromagnetic materials such as iron, cobalt, or nickel, and attract or repel other magnets.'
p6308
aS'Magnetic_fields are widely used throughout modern technology, particularly in electrical engineering and electromechanics.'
p6309
aS"The Earth produces its own magnetic field, which is important in navigation, and it shields the Earth's atmosphere from solar wind."
p6310
aS'Modern interest in the concept stems from particle theories, notably the grand unified and superstring theories, which predict their existence.Magnetism in bar magnets and electromagnets does not arise from magnetic monopoles.'
p6311
aS'There is no conclusive experimental evidence that magnetic monopoles exist at all in our universe.Some condensed matter systems contain effective (non-isolated) magnetic monopole quasi-particles, or contain phenomena that are mathematically analogous to magnetic monopoles. Historical background  Pre-twentieth century Many early scientists attributed the magnetism of lodestones to two different "magnetic fluids" ("effluvia"), a north-pole fluid at one end and a south-pole fluid at the other, which attracted and repelled each other in analogy to positive and negative electric charge.'
p6312
aS"However, an improved understanding of electromagnetism in the nineteenth century showed that the magnetism of lodestones was properly explained by Ampere's circuital law, not magnetic monopole fluids."
p6313
aS"Gauss's law for magnetism, one of Maxwell's equations, is the mathematical statement that magnetic monopoles do not exist."
p6314
aS'Nevertheless, it was pointed out by Pierre Curie in 1894 that magnetic monopoles could conceivably exist, despite not having been seen so far. Twentieth century The quantum theory of magnetic charge started with a paper by the physicist Paul A.M. Dirac in 1931.'
p6315
aS'In this paper, Dirac showed that if any magnetic monopoles exist in the universe, then all electric charge in the universe must be quantized.'
p6316
aS"The electric charge is, in fact, quantized, which is consistent with (but does not prove) the existence of monopoles.Since Dirac's paper, several systematic monopole searches have been performed."
p6317
aS'For the next twelve and a half years he practiced intense meditation and severe penance, after which he achieved Kevala Jnana or enlightenment.'
p6318
aS"He travelled all over Bharat (which was larger than today's India) for the next thirty years to teach Jain philosophy."
p6319
aS'Mahavira attained moksha at the age of 72.'
p6320
aS'Mahavira was given the title Jina, or "Conqueror" (conqueror of inner enemies such as attachment, pride and greed), which subsequently became synonymous with Tirthankara.'
p6321
aS'Although, there is reasonable evidence to believe that Parsva, predecessor of Mahavira was a historical figure, still Mahavira is sometimes referred as the founder of Jainism.'
p6322
aS'On this famous Indologist, Heinrich Zimmer note: Birth According to Jain texts, Mahavira was born in 599 BCE.'
p6323
aS'His date of birth is on the thirteenth day of the rising moon of Chaitra in the Vira Nirvana Samvat calendar.'
p6324
aS'Carol is appalled at the backwardness of Gopher Prairie.'
p6325
aS"But her disdain for the town's physical ugliness and smug conservatism compels her to reform it.She speaks with its members about progressive changes, joins women's clubs, distributes literature, and holds parties to liven up Gopher Prairie's inhabitants."
p6326
aS'Despite her friendly but ineffective efforts, she is constantly derided by the leading cliques.She finds comfort and companionship outside her social class.'
p6327
aS'These companions are taken from her one by one.In her unhappiness, Carol leaves her husband and moves for a time to Washington, D.C., but she eventually returns.'
p6328
aS'Nevertheless, Carol does not feel defeated:I do not admit that Main Street is as beautiful as it should be!'
p6329
aS'I do not admit that Gopher Prairie is greater or more generous than Europe!'
p6330
aS'I do not admit that dish-washing is enough to satisfy all women!'
p6331
aS'It is known for its scenery--its jagged, mostly rocky coastline, low, rolling mountains, heavily forested interior, and picturesque waterways--as well as for its seafood cuisine, especially lobster and clams.'
p6332
aS'Maine is the northernmost U.S. state with an Atlantic coastline, but in spite of its maritime position it has a continental climate even in coastal cities such as its largest city Portland.For thousands of years, indigenous peoples were the only inhabitants of the territory that is now Maine.'
p6333
aS'At the time of European encounter, several Algonquian-speaking peoples inhabited the area.'
p6334
aS'The first European settlement in Maine was by the French in 1604 on Saint Croix Island, by Pierre Dugua, Sieur de Mons.'
p6335
aS'The first English settlement in Maine, the short-lived Popham Colony, was established by the Plymouth Company in 1607.'
p6336
aS'A number of English settlements were established along the coast of Maine in the 1620s, although the rugged climate, deprivations, and conflict with the local peoples caused many to fail over the years.As Maine entered the 18th century, only a half dozen European settlements had survived.'
p6337
aS"Patriot and Loyalist forces contended for Maine's territory during the American Revolution and the War_of_1812."
p6338
aS'Peninsular Malaysia shares a land and maritime border with Thailand and maritime borders with Singapore, Vietnam, and Indonesia.'
p6339
aS'East Malaysia shares land and maritime borders with Brunei and Indonesia and a maritime border with the Philippines.'
p6340
aS'The capital city is Kuala Lumpur, while Putrajaya is the seat of the federal government.'
p6341
aS'By 2015, with a population of over 30 million, Malaysia became the 43rd most populous country in the world.'
p6342
aS'The southernmost point of continental Eurasia, Tanjung Piai, is in Malaysia, located in the tropics.'
p6343
aS'It is one of 17 megadiverse countries on earth, with large numbers of endemic species.Malaysia has its origins in the Malay kingdoms present in the area which, from the 18th century, became subject to the British Empire.'
p6344
aS'The first British territories were known as the Straits Settlements, whose establishment was followed by the Malay kingdoms becoming British protectorates.'
p6345
aS'Particularly in Egypt, but also in the Levant, Mesopotamia, and India, mamluks held political and military power.'
p6346
aS'In some cases, they attained the rank of sultan, while in others they held regional power as amirs or beys.'
p6347
aS'Most notably, mamluk factions seized the sultanate for themselves in Egypt and Syria in a period known as the Mamluk Sultanate (1250-1517).'
p6348
aS'The Mamluk Sultanate famously beat back the troops of the Ilkhanate at the Battle of Ain Jalut and fought the Crusaders, effectively driving them out from the Levant by 1291 and officially in 1302 ending the era of the Crusades.While mamluks were purchased, their status was above ordinary slaves, who were not allowed to carry weapons or perform certain tasks.'
p6349
aS'In places such as Egypt from the Ayyubid dynasty to the time of Muhammad_Ali_of_Egypt, mamluks were considered to be "true lords", with social status above freeborn Muslims. Overview The origins of the Mamluk system are disputed.'
p6350
aS'Everybody agrees that the story of an entrenched military caste like the Mamluks in Islamic societies begins with the Abbasid caliphs of the 9th century Baghdad.'
p6351
aS'The question is more precisely when in the 9th century.'
p6352
aS'Its beliefs were based on local Mesopotamian gnostic and religious movements.Manichaeism was quickly successful and spread far through the Aramaic-Syriac speaking regions.'
p6353
aS'It thrived between the third and seventh centuries, and at its height was one of the most widespread religions in the world.'
p6354
aS'Manichaean churches and scriptures existed as far east as China and as far west as the Roman Empire.'
p6355
aS'It was briefly the main rival to Christianity in the competition to replace classical paganism.'
p6356
aS'Manichaeism survived longer in the east than in the west, and it appears to have finally faded away after the 14th century in southern China contemporary to the decline in China of the Church of the East during the Ming_Dynasty.'
p6357
aS"While most of Manichaeism's original writings have been lost, numerous translations and fragmentary texts have survived.An adherent of Manichaeism is called, especially in older sources, a Manichee, or more recently Manichaean."
p6358
aS'By extension, the term "manichean" is widely applied (often used as a derogatory term) as an adjective to a philosophy of moral dualism, according to which a moral course of action involves a clear (or simplistic) choice between good and evil, or as a noun to people who hold such a view. History  Life of Mani Mani, an Arsacid Persian by birth, was born 216 AD in Mesopotamia (Iraq), which was ruled by Persia, then within the Sassanid Empire province of Asuristan.'
p6359
aS"Agriculture, mostly concentrated in the fertile southern and western parts of the province, is vital to the province's economy; other major industries are transportation, manufacturing, mining, forestry, energy, and tourism.Manitoba's capital and largest city, Winnipeg, is Canada's eighth-largest Census Metropolitan Area, and home to 60 percent of the population of the province."
p6360
aS'Winnipeg is the seat of government, home to the Legislative Assembly of Manitoba and the highest court in the jurisdiction, the Manitoba Court of Appeal.'
p6361
aS"Four of the province's five universities, both of its professional sports teams, and most of its cultural activities are located in Winnipeg.Fur traders first arrived during the late 17th century and Manitoba was the heart of Rupert's Land, owned by the Hudson's Bay Company."
p6362
aS'Manitoba became a province of Canada in 1870 after the Red River Rebellion of 1867, led by the Metis.'
p6363
aS'A general strike took place in Winnipeg in 1919, and the province was hit hard by the Great Depression.'
p6364
aS"This led to the creation of what would become the New Democratic Party of Manitoba, one of the province's major political parties and currently in power, led by premier Greg Selinger. Etymology The name Manitoba is believed to be derived from the Cree, Ojibwe or Assiniboine languages."
p6365
aS'The name derives from Cree manitou-wapow or Ojibwa manidoobaa, both meaning "straits of Manitou, the Great Spirit", a place referring to what are now called The Narrows in the centre of Lake Manitoba.'
p6366
aS"Interpretation of spacecraft data suggests that at least three other moons of Jupiter (Europa, Ganymede and Callisto), as well as Titan and Triton each have a mantle made of ice or another solid volatile substance. Earth's mantle The interior of Earth, similar to the other terrestrial planets, is chemically divided into layers."
p6367
aS'The mantle is a layer between the crust and the outer core.'
p6368
aS"Earth's mantle is a silicate rocky shell with an average thickness of 2,886 kilometres (1,793 mi)."
p6369
aS"The mantle makes up about 84% of Earth's volume."
p6370
aS'It is predominantly solid but in geological time it behaves as a very viscous fluid.'
p6371
aS"The mantle encloses the hot core rich in iron and nickel, which makes up about 15% of Earth's volume."
p6372
aS'Past episodes of melting and volcanism at the shallower levels of the mantle have produced a thin crust of crystallized melt products near the surface, upon which we live.'
p6373
aS"His image was on Spain's 1970 100-pesetas banknote. Biography Falla was born Manuel Maria de los Dolores Falla y Matheu in Cadiz."
p6374
aS'He was the son of Jose Maria Falla, a Valencian, and Maria Jesus Matheu, from Catalonia (Hess 2001a).'
p6375
aS'His early teachers in music were his mother and grandfather.'
p6376
aS'At the age of nine he was introduced to his first piano teacher, Eloisa Galluzo.'
p6377
aS'Little is known of that period in his life, but his relationship with his teacher was soon ended after she decided to enter a convent, Sisters of Charity, to become a nun.In 1889 he continued his piano lessons with Alejandro Odero and learned the techniques of harmony and counterpoint from Enrique Broca.'
p6378
aS'At age 15 he became interested in literature and journalism and founded the literary magazines El Burlon and El Cascabel.'
p6379
aS'In 1893 he was inspired by a concert of Edvard_Grieg\'s works, later saying that at the time he felt that "my definitive vocation is music". Madrid In 1896 he moved to Madrid where he attended the Real Conservatorio de Musica y Declamacion.'
p6380
aS"['maUri]; N.Z."
p6381
aS'Eng.'
p6382
aS"['maori], ['maeuri], ['mari], ['ma@ri]) are the indigenous Polynesian people of New Zealand."
p6383
aS'The Maori originated with settlers from eastern Polynesia, who arrived in New Zealand in several waves of canoe voyages at some time between 1250 and 1300 CE.'
p6384
aS'Over several centuries in isolation, the Polynesian settlers developed a unique culture that became known as the "Maori", with their own language, a rich mythology, distinctive crafts and performing arts.'
p6385
aS'Early Maori formed tribal groups, based on eastern Polynesian social customs and organisation.'
p6386
aS'Horticulture flourished using plants they introduced, and later a prominent warrior culture emerged.The arrival of Europeans to New Zealand starting from the 17th century brought enormous change to the Maori way of life.'
p6387
aS'This process became known as the incorporation of the Bill of Rights.'
p6388
aS"During those years, cases concerning the right to legal counsel, confessions, searches, and the treatment of juvenile criminals all appeared on the Court's docket.The Warren Court's revolution in the criminal justice system began with the case of Mapp v. Ohio, the first of several significant cases in which it re-evaluated the role of the 4th Amendment as it applied to State judicial review. Circumstances of the case Dollree (pronounced doll ray, also known as Dolly or Doll Rae) Mapp (1923/24-2014), the divorced ex-wife of boxer Jimmy Bivins and ex-girlfriend of light heavyweight champion Archie Moore, was an employee in the illegal gambling rackets dominated by Cleveland rackets kingpin Shon Birns."
p6389
aS'On May 23rd, 1957, police officers in Cleveland, Ohio, received an anonymous tip by phone that Virgil Ogletree, a numbers operator who was wanted for questioning in the bombing of rival numbers racketeer and future boxing promoter Don King\'s home three days earlier, might be found at Mapp\'s house, as well as illegal betting slips and equipment employed in the "California Gold" numbers operation set up by Mapp\'s boyfriend Edward Keeling.'
p6390
aS'Three officers went to the home and asked for permission to enter, but Mapp, after consulting her lawyer by telephone, refused to admit them without a search warrant.'
p6391
aS'Two officers left, and one remained, watching the house from across the street.Three hours later, several squad cars full of police arrived and stormed the house.'
p6392
aS'Brandishing a piece of paper, they broke in the door.'
p6393
aS'Mapp asked to see the "warrant" and took it from an officer, putting it in her dress.'
p6394
aS'Marbury petitioned the Supreme Court to force the new Secretary of State James Madison to deliver the documents.'
p6395
aS"The Court, with John Marshall as Chief Justice, found firstly that Madison's refusal to deliver the commission was both illegal and correctible."
p6396
aS"Nonetheless, the Court stopped short of ordering Madison (by writ of mandamus) to hand over Marbury's commission, instead holding that the provision of the Judiciary Act of 1789 that enabled Marbury to bring his claim to the Supreme Court was itself unconstitutional, since it purported to extend the Court's original jurisdiction beyond that which Article III established."
p6397
aS'The petition was therefore denied. Background of the case In the presidential election of 1800, Democratic-Republican Thomas Jefferson defeated Federalist John_Adams, becoming the third President of the United_States.'
p6398
aS'Although the election was decided on February 17, 1801, Jefferson did not take office until March 4, 1801.'
p6399
aS'Until that time, outgoing president Adams and the Federalist-controlled 6th Congress were still in power.'
p6400
aS'During this lame-duck session, Congress passed the Judiciary Act of 1801.'
p6401
aS'Today, he is perhaps better recognised for his influence on the latter discipline, particularly with respect to his analyses of topics such as magic, sacrifice and gift exchange in different cultures around the world.'
p6402
aS'Mauss had a significant influence upon Claude Levi-Strauss, the founder of structural anthropology.'
p6403
aS'His most famous book is The Gift (1925). Background Mauss was born in Epinal, Vosges to a Jewish family, and studied philosophy at Bordeaux, where his maternal uncle Emile_Durkheim was teaching at the time.'
p6404
aS'He passed the agregation in 1893.'
p6405
aS'He was also first cousin of the much younger Claudette (nee Raphael) Bloch, a marine biologist and mother of Maurice Bloch, who became a noted anthropologist.'
p6406
aS'Instead of taking the usual route of teaching at a lycee following college, Mauss moved to Paris and took up the study of comparative religion and Sanskrit.His first publication in 1896 marked the beginning of a prolific career that would produce several landmarks in the sociological literature.'
p6407
aS'Like many members of Annee Sociologique Mauss was attracted to socialism, particularly that espoused by Jean Jaures.'
p6408
aS"Following Sulla's assumption of the dictatorship, Crassus amassed an enormous fortune through real estate speculation."
p6409
aS'Crassus rose to political prominence following his victory over the slave revolt led by Spartacus, sharing the Consulship with his rival Pompey the Great.A political and financial patron of Julius Caesar, Crassus joined Caesar and Pompey in the unofficial political alliance known as the First Triumvirate.'
p6410
aS'Together the three men dominated the Roman political system.'
p6411
aS'The alliance would not last indefinitely due to the ambitions, egos, and jealousies of the three men.'
p6412
aS"While Caesar and Crassus were lifelong allies, Crassus and Pompey disliked each other and Pompey grew increasingly envious of Caesar's spectacular successes in the Gallic Wars."
p6413
aS'The alliance was re-stabilized at the Lucca Conference in 56 BC, after which Crassus and Pompey again served jointly as Consuls.'
p6414
aS'Following his second Consulship, Crassus was appointed as the Governor of Roman Syria.'
p6415
aS'In the city of Babylon, he resided in the temple Esagila.'
p6416
aS'"Marduk" is the Babylonian form of his name.According to The Encyclopedia of Religion, the name Marduk was probably pronounced Marutuk.'
p6417
aS'The etymology of the name Marduk is conjectured as derived from amar-Utu ("bull calf of the sun god Utu").'
p6418
aS"The origin of Marduk's name may reflect an earlier genealogy, or have had cultural ties to the ancient city of Sippar (whose god was Utu, the sun god), dating back to the third millennium BC.In the perfected system of astrology, the planet Jupiter was associated with Marduk by the Hammurabi period. Mythology  Babylonian Marduk's original character is obscure but he was later associated with water, vegetation, judgment, and magic."
p6419
aS'His consort was the goddess Sarpanit.'
p6420
aS'He was also regarded as the son of Ea (Sumerian Enki) and Damkina and the heir of Anu, but whatever special traits Marduk may have had were overshadowed by the political development through which the Euphrates valley passed and which led to people of the time imbuing him with traits belonging to gods who in an earlier period were recognized as the heads of the pantheon.'
p6421
aS'There are particularly two gods--Ea and Enlil--whose powers and attributes pass over to Marduk.In the case of Ea, the transfer proceeded pacifically and without effacing the older god.'
p6422
aS'Some critics consider him to have had a larger international impact and worldwide audience than any other writer of the Latin American Boom.'
p6423
aS'Upon announcing the 2010 Nobel Prize in Literature, the Swedish Academy said it had been given to Vargas Llosa "for his cartography of structures of power and his trenchant images of the individual\'s resistance, revolt, and defeat".Vargas Llosa rose to fame in the 1960s with novels such as The Time of the Hero (La ciudad y los perros, literally The City and the Dogs, 1963/1966), The Green House (La casa verde, 1965/1968), and the monumental Conversation in the Cathedral (Conversacion en la catedral, 1969/1975).'
p6424
aS'He writes prolifically across an array of literary genres, including literary criticism and journalism.'
p6425
aS'His novels include comedies, murder mysteries, historical novels, and political thrillers.'
p6426
aS"Several, such as Captain Pantoja and the Special Service (1973/1978) and Aunt_Julia_and_the_Scriptwriter (1977/1982), have been adapted as feature films.Many of Vargas Llosa's works are influenced by the writer's perception of Peruvian society and his own experiences as a native Peruvian."
p6427
aS'Increasingly, however, he has expanded his range, and tackled themes that arise from other parts of the world.'
p6428
aS'In his essays, Vargas Llosa has made many criticisms of nationalism in different parts of the world.'
p6429
aS"After Caesar's death in 44 BC, Antony joined forces with Marcus Aemilius Lepidus, another of Caesar's generals, and Octavian, Caesar's nephew and adopted son, forming a three-man dictatorship known to historians as the Second Triumvirate."
p6430
aS"The Triumvirs defeated Caesar's murderers, the Liberatores, at the Battle of Philippi in 42 BC, and divided the government of the Republic between themselves."
p6431
aS"Antony was assigned Rome's eastern provinces, including the client kingdom of Egypt, then ruled by Cleopatra VII Philopater, and was given the command in Rome's war against Parthia.Relations among the Triumvirs were strained as the various members sought greater political power."
p6432
aS"Civil war between Antony and Octavian was averted in 40 BC, when Antony married Octavian's sister, Octavia."
p6433
aS"Despite this marriage, Antony carried on a love affair with Cleopatra, who bore him three children, further straining Antony's relations with Octavian."
p6434
aS'Lepidus was expelled from the association in 36 BC, and in 33 BC disagreements between Antony and Octavian caused a split between the remaining Triumvirs.'
p6435
aS"Their ongoing hostility erupted into civil war in 31 BC, as the Roman Senate, at Octavian's direction, declared war on Cleopatra and proclaimed Antony a traitor."
p6436
aS'Alternatively, the rule can be stated that the hydrogen atom is added to the carbon with the greater number of hydrogen atoms while the X component is added to the carbon with the fewer number of hydrogen atoms.The same is true when an alkene reacts with water in an addition reaction to form an alcohol which involve formation of carbocations.'
p6437
aS"The hydroxyl group (OH) bonds to the carbon that has the greater number of carbon-carbon bonds, while the hydrogen bonds to the carbon on the other end of the double bond, that has more carbon-hydrogen bonds.The chemical basis for Markovnikov's Rule is the formation of the most stable carbocation during the addition process."
p6438
aS'The addition of the hydrogen ion to one carbon atom in the alkene creates a positive charge on the other carbon, forming a carbocation intermediate.'
p6439
aS'The more substituted the carbocation (the more bonds it has to carbon or to electron-donating substituents) the more stable it is, due to induction and hyperconjugation.'
p6440
aS'The major product of the addition reaction will be the one formed from the more stable intermediate.'
p6441
aS'Therefore, the major product of the addition of HX (where X is some atom more electronegative than H) to an alkene has the hydrogen atom in the less substituted position and X in the more substituted position.'
p6442
aS"However, the other less substituted, less stable carbocation will still be formed to some degree, and will proceed to form the minor product with the opposite attachment of X. Anti-Markovnikov reactions Mechanisms that avoid the carbocation intermediate may react through other mechanisms that are regioselective, against what Markovnikov's_rule predicts, such as free radical addition."
p6443
aS'Most of his festivals were held in March, the month named for him (Latin Martius), and in October, which began the season for military campaigning and ended the season for farming.Under the influence of Greek culture, Mars was identified with the Greek god Ares, whose myths were reinterpreted in Roman literature and art under the name of Mars.'
p6444
aS'But the character and dignity of Mars differed in fundamental ways from that of his Greek counterpart, who is often treated with contempt and revulsion in Greek literature.'
p6445
aS'Mars was a part of the Archaic Triad along with Jupiter and Quirinus, the latter of whom as a guardian of the Roman people had no Greek equivalent.'
p6446
aS"Mars' altar in the Campus Martius, the area of Rome that took its name from him, was supposed to have been dedicated by Numa, the peace-loving semi-legendary second king of Rome."
p6447
aS"Although the center of Mars' worship was originally located outside the sacred boundary of Rome (pomerium), Augustus made the god a renewed focus of Roman religion by establishing the Temple of Mars Ultor in his new forum.Although Ares was viewed primarily as a destructive and destabilizing force, Mars represented military power as a way to secure peace, and was a father (pater) of the Roman people."
p6448
aS'In the mythic genealogy and founding myths of Rome, Mars was the father of Romulus_and_Remus with Rhea Silvia.'
p6449
aS'His love affair with Venus symbolically reconciled the two different traditions of Rome\'s founding; Venus was the divine mother of the hero Aeneas, celebrated as the Trojan refugee who "founded" Rome several generations before Romulus laid out the city walls.The importance of Mars in establishing religious and cultural identity within the Roman Empire is indicated by the vast number of inscriptions identifying him with a local deity, particularly in the Western provinces. Birth Although Ares was the son of Zeus and Hera, Mars was the son of Juno alone.'
p6450
aS'He wrote a total of 1,561, of which 1,235 are in elegiac couplets.'
p6451
aS'He is considered to be the creator of the modern epigram. Early life Knowledge of his origins and early life are derived almost entirely from his works, which can be more or less dated according to the well-known events to which they refer.'
p6452
aS'In Book X of his Epigrams, composed between 95 and 98, he mentions celebrating his fifty-seventh birthday; hence he was born during March 38, 39, 40 or 41 AD (x.'
p6453
aS'24, 1), under Caligula or Claudius.'
p6454
aS'His place of birth was Augusta Bilbilis (now Calatayud) in Hispania Tarraconensis.'
p6455
aS'His parents, Fronto and Flaccilla, appear to have died in his youth.His name seems to imply that he was born a Roman citizen, but he speaks of himself as "sprung from the Celts and Iberians, and a countryman of the Tagus;" and, in contrasting his own masculine appearance with that of an effeminate Greek, he draws particular attention to "his stiff Hispanian hair" (x.'
p6456
aS"65, 7).His home was evidently one of rude comfort and plenty, sufficiently in the country to afford him the amusements of hunting and fishing, which he often recalls with keen pleasure, and sufficiently near the town to afford him the companionship of many comrades, the few survivors of whom he looks forward to meeting again after his thirty-four years' absence (x."
p6457
aS'In it and later works, Heidegger maintained that our way of questioning defines our nature.'
p6458
aS'He argued that Western thinking had lost sight of being.'
p6459
aS'Finding ourselves as "always already" moving within ontological presuppositions, we lose touch with our grasp of being and its truth becomes "muddled".'
p6460
aS'As a solution to this condition, Heidegger advocated a change in focus from ontologies based on ontic determinants to the fundamental ontological elucidation of being-in-the-world in general, allowing it to reveal, or "unconceal" itself as concealment.Heidegger is a controversial figure, largely for his affiliation with Nazism prior to 1934, for which he publicly neither apologized nor expressed regret, although in private he called it "the biggest stupidity of his life" (die grosste Dummheit seines Lebens). Biography  Early years He was born in rural Messkirch, Germany.'
p6461
aS'Raised a Roman Catholic, he was the son of the sexton of the village church that adhered to the First Vatican Council of 1870, which was observed mainly by the poorer class of Messkirch.'
p6462
aS'His family could not afford to send him to university, so he entered a Jesuit seminary, though he was turned away within weeks because of the health requirement and what the director and doctor of the seminary described as a psychosomatic heart condition.'
p6463
aS'Heidegger was short and sinewy, with dark piercing eyes.'
p6464
aS'Mass_spectrometry works by ionizing chemical compounds to generate charged molecules or molecule fragments and measuring their mass-to-charge ratios.In a typical MS procedure, a sample, which may be solid, liquid, or gas, is ionized, for example by bombarding it with electrons.'
p6465
aS"This may cause some of the sample's molecules to break into charged fragments."
p6466
aS'These ions are then separated according to their mass-to-charge ratio, typically by accelerating them and subjecting them to an electric or magnetic field: ions of the same mass-to-charge ratio will undergo the same amount of deflection.'
p6467
aS'The ions are detected by a mechanism capable of detecting charged particles, such as an electron multiplier.'
p6468
aS'Results are displayed as spectra of the relative abundance of detected ions as a function of the mass-to-charge ratio.'
p6469
aS'The atoms or molecules in the sample can be identified by correlating known masses to the identified masses or through a characteristic fragmentation pattern. History In 1886, Eugen Goldstein observed rays in gas discharges under low pressure that traveled away from the anode and through channels in a perforated cathode, opposite to the direction of negatively charged cathode rays (which travel from cathode to anode).'
p6470
aS'Goldstein called these positively charged anode rays "Kanalstrahlen"; the standard translation of this term into English is "canal rays".'
p6471
aS'An object on the Moon would weigh less than it would on Earth because of the lower gravity, but it would still have the same mass.For everyday objects and energies well-described by Newtonian physics, mass describes the amount of matter in an object.'
p6472
aS'However, at very high speeds or for subatomic particles, special relativity shows that energy is an additional source of mass.'
p6473
aS'Thus, any stationary body having mass has an equivalent amount of energy, and all forms of energy resist acceleration by a force and have gravitational attraction.There are several distinct phenomena which can be used to measure mass.'
p6474
aS"Although some theorists have speculated some of these phenomena could be independent of each other, current experiments have found no difference among any of the ways used to measure mass:Inertial mass measures an object's resistance to being accelerated by a force (represented by the relationship F  ma).Active gravitational mass measures the gravitational force exerted by an object.Passive gravitational mass measures the gravitational force experienced by an object in a known gravitational field.Mass-energy measures the total amount of energy contained within a body, using E  mc2.The mass of an object determines its acceleration in the presence of an applied force."
p6475
aS'This phenomenon is called inertia.'
p6476
aS"According to Newton's second law of motion, if a body of fixed mass m is subjected to a single force F, its acceleration a is given by F/m."
p6477
aS"A body's mass also determines the degree to which it generates or is affected by a gravitational field."
p6478
aS'Matthew_Arnold has been characterised as a sage writer, a type of writer who chastises and instructs the reader on contemporary social issues. Early years The Reverend John Keble, who would become one of the leaders of the Oxford Movement, stood as godfather to Matthew.'
p6479
aS'"Thomas Arnold admired Keble\'s \'hymns\' in The Christian Year, only reversing himself with exasperation when this old friend became a Romeward-tending \'High Church\' reactionary in the 1830s."'
p6480
aS"In 1828, Arnold's father was appointed Headmaster of Rugby School and his young family took up residence, that year, in the Headmaster's house."
p6481
aS'In 1831, Arnold was tutored by his uncle, Rev.'
p6482
aS'John Buckland in the small village of Laleham.'
p6483
aS'In 1834, the Arnolds occupied a holiday home, Fox How, in the Lake District.'
p6484
aS'William_Wordsworth was a neighbour and close friend.'
p6485
aS"In the 1920s and '30s Ravel was internationally regarded as France's greatest living composer.Born to a music-loving family, Ravel attended France's premier music college, the Paris Conservatoire; he was not well regarded by its conservative establishment, whose biased treatment of him caused a scandal."
p6486
aS'After leaving the conservatoire Ravel found his own way as a composer, developing a style of great clarity, incorporating elements of baroque, neoclassicism and, in his later works, jazz.'
p6487
aS'He liked to experiment with musical form, as in his best-known work, Bolero (1928), in which repetition takes the place of development.'
p6488
aS"He made some orchestral arrangements of other composers' music, of which his 1922 version of Mussorgsky's Pictures at an Exhibition is the best known.As a slow and painstaking worker, Ravel composed fewer pieces than many of his contemporaries."
p6489
aS'Among his works to enter the repertoire are pieces for piano, chamber music, two piano concertos, ballet music, two operas, and eight song cycles; he wrote no symphonies or religious works.'
p6490
aS'Many of his works exist in two versions: a first, piano score and a later orchestration.'
p6491
aS'Some of his piano music, such as Gaspard de la nuit (1908), is exceptionally difficult to play, and his complex orchestral works such as Daphnis et Chloe (1912) require skilful balance in performance.Ravel was among the first composers to recognise the potential of recording to bring their music to a wider public.'
p6492
aS"The Empire was founded in 322 BCE by Chandragupta_Maurya, who had overthrown the Nanda Dynasty and rapidly expanded his power westwards across central and western India, alongside Chanakya's help, taking advantage of the disruptions of local powers in the wake of the withdrawal westward by Alexander_the_Great's armies."
p6493
aS'By 316 BCE the empire had fully occupied Northwestern India, defeating and conquering the satraps left by Alexander.'
p6494
aS"Chandragupta then defeated the invasion led by Seleucus I, a Macedonian general from Alexander's army, gaining additional territory west of the Indus River.The Maurya_Empire was one of the largest empires of the world in its time."
p6495
aS'It was also the largest empire ever in the Indian subcontinent.'
p6496
aS'At its greatest extent, the empire stretched to the north along the natural boundaries of the Himalayas, to the east into Assam, to the west into Balochistan (south west Pakistan and south east Iran) and the Hindu Kush mountains of what is now Afghanistan.'
p6497
aS"The Empire was expanded into India's central and southern regions by the emperors Chandragupta and Bindusara, but it excluded a small portion of unexplored tribal and forested regions near Kalinga (modern Odisha), until it was conquered by Ashoka."
p6498
aS"It declined for about 50 years after Ashoka's rule ended, and it dissolved in 185 BCE with the foundation of the Shunga Dynasty in Magadha.Under Chandragupta and his successors, internal and external trade, agriculture and economic activities, all thrived and expanded across India thanks to the creation of a single and efficient system of finance, administration, and security."
p6499
aS'Weber\'s main intellectual concern was understanding the processes of rationalisation, secularisation, and "disenchantment" that he associated with the rise of capitalism and modernity, and which he saw as the result of a new way of thinking about the world.Weber is best known for his thesis combining economic sociology and the sociology of religion, elaborated in his book The_Protestant_Ethic_and_the_Spirit_of_Capitalism, in which he proposed that ascetic Protestantism was one of the major "elective affinities" associated with the rise in the Western world of market-driven capitalism and the rational-legal nation-state.'
p6500
aS'Against Marx\'s "historical materialism", Weber emphasised the importance of cultural influences embedded in religion as a means for understanding the genesis of capitalism.'
p6501
aS'The Protestant Ethic formed the earliest part in Weber\'s broader investigations into world religion; he went on to examine the religions of China, the religions of India and ancient Judaism, with particular regard to their differing economic consequences and conditions of social stratification.In another major work, Politics as a Vocation, Weber defined the state as an entity that successfully claims a "monopoly of the legitimate use of physical force within a given territory".'
p6502
aS'He was also the first to categorise social authority into distinct forms, which he labelled as charismatic, traditional, and rational-legal.'
p6503
aS'His analysis of bureaucracy emphasised that modern state institutions are increasingly based on rational-legal authority.Weber also made a variety of other contributions in economic history, as well as economic theory and methodology.'
p6504
aS"Weber's analysis of modernity and rationalisation significantly influenced the critical theory associated with the Frankfurt School.After the First World War, Max_Weber was among the founders of the liberal German Democratic Party."
p6505
aS'He also ran unsuccessfully for a seat in parliament and served as advisor to the committee that drafted the ill-fated democratic Weimar Constitution of 1919.'
p6506
aS'Wertheimer eventually ended up at the New School for Social Research in New York, a position he held until his death.Max_Wertheimer is known for his work Productive Thinking, as well as his idea of Phi Phenomenon.'
p6507
aS'Both contributed to his collaboration on Gestalt_psychology. Early life Max_Wertheimer was born on April 15, 1880 in Prague, then part of the Bohemian Austria-Hungary.'
p6508
aS'Max was born to Wilhelm and Rosa Wertheimer.'
p6509
aS'Second to his brother Walter.'
p6510
aS'Wilhelm Wertheimer was a successful educator, as well as financier.'
p6511
aS'Rosa Wilhelm, born Rosa Zwicker, had a rich classical education.'
p6512
aS'The Wertheimers were active in the Jewish community in which they lived.'
p6513
aS'This region consists of the northern lowlands encompassing the Yucatan Peninsula, and the highlands of the Sierra Madre, running from the Mexican state of Chiapas, across southern Guatemala and onwards into El_Salvador, and the southern lowlands of the Pacific littoral plain.The Archaic period, prior to 2000 BC, saw the first developments in agriculture and the earliest villages.'
p6514
aS'The Preclassic period (c. 2000 BC to 250 AD) saw the establishment of the first complex societies in the Maya region, and the cultivation of the staple crops of the Maya diet, including maize, beans, squashes, and chili peppers.'
p6515
aS'The first Maya cities developed around 750 BC, and by 500 BC these cities possessed monumental architecture, including large temples with elaborate stucco facades.'
p6516
aS'Hieroglyphic writing was being used in the Maya region by the 3rd century BC.'
p6517
aS'In the Late Preclassic a number of large cities developed in the Peten Basin, and Kaminaljuyu rose to prominence in the Guatemalan Highlands.'
p6518
aS'Beginning around 250 AD, the Classic period is largely defined as when the Maya were raising sculpted monuments with Long Count dates.'
p6519
aS'This period saw the Maya_civilization develop a large number of city-states linked by a complex trade network.'
p6520
aS"The book was the basis for the films McTeague (1916) and Erich von Stroheim's Greed (1924)."
p6521
aS"It was also adapted as an opera by William Bolcom in 1992. Plot McTeague is a dentist of limited intellect from a poor miner's family, who has opened a dentist shop on Polk Street in San_Francisco."
p6522
aS'(His first name is never revealed; other characters in the novel call him simply "Mac.")'
p6523
aS"His best friend, Marcus Schouler, brings his cousin, Trina Sieppe, whom he is courting, to McTeague's parlor for dental work."
p6524
aS'McTeague becomes infatuated with her while working on her teeth, and Marcus graciously steps aside.'
p6525
aS'McTeague successfully woos Trina.'
p6526
aS'Shortly after McTeague and Trina have kissed and declared their love for each other, Trina discovers that she has won $5000 from a lottery ticket.'
p6527
aS'The play tells of Medea avenging her husband\'s betrayal by slaying their children.The myths involving Jason have been interpreted as part of a class of myths that tell how the Hellenes of the distant heroic age, before the Trojan War, faced the challenges of the pre-Greek "Pelasgian" cultures of mainland Greece, the Aegean and Anatolia.'
p6528
aS'Jason, Perseus, Theseus, and above all Heracles, are all "liminal" figures, poised on the threshold between the old world of shamans, chthonic earth deities, and the new Bronze Age Greek ways.Medea figures in the myth of Jason and the Argonauts, a myth known best from a late literary version worked up by Apollonius of Rhodes in the 3rd century BC and called the Argonautica.'
p6529
aS'However, for all its self-consciousness and researched archaic vocabulary, the late epic was based on very old, scattered materials.'
p6530
aS'Medea is known in most stories as an enchantress and is often depicted as being a priestess of the goddess Hecate or a witch.'
p6531
aS'The myth of Jason and Medea is very old, originally written around the time Hesiod wrote the Theogony.'
p6532
aS"It was known to the composer of the Little Iliad, part of the Epic Cycle. Jason and Medea Medea's role began after Jason came from Iolcus to Colchis, to claim his inheritance and throne by retrieving the Golden Fleece."
p6533
aS'In the most complete surviving account, the Argonautica of Apollonius, Medea fell in love with him and promised to help him, but only on the condition that if he succeeded, he would take her with him and marry her.'
p6534
aS'Most sources describe her as the daughter of Phorcys and Ceto, though the author Hyginus (Fabulae, 151) interposes a generation and gives Medusa another chthonic pair as parents.Medusa was beheaded by the hero Perseus, who thereafter used her head, which retained its ability to turn onlookers to stone, as a weapon until he gave it to the goddess Athena to place on her shield.'
p6535
aS'In classical antiquity the image of the head of Medusa appeared in the evil-averting device known as the Gorgoneion. Medusa in classical mythology The three Gorgon sisters--Medusa, Stheno, and Euryale--were all children of the ancient marine deities Phorcys (or "Phorkys") and his sister Ceto (or "Keto"), chthonic monsters from an archaic world.'
p6536
aS'Their genealogy is shared with other sisters, the Graeae, as in Aeschylus\'s Prometheus_Bound, which places both trinities of sisters far off "on Kisthene\'s dreadful plain":Near them their sisters three, the Gorgons, wingedWith snakes for hair-- hatred of mortal man--While ancient Greek vase-painters and relief carvers imagined Medusa and her sisters as beings born of monstrous form, sculptors and vase-painters of the fifth century began to envisage her as being beautiful as well as terrifying.'
p6537
aS'In an ode written in 490 BC Pindar already speaks of "fair-cheeked Medusa".In a late version of the Medusa myth, related by the Roman poet Ovid (Metamorphoses 4.770), Medusa was originally a ravishingly beautiful maiden, "the jealous aspiration of many suitors," but because Poseidon had raped her in Athena\'s temple, the enraged Athena transformed Medusa\'s beautiful hair to serpents and made her face so terrible to behold that the mere sight of it would turn onlookers to stone.'
p6538
aS"In Ovid's telling, Perseus describes Medusa's punishment by Minerva (Athena) as just and well earned.In most versions of the story, she was beheaded by the hero Perseus, who was sent to fetch her head by King Polydectes of Seriphus because Polydectes wanted to marry his mother."
p6539
aS'The gods were well aware of this, and Perseus received help.'
p6540
aS"He received a mirrored shield from Athena, gold, winged sandals from Hermes, a sword from Hephaestus and Hades's helm of invisibility."
p6541
aS'The goals of the restored government were expressed by the new emperor in the Charter Oath.'
p6542
aS"The Restoration led to enormous changes in Japan's political and social structure, and spanned both the late Edo period (often called Late Tokugawa_shogunate) and the beginning of the Meiji period."
p6543
aS'The period spanned from 1868 to 1912 and was responsible for the emergence of Japan as a modernized nation in the early twentieth century. Alliances and allegiances The foundation of the Meiji restoration was the 1866 Satsuma-Choshu Alliance between Saigo Takamori and Kido Takayoshi, leaders of the reformist elements in the Satsuma Domain and Choshu Domain.'
p6544
aS"These two leaders supported the Emperor Komei (Emperor Meiji's father) and were brought together by Sakamoto Ryoma for the purpose of challenging the ruling Tokugawa Shogunate (bakufu) and restoring the Emperor to power."
p6545
aS"After Emperor Komei's death on January 30, 1867, Emperor Meiji ascended the throne on February 3."
p6546
aS'This period also saw Japan change from being a feudal society to having a market economy and left the Japanese with a lingering Western influence. End of the Shogunate The Tokugawa Shogunate came to its official end on November 9, 1867, when Tokugawa Yoshinobu, the 15th Tokugawa Shogun, "put his prerogatives at the Emperor\'s disposal" and resigned 10 days later.'
p6547
aS'This was effectively the "restoration" (Taisei Hokan) of imperial rule - although Yoshinobu still had significant influence and it was not until January 3, the following year, with the young emperor\'s edict that the restoration fully occurred.Shortly thereafter in January 1868, the Boshin War (War of the Year of the Dragon) started with the Battle of Toba-Fushimi in which Choshu and Satsuma\'s forces defeated the ex-shogun\'s army.'
p6548
aS'The two meiotic divisions are known as meiosis I and meiosis II.'
p6549
aS'Before meiosis begins, during S phase of the cell cycle, the DNA of each chromosome is replicated so that it consists of two identical sister chromatids attached at a centromere.'
p6550
aS'In meiosis I, homologous chromosomes pair with each other and can exchange genetic material in a process called chromosomal crossover.'
p6551
aS'The homologous chromosomes are then pulled apart into two new separate daughter cells, each containing half the number of chromosomes as the parent cell.'
p6552
aS'At the end of meiosis I, sister chromatids remain attached and may differ from one another if crossing-over occurred.'
p6553
aS'In meiosis II, the two cells produced during meiosis I divide again.'
p6554
aS'During this division, sister chromatids detach from one another and are separated into four total daughter cells.'
p6555
aS'The samples, in the presence of an applied magnetic field, were cooled below their superconducting transition temperature.'
p6556
aS'Below the transition temperature the samples cancelled nearly all interior magnetic fields.'
p6557
aS'They detected this effect only indirectly because the magnetic flux is conserved by a superconductor: when the interior field decreases, the exterior field increases.'
p6558
aS'The experiment demonstrated for the first time that superconductors were more than just perfect conductors and provided a uniquely defining property of the superconducting state. Explanation In a weak applied field, a superconductor "expels" nearly all magnetic flux.'
p6559
aS'It does this by setting up electric currents near its surface.'
p6560
aS'The magnetic field of these surface currents cancels the applied magnetic field within the bulk of the superconductor.'
p6561
aS'As the field expulsion, or cancellation, does not change with time, the currents producing this effect (called persistent currents) do not decay with time.'
p6562
aS"Its estimated length is 4,350 km (2,703 mi), and it drains an area of 795,000 km2 (307,000 sq mi), discharging 457 km3 (110 cu mi) of water annually.From the Tibetan Plateau this river runs through China's Yunnan province, Myanmar, Laos, Thailand, Cambodia and Vietnam."
p6563
aS"In 1995, Laos, Thailand, Cambodia and Vietnam established the Mekong River Commission to assist in the management and coordinated use of the Mekong's resources."
p6564
aS'In 1996 China and Burma (Myanmar) became "dialogue partners" of the MRC and the six countries now work together within a cooperative framework.The extreme seasonal variations in flow and the presence of rapids and waterfalls in this river have made navigation difficult.'
p6565
aS'The river is a major trading route linking China\'s southwestern province of Yunnan to Laos, Burma (Myanmar) and Thailand to the south, an important trade route between western China and Southeast Asia. Names In English the river is called the "Mekong River", derived from "Mae Nam Khong", a term of both Thai and Lao origin.'
p6566
aS'In the Lao-Thai toponymy, "rivers" translates to "mother of water", signalled by the prefix "mae", meaning "mother", and "nam" for water.'
p6567
aS'In the Mekong\'s case, Mae Nam Khong means "Khong, The mother of water".'
p6568
aS'Many Northern Thai and Laos locals refer to it as the "River Khong".'
p6569
aS'A number of pseudepigraphal works of divination were circulated in Classical and Hellenistic times under the name Melampus.'
p6570
aS'According to Herodotus and Pausanias (vi.17.6), on the authority of Hesiod, his father was Amythaon, whose name implies the "ineffable" or "unspeakably great"; Thus Melampus and his heirs were Amythaides of the "House of Amythaon". Homer In Homer\'s Odyssey, a digression concerning the lineage of Theoclymenus, "a prophet, sprung from Melampus\' line of seers", sketches the epic narrative concerning Melampus with such brevity that its details must have been familiar to Homer\'s audience.'
p6571
aS'With brief hints, a sequence of episodes is alluded to, in which we discern strife in Pylos between Melampus and Neleus, who usurps Melampus\'s "great high house", forcing him into heroic exile.'
p6572
aS'Melampus spends a year as bondsman in the house of Phylacus, "all for Neleus\' daughter Pero".'
p6573
aS'At his extremity, Melampus is visited by "the mad spell a Fury, murderous spirit, cast upon his mind.'
p6574
aS'But the seer worked free of death" and succeeded at last in rustling Phylacus\'s cattle back to Pylos, where he avenged himself on Neleus and gave Pero in marriage to his brother Bias.'
p6575
aS"But Melampus's own destiny lay in Argos, where he lived and ruled, married and sired a long line, also briefly sketched in Homer's excursus. Later myths At a later date the narrative was embellished with anecdotal detail: Melampus lived in Pylos during the reign of Anaxagoras or possibly Proetus."
p6576
aS'The metropolis is located on the large natural bay of Port Phillip and expands into the hinterlands toward the Dandenong and Macedon mountain ranges, Mornington Peninsula and Yarra Valley.'
p6577
aS'Melbourne consists of 31 municipalities.'
p6578
aS"It has a population of 4,442,918 as of 2014, and its inhabitants are called Melburnians.Founded by settlers from Van Diemen's Land on 30 August 1835 in what was then the British colony of New South Wales, it was incorporated as a Crown settlement in 1837."
p6579
aS'It was named "Melbourne" by the Governor of New South Wales, Sir Richard Bourke, in honour of the British Prime Minister of the day, William Lamb, 2nd Viscount Melbourne.'
p6580
aS'It was officially declared a city by Queen Victoria in 1847, after which it became the capital of the newly founded colony of Victoria in 1851.'
p6581
aS"During the Victorian gold rush of the 1850s, Melbourne was transformed into one of the world's largest and wealthiest cities."
p6582
aS"After the federation of Australia in 1901, it served as the nation's interim seat of government until 1927.Melbourne rates highly in education, entertainment, health care, research and development, tourism and sport, making it the world's most livable city according to the Economist Intelligence Unit."
p6583
aS'In this first stage the information must be changed so that it may be put into the encoding process.'
p6584
aS'Storage is the second memory stage or process.'
p6585
aS'This entails that information is maintained over periods of time.'
p6586
aS'Finally the third process is the retrieval of information that has been stored.'
p6587
aS'Such information must be located and returned to the consciousness.'
p6588
aS'Some retrieval attempts may be effortless due to the type of information, and other attempts to remember stored information may be more demanding for various reasons.From an information processing perspective there are three main stages in the formation and retrieval of memory:Encoding or registration: receiving, processing and combining of received informationStorage: creation of a permanent record of the encoded informationRetrieval, recall or recollection: calling back the stored information in response to some cue for use in a process or activityThe loss of memory is described as forgetfulness or, as a medical disorder, amnesia. Sensory memory Sensory memory holds sensory information for less than one second after an item is perceived.'
p6589
aS'The ability to look at an item and remember what it looked like with just a split second of observation, or memorization, is the example of sensory memory.'
p6590
aS'In 1960, Lovelace invited Geraldyn "Jerrie" Cobb to undergo the same rigorous challenges as the men.Cobb, already an accomplished pilot, became the first American woman (and the only one of the Mercury_13) to undergo and pass all three phases of testing.'
p6591
aS'Lovelace and Cobb recruited 19 more women to take the tests, financed by the world-renowned aviator Jacqueline Cochran.'
p6592
aS'Thirteen of the women passed the same tests as the Mercury 7.'
p6593
aS'Some were disqualified due to brain or heart anomalies.'
p6594
aS'The results were announced at a conference in Stockholm, Sweden. Candidate background All of the candidates were accomplished pilots; Lovelace and Cobb reviewed the records of over 700 women pilots in order to select candidates, and did not invite anyone with less than 1000 hours of flight experience.'
p6595
aS"Some of them may have been recruited through the Ninety-Nines, a women pilot's organization of which Cobb was also a member."
p6596
aS"Some women responded after hearing about the opportunity through friends.This group of women that Jerrie Cobb called the Fellow Lady Astronaut Trainees (FLATs) accepted the challenge to be tested for a research program. Tests Since doctors didn't know what stresses astronauts would experience in space, tests ranged from the typical X-ray and general body physicals to the atypical, in which the women had to swallow a rubber tube so their stomach acids could be tested."
p6597
aS"After an initially modest public reception, the oratorio gained in popularity, eventually becoming one of the best-known and most frequently performed choral works in Western music.Handel's reputation in England, where he had lived since 1712, had been established through his compositions of Italian opera."
p6598
aS'He turned to English oratorio in the 1730s in response to changes in public taste; Messiah was his sixth work in this genre.'
p6599
aS'Although its structure resembles that of opera, it is not in dramatic form; there are no impersonations of characters and no direct speech.'
p6600
aS"Instead, Jennens's text is an extended reflection on Jesus Christ as Messiah."
p6601
aS'The text begins in Part I with prophecies by Isaiah and others, and moves to the annunciation to the shepherds, the only "scene" taken from the Gospels.'
p6602
aS'In Part II, Handel concentrates on the Passion and ends with the "Hallelujah" chorus.'
p6603
aS"In Part III he covers the resurrection of the dead and Christ's glorification in heaven.Handel wrote Messiah for modest vocal and instrumental forces, with optional settings for many of the individual numbers."
p6604
aS"It originated as a revival within the 18th-century Church of England and became a separate Church following Wesley's death."
p6605
aS'Because of vigorous missionary activity, the movement spread throughout the British Empire, the United_States, and beyond, today claiming approximately 80 million adherents worldwide.Methodism is characterized by its emphasis on helping the poor and the average person, its very systematic approach to building the person, and the "church" and its missionary spirit.'
p6606
aS"These ideals are put into practice by the establishment of hospitals, universities, orphanages, soup kitchens, and schools to follow Jesus's command to spread the Good News and serve all people.Methodists are convinced that building loving relationships with others through social service is a means of working towards the inclusiveness of God's love."
p6607
aS"Most Methodists teach that Christ died for all of humanity, not just for a limited group, and thus everyone is entitled to God's grace and protection."
p6608
aS'In theology, this view is known as Arminianism.'
p6609
aS'It denies that God has pre-ordained an elect number of people to eternal bliss while others are doomed to hell no matter what they do in life.'
p6610
aS'However, Whitefield and several others were considered Calvinistic Methodists.The Methodist movement has a wide variety of forms of worship, ranging from high church to low church in liturgical usage; denominations that descend from the British Methodist tradition tend toward a less formal worship style, while American Methodism--in particular the United Methodist Church--is more liturgical.'
p6611
aS'Covering almost two million square kilometres (over 760,000 sq mi), Mexico is the fifth largest country in the Americas by total area and the 13th largest independent nation in the world.'
p6612
aS'With an estimated population of over 113 million, it is the eleventh most populous and the most populous Spanish-speaking country in the world and the second most populous country in Latin America.'
p6613
aS'Mexico is a federation comprising thirty-one states and a Federal District, its capital and largest city.In pre-Columbian Mexico many Mesoamerican cultures matured into advanced civilizations such as the Olmec, the Toltec, the Teotihuacan, the Zapotec, the Maya and the Aztec before first contact with Europeans.'
p6614
aS'In 1521, the Spanish Empire conquered and colonized the territory from its base in Mexico-Tenochtitlan, which was administered as the Viceroyalty of New Spain.'
p6615
aS"This territory would eventually become Mexico following recognition of the colony's independence in 1821."
p6616
aS'The post-independence period was characterized by economic instability, the Mexican-American War that led to the territorial cession to the United_States, the Pastry War, the Franco-Mexican War, a civil war, two empires and a domestic dictatorship.'
p6617
aS"The latter led to the Mexican Revolution in 1910, which culminated with the promulgation of the 1917 Constitution and the emergence of the country's current political system."
p6618
aS'The nearly perfect cleavage, which is the most prominent characteristic of mica, is explained by the hexagonal sheet-like arrangement of its atoms.The word mica is derived from the Latin word mica, meaning a crumb, and probably influenced by micare, to glitter. Classification Chemically, micas can be given the general formulaX2Y4-6Z8O20(OH,F)4in whichX is K, Na, or Ca or less commonly Ba, Rb, or Cs;Y is Al, Mg, or Fe or less commonly Mn, Cr, Ti, Li, etc.'
p6619
aS';Z is chiefly Si or Al, but also may include Fe3+ or Ti.Structurally, micas can be classed as dioctahedral (Y  4) and trioctahedral (Y  6).'
p6620
aS'If the X ion is K or Na, the mica is a common mica, whereas if the X ion is Ca, the mica is classed as a brittle mica. Trioctahedral micas Common micas:BiotiteLepidoliteMuscovitePhlogopiteZinnwalditeBrittle micas:Clintonite Interlayer deficient micas Very fine-grained micas, which typically show more variation in ion and water content, are informally termed "clay micas".'
p6621
aS'They include:Hydro-muscovite with H3O+ along with K in the X site;Illite with a K deficiency in the X site and correspondingly more Si in the Z site;Phengite with Mg or Fe2+ substituting for Al in the Y site and a corresponding increase in Si in the Z site. Occurrence and production Mica is widely distributed and occurs in igneous, metamorphic and sedimentary regimes.'
p6622
aS'Large crystals of mica used for various applications are typically mined from granitic pegmatites.Until the 19th century, large crystals of mica were quite rare and expensive as a result of the limited supply in Europe.'
p6623
aS'However, their price dramatically dropped when large reserves were found and mined in Africa and South America during the early 19th century.'
p6624
aS'The largest documented single crystal of mica (phlogopite) was found in Lacey Mine, Ontario, Canada; it measured 10 x 4.3 x 4.3 m and weighed about 330 tonnes.'
p6625
aS'This phase is caused by the packing behavior of single-tail lipids in a bilayer.'
p6626
aS'The difficulty filling all the volume of the interior of a bilayer, while accommodating the area per head group forced on the molecule by the hydration of the lipid head group, leads to the formation of the micelle.'
p6627
aS'This type of micelle is known as a normal-phase micelle (oil-in-water micelle).'
p6628
aS'Inverse micelles have the head groups at the centre with the tails extending out (water-in-oil micelle).'
p6629
aS'Micelles are approximately spherical in shape.'
p6630
aS'Other phases, including shapes such as ellipsoids, cylinders, and bilayers, are also possible.'
p6631
aS'The shape and size of a micelle are a function of the molecular geometry of its surfactant molecules and solution conditions such as surfactant concentration, temperature, pH, and ionic strength.'
p6632
aS'This is one of the most useful methods for the mild formation of C-C bonds.'
p6633
aS"Many asymmetric variants exist.In this scheme the R and R' substituents on the nucleophile (a Michael donor) are electron-withdrawing groups such as acyl and cyano making the methylene hydrogen acidic forming the carbanion on reaction with base B:."
p6634
aS'The substituent on the activated alkene, also called a Michael acceptor, is usually a ketone making it an enone, but it can also be a nitro group. Definition As originally defined by Arthur Michael, the reaction is the addition of an enolate of a ketone or aldehyde to an a,b-unsaturated carbonyl compound at the b carbon.'
p6635
aS'A newer definition, proposed by Kohler, is the 1,4-addition of a doubly stabilized carbon nucleophile to an a,b-unsaturated carbonyl compound.'
p6636
aS'Some examples of nucleophiles include beta-ketoesters, malonates, and beta-cyanoesters.'
p6637
aS'The resulting product contains a highly useful 1,5-dioxygenated pattern.Classical examples of the Michael_reaction are the reaction between diethyl malonate (Michael donor) and diethyl fumarate (Michael acceptor), that of mesityl oxide and diethyl malonate, that of diethyl malonate and methyl crotonate, that of 2-nitropropane and methyl acrylate, that of ethyl phenylcyanoacetate and acrylonitrile and that of nitropropane and methyl vinyl ketone.The Michael addition is an important atom-economical method for diastereoselective and enantioselective C-C bond formation.'
p6638
aS'A classical tandem sequence of Michael and aldol additions is the Robinson annulation. Mechanism The reaction mechanism is 1 (with R an alkoxy group) as the nucleophile:Deprotonation of 1 by base leads to carbanion 2 stabilized by its electron-withdrawing groups.'
p6639
aS'Though often cited as a post-structuralist and postmodernist, Foucault rejected these labels, preferring to present his thought as a critical history of modernity.'
p6640
aS'His thought has been highly influential both for academic and for activist groups.Born in Poitiers, France, into an upper-middle-class family, Foucault was educated at the Lycee Henri-IV and then at the Ecole Normale Superieure, where he developed an interest in philosophy and came under the influence of his tutors Jean Hyppolite and Louis Althusser.'
p6641
aS'After several years as a cultural diplomat abroad, he returned to France and published his first major book, The History of Madness.'
p6642
aS'After obtaining work between 1960 and 1966 at the University of Clermont-Ferrand, he produced two more significant publications, The Birth of the Clinic and The Order of Things, which displayed his increasing involvement with structuralism, a theoretical movement in social anthropology from which he later distanced himself.'
p6643
aS'These first three histories exemplified a historiographical technique Foucault was developing which he called "archaeology", not to be confused with the academic discipline of archaeology.From 1966 to 1968, Foucault lectured at the University of Tunis, Tunisia, before returning to France, where he became head of the philosophy department at the new experimental university of Paris VIII.'
p6644
aS'In 1970 he was admitted to the College de France, membership of which he retained until his death.'
p6645
aS'He also became active in a number of left-wing groups involved in anti-racist campaigns, anti-human rights abuses movements, and the struggle for penal reform.'
p6646
aS'Despite making few forays beyond the arts, his versatility in the disciplines he took up was of such a high order that he is often considered a contender for the title of the archetypal Renaissance man, along with his fellow Italian Leonardo da Vinci.A number of his works in painting, sculpture, and architecture rank among the most famous in existence.'
p6647
aS'His output in every field during his long life was prodigious; when the sheer volume of correspondence, sketches, and reminiscences that survive is also taken into account, he is the best-documented artist of the 16th century.Two of his best-known works, the Pieta and David, were sculpted before he turned thirty.'
p6648
aS'Despite his low opinion of painting, Michelangelo also created two of the most influential works in fresco in the history of Western art: the scenes from Genesis on the ceiling and The Last Judgment on the altar wall of the Sistine_Chapel in Rome.'
p6649
aS'As an architect, Michelangelo pioneered the Mannerist style at the Laurentian Library.'
p6650
aS"At the age of 74 he succeeded Antonio da Sangallo the Younger as the architect of St. Peter's Basilica."
p6651
aS"Michelangelo transformed the plan, the western end being finished to Michelangelo's design, the dome being completed after his death with some modification.In a demonstration of Michelangelo's unique standing, he was the first Western artist whose biography was published while he was alive."
p6652
aS'Two biographies were published of him during his lifetime; one of them, by Giorgio Vasari, proposed that he was the pinnacle of all artistic achievement since the beginning of the Renaissance, a viewpoint that continued to have currency in art history for centuries.In his lifetime he was also often called Il Divino ("the divine one").'
p6653
aS'The outer diameter of a microtubule is about 24 nm while the inner diameter is about 12 nm.'
p6654
aS'They are found in eukaryotic cells and are formed by the polymerization of a dimer of two globular proteins, alpha and beta tubulin.Microtubules are very important in a number of cellular processes.'
p6655
aS'They are involved in maintaining the structure of the cell and, together with microfilaments and intermediate filaments, they form the cytoskeleton.'
p6656
aS'They also make up the internal structure of cilia and flagella.They provide platforms for intracellular transport and are involved in a variety of cellular processes, including the movement of secretory vesicles, organelles, and intracellular macromolecular assemblies (see entries for dynein and kinesin).'
p6657
aS'They are also involved in chromosome separation (mitosis and meiosis), and are the major constituents of mitotic spindles, which are used to pull apart eukaryotic chromosomes.Microtubules are nucleated and organized by microtubule organizing centers (MTOCs), such as the centrosome found in the center of many animal cells or the basal bodies found in cilia and flagella, or the spindle pole bodies found in fungi.There are many proteins that bind to microtubules, including the motor proteins kinesin and dynein, severing proteins like katanin, and other proteins important for regulating microtubule dynamics. Structure Microtubules are long, hollow cylinders made up of polymerised a- and b-tubulin dimers.'
p6658
aS'The a and b-tubulin subunits are approximately 50% identical at the amino acid level, and each have a molecular weight of approximately 50 kDa.These a/b-tubulin dimers polymerize end-to-end into linear protofilaments that associate laterally to form a single microtubule, which can then be extended by the addition of more a/b-tubulin dimers.'
p6659
aS'Typically, microtubules are formed by the parallel association of thirteen protofilaments, although microtubules composed of fewer or more protofilaments have been observed in-vitro.Microtubules have a distinct polarity that is critical for their biological function.'
p6660
aS'Significant themes include the status of women, the nature of marriage, idealism, self-interest, religion, hypocrisy, political reform, and education.Although containing comical elements, Middlemarch is a work of realism that refers to many historical events: the 1832 Reform Act, the beginnings of the railways, the death of King George IV, and the succession of his brother, the Duke of Clarence (the future King William IV).'
p6661
aS'In addition, the work incorporates contemporary medical science and examines the deeply reactionary mindset found within a settled community facing the prospect of unwelcome change.Eliot began writing the two pieces that would eventually form Middlemarch during the years 1869-70 and completed the novel in 1871.'
p6662
aS'Although the first reviews were mixed, it is now widely regarded as her best work and one of the greatest novels in English. Background  Composition and publication Middlemarch originates in two unfinished pieces that Eliot worked on during the years 1869 and 1870: the novel "Middlemarch" (which focused on the character of Lydgate) and the long story "Miss Brooke" (which focused on the character of Dorothea).'
p6663
aS'The former piece is first mentioned in her journal on 1 January 1869 as one of the tasks for the coming year.'
p6664
aS"In August she began writing, but progress ceased in the following month amidst a lack of confidence about it and distraction caused by the illness of George Henry Lewes's son Thornie, who was dying of tuberculosis."
p6665
aS'(Eliot had been living with Lewes since 1854 as part of an open marriage.)'
p6666
aS"Following Thornie's death on 19 October 1869, all work on the novel stopped; it is uncertain at this point whether or not Eliot intended to revive it at a later date."
p6667
aS'He first lived in Paris in the 1920s where he studied ethnology.'
p6668
aS'Some scholars view him as the first Latin American novelist to show how the study of anthropology and linguistics could affect the writing of literature.'
p6669
aS'While in Paris, Asturias also associated with the Surrealist movement, and he is credited with introducing many features of modernist style into Latin American letters.'
p6670
aS"In this way, he is an important precursor of the Latin American Boom of the 1960s and 1970s.One of Asturias' most famous novels, El Senor Presidente, describes life under a ruthless dictator."
p6671
aS"Asturias' very public opposition to dictatorial rule led to him spending much of his later life in exile, both in South America and in Europe."
p6672
aS'The book that is sometimes described as his masterpiece, Hombres de maiz (Men of Maize), is a defense of Mayan culture and customs.'
p6673
aS'Asturias combined his extensive knowledge of Mayan beliefs with his political convictions, channeling them into a life of commitment and solidarity.'
p6674
aS"July 15] 1841), a Russian Romantic writer, poet and painter, the most important Russian poet after Alexander_Pushkin's death in 1837 and the greatest figure in Russian Romanticism."
p6675
aS'His influence on later Russian literature is still felt in modern times, not only through his poetry, but also through his prose, which founded the tradition of the Russian psychological novel. Biography Mikhail Yurievich Lermontov was born in Moscow into a respectable noble family, and grew up in the village of Tarkhany (now Lermontovo in Penza Oblast).'
p6676
aS'His paternal family descended from the Scottish family of Learmonth, one of whom settled in Russia in the early 17th century, during the reign (1613-1645) of Mikhail Fyodorovich Romanov.'
p6677
aS'The 13th-century Scottish poet Thomas the Rhymer (Thomas Learmonth) is thus claimed as a relative of Lermontov.'
p6678
aS"The only ascertainable genealogical information states that the poet descended from Yuri (George) Learmont, a Scottish officer in the Polish-Lithuanian service who settled in Russia in the middle of the 17th century.Lermontov's father, Yuri Petrovich Lermontov, like his father before him, followed a military career."
p6679
aS'Having moved up the ranks to captain, he married the sixteen-year-old Maria Mikhaylovna Arsenyeva, a wealthy young heiress of a prominent aristocratic Stolypin family.'
p6680
aS"Lermontov's maternal grandmother, Elizaveta Arsenyeva (nee Stolypina), regarded their marriage as a mismatch and deeply disliked her son-in-law."
p6681
aS'"Kundera\'s best-known work is The Unbearable Lightness of Being.'
p6682
aS'His books were banned by the Communist regime of Czechoslovakia until the downfall of the regime in the Velvet Revolution of 1989.'
p6683
aS'He lives virtually incognito and rarely speaks to the media.'
p6684
aS'A perennial contender for the Nobel Prize in Literature, he has been nominated on several occasions. Biography Kundera was born in 1929 at Purkynova ulice, 6 (6 Purkynova Street) in Brno, Czechoslovakia, to a middle-class family.'
p6685
aS'His father, Ludvik Kundera (1891-1971) was an important Czech musicologist and pianist who served as the head of the Janacek Music Academy in Brno from 1948 to 1961.'
p6686
aS'His mother was Milada Kunderova (born Janosikova).'
p6687
aS'Milan learned to play the piano from his father; he later studied musicology and musical composition.'
p6688
aS'In 2008, his 1959 album Kind of Blue received its fourth platinum certification from the Recording Industry Association of America (RIAA), for shipments of at least four million copies in the United_States.'
p6689
aS'On December 15, 2009, the U.S. House of Representatives passed a symbolic resolution recognizing and commemorating the album Kind of Blue on its 50th anniversary, "honoring the masterpiece and reaffirming jazz as a national treasure". Life and careerEdit  Early life (1926-44)Edit Miles Dewey Davis III was born on May 26, 1926, to an affluent African American family in Alton, Illinois.'
p6690
aS'His father, Miles Dewey Davis, Jr., was a dentist.'
p6691
aS'In 1927 the family moved to East St. Louis, Illinois.'
p6692
aS"They also owned a substantial ranch in the Delta region of Arkansas near the city of Pine Bluff, Arkansas, where Davis's father and grandfather were from."
p6693
aS"It was in both East St. Louis, Illinois and near Pine Bluff, Arkansas that young Davis developed his earliest appreciation for music listening to the gospel music of the black church.Davis' mother, Cleota Mae Davis (nee Henry), wanted her son to learn the piano; she was a capable blues pianist but kept this fact hidden from her son."
p6694
aS'His musical studies began at 13, when his father gave him a trumpet and arranged lessons with local musician Elwood Buchanan.'
p6695
aS"Although the primary capital of Beijing fell in 1644 to a rebellion led by Li Zicheng (who established the Shun dynasty, soon replaced by the Manchu-led Qing dynasty), regimes loyal to the Ming throne - collectively called the Southern Ming - survived until 1662.The Hongwu Emperor (ruled 1368-98) attempted to create a society of self-sufficient rural communities ordered in a rigid, immobile system that would guarantee and support a permanent class of soldiers for his dynasty: the empire's standing army exceeded one million troops and the navy's dockyards in Nanjing were the largest in the world."
p6696
aS'He also took great care breaking the power of the court eunuchs and unrelated magnates, enfeoffing his many sons throughout China and attempting to guide these princes through the Huang Ming Zu Xun, a set of published dynastic instructions.'
p6697
aS"This failed spectacularly when his teenage successor, the Jianwen Emperor, attempted to curtail his uncles' power, prompting the Jingnan Campaign, an uprising that placed the Prince of Yan upon the throne as the Yongle Emperor in 1402."
p6698
aS'The Yongle Emperor established Yan as a secondary capital and renamed it Beijing, constructed the Forbidden City, and restored the Grand Canal and the primacy of the imperial examinations in official appointments.'
p6699
aS'He rewarded his eunuch supporters and employed them as a counterweight against the Confucian scholar-bureaucrats.'
p6700
aS'One, Zheng He, led seven enormous voyages of exploration into the Indian Ocean as far as Arabia and the coast of Africa.The rise of new emperors and new factions diminished such extravagances; the capture of the Zhengtong Emperor during the 1449 Tumu Crisis ended them completely.'
p6701
aS'The imperial navy was allowed to fall into disrepair while forced labor constructed the Liaodong palisade and connected and fortified the Great Wall of China into its modern form.'
p6702
aS'After his death, Minos became a judge of the dead in the underworld.'
p6703
aS'The Minoan civilization of Crete has been named after him by the archaeologist Arthur Evans.'
p6704
aS'By his wife, Pasiphae (or some say Crete), he fathered Ariadne, Androgeus, Deucalion, Phaedra, Glaucus, Catreus, Acacallis and Xenodice.'
p6705
aS"By a nymph, Pareia, he had four sons, Eurymedon, Nephalion, Chryses and Philolaus, who were killed by Heracles in revenge for the murder of the latter's two companions; and by Dexithea, one of the Telchines, he had a son called Euxanthius."
p6706
aS'By Androgeneia of Phaestus he had Asterion, who commanded the Cretan contingent in the war between Dionysus and the Indians.'
p6707
aS'Also given as his children are Euryale, possibly the mother of Orion with Poseidon, and Pholegander, eponym of the island Pholegandros.Minos, along with his brothers, Rhadamanthys and Sarpedon, was raised by king Asterion (or Asterius) of Crete.'
p6708
aS'When Asterion died, his throne was claimed by Minos who banished Sarpedon and, according to some sources, Rhadamanthys too. Etymology Minos is the Cretan word for "king", or, by a euhemerist interpretation, the name of a particular king that was subsequently used as a title.'
p6709
aS'The young woman of the title is drawn to a senior servant, a valet named Jean, who is particularly well-traveled, well-mannered and well-read.'
p6710
aS"The action takes place in the kitchen of Miss_Julie's father's manor, where Jean's fiancee, a servant named Christine, cooks and sometimes sleeps while Jean and Miss_Julie talk.On this night the relationship between Miss_Julie and Jean escalates rapidly to feelings of love and is subsequently consummated."
p6711
aS'Over the course of the play Miss_Julie and Jean battle until Jean convinces her that the only way to escape her predicament is to commit suicide. Themes The major theme of the play is Darwinism, a theory that was a significant influence on the author during his naturalistic period.'
p6712
aS'It isn\'t explicitly stated in the script, but it is in the preface, where Strindberg describes his two lead characters, Miss_Julie and Jean, as vying against each other in an evolutionary "life and death" battle for a survival of the fittest.'
p6713
aS'The character, Miss_Julie, represents the last of an old aristocratic breed about to die out, whereas Jean represents one who is clambering upwards, and who is more fit to thrive because he is better able to adapt in terms of the "life roles" he can take on.'
p6714
aS"The play contains a variety of themes, partly because Miss_Julie's actions are motivated by a range of factors and influences: Her class, her desires and impulsive nature, her father, and the dynamic traumas of her family histories."
p6715
aS'She is given a number of motivations because the author, in wanting to be naturalistic, realizes that in life people can be motivated in a number of ways, and also because the author is taking a stand against the dominant theatrical idea that says that characters should be written with only one primary motivation. The author\'s preface The play is preceded by a remarkable author\'s preface, which concerns itself with Strindberg\'s ideas of naturalism and how they apply to his play, Miss_Julie. Naturalism Strindberg wrote this play with the intention of abiding by the theories of "naturalism" -- both his own version, and also the version described by the French novelist and literary theoretician, Emile_Zola.'
p6716
aS'The river takes drainage from a sparsely populated, semi-arid watershed of more than half a million square miles (1,300,000 km2), which includes parts of ten U.S. states and two Canadian provinces.'
p6717
aS"When combined with the lower Mississippi River, it forms the world's fourth longest river system.For over 12,000 years, people have depended on the Missouri and its tributaries as a source of sustenance and transportation."
p6718
aS'More than ten major groups of Native Americans populated the watershed, most leading a nomadic lifestyle and dependent on enormous buffalo herds that once roamed through the Great Plains.'
p6719
aS'The first Europeans encountered the river in the late seventeenth century, and the region passed through Spanish and French hands before finally becoming part of the United_States through the Louisiana Purchase.'
p6720
aS"The Missouri was long believed to be part of the Northwest Passage - a water route from the Atlantic to the Pacific - but when Lewis and Clark became the first to travel the river's entire length, they confirmed the mythical pathway to be no more than a legend.The Missouri was one of the main routes for the westward expansion of the United_States during the 19th century."
p6721
aS'The growth of the fur trade in the early 1800s laid much of the groundwork as trappers explored the region and blazed trails.'
p6722
aS'Pioneers headed west en masse beginning in the 1830s, first by covered wagon, then by the growing numbers of steamboats entering service on the river.'
p6723
aS'Writers of the Roman Empire period referred to this mystery religion by phrases which can be anglicized as Mysteries of Mithras or Mysteries of the Persians; modern historians refer to it as Mithraism, or sometimes Roman Mithraism.'
p6724
aS'The mysteries were popular in the Roman military.Worshippers of Mithras had a complex system of seven grades of initiation, with ritual meals.'
p6725
aS'Initiates called themselves syndexioi, those "united by the handshake".'
p6726
aS'They met in underground temples (called mithraea), which survive in large numbers.'
p6727
aS'The cult appears to have had its centre in Rome.Numerous archeological finds, including meeting places, monuments, and artifacts, have contributed to modern knowledge about Mithraism throughout the Roman Empire.'
p6728
aS'The iconic scenes of Mithras show him being born from a rock, slaughtering a bull, and sharing a banquet with the god Sol (the Sun).'
p6729
aS'About 420 sites have yielded materials related to the cult.'
p6730
aS"Lumumba was the first leader in the country to be democratically elected, but he was subsequently deposed in a coup d'etat organised by Colonel Mobutu and executed by a Katangese firing squad led by Julien Gat, a Belgian mercenary, Mobutu then assumed the role of army chief of staff, before taking power directly in a second coup in 1965."
p6731
aS'As part of his program of "national authenticity," Mobutu changed the Congo\'s name to Zaire in 1971 and his own name to Mobutu_Sese_Seko in 1972.Mobutu established a single-party state in which all power was concentrated in his hands.'
p6732
aS'He also became the object of a pervasive cult of personality.'
p6733
aS'During his reign, Mobutu built a highly centralized state and amassed a large personal fortune through economic exploitation and corruption, leading some to call his rule a "kleptocracy."'
p6734
aS'The nation suffered from uncontrolled inflation, a large debt, and massive currency devaluations.'
p6735
aS'By 1991, economic deterioration and unrest led him to agree to share power with opposition leaders, but he used the army to thwart change until May 1997, when rebel forces led by Laurent Kabila expelled him from the country.'
p6736
aS'Already suffering from advanced prostate cancer, he died three months later in Morocco.Mobutu became notorious for corruption, nepotism, and the embezzlement of between US$4 billion and $15 billion during his reign, as well as extravagances such as Concorde-flown shopping trips to Paris.'
p6737
aS'16 March] 1881) was a Russian composer, one of the group known as "The Five".'
p6738
aS'He was an innovator of Russian music in the romantic period.'
p6739
aS'He strove to achieve a uniquely Russian musical identity, often in deliberate defiance of the established conventions of Western music.Many of his works were inspired by Russian history, Russian folklore, and other nationalist themes.'
p6740
aS"Such works include the opera Boris Godunov, the orchestral tone poem Night on Bald Mountain, and the piano suite Pictures at an Exhibition.For many years Mussorgsky's works were mainly known in versions revised or completed by other composers."
p6741
aS"Many of his most important compositions have latterly come into their own in their original forms, and some of the original scores are now also available. Name The spelling and pronunciation of the composer's name has been a matter of some controversy.The family name is derived from a 15th or 16th century ancestor, Roman Vasilyevich Monastyryov, who was mentioned in the Velvet Book, the 17th century genealogy of Russian boyars."
p6742
aS'Roman Vasilyevich bore the nickname "Musorga", and was the grandfather of the first \'Mussorgsky\'.'
p6743
aS"The composer is of the lineage of Rurik, the legendary founder of the Russian state.In Mussorgsky family documents, the spelling of the name varies: 'Musarskiy', 'Muserskiy', 'Muserskoy', 'Musirskoy', 'Musorskiy', and 'Musurskiy'."
p6744
aS'The term orbital was introduced by Robert S. Mulliken in 1932 as an abbreviation for one-electron orbital wave function.'
p6745
aS'At an elementary level, it is used to describe the region of space in which the function has a significant amplitude.'
p6746
aS'Molecular_orbitals are usually constructed by combining atomic orbitals or hybrid orbitals from each atom of the molecule, or other molecular orbitals from groups of atoms.'
p6747
aS'They can be quantitatively calculated using the Hartree-Fock or self-consistent field (SCF) methods. Overview A molecular orbital (MO) can be used to represent the regions in a molecule where an electron occupying that orbital is likely to be found.'
p6748
aS'Molecular_orbitals are obtained from the combination of atomic orbitals, which predict the location of an electron in an atom.'
p6749
aS'A molecular orbital can specify the electron configuration of a molecule: the spatial distribution and energy of one (or one pair of) electron(s).'
p6750
aS'Most commonly an MO is represented as a linear combination of atomic orbitals (the LCAO-MO method), especially in qualitative or very approximate usage.'
p6751
aS'Molluscs are the largest marine phylum, comprising about 23% of all the named marine organisms.'
p6752
aS'Numerous molluscs also live in freshwater and terrestrial habitats.'
p6753
aS'They are highly diverse, not just in size and in anatomical structure, but also in behaviour and in habitat.'
p6754
aS'The phylum is typically divided into 9 or 10 taxonomic classes, of which two are entirely extinct.'
p6755
aS'Cephalopod molluscs, such as squid, cuttlefish and octopus, are among the most neurologically advanced of all invertebrates--and either the giant squid or the colossal squid is the largest known invertebrate species.'
p6756
aS'The gastropods (snails and slugs) are by far the most numerous molluscs in terms of classified species, and account for 80% of the total.'
p6757
aS'The scientific study of molluscs is called malacology.The three most universal features defining modern molluscs are a mantle with a significant cavity used for breathing and excretion, the presence of a radula, and the structure of the nervous system.'
p6758
aS'It is an extensive (additive) property: the moment of inertia of a composite system is the sum of the moments of inertia of its component subsystems (all taken about the same axis).'
p6759
aS'One of its definitions is the second moment of mass with respect to distance from an axis r, , integrating over the entire mass.For bodies constrained to rotate in a plane, it is sufficient to consider their moment of inertia about an axis perpendicular to the plane.'
p6760
aS'For bodies free to rotate in three dimensions, their moments can be described by a symmetric 3 x 3 matrix; each body has a set of mutually perpendicular principal axes for which this matrix is diagonal and torques around the axes act independently of each other. Introduction When a body is rotating, or free to rotate, around an axis, a torque must be applied to change its angular momentum.'
p6761
aS'The amount of torque needed for any given rate of change in angular momentum is proportional to the moment of inertia of the body.'
p6762
aS'Moment_of_inertia may be expressed in terms of kilogram-square metres (kg*m2) in SI units and pound-square feet (lbm*ft2) in imperial or US units.Moment_of_inertia plays the role in rotational kinetics that Mass (inertia) plays in linear kinetics - both characterize the resistance of a body to changes in its motion.'
p6763
aS'The moment of inertia depends on how mass is distributed around an axis of rotation, and will vary depending on the chosen axis.'
p6764
aS'For a point-like mass, the moment of inertia about some axis is given by d2m, where d is the distance to the axis, and m is the mass.'
p6765
aS'For example, a heavy truck moving rapidly has a large momentum--it takes a large or prolonged force to get the truck up to this speed, and it takes a large or prolonged force to bring it to a stop afterwards.'
p6766
aS'If the truck were lighter, or moving more slowly, then it would have less momentum.Like velocity, linear momentum is a vector quantity, possessing a direction as well as a magnitude:Linear momentum is also a conserved quantity, meaning that if a closed system is not affected by external forces, its total linear momentum cannot change.'
p6767
aS"In classical mechanics, conservation of linear momentum is implied by Newton's laws; but it also holds in special relativity (with a modified formula) and, with appropriate definitions, a (generalized) linear momentum conservation law holds in electrodynamics, quantum mechanics, quantum field theory, and general relativity. Newtonian mechanics Momentum has a direction as well as magnitude."
p6768
aS'Quantities that have both a magnitude and a direction are known as vector quantities.'
p6769
aS'Because momentum has a direction, it can be used to predict the resulting direction of objects after they collide, as well as their speeds.'
p6770
aS'Below, the basic properties of momentum are described in one dimension.'
p6771
aS'The vector equations are almost identical to the scalar equations (see multiple dimensions). Single particle The momentum of a particle is traditionally represented by the letter p. It is the product of two quantities, the mass (represented by the letter m) and velocity (v):The units of momentum are the product of the units of mass and velocity.'
p6772
aS'Ulaanbaatar, the capital and also the largest city, is home to about 45% of the population.'
p6773
aS"Mongolia's political system is a parliamentary republic.The area of what is now Mongolia has been ruled by various nomadic empires, including the Xiongnu, the Xianbei, the Rouran, the Turkic Khaganate, and others."
p6774
aS'In 1206, Genghis_Khan founded the Mongol Empire, and his grandson Kublai_Khan conquered China to establish the Yuan dynasty.'
p6775
aS'After the collapse of the Yuan, the Mongols retreated to Mongolia and resumed their earlier pattern of factional conflict except during the era of Dayan Khan and Tumen Zasagt Khan.'
p6776
aS'In the 16th century, Tibetan Buddhism began to spread in Mongolia and it was accelerated by the unwavering support of the Qing government after Mongolia was incorporated by the Manchu Qing dynasty.'
p6777
aS'In the 1900s almost half of the adult male population were Buddhist monks.By the mid-18th century, all of Mongolia had been incorporated into the area ruled by the Qing dynasty.'
p6778
aS'During the collapse of the Qing dynasty Mongols established the Temporary Government of Khalkha on 30 November 1911, before the abdication of the last Qing emperor and the establishment of the Republic of China.'
p6779
aS'Its main application is in Mossbauer spectroscopy.In the Mossbauer_effect the narrow resonance absorption for nuclear gamma absorption can be successfully attained by physically immobilizing atomic nuclei in a crystal.'
p6780
aS'The immobilization of nuclei at both ends of a gamma resonance interaction is required so that no gamma energy is lost to the kinetic energy of recoiling nuclei at either the emitting or absorbing end of a gamma transition.'
p6781
aS'Such loss of energy causes gamma ray resonance absorption to fail.'
p6782
aS'However, when emitted gamma rays carry essentially all of the energy of the atomic nuclear de-excitation that produces them, this energy is also sufficient to excite the same energy state in a second immobilized nucleus of the same type. History The emission and absorption of X-rays by gases had been observed previously, and it was expected that a similar phenomenon would be found for gamma rays, which are created by nuclear transitions (as opposed to X-rays, which are typically produced by electronic transitions).'
p6783
aS'However, attempts to observe nuclear resonance produced by gamma-rays in gases failed due to energy being lost to recoil, preventing resonance (the Doppler_effect also broadens the gamma-ray spectrum).'
p6784
aS'Mossbauer was able to observe resonance in nuclei of solid iridium, which raised the question of why gamma-ray resonance was possible in solids, but not in gases.'
p6785
aS'Mossbauer proposed that, for the case of atoms bound into a solid, under certain circumstances a fraction of the nuclear events could occur essentially without recoil.'
p6786
aS'The capital and largest city is Maputo (known as "Lourenco Marques" before independence).Between the 1st and 5th centuries AD, Bantu-speaking peoples migrated from farther north and west.'
p6787
aS'Swahili, and later also Arab, commercial ports existed along the coasts until the arrival of Europeans.'
p6788
aS'The area was explored by Vasco da Gama in 1498 and colonized by Portugal from 1505.'
p6789
aS"After over four centuries of Portuguese rule, Mozambique gained independence in 1975, becoming the People's Republic of Mozambique shortly thereafter."
p6790
aS'After only two years of independence, the country descended into an intense and protracted civil war lasting from 1977 to 1992.'
p6791
aS'In 1994, Mozambique held its first multiparty elections and has remained a relatively stable presidential republic since.Mozambique is endowed with rich and extensive natural resources.'
p6792
aS"The country's economy is based largely on agriculture, but industry, mainly food and beverages, chemical manufacturing, aluminium and petroleum production, is growing."
p6793
aS"With an interior perspective, the story travels forwards and back in time and in and out of the characters' minds to construct an image of Clarissa's life and of the inter-war social structure."
p6794
aS"In October 2005, Mrs_Dalloway was included on TIME magazine's list of the 100 best English-language novels written since 1923. Plot summary Clarissa Dalloway goes around London in the morning, getting ready to host a party that evening."
p6795
aS'The nice day reminds her of her youth spent in the countryside in Bourton and makes her wonder about her choice of husband; she married the reliable Richard Dalloway instead of the enigmatic and demanding Peter Walsh, and she "had not the option" to be with Sally Seton.'
p6796
aS'Peter reintroduces these conflicts by paying a visit that morning.Septimus Warren Smith, a First World War veteran suffering from deferred traumatic stress, spends his day in the park with his Italian-born wife Lucrezia, where Peter Walsh observes them.'
p6797
aS'Septimus is visited by frequent and indecipherable hallucinations, mostly concerning his dear friend Evans who died in the war.'
p6798
aS"Later that day, after he is prescribed involuntary commitment to a psychiatric hospital, he commits suicide by jumping out of a window.Clarissa's party in the evening is a slow success."
p6799
aS'It is attended by most of the characters she has met in the book, including people from her past.'
p6800
aS'Much_Ado_About_Nothing is generally considered one of Shakespeare\'s best comedies, because it combines elements of robust hilarity with more serious meditations on honor, shame, and court politics.By means of "noting" (which, in Shakespeare\'s day, sounded the same as "nothing," and which is gossip, rumour, and overhearing), Benedick and Beatrice are tricked into confessing their love for each other, and Claudio is tricked into rejecting Hero at the altar on the erroneous belief that she has been unfaithful.'
p6801
aS'At the end, Benedick and Beatrice join forces to set things right, and the others join in a dance celebrating the marriages of the two couples. Characters  Synopsis At Messina, a messenger brings news that Don Pedro, a Spanish prince from Aragon, will return this night from a successful battle, Claudio being among his soldiers.'
p6802
aS"Beatrice, Leonato's niece, asks the messenger about Benedick, and makes sarcastic remarks about his ineptitude as a soldier."
p6803
aS'Leonato explains that "There is a kind of merry war betwixt Signior Benedick and her.'
p6804
aS'"Upon the arrival of the soldiers, Leonato welcomes Don Pedro and invites him to stay for a month, Benedick and Beatrice resume their "merry war", and Pedro\'s illegitimate brother Don John is introduced.'
p6805
aS"Claudio's feelings for Hero, Leonato's only daughter, are rekindled upon seeing her, and Claudio soon announces to Benedick his intention to court her."
p6806
aS'Benedick, who openly despises marriage, tries to dissuade his friend but Don Pedro encourages the marriage.'
p6807
aS'The "classic period" of the empire started in 1556 with the ascension of Akbar the Great to the throne.'
p6808
aS'Under the rule of Akbar and his son Jahangir, India enjoyed economic progress as well as religious harmony, and the monarchs were interested in local religious and cultural traditions.'
p6809
aS'Akbar was a successful warrior.'
p6810
aS'He also forged alliances with several Hindu Rajput kingdoms.'
p6811
aS'Some Rajput kingdoms continued to pose a significant threat to Mughal dominance of northwestern India, but they were subdued by Akbar.'
p6812
aS'All Mughal emperors were Muslims, except Akbar in the latter part of his life followed a new religion called Deen-i-Ilahi, as recorded in historical books like Ain-e-Akbari and Dabestan-e Mazaheb.The Mughal_Empire did not try to intervene in the local societies during most of its existence, but rather balanced and pacified them through new administrative practices and diverse and inclusive ruling elites, leading to more systematic, centralised, and uniform rule.'
p6813
aS'Newly coherent social groups in northern and western India, such as the Marathas, the Rajputs, and the Sikhs, gained military and governing ambitions during Mughal rule, which, through collaboration or adversity, gave them both recognition and military experience.The reign of Shah Jahan, the fifth emperor, was the golden age of Mughal architecture.'
p6814
aS'He also ruled Levantine territories outside Egypt.'
p6815
aS'The dynasty that he established would rule Egypt and Sudan until the Egyptian Revolution of 1952 led by Muhammad Naguib. Early lifeEdit Muhammad Ali was born to Albanian parents in the city of Kavala, part of the Ottoman Rumelia Eyalet (now in Greek Macedonia).'
p6816
aS'According to the many French, English and other western journalists who interviewed him, and according to people who knew him, the only language he knew fluently was Albanian although he was also competent in Turkish.'
p6817
aS'Lately however, it has also started to be thought possible that his ancestors were Turkish, and actually migrated from South-East Anatolia.'
p6818
aS'But this has been refuted, because it is proven by his descendants, and other historians that his family were ethnic Albanians and originated from Albania.'
p6819
aS"He was a son (of 17) of a tobacco and shipping merchant named Ibrahim Agha, his mother Zainab was his uncle Husain Agha's sister."
p6820
aS'Muhammad Ali was the nephew of the "Ayan of Kavalla" (Corbaci) Husain Agha.'
p6821
aS'The Munich Metropolitan Region is home to 5.8 million people.The name of the city is derived from the Old/Middle High German term Munichen, meaning "by the monks".'
p6822
aS"It derives from the monks of the Benedictine order who ran a monastery at the place that was later to become the Old Town of Munich; hence the monk depicted on the city's coat of arms."
p6823
aS'Munich was first mentioned in 1158.'
p6824
aS'From 1255 the city was seat of the Bavarian Dukes.'
p6825
aS"Black and gold -- the colours of the Holy Roman Empire -- have been the city's official colours since the time of Ludwig the Bavarian, when it was an imperial residence."
p6826
aS"Following a final reunification of the Wittelsbachian Duchy of Bavaria, previously divided and sub-divided for more than 200 years, the town became the country's sole capital in 1506."
p6827
aS"Catholic Munich was a cultural stronghold of the Counter-Reformation and a political point of divergence during the resulting Thirty_Years'_War, but remained physically untouched despite an occupation by the Protestant Swedes; as the townsfolk would rather open the gates of their town than risk siege and almost inevitable destruction."
p6828
aS'In the United_States, it was published February 28, 1934, under the title of Murder in the Calais Coach, by Dodd, Mead and Company.'
p6829
aS'The U.K. edition retailed at seven shillings and sixpence (7/6) and the U.S. edition at $2.00.The U.S. title of Murder in the Calais Coach was used to avoid confusion with the 1932 Graham_Greene novel Stamboul Train which had been published in the United_States as Orient Express. Plot summary Upon arriving at the Tokatlian Hotel in Istanbul, private detective Hercule Poirot receives a telegram prompting him to cancel his arrangements and return to London.'
p6830
aS'He instructs the concierge to book a first-class compartment on the Orient Express leaving that night.'
p6831
aS'After boarding, Poirot is approached by Mr. Ratchett, a malevolent American he initially saw at the Tokatlian.'
p6832
aS'Ratchett believes his life is being threatened and attempts to hire Poirot but, due to his distaste, Poirot refuses.'
p6833
aS'"I do not like your face, Mr. Ratchett," he says.On the second night of the journey, the train is stopped by a snowdrift near Vinkovci.'
p6834
aS"Several events disturb Poirot's sleep, including a cry emanating from Ratchett's compartment."
p6835
aS'Writing about Tchaikovsky\'s ballet The Sleeping Beauty in an open letter to impresario Sergei Diaghilev that was printed in the Times of London, composer Igor Stravinsky contended that Tchaikovsky\'s music was as Russian as Pushkin\'s verse or Glinka\'s song, since Tchaikovsky "drew unconsciously from the true, popular sources" of the Russian race.'
p6836
aS'This Russianness of mindset ensured that Tchaikovsky would not become a mere imitator of Western technique.'
p6837
aS"Tchaikovsky's natural gift for melody, based mainly on themes of tremendous eloquence and emotive power and supported by matching resources in harmony and orchestration, has always made his music appealing to the public."
p6838
aS'However, his hard-won professional technique and an ability to harness it to express his emotional life gave Tchaikovsky the ability to realize his potential more fully than any other Russian composer of his time. Ballets "Tchaikovsky was made for ballet," writes musicologist David Brown Before him, musicologist Francis Maes writes, ballet music was written by specialists, such as Ludwig Minkus and Cesare Pugni, "who wrote nothing else and knew all the tricks of the trade."'
p6839
aS'Brown explains that Tchaikovsky gifts for melody and orchestration, his ability to write memorable dance music with great fluency and his responsiveness to a theatrical atmosphere made him uniquely qualified in writing for the genre.'
p6840
aS'Above all, Brown writes, he had "an ability to create and sustain atmosphere: above all, a faculty for suggesting and supporting movement ... animated by an abundant inventiveness, above all rhythmic, within the individual phrase."'
p6841
aS"In comparing Tchaikovsky to French composer Leo Delibes, whose ballets Tchaikovsky adored, Brown writes that while the two composers shared similar talents, the Russian's passion places him in a higher league than that of the Frenchman."
p6842
aS'The poem is written in 28 rhymed couplets of iambic pentameter. Historical background The poem is preceded by "Ferrara:", indicating that the speaker is most likely Alfonso II d\'Este, the fifth Duke of Ferrara (1533-1598), who, at the age of 25, married Lucrezia di Cosimo de\' Medici, the 14-year-old daughter of Cosimo I de\' Medici, Grand Duke of Tuscany, and Eleonora di Toledo.Lucrezia was not well educated, and the Medicis could be considered "nouveau riche" in comparison to the venerable and distinguished Este family (the Duke\'s remark regarding his gift of a "nine-hundred-years-old name" clearly indicates that he considered his bride beneath him socially).'
p6843
aS'She came with a sizeable dowry, and the couple married in 1558.'
p6844
aS'He then abandoned her for two years before she died on 21 April 1561, at age 17.'
p6845
aS'There was a strong suspicion of poisoning.'
p6846
aS'The Duke then sought the hand of Barbara, eighth daughter of the Holy Roman Emperor Ferdinand I and Anna of Bohemia and Hungary and the sister of the Count of Tyrol, Ferdinand II.'
p6847
aS'The count was in charge of arranging the marriage; the chief of his entourage, Nikolaus Madruz, a native of Innsbruck, was his courier.'
p6848
aS'Madruz is presumably the silent listener in the poem.The other characters named in the poem, painter Fra Pandolf and sculptor Claus of Innsbruck, are fictional. Story The poem is set during the late Italian Renaissance.'
p6849
aS"Under that regime, works such as Burger's Daughter and July's_People were banned."
p6850
aS'She was active in the anti-apartheid movement, joining the African National Congress during the days when the organization was banned.'
p6851
aS'She was also active in HIV/AIDS causes. Early life Gordimer was born near Springs, Gauteng, an East Rand mining town outside Johannesburg.'
p6852
aS'Her father, Isidore Gordimer, was a Jewish immigrant watchmaker from Zagare (then Russian Empire, now Lithuania), and her mother, Hannah "Nan" (Myers) Gordimer, was from London.'
p6853
aS"Her mother was from an assimilated family of Jewish origins; Gordimer was raised in a secular household.Gordimer's early interest in racial and economic inequality in South Africa was shaped in part by her parents."
p6854
aS"Her father's experience as a refugee in tsarist Russia helped form Gordimer's political identity, but he was neither an activist nor particularly sympathetic toward the experiences of black people under apartheid."
p6855
aS'Conversely, Gordimer saw activism by her mother, whose concern about the poverty and discrimination faced by black people in South Africa ostensibly led her to found a creche for black children.'
p6856
aS'He is regarded as one of the first contemporary writers of Arabic literature, along with Tawfiq el-Hakim, to explore themes of existentialism.'
p6857
aS'He published 34 novels, over 350 short stories, dozens of movie scripts, and five plays over a 70-year career.'
p6858
aS'Many of his works have been made into Egyptian and foreign films. Early life and education Born into a lower middle-class Muslim family in the Gamaleyya quarter of Cairo, Mahfouz was named after Professor Naguib Pasha Mahfouz (1882-1974), the renowned Coptic physician who delivered him.'
p6859
aS'Mahfouz was the seventh and the youngest child in a family that had five boys and two girls.'
p6860
aS"The family lived in two popular districts of the town, in el-Gamaleyya, from where they moved in 1924 to el-Abbaseyya, then a new Cairo suburb; both provided the backdrop for many of Mahfouz's writings."
p6861
aS'His father, whom Mahfouz described as having been "old-fashioned", was a civil servant, and Mahfouz eventually followed in his footsteps.'
p6862
aS'In his early years, Mahfouz read extensively and was influenced by Hafiz Najib, Taha Hussein and Salama Moussa.'
p6863
aS'Napoleon dominated European affairs for over a decade while leading France against a series of coalitions in the Revolutionary Wars and the Napoleonic Wars.'
p6864
aS'He won most of these wars and the vast majority of his battles, rapidly gaining control of continental Europe before his ultimate defeat in 1815.'
p6865
aS'One of the greatest commanders in history, his campaigns are studied at military schools worldwide and he remains one of the most celebrated and controversial political figures in Western history.'
p6866
aS'In civil affairs, Napoleon implemented foundational liberal reforms in France and across Europe.'
p6867
aS'He established a system of public education, abolished the vestiges of feudalism, emancipated Jews and other religious minorities, enacted legal protections for an emerging middle class, and centralized state power at the expense of religious authorities.'
p6868
aS"His lasting legal achievement, the Napoleonic Code, has been adopted in various forms by a quarter of the world's legal systems, from Japan in Asia to Quebec in North America.Napoleon was born in Corsica, just one year after the island had passed to France from the Genoese Republic, to a relatively modest family of noble Italian ancestry from Tuscany."
p6869
aS'Serving in the French army as an artillery officer, Napoleon supported the Revolution from the outset in 1789 and tried to spread its ideals to Corsica, but was banished from the island in 1793.'
p6870
aS"Its performance was forbidden by the church during Lessing's lifetime; it was first performed in 1783 in Berlin."
p6871
aS'In 1922 it was adapted into a silent film of the same title.Set in Jerusalem during the Third Crusade, it describes how the wise Jewish merchant Nathan, the enlightened sultan Saladin, and the (initially anonymous) Templar bridge their gaps between Judaism, Islam and Christianity.'
p6872
aS'Its major themes are friendship, tolerance, relativism of God, a rejection of miracles and a need for communication. Ring Parable The centerpiece of the work is the Ring Parable (German: Ringparabel), narrated by Nathan when asked by Saladin which religion is true: An heirloom ring with the magical ability to render its owner pleasing in the eyes of God and mankind had been passed from father to the son he loved most.'
p6873
aS'When it came to a father of three sons whom he loved equally, he promised it (in "pious weakness") to each of them.'
p6874
aS'Looking for a way to keep his promise, he had two replicas made, which were indistinguishable from the original, and gave on his deathbed a ring to each of them.The brothers quarreled over who owned the real ring.'
p6875
aS"A wise judge admonished them that it was impossible to tell at that time - that it even could not be discounted that all three rings were replicas, the original one having been lost at some point in the past; that to find out whether one of them had the real ring it was up to them to live in such a way that their ring's powers could prove true, to live a life that is pleasant in the eyes of God and mankind rather than expecting the ring's miraculous powers to do so."
p6876
aS"Nathan compares this to religion, saying that each of us lives by the religion we have learned from those we respect. Background The character of Nathan is to a large part modeled after Lessing's lifelong friend, the eminent philosopher Moses Mendelssohn."
p6877
aS'Nathaniel later added a "w" to make his name "Hawthorne" in order to hide this relation.'
p6878
aS'He entered Bowdoin College in 1821, was elected to Phi Beta Kappa in 1824, and graduated in 1825.'
p6879
aS'Hawthorne published his first work, a novel titled Fanshawe, in 1828; he later tried to suppress it, feeling it was not equal to the standard of his later work.'
p6880
aS'He published several short stories in various periodicals, which he collected in 1837 as Twice-Told Tales.'
p6881
aS'The next year, he became engaged to Sophia Peabody.'
p6882
aS'He worked at a Custom House and joined Brook Farm, a transcendentalist community, before marrying Peabody in 1842.'
p6883
aS'The couple moved to The Old Manse in Concord, Massachusetts, later moving to Salem, the Berkshires, then to The Wayside in Concord.'
p6884
aS'Critics have labeled the organization as being black supremacist and antisemitic, and NOI is tracked as a hate group by the Southern Poverty Law Center.Its official newspaper is The Final Call.'
p6885
aS'The Nation_of_Islam does not publish its membership numbers; in 2007, the core membership was estimated between 20,000 and 50,000.After Fard disappeared in June 1934, the Nation_of_Islam was led by Elijah Muhammad, who established places of worship (called Temples or Mosques), a school named Muhammad University of Islam, businesses, farms and real estate holdings in the United_States and abroad.'
p6886
aS"There were a number of splits and splinter groups during Elijah Muhammad's leadership, most notably the departure of senior leader Malcolm X to become Sunni Muslim."
p6887
aS'After Elijah Muhammad\'s death, his son Warith Deen Mohammed changed the name of the organization to "World Community of Islam in the West" (and twice more after that), and attempted to convert it to a mainstream Sunni Muslim ideology.In 1977, Louis Farrakhan rejected Warith Deen Mohammed\'s leadership and re-established the Nation_of_Islam on the original model.'
p6888
aS"He took over the Nation_of_Islam's headquarter Temple, Mosque Maryam (Mosque #2), which is located in Chicago, Illinois."
p6889
aS'Since 2010, under Farrakhan, members have been strongly encouraged to study Dianetics, and the Nation claims it has trained 1055 Auditors. History The NOI was founded in Detroit, Michigan, on July 4, 1930, by Wallace Fard Muhammad, also known as W. D. Fard Muhammad, on order to, as the Nation_of_Islam states: "... teach the downtrodden and defenseless Black people a thorough Knowledge of God and of themselves, and to put them on the road to Self-Independence with a superior culture and higher civilization than they had previously experienced."'
p6890
aS'The NOI teaches that W. Fard Muhammad was both the "Messiah" of Judaism and the Mahdi of Islam.'
p6891
aS'Sartre was awarded, though he ultimately declined, the Nobel Prize for literature in 1964.'
p6892
aS'The Nobel Foundation recognized him "for his work which, rich in ideas and filled with the spirit of freedom and the quest for truth, has exerted a far-reaching influence on our age."'
p6893
aS'Sartre was one of the few people to have declined the award, referring to it as merely a function of a bourgeois institution.The novel has been translated into English at least twice, by Lloyd Alexander as "The Diary of Antoine Roquentin" (John Lehmann, 1949) and by Robert Baldick as "Nausea" (Penguin Books, 1965). Plot summary Written in the form of journal entries, it follows 30-year-old Antoine Roquentin who, returned from years of travel, settles in the fictional French seaport town of Bouville to finish his research on the life of an 18th-century political figure.'
p6894
aS'But during the winter of 1932 a "sweetish sickness," as he calls nausea, increasingly impinges on almost everything he does or enjoys: his research project, the company of an autodidact who is reading all the books in the local library alphabetically, a physical relationship with a cafe owner named Francoise, his memories of Anny, an English girl he once loved, even his own hands and the beauty of nature.Over time, his disgust towards existence forces him into self-hatred and near-insanity.'
p6895
aS"He embodies Sartre's theories of existential angst, and he searches anxiously for meaning in all the things that had filled and fulfilled his life up to that point."
p6896
aS"But finally Antoine comes to a revelation into the nature of his being when he faces the troublesomely provisional and limited nature of existence itself.In his resolution at the end of the book he accepts the indifference of the physical world to man's aspirations."
p6897
aS'He is able to see that realization not only as a regret but also as an opportunity.'
p6898
aS'Among the gaseous planets in the Solar System, Neptune is the most dense.'
p6899
aS'Neptune is 17 times the mass of Earth and is slightly more massive than its near-twin Uranus, which is 15 times the mass of Earth, and not as dense as Neptune.'
p6900
aS'Neptune orbits the Sun at an average distance of 30.1 astronomical units (4.50x109 km).'
p6901
aS"Named after the Roman god of the sea, its astronomical symbol is , a stylised version of the god Neptune's trident.Neptune is not visible to the unaided eye and was the first and only planet found by mathematical prediction rather than by empirical observation."
p6902
aS'Unexpected changes in the orbit of Uranus led Alexis Bouvard to deduce that its orbit was subject to gravitational perturbation by an unknown planet.'
p6903
aS'Neptune was subsequently observed with a telescope on 23 September 1846 by Johann Galle within a degree of the position predicted by Urbain Le Verrier.'
p6904
aS"Its largest moon, Triton, was discovered shortly thereafter, though none of the planet's remaining 13 moons were located telescopically until the 20th century."
p6905
aS'When the reaction quotient is equal to the equilibrium constant of the reaction for a given temperature, i.e.'
p6906
aS'when the concentration of species are at their equilibrium values, the Nernst_equation gives the equilibrium voltage of the half-cell (or the full cell), which is zero; at equilibrium, QK, DG0, and therefore, E0.'
p6907
aS'It is named after the German physical chemist who first formulated it, Walther Nernst.The Nernst_equation gives a formula that relates the numerical values of the concentration gradient to the electric gradient that balances it.'
p6908
aS'For example, if a concentration gradient is established by dissolving KCl in half of a divided vessel that is full of H2O, and then a membrane permeable to K+ ions is introduced between the two halves, then after a relaxation period, an equilibrium situation arises where the chemical concentration gradient, which at first causes ions to move from the region of high concentration to the region of low concentration, is exactly balanced by an electrical gradient that opposes the movement of charge. Expression The two (ultimately equivalent) equations for these two cases (half-cell, full cell) are as follows:    (half-cell reduction potential for )    (total cell potential)whereEred is the half-cell reduction potential at the temperature of interestEored is the standard half-cell reduction potentialEcell is the cell potential (electromotive force) at the temperature of interestEocell is the standard cell potentialR is the universal gas constant: R  8.314 472(15) J K-1 mol-1T is the absolute temperaturea is the chemical activity for the relevant species, where aRed is the reducing agent and aOx is the oxidizing agent.'
p6909
aS'aX  gXcX, where gX is the activity coefficient of species X.'
p6910
aS'(Since activity coefficients tend to unity at low concentrations, activities in the Nernst_equation are frequently replaced by simple concentrations.'
p6911
aS')F is the Faraday constant, the number of coulombs per mole of electrons: F  9.648 533 99(24)x104 C mol-1z is the number of moles of electrons transferred in the cell reaction or half-reactionQr is the reaction quotient.At room temperature (25 degC), RT/F may be treated like a constant and replaced by 25.693 mV for cells.The Nernst_equation is frequently expressed in terms of base 10 logarithms (i.e., common logarithms) rather than natural logarithms, in which case it is written, for a cell at 25 degC:The Nernst_equation is used in physiology for finding the electric potential of a cell membrane with respect to one type of ion. Nernst potential The Nernst_equation has a physiological application when used to calculate the potential of an ion of charge z across a membrane.'
p6912
aS'He ordered theatres built and promoted athletic games.'
p6913
aS'During his reign, the redoubtable general Corbulo conducted a successful war and negotiated peace with the Parthian_Empire.'
p6914
aS'His general Suetonius Paulinus crushed a revolt in Britain.'
p6915
aS'Nero annexed the Bosporan Kingdom to the Empire and began the First Roman-Jewish War.In 64 AD, most of Rome was destroyed in the Great Fire of Rome, which many Romans believed Nero himself had started in order to clear land for his planned palatial complex, the Domus Aurea.'
p6916
aS'In 68, the rebellion of Vindex in Gaul and later the acclamation of Galba in Hispania drove Nero from the throne.'
p6917
aS'Facing a false report of being denounced as a public enemy who was to be executed, he committed suicide on 9 June 68 (the first Roman emperor to do so).'
p6918
aS'His death ended the Julio-Claudian Dynasty, sparking a brief period of civil wars known as the Year of the Four Emperors.'
p6919
aS'His wife was either Eurydice or Anaxibia; their children included Peisistratus, Thrasymedes, Pisidice, Polycaste, Stratichus, Aretus, Echephron, and Antilochus. Biography Nestor was an Argonaut, helped fight the centaurs, and participated in the hunt for the Calydonian Boar.He and his sons, Antilochus and Thrasymedes, fought on the side of the Achaeans in the Trojan War.'
p6920
aS'Though Nestor was already very old when the war began (he was believed to be about 110), he was noted for his bravery and speaking abilities.'
p6921
aS'In the Iliad, he often gives advice to the younger warriors and advises Agamemnon and Achilles to reconcile.'
p6922
aS'He is too old to engage in combat himself, but he leads the Pylian troops, riding his chariot, and one of his horses is killed by an arrow shot by Paris.'
p6923
aS'He also had a solid gold shield.'
p6924
aS'Homer frequently calls him by the epithet "the Gerenian horseman."'
p6925
aS'At the funeral games of Patroclus, Nestor advises Antilochus on how to win the chariot race.'
p6926
aS'The European part of the Netherlands borders Germany to the east, Belgium to the south, and the North Sea to the northwest, sharing maritime borders with Belgium, the United Kingdom and Germany.'
p6927
aS'The largest and most important cities in the Netherlands are Amsterdam, The Hague and Rotterdam.'
p6928
aS"Amsterdam is the country's capital, while The Hague holds the Dutch seat of government and parliament."
p6929
aS'The port of Rotterdam is the largest port in Europe - as large as the next three largest combined.The Netherlands\' name literally means "Low Countries", influenced by its low land and flat geography, with only about 50% of its land exceeding one metre above sea level.'
p6930
aS'Most of the areas below sea level are man-made.'
p6931
aS"Since the late 16th century, large areas (polders) have been reclaimed from the sea and lakes, amounting to nearly 17% of the country's current land mass.With a population density of 407 people per km2 - 500 if water is excluded - the Netherlands is a very densely populated country for its size."
p6932
aS'Only Bangladesh, South_Korea, and Taiwan have both a larger population and a higher population density.'
p6933
aS'Neurons can connect to each other to form neural networks.'
p6934
aS'Neurons are the core components of the brain and spinal cord of the central nervous system (CNS), and of the ganglia of the peripheral nervous system (PNS).'
p6935
aS'Specialized types of neurons include: sensory neurons which respond to touch, sound, light and all other stimuli affecting the cells of the sensory organs that then send signals to the spinal cord and brain, motor neurons that receive signals from the brain and spinal cord to cause muscle contractions and affect glandular outputs, and interneurons which connect neurons to other neurons within the same region of the brain, or spinal cord in neural networks.A typical neuron consists of a cell body (soma), dendrites, and an axon.'
p6936
aS'The term neurite is used to describe either a dendrite or an axon, particularly in its undifferentiated stage.'
p6937
aS'Dendrites are thin structures that arise from the cell body, often extending for hundreds of micrometres and branching multiple times, giving rise to a complex "dendritic tree".'
p6938
aS'An axon is a special cellular extension that arises from the cell body at a site called the axon hillock and travels for a distance, as far as 1 meter in humans or even more in other species.'
p6939
aS'The cell body of a neuron frequently gives rise to multiple dendrites, but never to more than one axon, although the axon may branch hundreds of times before it terminates.'
p6940
aS'Neutron_stars are very hot and are supported against further collapse by quantum degeneracy pressure due to the phenomenon described by the Pauli_exclusion_principle, which states that no two neutrons (or any other fermionic particles) can occupy the same place and quantum state simultaneously.A neutron star has a mass of at least 1.1 and perhaps up to 3 solar masses (M), though the highest observed mass is 2.01 M Neutron_stars typically have a surface temperature around ~70056000000000000006x105 K. Neutron_stars have overall densities of 70173700000000000003.7x1017 to 70175900000000000005.9x1017 kg/m3 (70142600000000000002.6x1014 to 70144099999999999994.1x1014 times the density of the Sun), which is comparable to the approximate density of an atomic nucleus of 70173000000000000003x1017 kg/m3.'
p6941
aS"The neutron star's density varies from below 70091000000000000001x109 kg/m3 in the crust--increasing with depth--to above 70176000000000000006x1017 or 70178000000000000008x1017 kg/m3 deeper inside (denser than an atomic nucleus)."
p6942
aS'A normal-sized matchbox containing neutron-star material would have a mass of approximately 5 trillion tons or ~1000 km3 of Earth rock.In general, compact stars of less than 1.39 M (the Chandrasekhar_limit) are white dwarfs, whereas compact stars with a mass between that and 3 M (the Tolman-Oppenheimer-Volkoff limit) should be neutron stars.'
p6943
aS'The maximum observed mass of neutron stars is about 2 M. Compact stars with more than 10 M will overcome the neutron degeneracy pressure and gravitational collapse will usually occur to produce a black hole.'
p6944
aS'The smallest observed mass of a black hole is about 5 M. Between these, hypothetical intermediate-mass stars such as quark stars and electroweak stars have been proposed, but none have been shown to exist.'
p6945
aS'The equations of state of matter at such high densities are not precisely known because of the theoretical and empirical difficulties.Some neutron stars rotate very rapidly (up to 716 times a second, or approximately 43,000 revolutions per minute) and emit beams of electromagnetic radiation as pulsars.'
p6946
aS'Indeed, the discovery of pulsars in 1967 first suggested that neutron stars exist.'
p6947
aS"The name came from papo (to unite) and ua (negation), which means not united or, territory that geographically is far away (and thus not united).Ploeg reports that the word papua is often said to derive from the Malay word papua or pua-pua, meaning 'frizzly-haired', referring to the highly curly hair of the inhabitants of these areas."
p6948
aS"Another possibility, (put forward by Sollewijn Gelpke in 1993) is that it comes from the Biak phrase sup i papwa which means 'the land below [the sunset]' and refers to the islands west of the Bird's Head, as far as Halmahera."
p6949
aS'Whatever the origin of the name Papua, it came to be associated with this area, and more especially with Halmahera, which was known to the Portuguese by this name during the era of their colonization in this part of the world.When the Portuguese and Spanish explorers arrived in the island via the Spice Islands, they also referred to the island as Papua.'
p6950
aS"However, the name New_Guinea would later be used by Westerners starting with the Spanish explorer Inigo Ortiz de Retes in 1545, referring to the similarities of the indigenous people's appearance with the natives of the Guinea region of Africa."
p6951
aS'The Dutch, who arrived later under Lemaire and Schouten, called it Schouten island, but later this name is used only to refer to islands to the north of the coast of Papua proper, the Schouten Islands or Biak Island.'
p6952
aS'When the Dutch colonized it as part of Netherlands East Indies, they called it Nieuw Guinea.The name Irian was used in the Indonesian language to refer the island and Indonesian province, as "Irian Jaya province".'
p6953
aS'The name was promoted in 1945 by Marcus Kaisiepo, brother of the future governor Frans Kaisiepo.'
p6954
aS'New_Mexico is the 5th most extensive, the 36th most populous, and the 6th least densely populated of the 50 United_States.Inhabited by indigenous peoples of the Americas for many centuries before European exploration, New_Mexico was subsequently part of the Imperial Spanish viceroyalty of New Spain.'
p6955
aS'Later, it was part of Mexico before becoming a U.S. territory and eventually a U.S. state.'
p6956
aS'Among U.S. states, New_Mexico has the highest percentage of Hispanics, including descendants of Spanish colonists who have lived in the area for over 400 years.'
p6957
aS'It also has the second-highest percentage of Native Americans after Alaska, and the fourth-highest total number of Native Americans after California, Oklahoma, and Arizona.'
p6958
aS'The nations in the state consist of mostly Navajo, Puebloan and the Apache peoples.'
p6959
aS'As a result, the demographics and culture of the state are unique for their strong Hispanic and Native American influences, both of which are reflected in the state flag.'
p6960
aS'The scarlet and gold colors of the New_Mexico flag are taken from the royal standards of Spain, along with the ancient sun symbol of the Zia, a Pueblo-related tribe.New_Mexico, or Nuevo Mexico in Spanish, is often incorrectly believed to have taken its name from the nation of Mexico.'
p6961
aS'The New_Orleans metropolitan area (New_Orleans-Metairie-Kenner Metropolitan Statistical Area) had a population of 1,167,764 in 2010 and was the 46th largest in the United_States.'
p6962
aS'The New_Orleans-Metairie-Bogalusa Combined Statistical Area, a larger trading area, had a 2010 population of 1,452,502.The city is named after the Duke of Orleans, who reigned as Regent for Louis XV from 1715 to 1723, as it was established by French colonists and strongly influenced by their European culture.'
p6963
aS'It is well known for its distinct French and Spanish Creole architecture, as well as its cross-cultural and multilingual heritage.'
p6964
aS'New_Orleans is also famous for its cuisine, music (particularly as the birthplace of jazz), and its annual celebrations and festivals, most notably Mardi Gras, dating to French colonial times.'
p6965
aS'The city is often referred to as the "most unique" in the United_States.New_Orleans is located in southeastern Louisiana, straddling the Mississippi River.'
p6966
aS"The city and Orleans Parish (French: paroisse d'Orleans) are coterminous."
p6967
aS'The city and parish are bounded by the parishes of St. Tammany to the north, St. Bernard to the east, Plaquemines to the south, and Jefferson to the south and west.'
p6968
aS'The five boroughs - Brooklyn, Queens, Manhattan, the Bronx, and Staten Island - were consolidated into a single city in 1898.'
p6969
aS'With a census-estimated 2014 population of 8,491,079 distributed over a land area of just 305 square miles (790 km2), New York is the most densely populated major city in the United_States.'
p6970
aS'As many as 800 languages are spoken in New York, making it the most linguistically diverse city in the world.'
p6971
aS'By 2014 census estimates, the New_York_City metropolitan region remains by a significant margin the most populous in the United_States, as defined by both the Metropolitan Statistical Area (20.1 million residents) and the Combined Statistical Area (23.6 million residents).'
p6972
aS'In 2013, the MSA produced a gross metropolitan product (GMP) of nearly US$1.39 trillion, while in 2012, the CSA generated a GMP of over US$1.55 trillion, both ranking first nationally by a wide margin and behind the GDP of only twelve nations and eleven nations, respectively.New_York_City traces its roots to its 1624 founding as a trading post by colonists of the Dutch Republic and was named New Amsterdam in 1626.'
p6973
aS'The city and its surroundings came under English control in 1664.'
p6974
aS'New York served as the capital of the United_States from 1785 until 1790.'
p6975
aS'He is the founder and editor of the Gikuyu-language journal Mutiiri.In 1977, Ngugi embarked upon a novel form of theatre in his native Kenya that sought to liberate the theatrical process from what he held to be "the general bourgeois education system", by encouraging spontaneity and audience participation in the performances.'
p6976
aS'His project sought to "demystify" the theatrical process, and to avoid the "process of alienation [that] produces a gallery of active stars and an undifferentiated mass of grateful admirers" which, according to Ngugi, encourages passivity in "ordinary people".'
p6977
aS'Although Ngaahika Ndeenda was a commercial success, it was shut down by the authoritarian Kenyan regime six weeks after its opening.'
p6978
aS'Ngugi was subsequently imprisoned for over a year.Adopted as an Amnesty International prisoner of conscience, the artist was released from prison, and fled Kenya.'
p6979
aS'In the United_States, he taught at Yale University for some years, and has since also taught at New York University, with a dual professorship in Comparative Literature and Performance Studies, and the University of California, Irvine.'
p6980
aS'Ngugi has frequently been regarded as a likely candidate for the Nobel Prize in Literature.'
p6981
aS'His son is the author Mukoma wa Ngugi. Biography Ngugi was born in Kamiriithu, near Limuru in Kiambu district, Kenya, of Kikuyu descent, and baptised James Ngugi.'
p6982
aS'Nicotinic acid and niacinamide are convertible to each other with steady world demand rising from 8,500 tonnes per year in the 1980s to 40,000 in recent years.Niacin cannot be directly converted to nicotinamide, but both compounds are precursors of the coenzymes nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide (NAD) and nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate (NADP) in vivo.'
p6983
aS'NAD converts to NADP by phosphorylation in the presence of the enzyme NAD+ kinase.'
p6984
aS'NADP and NAD are coenzymes for many dehydrogenases, participating in many hydrogen transfer processes.'
p6985
aS'NAD is important in catabolism of fat, carbohydrate, protein, and alcohol, as well as cell signaling and DNA repair, and NADP mostly in anabolism reactions such as fatty acid and cholesterol synthesis.'
p6986
aS'High energy requirements (brain) or high turnover rate (gut, skin) organs are usually the most susceptible to their deficiency.'
p6987
aS'Although the two are identical in their vitamin activity, nicotinamide does not have the same pharmacological effects (lipid modifying effects) as niacin.'
p6988
aS'Nicotinamide does not reduce cholesterol or cause flushing.'
p6989
aS"Nicaragua's capital Managua is the third-largest city in Central America."
p6990
aS'The multi-ethnic population includes indigenous peoples, Europeans, Africans, Asians, and people of Middle Eastern origin.'
p6991
aS'The main language is Spanish.'
p6992
aS'Native tribes on the eastern coast speak their own languages.The Spanish Empire conquered the region in the 16th century.'
p6993
aS'Nicaragua gained independence from Spain in 1821.'
p6994
aS'Since its independence, Nicaragua has undergone periods of political unrest, dictatorship, and fiscal crisis--the most notable causes that led to the Nicaraguan Revolution of the 1960s and 1970s.'
p6995
aS'Nicaragua is a representative democratic republic, and has experienced economic growth and political stability in recent years.'
p6996
aS'He also wrote comedies, carnival songs, and poetry.'
p6997
aS'His personal correspondence is renowned in the Italian language.'
p6998
aS'He was secretary to the Second Chancery of the Republic of Florence from 1498 to 1512, when the Medici were out of power.'
p6999
aS'He wrote his most renowned work The_Prince (Il Principe) in 1513 after the Medici had recovered power and he no longer held a position of responsibility in Florence.'
p7000
aS'His views on the importance of a strong ruler who was not afraid to be harsh with his subjects and enemies were most likely influenced by the Italian city-states, which due to a lack of unification were very vulnerable to other unified nation-states such as France.'
p7001
aS'"Machiavellianism" is a widely-used negative term to characterize unscrupulous politicians of the sort Machiavelli described in The_Prince.'
p7002
aS'The book itself gained enormous notoriety and wide readership because most readers assumed the author was teaching and endorsing evil and immoral behavior.'
p7003
aS'Nickel belongs to the transition metals and is hard and ductile.'
p7004
aS'Pure nickel shows a significant chemical activity that can be observed when nickel is powdered to maximize the exposed surface area on which reactions can occur, but larger pieces of the metal are slow to react with air at ambient conditions due to the formation of a protective oxide surface.'
p7005
aS"Even then, nickel is reactive enough with oxygen that native nickel is rarely found on Earth's surface, being mostly confined to the interiors of larger nickel-iron meteorites that were protected from oxidation during their time in space."
p7006
aS"On Earth, such native nickel is found in combination with iron, a reflection of those elements' origin as major end products of supernova nucleosynthesis."
p7007
aS"An iron-nickel mixture is thought to compose Earth's inner core.The use of nickel (as a natural meteoric nickel-iron alloy) has been traced as far back as 3500 BCE."
p7008
aS'Nickel was first isolated and classified as a chemical element in 1751 by Axel Fredrik Cronstedt, who initially mistook its ore for a copper mineral.'
p7009
aS"The element's name comes from a mischievous sprite of German miner mythology, Nickel (similar to Old Nick), that personified the fact that copper-nickel ores resisted refinement into copper."
p7010
aS"He was also the country's head of state from 1967 to 1989.A member of the Romanian Communist youth movement, Ceausescu rose up through the ranks of Gheorghe Gheorghiu-Dej's Socialist government and, upon the death of Gheorghiu-Dej in 1965, he succeeded to the leadership of Romania's Communist Party as General Secretary.After a brief period of relatively moderate rule, Ceausescu's regime became increasingly brutal and repressive."
p7011
aS'By some accounts, his rule was the most rigidly Stalinist in the Soviet bloc.'
p7012
aS'He maintained controls over speech and the media that were very strict even by Soviet-bloc standards, and internal dissent was not tolerated.'
p7013
aS'His secret police, the Securitate, was one of the most ubiquitous and brutal secret police forces in the world.'
p7014
aS"In 1982, with the goal of paying off Romania's large foreign debt, Ceausescu ordered the export of much of the country's agricultural and industrial production."
p7015
aS'The resulting extreme shortages of food, fuel, energy, medicines, and other basic necessities drastically lowered living standards and intensified unrest.'
p7016
aS"Ceausescu's regime was also marked by an extensive and ubiquitous cult of personality, nationalism, a continuing deterioration in foreign relations even with the Soviet Union, and nepotism.Ceausescu's regime collapsed after he ordered his security forces to fire on anti-government demonstrators in the city of Timisoara on 17 December 1989."
p7017
aS'Until the 20th century he remained a major inspiration for such classically oriented artists as Jacques-Louis David, Jean-Auguste-Dominique Ingres and Paul_Cezanne.He worked in Rome for a circle of leading collectors there and elsewhere, except for a short period when Cardinal Richelieu ordered him back to France to serve as First Painter to the King.'
p7018
aS"Most of his works are history paintings of religious or mythological subjects that very often have a large landscape element. Biography  Early years Nicolas_Poussin's early biographer was his friend Giovanni Pietro Bellori, who relates that Poussin was born near Les Andelys in Normandy and that he received an education that included some Latin, which would stand him in good stead."
p7019
aS'Early sketches attracted the notice of Quentin Varin, a local painter, whose pupil Poussin became, until he ran away to Paris at the age of eighteen.'
p7020
aS'There he entered the studios of the Flemish painter Ferdinand Elle and then of Georges Lallemand, both minor masters now remembered for having tutored Poussin.'
p7021
aS'He found French art in a stage of transition: the old apprenticeship system was disturbed, and the academic training destined to supplant it was not yet established by Simon Vouet; but having met Alexandre Courtois the mathematician, Poussin was fired by the study of his collection of engravings by Marcantonio Raimondi after Italian masters.After two abortive attempts to reach Rome, he fell in with Giambattista Marino, the court poet to Marie de Medici, at Lyon.'
p7022
aS"Marino employed him on illustrations to his poem Adone (untraced) and on a series of illustrations for a projected edition of Ovid's Metamorphoses, took him into his household, and in 1624 enabled Poussin (who had been detained by commissions in Lyon and Paris) to rejoin him at Rome."
p7023
aS"It has been suggested that it was this early friendship with Marino, and the commissioning of illustrations of his poetry (which drew on Ovidian themes), that founded, or at least reinforced, the prominent eroticism in Poussin's early work. In Rome Poussin was thirty when he arrived in Rome in 1624."
p7024
aS"He was Minister of the Budget in the government of Edouard Balladur (RPR, predecessor of the UMP) during Francois_Mitterrand's last term.In foreign affairs, he promised a strengthening of the entente cordiale with the United Kingdom and closer cooperation with the United_States."
p7025
aS'During his term, he faced the late-2000s financial crisis (followed by the recession and the debt crisis caused by it) and the Arab Spring (especially in Tunisia, Libya, and Syria).'
p7026
aS'He married Italian-French singer-songwriter Carla Bruni on 2 February 2008 at the Elysee Palace in Paris.On 6 May 2012, Sarkozy was defeated in the 2012 election by Socialist Francois Hollande by a margin of 3.2 percentage points, or 1,139,983 votes.'
p7027
aS'After leaving the office, Sarkozy retired from political life.'
p7028
aS'As a former president, Sarkozy is entitled to ex officio membership in the Constitutional Council.On 2 July 2014, Sarkozy was criminally charged with corruption by French prosecutors. Personal life  Family background Sarkozy is the son of Pal Istvan Erno Sarkozy de Nagy-Bocsa (Hungarian: nagybocsai Sarkozy Pal [najjbo:tSai Sa:rkozi pa:l]; in some sources Nagy-Bocsay Sarkozy Pal Istvan Erno), a Hungarian aristocrat, and Andree Jeanne "Dadu" Mallah (b. Paris, 12 October 1925), whose Greek Jewish father converted to Catholicism to marry Sarkozy\'s French Catholic maternal grandmother.'
p7029
aS"They were married in the Saint-Francois-de-Sales church, 17th arrondissement of Paris, on 8 February 1950 and divorced in 1959. Early life During Sarkozy's childhood, his father founded his own advertising agency and became wealthy."
p7030
aS"The family lived in a mansion owned by Sarkozy's maternal grandfather, Benedict Mallah, in the 17th Arrondissement of Paris."
p7031
aS'Bohr was also a philosopher and a promoter of scientific research.Bohr developed the Bohr model of the atom, in which he proposed that energy levels of electrons are discrete and that the electrons revolve in stable orbits around the atomic nucleus but can jump from one energy level (or orbit) to another.'
p7032
aS'Although the Bohr model has been supplanted by other models, its underlying principles remain valid.'
p7033
aS'He conceived the principle of complementarity: that items could be separately analysed in terms of contradictory properties, like behaving as a wave or a stream of particles.'
p7034
aS"The notion of complementarity dominated Bohr's thinking in both science and philosophy.Bohr founded the Institute of Theoretical Physics at the University of Copenhagen, now known as the Niels_Bohr Institute, which opened in 1920."
p7035
aS'Bohr mentored and collaborated with physicists including Hans Kramers, Oskar Klein, George de Hevesy and Werner Heisenberg.'
p7036
aS'He predicted the existence of a new zirconium-like element, which was named hafnium, after the Latin name for Copenhagen, where it was discovered.'
p7037
aS'Later, the element bohrium was named after him.During the 1930s, Bohr helped refugees from Nazism.'
p7038
aS'Many of those killed were leaders of the Sturmabteilung (SA), the paramilitary Brownshirts.Adolf_Hitler moved against the SA and its leader, Ernst Rohm, because he saw the independence of the SA and the penchant of its members for street violence as a direct threat to his newly gained political power.'
p7039
aS"Hitler also wanted to conciliate leaders of the Reichswehr, the official German military who feared and despised the SA--in particular Rohm's ambition to absorb the Reichswehr into the SA under his own leadership."
p7040
aS'Additionally, Hitler was uncomfortable with Rohm\'s outspoken support for a "second revolution" to redistribute wealth.'
p7041
aS'(In Rohm\'s view, President Hindenburg\'s appointing of Hitler as German Chancellor on January 30, 1933 had accomplished the "nationalistic" revolution but had left unfulfilled the "socialistic" motive in National Socialism.)'
p7042
aS'Finally, Hitler used the purge to attack or eliminate critics of his new regime, especially those loyal to Vice-Chancellor Franz von Papen, as well as to settle scores with old enemies.At least 85 people died during the purge, although the final death toll may have been in the hundreds, and more than a thousand perceived opponents were arrested.'
p7043
aS"Most of the killings were carried out by the Schutzstaffel (SS) and the Gestapo (Geheime Staatspolizei), the regime's secret police."
p7044
aS'The purge strengthened and consolidated the support of the Reichswehr for Hitler.'
p7045
aS'Jo Hopper would then add additional information about the theme of the painting.A review of the page on which Nighthawks is entered shows (in Edward_Hopper\'s handwriting) that the intended name of the work was actually Night Hawks and that the painting was completed on January 21, 1942.Jo\'s handwritten notes about the painting give considerably more detail, including the possibility that the painting\'s title may have had its origins as a reference to the beak-shaped nose of the man at the bar, or that the appearance of one of the "nighthawks" was tweaked in order to relate to the original meaning of the word:Night + brilliant interior of cheap restaurant.'
p7046
aS'Bright items: cherry wood counter + tops of surrounding stools; light on metal tanks at rear right; brilliant streak of jade green tiles 3/4 across canvas--at base of glass of window curving at corner.'
p7047
aS'Light walls, dull yellow ocre [sic] door into kitchen right.Very good looking blond boy in white (coat, cap) inside counter.'
p7048
aS'Girl in red blouse, brown hair eating sandwich.'
p7049
aS'Man night hawk (beak) in dark suit, steel grey hat, black band, blue shirt (clean) holding cigarette.'
p7050
aS'Other figure dark sinister back--at left.'
p7051
aS'Light side walk outside pale greenish.'
p7052
aS'He served as First Secretary of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union from 1953 to 1964, and as Chairman of the Council of Ministers, or Premier, from 1958 to 1964.'
p7053
aS'Khrushchev was responsible for the de-Stalinization of the Soviet Union, for backing the progress of the early Soviet space program, and for several relatively liberal reforms in areas of domestic policy.'
p7054
aS"Khrushchev's party colleagues removed him from power in 1964, replacing him with Leonid_Brezhnev as First Secretary and Alexei Kosygin as Premier.Khrushchev was born in the village of Kalinovka in 1894, close to the present-day border between Russia and Ukraine."
p7055
aS'He was employed as a metalworker in his youth, and during the Russian Civil War was a political commissar.'
p7056
aS'With the help of Lazar Kaganovich, he worked his way up the Soviet hierarchy.'
p7057
aS"He supported Joseph Stalin's purges, and approved thousands of arrests."
p7058
aS'In 1939, Stalin sent him to govern Ukraine, and he continued the purges there.'
p7059
aS'19 March] 1809 - 4 March [O.S.'
p7060
aS'21 February] 1852) was a Russian dramatist, novelist and short story writer of Ukrainian ethnicity.'
p7061
aS'Russian and Ukrainian scholars debate whether or not Gogol was of their respective nationalities.Considered by his contemporaries one of the preeminent figures of the natural school of Russian literary realism, later critics have found in Gogol\'s work a fundamentally romantic sensibility, with strains of Surrealism and the grotesque ("The Nose", "Viy", "The_Overcoat," "Nevsky Prospekt").'
p7062
aS'His early works, such as Evenings on a Farm Near Dikanka, were influenced by his Ukrainian upbringing, Ukrainian culture and folklore.'
p7063
aS'His later writing satirised political corruption in the Russian Empire (The Government Inspector, Dead_Souls), leading to his eventual exile.'
p7064
aS'The novel Taras Bulba (1835) and the play Marriage (1842), along with the short stories "Diary of a Madman", "The Tale of How Ivan Ivanovich Quarreled with Ivan Nikiforovich", "The Portrait" and "The Carriage", round out the tally of his best-known works. Early life Gogol was born in the Ukrainian Cossack village of Sorochyntsi, in Poltava Governorate of the Russian Empire, present-day Ukraine.'
p7065
aS'His mother was a descendant of Polish landowners.'
p7066
aS'8 June] 1908) was a Russian composer, and a member of the group of composers known as The Five.'
p7067
aS'He was a master of orchestration.'
p7068
aS'His best-known orchestral compositions--Capriccio Espagnol, the Russian Easter Festival Overture, and the symphonic suite Scheherazade--are staples of the classical music repertoire, along with suites and excerpts from some of his 15 operas.'
p7069
aS'Scheherazade is an example of his frequent use of fairy tale and folk subjects.Rimsky-Korsakov believed, as did fellow composer Mily Balakirev and critic Vladimir Stasov, in developing a nationalistic style of classical music.'
p7070
aS'This style employed Russian folk song and lore along with exotic harmonic, melodic and rhythmic elements in a practice known as musical orientalism, and eschewed traditional Western compositional methods.'
p7071
aS'However, Rimsky-Korsakov appreciated Western musical techniques after he became a professor of musical composition, harmony and orchestration at the Saint_Petersburg Conservatory in 1871.'
p7072
aS'He undertook a rigorous three-year program of self-education and became a master of Western methods, incorporating them alongside the influences of Mikhail Glinka and fellow members of The Five.'
p7073
aS'Most commercially available nitric acid has a concentration of 68%.'
p7074
aS'When the solution contains more than 86% HNO3, it is referred to as fuming nitric acid.'
p7075
aS'Depending on the amount of nitrogen dioxide present, fuming nitric acid is further characterized as white fuming nitric acid or red fuming nitric acid, at concentrations above 95%.Nitric_acid is the primary reagent used for nitration - the addition of a nitro group, typically to an organic molecule.'
p7076
aS'While some resulting nitro compounds are shock- and thermally-sensitive explosives, a few are stable enough to be used in munitions and demolition, while others are still more stable and used as pigments in inks and dyes.'
p7077
aS'Nitric_acid is also commonly used as a strong oxidizing agent. Physical and chemical properties Commercially available nitric acid is an azeotrope with water at a concentration of 68% HNO3, which is the ordinary concentrated nitric acid of commerce.'
p7078
aS'This solution has a boiling temperature of 120.5 degC at 1 atm.'
p7079
aS'Two solid hydrates are known; the monohydrate (HNO3*H2O) and the trihydrate (HNO3*3H2O).Nitric_acid of commercial interest usually consists of the maximum boiling azeotrope of nitric acid and water, which is approximately 68% HNO3, (approx.'
p7080
aS'The prefix cyano- is used interchangeably with the term nitrile in industrial literature.'
p7081
aS'Nitriles are found in many useful compounds, including methyl cyanoacrylate, used in super glue, and nitrile rubber, a nitrile-containing polymer used in the latex-free laboratory and medical gloves.'
p7082
aS'Nitrile rubber is also widely used as automotive and other seals since it is resistant to fuels and oils.'
p7083
aS'Organic compounds containing multiple nitrile groups are known as cyanocarbons.Inorganic compounds containing the -C[?'
p7084
aS']N group are not called nitriles, but cyanides instead.'
p7085
aS'Though both nitriles and cyanides can be derived from cyanide salts, most nitriles are not nearly as toxic. Structure and basic properties The N-C-C skeleton is linear in nitriles, reflecting the sp hybridization of the triply bonded carbon.'
p7086
aS'The C-N distance is short at 1.16 A, consistent with a triple bond.'
p7087
aS'The fixation process frees up the nitrogen atoms from their triply bonded diatomic form, N[?'
p7088
aS']N, to be used in other ways.Nitrogen_fixation, natural and synthetic, is essential for all forms of life because nitrogen is required to biosynthesize basic building blocks of plants, animals and other life forms, e.g., nucleotides for DNA and RNA and amino acids for proteins.'
p7089
aS'Therefore, nitrogen fixation is essential for agriculture and the manufacture of fertilizer.'
p7090
aS'It is also an important process in the manufacture of explosives (e.g.'
p7091
aS'gunpowder, dynamite, TNT, etc.).'
p7092
aS'Nitrogen_fixation occurs naturally in the air by means of lightning.Biological nitrogen fixation can include conversion to nitrogen dioxide.'
p7093
aS'All biological nitrogen fixation is done by way of nitrogenase metalo-enzymes which contain iron, molybdenum, or vanadium.'
p7094
aS'The play was first performed at the Theatre du Vieux-Colombier in May 1944.The play is a depiction of the afterlife in which three deceased characters are punished by being locked into a room together for eternity.'
p7095
aS'It is the source of Sartre\'s especially famous and often misinterpreted quotation "L\'enfer, c\'est les autres" or "Hell is other people", a reference to Sartre\'s ideas about the Look and the perpetual ontological struggle of being caused to see oneself as an object in the world of another consciousness. Plot synopsis Three damned souls, Joseph Garcin, Ines Serrano, and Estelle Rigault, are brought to the same room in Hell and locked inside by a mysterious valet.'
p7096
aS'They had all expected torture devices to punish them for eternity, but instead find a plain room furnished in the style of the Second French Empire.'
p7097
aS'At first, none of them will admit the reason for their damnation: Joseph says that he was executed for being a pacifist, while Estelle insists that a mistake has been made; Ines, however, is the only one to demand that they all stop lying to themselves and confess to their moral crimes.'
p7098
aS"She refuses to believe that they have all ended up in the room by accident and soon realizes that they have been placed together to make each other miserable; she deduces that they are to be one another's torturers."
p7099
aS'Joseph suggests that they try to leave each other alone and to be silent, but Ines starts to sing about an execution and Estelle vainly wants to find a mirror to check on her appearance.'
p7100
aS'Ines tries to seduce Estelle by offering to be her "mirror" by telling her everything she sees, but ends up frightening her instead.'
p7101
aS'The novel is the second work in what is sometimes referred to as the "African trilogy", following Things_Fall_Apart and preceding Arrow of God.'
p7102
aS"Things_Fall_Apart concerns the struggle of Obi Okonkwo's grandfather Okonkwo against the changes brought by the English. Novel's title The book's title comes from the closing lines of T. S. Eliot's poem, The Journey of the Magi:We returned to our places, these Kingdoms,But no longer at ease here, in the old dispensation,With an alien people clutching their gods.I should be glad of another death. Plot summary The novel opens with the trial of Obi Okonkwo on the charge of accepting a bribe."
p7103
aS'It then jumps back in time to a point before his departure for England and works its way forward to describe how Obi ended up on trial.The members of the Umuofia Progressive Union (UPU), a group of Igbo men who have left their villages to live in major Nigerian cities, have taken up a collection to send Obi to England to study law, in the hope that he will return to help his people navigate British colonial society.'
p7104
aS'But once there, Obi switches his major to English and meets Clara Okeke for the first time during a dance.Obi returns to Nigeria after four years of studies and lives in Lagos with his friend Joseph.'
p7105
aS'He takes a job with the Scholarship Board and is almost immediately offered a bribe by a man who is trying to obtain a scholarship for his little sister.'
p7106
aS'When Obi indignantly rejects the offer, he is visited by the girl herself, who implies that she will bribe him with sexual favors for the scholarship, another offer Obi rejects.At the same time, Obi is developing a romantic relationship with Clara Okeke, a Nigerian woman who eventually reveals that she is an osu, an outcast by her descendants, meaning that Obi can not marry her under the traditional ways of the Igbo people of Nigeria.'
p7107
aS'He remains intent on marrying Clara, but even his Christian father opposes it, although reluctantly due to his desire to progress and eschew the "heathen" customs of pre-colonial Nigeria.'
p7108
aS'He has spent most of his career at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT), where he is currently Professor Emeritus, and has authored over 100 books.'
p7109
aS'He has been described as a prominent cultural figure, and was voted the "world\'s top public intellectual" in a 2005 poll.Born to a middle-class Jewish family in Philadelphia, Chomsky developed an early interest in anarchism from relatives in New_York_City.'
p7110
aS"He later undertook studies in linguistics at the University of Pennsylvania, where he obtained his BA, MA, and PhD, while from 1951 to 1955 he was appointed to Harvard University's Society of Fellows."
p7111
aS'In 1955 he began work at MIT, soon becoming a significant figure in the field of linguistics for his publications and lectures on the subject.'
p7112
aS'He is credited as the creator or co-creator of the Chomsky hierarchy, the universal grammar theory, the Chomsky-Schutzenberger representation theorem, and the Chomsky-Schutzenberger enumeration theorem.'
p7113
aS'Chomsky also played a major role in the decline of behaviorism, and was especially critical of the work of B.F. Skinner.'
p7114
aS'In 1967 he gained public attention for his vocal opposition to U.S. involvement in the Vietnam_War, in part through his essay The Responsibility of Intellectuals, and came to be associated with the New Left while being arrested on multiple occasions for his anti-war activism.'
p7115
aS'It is possible that due to relativistic effects, the group 14 element flerovium exhibits some noble-gas-like properties, instead of the group 18 element ununoctium.'
p7116
aS'Noble_gases are typically highly unreactive except when under particular extreme conditions.'
p7117
aS'The inertness of noble gases makes them very suitable in applications where reactions are not wanted.'
p7118
aS'For example: argon is used in lightbulbs to prevent the hot tungsten filament from oxidizing; also, helium is breathed by deep-sea divers to prevent oxygen and nitrogen toxicity.The properties of the noble gases can be well explained by modern theories of atomic structure: their outer shell of valence electrons is considered to be "full", giving them little tendency to participate in chemical reactions, and it has been possible to prepare only a few hundred noble gas compounds.'
p7119
aS'The melting and boiling points for a given noble gas are close together, differing by less than 10 degC (18 degF); that is, they are liquids over only a small temperature range.Neon, argon, krypton, and xenon are obtained from air in an air separation unit using the methods of liquefaction of gases and fractional distillation.'
p7120
aS'Helium is sourced from natural gas fields which have high concentrations of helium in the natural gas, using cryogenic gas separation techniques, and radon is usually isolated from the radioactive decay of dissolved radium, thorium, or uranium compounds (since those compounds give off alpha particles).'
p7121
aS'Noble_gases have several important applications in industries such as lighting, welding, and space exploration.'
p7122
aS'It presents itself as an excerpt from the rambling memoirs of a bitter, isolated, unnamed narrator (generally referred to by critics as the Underground Man) who is a retired civil servant living in St. Petersburg.'
p7123
aS"The first part of the story is told in monologue form, or the underground man's diary, and attacks emerging Western philosophy, especially Nikolay Chernyshevsky's What Is to Be Done?."
p7124
aS'The second part of the book is called "Apropos of the Wet Snow", and describes certain events that, it seems, are destroying and sometimes renewing the underground man, who acts as a first person, unreliable narrator. Plot summary The novel is divided into two parts. Part 1: "Underground" It consists of an introduction, three main sections and a conclusion.'
p7125
aS'(i) The short introduction propounds a number of riddles whose meanings will be further developed.'
p7126
aS'(1) Chapters two, three and four deal with suffering and the enjoyment of suffering; (2) chapters five and six with intellectual and moral vacillation and with conscious "inertia"-inaction; (3) chapters seven through nine with theories of reason and logic; (c) the last two chapters are a summary and a transition into Part 2.War is described as people\'s rebellion against the assumption that everything needs to happen for a purpose, because humans do things without purpose, and this is what determines human history.Secondly, the narrator\'s desire for happiness is exemplified by his liver pain and toothache.'
p7127
aS"This parallels Raskolnikov's behavior in Dostoyevsky's later novel, Crime_and_Punishment."
p7128
aS'He says that, due to the cruelty of society, human beings only moan about pain in order to spread their suffering to others.'
p7129
aS'Fusion is the process that powers active or "main sequence" stars.The fusion of two nuclei with lower masses than iron (which, along with nickel, has the largest binding energy per nucleon) generally releases energy, while the fusion of nuclei heavier than iron absorbs energy.'
p7130
aS'The opposite is true for the reverse process, nuclear fission.'
p7131
aS'This means that fusion generally occurs for lighter elements only, and likewise, that fission normally occurs only for heavier elements.'
p7132
aS'There are extreme astrophysical events that can lead to short periods of fusion with heavier nuclei.'
p7133
aS'This is the process that gives rise to nucleosynthesis, the creation of the heavy elements during events such as supernova.Following the discovery of quantum tunneling by Friedrich Hund, in 1929 Robert Atkinson and Fritz Houtermans used the measured masses of light elements to predict that large amounts of energy could be released by fusing small nuclei.'
p7134
aS'Building upon the nuclear transmutation experiments by Ernest Rutherford, carried out several years earlier, the laboratory fusion of hydrogen isotopes was first accomplished by Mark Oliphant in 1932.'
p7135
aS'During the remainder of that decade the steps of the main cycle of nuclear fusion in stars were worked out by Hans Bethe.'
p7136
aS'NMR allows the observation of specific quantum mechanical magnetic properties of the atomic nucleus.'
p7137
aS'Many scientific techniques exploit NMR phenomena to study molecular physics, crystals, and non-crystalline materials through NMR spectroscopy.'
p7138
aS'NMR is also routinely used in advanced medical imaging techniques, such as in magnetic resonance imaging (MRI).All isotopes that contain an odd number of protons and/or of neutrons (see Isotope) have an intrinsic magnetic moment and angular momentum, in other words a nonzero spin, while all nuclides with even numbers of both have a total spin of zero.'
p7139
aS'The most commonly studied nuclei are 1H and 13C, although nuclei from isotopes of many other elements (e.g.'
p7140
aS'2H, 6Li, 10B, 11B, 14N, 15N, 17O, 19F, 23Na, 29Si, 31P, 35Cl, 113Cd, 129Xe, 195Pt) have been studied by high-field NMR spectroscopy as well.A key feature of NMR is that the resonance frequency of a particular substance is directly proportional to the strength of the applied magnetic field.'
p7141
aS"It is this feature that is exploited in imaging techniques; if a sample is placed in a non-uniform magnetic field then the resonance frequencies of the sample's nuclei depend on where in the field they are located."
p7142
aS'Since the resolution of the imaging technique depends on the magnitude of magnetic field gradient, many efforts are made to develop increased field strength, often using superconductors.'
p7143
aS'He changed the spelling of his middle name to Sydney in 1898.'
p7144
aS'His parents were Dr. Algernon Sidney Porter (1825-88), a physician, and Mary Jane Virginia Swaim Porter (1833-65).'
p7145
aS"William's parents had married on April 20, 1858."
p7146
aS'When William was three, his mother died from tuberculosis, and he and his father moved into the home of his paternal grandmother.'
p7147
aS"As a child, Porter was always reading, everything from classics to dime novels; his favorite works were Lane's translation of One Thousand and One Nights, and Burton's Anatomy of Melancholy.Porter graduated from his aunt Evelina Maria Porter's elementary school in 1876."
p7148
aS'He then enrolled at the Lindsey Street High School.'
p7149
aS'His aunt continued to tutor him until he was fifteen.'
p7150
aS"Inspired by the bird's song, Keats composed the poem in one day."
p7151
aS'It soon became one of his 1819 odes and was first published in Annals of the Fine Arts the following July.'
p7152
aS'"Ode_to_a_Nightingale" is a personal poem that describes Keats\'s journey into the state of negative capability.'
p7153
aS"The tone of the poem rejects the optimistic pursuit of pleasure found within Keats's earlier poems and explores the themes of nature, transience and mortality, the latter being particularly personal to Keats.The nightingale described within the poem experiences a type of death but does not actually die."
p7154
aS'Instead, the songbird is capable of living through its song, which is a fate that humans cannot expect.'
p7155
aS'The poem ends with an acceptance that pleasure cannot last and that death is an inevitable part of life.'
p7156
aS'In the poem, Keats imagines the loss of the physical world and sees himself dead--as a "sod" over which the nightingale sings.'
p7157
aS'In wider Germanic mythology and paganism, Odin was known in Old English as Woden, in Old Saxon as Woden, and in Old High German as Wuotan or Wodan, all stemming from the reconstructed Proto-Germanic theonym *wodanaz.Odin is a prominently mentioned god throughout the recorded history of the Germanic peoples, from the Roman occupation of regions of Germania, through the tribal expansions of the Migration Period and the Viking Age.'
p7158
aS'Odin continued into the modern period to be acknowledged in rural folklore in all Germanic regions.'
p7159
aS'References to Odin appear in place names throughout regions historically inhabited by the ancient Germanic peoples, and the day of the week Wednesday bears his name in many Germanic languages.In Anglo-Saxon England Odin held a particular place as a euhemerized ancestral figure among royalty, and he is frequently referred to as a founding figure among various other Germanic peoples, including the Langobards and in most of Scandinavia.'
p7160
aS'While forms of his name appear frequently throughout the Germanic record, narratives regarding Odin are primarily found in Old Norse works recorded in Iceland, primarily around the 13th century, texts which make up the bulk of modern understanding of Norse mythology.'
p7161
aS'In Old Norse texts, Odin is depicted as one-eyed and long-bearded, frequently wielding a spear, Gungnir, and wearing a black or blue cloak and a broad hat.'
p7162
aS'He is often accompanied by his animal companions-- the wolves Geri and Freki and the ravens Huginn and Muninn, who bring him information from all over Midgard--and Odin rides the flying, eight-legged steed Sleipnir across the sky and into the underworld.'
p7163
aS'Odin is attested as having many sons, most famously the god Baldr with Frigg, and is known by hundreds of names.'
p7164
aS'When the truth was discovered, his wife-mother hanged herself, and Oedipus gouged out his own eyes.'
p7165
aS'They had four children together.'
p7166
aS"The story of Oedipus is the subject of Sophocles's tragedy Oedipus the King, which was followed by Oedipus at Colonus and then Antigone."
p7167
aS"Together, these plays make up Sophocles's three Theban plays."
p7168
aS"Oedipus represents two enduring themes of Greek myth and drama: the flawed nature of humanity and an individual's role in the course of destiny in a harsh universe.In the most well-known version of the myth of what happened after Oedipus was born to King Laius and Queen Jocasta, Laius wished to thwart a prophecy."
p7169
aS"Thus, he fastened the infant's feet together with a large pin and left him to die on a mountainside."
p7170
aS'The baby was found on Kithairon by shepherds and raised by King Polybus and Queen Merope in the city of Corinth.'
p7171
aS'The state\'s capital and largest city is Columbus.The name "Ohio" originated from Iroquois word ohi-yo\', meaning "great river" or "large creek".'
p7172
aS'The state, originally partitioned from the Northwest Territory, was admitted to the Union as the 17th state (and the first under the Northwest Ordinance) on March 1, 1803.'
p7173
aS'Although there are conflicting narratives regarding the origin of the nickname, Ohio is historically known as the "Buckeye State" (relating to the Ohio buckeye tree) and Ohioans are also known as "Buckeyes".The government of Ohio is composed of the executive branch, led by the Governor; the legislative branch, which comprises the Ohio General Assembly; and the judicial branch, which is led by the Supreme Court.'
p7174
aS'Currently, Ohio occupies 16 seats in the United_States House of Representatives.'
p7175
aS'Ohio is known for its status as both a swing state and a bellwether in national elections.'
p7176
aS"Owing to its strategic electoral importance, six Presidents of the United_States have called Ohio their home state. Geography Ohio's geographic location has proven to be an asset for economic growth and expansion."
p7177
aS'Because Ohio links the Northeast to the Midwest, much cargo and business traffic passes through its borders along its well-developed highways.'
p7178
aS"More specifically, Ohm's_law states that the R in this relation is constant, independent of the current.The law was named after the German physicist Georg Ohm, who, in a treatise published in 1827, described measurements of applied voltage and current through simple electrical circuits containing various lengths of wire."
p7179
aS'He presented a slightly more complex equation than the one above (see History section below) to explain his experimental results.'
p7180
aS"The above equation is the modern form of Ohm's_law.In physics, the term Ohm's_law is also used to refer to various generalizations of the law originally formulated by Ohm."
p7181
aS'The simplest example of this is:where J is the current density at a given location in a resistive material, E is the electric field at that location, and s (Sigma) is a material-dependent parameter called the conductivity.'
p7182
aS"This reformulation of Ohm's_law is due to Gustav Kirchhoff. History In January 1781, before Georg Ohm's work, Henry Cavendish experimented with Leyden jars and glass tubes of varying diameter and length filled with salt solution."
p7183
aS'He measured the current by noting how strong a shock he felt as he completed the circuit with his body.'
p7184
aS'Cavendish wrote that the "velocity" (current) varied directly as the "degree of electrification" (voltage).'
p7185
aS'An intensely religious man--a self-styled Puritan Moses--he fervently believed that God was guiding his victories.'
p7186
aS'He was elected Member of Parliament for Huntingdon in 1628 and for Cambridge in the Short (1640) and Long (1640-49) Parliaments.'
p7187
aS'He entered the English Civil War on the side of the "Roundheads" or Parliamentarians.'
p7188
aS'Nicknamed "Old Ironsides", he was quickly promoted from leading a single cavalry troop to become one of the principal commanders of the New Model Army, playing an important role in the defeat of the royalist forces.Cromwell was one of the signatories of King Charles I\'s death warrant in 1649, and, as a member of the Rump Parliament (1649-53), he dominated the short-lived Commonwealth of England.'
p7189
aS'He was selected to take command of the English campaign in Ireland in 1649-50.'
p7190
aS"Cromwell's forces defeated the Confederate and Royalist coalition in Ireland and occupied the country - bringing to an end the Irish Confederate Wars."
p7191
aS'During this period a series of Penal Laws were passed against Roman Catholics (a significant minority in England and Scotland but the vast majority in Ireland), and a substantial amount of their land was confiscated.'
p7192
aS'According to the Library of Congress authority file, he told a biographer that he was born on 10 November 1728.'
p7193
aS'The location of his birthplace is also uncertain.'
p7194
aS'He was born either in the townland of Pallas, near Ballymahon, County Longford, Ireland, where his father was the Anglican curate of the parish of Forgney, or at the residence of his maternal grandparents, at the Smith Hill House in the diocese of Elphin, County Roscommon where his grandfather Oliver Jones was a clergyman and master of the Elphin diocesan school, and where Oliver studied.'
p7195
aS'When Goldsmith was two years old, his father was appointed the rector of the parish of "Kilkenny West" in County Westmeath.'
p7196
aS"The family moved to the parsonage at Lissoy, between Athlone and Ballymahon, and continued to live there until his father's death in 1747.In 1744 Goldsmith went up to Trinity College, Dublin."
p7197
aS'His tutor was Theaker Wilder.'
p7198
aS'Neglecting his studies in theology and law, he fell to the bottom of his class.'
p7199
aS"Holmes retired from the Court at the age of 90 years, making him the oldest Justice in the Supreme Court's history."
p7200
aS'He also served as an Associate Justice and as Chief Justice on the Massachusetts Supreme Judicial Court, and was Weld Professor of Law at the Harvard Law School, of which he was an alumnus.Profoundly influenced by his experience fighting in the American Civil War, Holmes helped move American legal thinking towards legal realism, as summed up in his maxim: "The life of the law has not been logic; it has been experience."'
p7201
aS'Holmes espoused a form of moral skepticism and opposed the doctrine of natural law, marking a significant shift in American jurisprudence.'
p7202
aS'As he wrote in one of his most famous decisions, his dissent in Abrams v. United_States (1919), he regarded the United_States Constitution as "an experiment, as all life is an experiment" and believed that as a consequence "we should be eternally vigilant against attempts to check the expression of opinions that we loathe and believe to be fraught with death."'
p7203
aS'During his tenure on the Supreme Court, to which he was appointed by President Theodore_Roosevelt, he supported efforts for economic regulation and advocated broad freedom of speech under the First Amendment.'
p7204
aS'These positions as well as his distinctive personality and writing style made him a popular figure, especially with American progressives, despite his deep cynicism and disagreement with their politics.'
p7205
aS'His jurisprudence influenced much subsequent American legal thinking, including judicial consensus supporting New Deal regulatory law, and influential schools of pragmatism, critical legal studies, and law and economics.'
p7206
aS"It is a common mineral in the Earth's subsurface but weathers quickly on the surface.The ratio of magnesium and iron varies between the two endmembers of the solid solution series: forsterite (Mg-endmember: Mg2SiO4) and fayalite (Fe-endmember: Fe2SiO4)."
p7207
aS'Compositions of olivine are commonly expressed as molar percentages of forsterite (Fo) and fayalite (Fa) (e.g., Fo70Fa30).'
p7208
aS'Forsterite has an unusually high melting temperature at atmospheric pressure, almost 1900 degC, but the melting temperature of fayalite is much lower (about 1200 degC).'
p7209
aS'The melting temperature varies smoothly between the two endmembers, as do other properties.'
p7210
aS'Olivine incorporates only minor amounts of elements other than oxygen, silicon, magnesium and iron.'
p7211
aS"Manganese and nickel commonly are the additional elements present in highest concentrations.Olivine gives its name to the group of minerals with a related structure (the olivine group) which includes tephroite (Mn2SiO4), monticellite (CaMgSiO4) and kirschsteinite (CaFeSiO4).Olivine's crystal structure incorporates aspects of the orthorhombic P Bravais lattice, which arise from each silica (SiO4) unit being joined by metal divalent cations with each oxygen in SiO4 bound to 3 metal ions."
p7212
aS'It has a spinel-like structure similar to magnetite but uses one quadravalent and two divalent cations M2+2 M+4O4 instead of two trivalent and one divalent cations.Olivine gemstones are called peridot and chrysolite. Identification and paragenesis Olivine is named for its typically olive-green color (thought to be a result of traces of nickel), though it may alter to a reddish color from the oxidation of iron.Translucent olivine is sometimes used as a gemstone called peridot (peridot, the French word for olivine).'
p7213
aS"It has been speculated that Olmec derive in part from neighboring Mokaya and/or Mixe-Zoque.The Olmec flourished during Mesoamerica's formative period, dating roughly from as early as 1500 BCE to about 400 BCE."
p7214
aS'Pre-Olmec cultures had flourished in the area since about 2500 BCE, but by 1600-1500 BCE, Early Olmec culture had emerged, centered on the San Lorenzo Tenochtitlan site near the coast in southeast Veracruz.'
p7215
aS'They were the first Mesoamerican civilization and laid many of the foundations for the civilizations that followed.'
p7216
aS'Among other "firsts", the Olmec appeared to practice ritual bloodletting and played the Mesoamerican ballgame, hallmarks of nearly all subsequent Mesoamerican societies.The aspect of the Olmecs most familiar now is their artwork, particularly the aptly named "colossal heads".'
p7217
aS'The Olmec civilization was first defined through artifacts which collectors purchased on the pre-Columbian art market in the late 19th century and early 20th century.'
p7218
aS'Olmec artworks are considered among ancient America\'s most striking. Etymology The name "Olmec" comes from the Nahuatl word for the Olmecs: Olmecatl [o:l\'me:katl] (singular) or Olmecah [o:l\'me:ka?]'
p7219
aS'(plural).'
p7220
aS"Olympia's confrontational gaze caused shock and astonishment when the painting was first exhibited because a number of details in the picture identified her as a prostitute."
p7221
aS'The French government acquired the painting in 1890 after a public subscription organized by Claude Monet.'
p7222
aS"The painting is on display at the Musee d'Orsay, Paris. Content What shocked contemporary audiences was not Olympia's nudity, nor the presence of her fully clothed maid, but her confrontational gaze and a number of details identifying her as a demi-mondaine or prostitute."
p7223
aS'Some of the details that indicated Olympia as a prostitute include the orchid in her hair, her bracelet, pearl earrings and the oriental shawl on which she lies, symbols of wealth and sensuality.'
p7224
aS'The black ribbon around her neck, in stark contrast with her pale flesh, and her cast-off slipper underline the voluptuous atmosphere.'
p7225
aS'"Olympia" was a name associated with prostitutes in 1860s Paris.The painting is modelled after Titian\'s Venus_of_Urbino (1538).'
p7226
aS"Whereas the left hand of Titian's Venus is curled and appears to entice, Olympia's left hand appears to block, which has been interpreted as symbolic of her sexual independence from men and her role as a prostitute, granting or restricting access to her body in return for payment."
p7227
aS"The novel, published in 1957, is a roman a clef, with many key figures in the Beat movement, such as William S. Burroughs (Old Bull Lee) and Allen Ginsberg (Carlo Marx) represented by characters in the book, including Kerouac himself as the narrator Sal Paradise.The idea for On_the_Road, Kerouac's second novel, was formed during the late 1940s in a series of notebooks, and then typed out on a continuous reel of paper during three weeks in April 1951."
p7228
aS'It was first published by Viking Press in 1957.'
p7229
aS'After several film proposals dating from 1957, the book was finally made into a film, On_the_Road, produced by Francis Ford Coppola and directed by Walter Salles, in 2012.When the book was originally released, The New York Times hailed it as "the most beautifully executed, the clearest and the most important utterance yet made by the generation Kerouac himself named years ago as \'beat,\' and whose principal avatar he is."'
p7230
aS'In 1998, the Modern Library ranked On_the_Road 55th on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century.'
p7231
aS'The novel was chosen by Time magazine as one of the 100 best English-language novels from 1923 to 2005. Production and publication After Kerouac dropped out of Columbia University he served on several different sailing vessels before returning to New York to write.'
p7232
aS'He met and mixed with Beat Generation figures Allen Ginsberg and William Burroughs, and Neal Cassady, who would become Dean Moriarty.'
p7233
aS'Between 1947 and 1950, while writing what would become The Town and the City, Kerouac engaged in the road adventures that would form On_the_Road.'
p7234
aS'One_Hundred_Years_of_Solitude (1967) earned Garcia Marquez international fame as a novelist of the Magical Realism movement within the literatures of Latin America.As a metaphoric, critical interpretation of Colombian history, from foundation to contemporary nation, One_Hundred_Years_of_Solitude presents different national myths through the story of the Buendia Family, whose spirit of adventure places them amidst the important actions of Colombian historical events -- such as the Liberal political reformation of a colonial way of life, and the nineteenth-century arguments for and against it; the arrival of the railway to a mountainous country; the Thousand Days\' War (Guerra de los Mil Dias, 1899-1902); the corporate hegemony of the United Fruit Company ("American Fruit Company" in the story); the cinema; the automobile; and the military massacre of striking workers as government-labour relations policy. Plot One_Hundred_Years_of_Solitude is the story of seven generations of the Buendia Family in the town of Macondo.'
p7235
aS'The founding patriarch of Macondo, Jose Arcadio Buendia, and Ursula Iguaran, his wife (and first cousin), leave Riohacha, Colombia, to find a better life and a new home.'
p7236
aS'One night of their emigration journey, while camping on a riverbank, Jose Arcadio Buendia dreams of "Macondo", a city of mirrors that reflected the world in and about it.'
p7237
aS"Upon awakening, he decides to establish Macondo at the river side; after days of wandering the jungle, Jose Arcadio Buendia's founding of Macondo is utopic.Founding patriarch Jose Arcadio Buendia believes Macondo to be surrounded by water, and from that island, he invents the world according to his perceptions."
p7238
aS'Soon after its foundation, Macondo becomes a town frequented by unusual and extraordinary events that involve the generations of the Buendia family, who are unable or unwilling to escape their periodic (mostly self-inflicted) misfortunes.'
p7239
aS'Ultimately, a hurricane destroys Macondo, the city of mirrors; just the cyclical turmoil inherent to Macondo.'
p7240
aS'At the end of the story, a Buendia man deciphers an encryption that generations of Buendia family men had failed to decode.'
p7241
aS'The Kuiper_belt and the scattered disc, the other two reservoirs of trans-Neptunian objects, are less than one thousandth as far from the Sun as the Oort_cloud.'
p7242
aS"The outer limit of the Oort_cloud defines the cosmographical boundary of the Solar System and the region of the Sun's gravitational dominance.The Oort_cloud is thought to comprise two regions: a spherical outer Oort_cloud and a disc-shaped inner Oort_cloud, or Hills cloud."
p7243
aS"Objects in the Oort_cloud are largely composed of ices, such as water, ammonia, and methane.Astronomers conjecture that the matter composing the Oort_cloud formed closer to the Sun and was scattered far into space by the gravitational effects of the giant planets early in the Solar System's evolution."
p7244
aS'Although no confirmed direct observations of the Oort_cloud have been made, it may be the source of all long-period and Halley-type comets entering the inner Solar System, and many of the centaurs and Jupiter-family comets as well.'
p7245
aS'The outer Oort_cloud is only loosely bound to the Solar System, and thus is easily affected by the gravitational pull both of passing stars and of the Milky Way itself.'
p7246
aS'These forces occasionally dislodge comets from their orbits within the cloud and send them towards the inner Solar System.'
p7247
aS'Based on their orbits, most of the short-period comets may come from the scattered disc, but some may still have originated from the Oort_cloud. Hypothesis In 1932, the Estonian astronomer Ernst Opik postulated that long-period comets originated in an orbiting cloud at the outermost edge of the Solar System.'
p7248
aS'These conditions are very loose, and they allow enormous flexibility in the choice of open sets.'
p7249
aS'In the two extremes, every set can be open (called the discrete topology), or no set can be open but the space itself (the indiscrete topology).In practice, however, open sets are usually chosen to be similar to the open intervals of the real line.'
p7250
aS'The notion of an open set provides a fundamental way to speak of nearness of points in a topological space, without explicitly having a concept of distance defined.'
p7251
aS'Once a choice of open sets is made, the properties of continuity, connectedness, and compactness, which use notions of nearness, can be defined using these open sets.Each choice of open sets for a space is called a topology.'
p7252
aS'Although open sets and the topologies that they comprise are of central importance in point-set topology, they are also used as an organizational tool in other important branches of mathematics.'
p7253
aS'Examples of topologies include the Zariski topology in algebraic geometry that reflects the algebraic nature of varieties, and the topology on a differential manifold in differential topology where each point within the space is contained in an open set that is homeomorphic to an open ball in a finite-dimensional Euclidean space. Motivation Intuitively, an open set provides a method to distinguish two points.'
p7254
aS'For example, if about one point in a topological space there exists an open set not containing another (distinct) point, the two points are referred to as topologically distinguishable.'
p7255
aS"The wars weakened the Qing dynasty and reduced China's separation from the rest of the world.Briefly, the Chinese sought to stop Britain from illegally importing and selling opium in the country; Britain sought to legalize its opium trade and to liberalize other trade."
p7256
aS'Earlier, China, inward-facing, had little demand for foreign goods, while European nations sought various Chinese goods, so China had a very favorable trade balance, and was accumulating silver bullion.'
p7257
aS'If Chinese payments for smuggled opium, provided from India and Turkey by British and other merchants, were increased, then the imbalance of trade would be reduced.'
p7258
aS'Increased smuggling led to China having a negative trade balance in the 1830s, and China took actions to halt or reduce the trade.'
p7259
aS'France joined in the fighting of the second war, and the U.S. engaged in some relatively small incidents within the second war.'
p7260
aS'China was defeated in the wars, and a major result was that China was forced to open ports to foreign trade.Although the two wars are referred to collectively as the Opium_Wars, some historians argue that they were quite different.'
p7261
aS'The importance and relationship of the two wars should not be overstated.'
p7262
aS"He is viewed as Greece's best-known living composer."
p7263
aS'He is awarded the Lenin Peace Prize Politically, he is identified with the left because of the long time connection with the Communist Party of Greece.'
p7264
aS'He was an MP for the KKE from 1981 to 1990.'
p7265
aS'Nevertheless, in 1989 he ran as an independent candidate within the centre-right New Democracy party, in order for the country to emerge from the political crisis that had been created due to the numerous scandals of the government of Andreas Papandreou and helped to establish a large coalition between conservatives, socialists and leftists.'
p7266
aS'In 1990 he was elected to the parliament (as in 1964 and 1981), became a government minister under Constantine Mitsotakis, and fought against drugs and terrorism and for culture, education and better relations between Greece and Turkey.'
p7267
aS'He continues to speak out in favor of left-liberal causes, Greek-Turkish-Cypriot relations, and against the War in Iraq.'
p7268
aS'He has consistently opposed oppressive regimes and was a key voice against the Greek junta 1967-1974, which imprisoned him. Biography  Early years Mikis Theodorakis was born on the Greek island of Chios and spent his childhood years in different provincial Greek cities such as Mytilene, Cephallonia, Patras, Pyrgos, and Tripoli.'
p7269
aS'In particular, Orientalist painting, depicting more specifically "the Middle East", was one of the many specialisms of 19th-century Academic art, and the literature of Western countries took a similar interest in Oriental themes.Since the publication of Edward Said\'s Orientalism in 1978, much academic discourse has begun to use the term "Orientalism" to refer to a general patronizing Western attitude towards Middle Eastern, Asian and North African societies.'
p7270
aS"In Said's analysis, the West essentializes these societies as static and undeveloped--thereby fabricating a view of Oriental culture that can be studied, depicted, and reproduced."
p7271
aS'Implicit in this fabrication, writes Said, is the idea that Western society is developed, rational, flexible, and superior. BackgroundEdit "Orientalism" refers to the Orient or East, in contrast to the Occident or West, and often, as seen by the West, often as "a form of radical realism".'
p7272
aS'Orient came into English from Middle French orient (the root word is oriens, L).'
p7273
aS'Oriens has related meanings: the eastern part of the world, the part of the sky in which the sun rises, the east, the rising sun, daybreak, and dawn.'
p7274
aS'Together with the geographical concepts of different ages, its reference of the "eastern part" has changed.'
p7275
aS'For example, when Chaucer wrote "That they conquered many regnes grete / In the orient, with many a fair citee" in Monk\'s Tale (1375), the "orient" refers to countries lying immediately to the east of the Mediterranean or Southern Europe; while in Aneurin Bevan\'s In Place of Fear (1952) this geographical term had already expanded to East Asia -- "the awakening of the Orient under the impact of Western ideas".'
p7276
aS'The Orinoco and its tributaries are the major transportation system for eastern and interior Venezuela and the llanos of Colombia.'
p7277
aS'The Orinoco is extremely diverse and hosts a wide variety of flora and fauna. History The mouth of the Orinoco at the Atlantic Ocean was documented by Columbus on 1 August 1498, during his third voyage.'
p7278
aS'Its source at the Cerro Delgado-Chalbaud, in the Parima range, was not explored by non-indigenous peoples until 1951, 453 years later.'
p7279
aS"The source, near the Venezuelan-Brazilian border, at 1,047 m (3,435 ft) of elevation (02deg19'05''N 63deg21'42''W ), was explored in 1951 by a joint Venezuelan-French team.The Orinoco delta, and tributaries in the eastern llanos such as the Apure and Meta, were explored in the 16th century by German expeditions under Ambrosius Ehinger and his successors."
p7280
aS'In 1531 Diego de Ordaz, starting at the principal outlet in the delta, the Boca de Navios, sailed up the river to the Meta.'
p7281
aS'Antonio de Berrio sailed down the Casanare to the Meta, and then down the Orinoco and back to Coro.Alexander von Humboldt explored the basin in 1800, reporting on the pink river dolphins.'
p7282
aS"He published extensively on the river's flora and fauna. Geography The course of the Orinoco forms a wide ellipsoidal arc, surrounding the Guiana Shield; it is divided in four stretches of unequal length that roughly correspond to the longitudinal zonation of a typical large river:Upper Orinoco-- 242 kilometres (150 mi) long, from its headwaters to the rapids Raudales de Guaharibos, flows through mountainous landscape in a northwesterly directionMiddle Orinoco-- 750 kilometres (470 mi) long, divided into two sectors, the first of which ca."
p7283
aS'Most ancient sources omit some of these episodes and several tell only one.'
p7284
aS"These various incidents may originally have been independent, unrelated stories and it is impossible to tell whether omissions are simple brevity or represent a real disagreement.In Greek literature he first appears as a great hunter in Homer's epic the Odyssey, where Odysseus sees his shade in the underworld."
p7285
aS"The bare bones of his story are told by the Hellenistic and Roman collectors of myths, but there is no extant literary version of his adventures comparable, for example, to that of Jason in Apollonius of Rhodes' Argonautica or Euripides' Medea; the entry in Ovid's Fasti for May 11 is a poem on the birth of Orion, but that is one version of a single story."
p7286
aS'The surviving fragments of legend have provided a fertile field for speculation about Greek prehistory and myth.Orion served several roles in ancient Greek culture.'
p7287
aS'The story of the adventures of Orion, the hunter, is the one on which we have the most evidence (and even on that not very much); he is also the personification of the constellation of the same name; he was venerated as a hero, in the Greek sense, in the region of Boeotia; and there is one etiological passage which says that Orion was responsible for the present shape of the Straits of Sicily. Legends  Homer and Hesiod Orion is mentioned in the oldest surviving works of Greek literature, which probably date back to the 7th or 8th century BC, but which are the products of an oral tradition with origins several centuries earlier.'
p7288
aS"In Homer's Iliad Orion is described as a constellation, and the star Sirius is mentioned as his dog."
p7289
aS'In the Odyssey, Odysseus sees him hunting in the underworld with a bronze club, a great slayer of animals; he is also mentioned as a constellation, as the lover of the Goddess Dawn, as slain by Artemis, and as the most handsome of the earthborn.'
p7290
aS'Orlando_Furioso is a continuation of Matteo Maria Boiardo\'s unfinished romance Orlando Innamorato ("Orlando in Love", published posthumously in 1495).'
p7291
aS'In its historical setting and characters, it shares some features with the Old French Chanson de Roland of the eleventh century, which tells of the death of Roland.Orlando is the Christian knight known in French (and subsequently English) as Roland.'
p7292
aS"The action takes place against the background of the war between Charlemagne's Christian paladins and the Saracen army that is attempting to invade Europe."
p7293
aS'The poem is about war and love and the romantic ideal of chivalry.'
p7294
aS'It mixes realism and fantasy, humor and tragedy.'
p7295
aS'The stage is the entire world, plus a trip to the moon.'
p7296
aS'The large cast of characters features Christians and Saracens, soldiers and sorcerers, and fantastic creatures including a gigantic sea monster called the orc and a flying horse called the hippogriff.'
p7297
aS'In 1937 he and John Houseman founded the Mercury Theatre, an independent repertory theatre company that presented an acclaimed series of productions on Broadway through 1941.'
p7298
aS"Welles found national and international fame as the director and narrator of a 1938 radio adaptation of H. G. Wells' novel The War of the Worlds performed for his radio anthology series The Mercury Theatre on the Air."
p7299
aS'It reportedly caused widespread panic when listeners thought that an invasion by extraterrestrial beings was occurring.'
p7300
aS'Although some contemporary sources claim these reports of panic were mostly false and overstated, they rocketed Welles to notoriety.His first film was Citizen Kane (1941), which he co-wrote, produced, directed, and starred in as Charles Foster Kane.'
p7301
aS'Welles was an outsider to the studio system and directed only 13 full-length films in his career.'
p7302
aS'Because of this, he struggled for creative control from the major film studios, and his films were either heavily edited or remained unreleased.'
p7303
aS'His distinctive directorial style featured layered and nonlinear narrative forms, innovative uses of lighting such as chiaroscuro, unusual camera angles, sound techniques borrowed from radio, deep focus shots, and long takes.'
p7304
aS"He was classically depicted as a green-skinned man with a pharaoh's beard, partially mummy-wrapped at the legs, wearing a distinctive crown with two large ostrich feathers at either side, and holding a symbolic crook and flail.Osiris was at times considered the oldest son of the earth god Geb, though other sources state his father is the sun-god Ra  and the sky goddess Nut, as well as being brother and husband of Isis, with Horus being considered his posthumously begotten son."
p7305
aS'He was also associated with the epithet Khenti-Amentiu, meaning "Foremost of the Westerners", a reference to his kingship in the land of the dead.'
p7306
aS'As ruler of the dead, Osiris was also sometimes called "king of the living": ancient Egyptians considered the blessed dead "the living ones".'
p7307
aS'Osiris was considered the brother of Isis, Set, Nephthys, and Horus the Elder, and father of Horus the younger.'
p7308
aS'Osiris is first attested in the middle of the Fifth dynasty of Egypt, although it is likely that he was worshipped much earlier; the Khenti-Amentiu epithet dates to at least the first dynasty, also as a pharaonic title.'
p7309
aS'Most information available on the myths of Osiris is derived from allusions contained in the Pyramid Texts at the end of the Fifth Dynasty, later New Kingdom source documents such as the Shabaka Stone and the Contending of Horus and Seth, and much later, in narrative style from the writings of Greek authors including Plutarch and Diodorus Siculus.Osiris was considered not only a merciful judge of the dead in the afterlife, but also the underworld agency that granted all life, including sprouting vegetation and the fertile flooding of the Nile River.'
p7310
aS'He was described as the "Lord of love", "He Who is Permanently Benign and Youthful" and the "Lord of Silence".'
p7311
aS'At the national level, American leaders had been satisfied to have the island remain in weak Spanish hands so long as it did not pass to a stronger power such as Britain or France.'
p7312
aS'The Ostend_Manifesto proposed a shift in foreign policy, justifying the use of force to seize Cuba in the name of national security.'
p7313
aS"It resulted from debates over slavery in the United_States, Manifest Destiny, and the Monroe Doctrine, as slaveholders sought new territory for slavery's expansion.During the administration of President Franklin Pierce, a pro-Southern Democrat, Southern expansionists called for acquiring Cuba as a slave state, but the breakout of violence following the Kansas-Nebraska Act left the administration unsure of how to proceed."
p7314
aS'At the suggestion of Secretary of State William L. Marcy, American ministers in Europe -- Pierre Soule for Spain, James Buchanan for Great Britain, and John Y. Mason for France -- met to discuss strategy related to an acquisition of Cuba.'
p7315
aS'They met secretly at Ostend, Belgium, and drafted a dispatch at Aix-la-Chapelle.'
p7316
aS'The document was sent to Washington in October 1854, outlining why a purchase of Cuba would be beneficial to each of the nations and declaring that the U.S. would be "justified in wresting" the island from Spanish hands if Spain refused to sell.'
p7317
aS"To Marcy's chagrin, Soule made no secret of the meetings, causing unwanted publicity in both Europe and the U.S."
p7318
aS"He continued his father's work of unifying all German tribes into a single kingdom and greatly expanded the king's powers at the expense of the aristocracy."
p7319
aS"Through strategic marriages and personal appointments, Otto installed members of his family in the kingdom's most important duchies."
p7320
aS'This reduced the various dukes, who had previously been co-equals with the king, to royal subjects under his authority.'
p7321
aS'Otto transformed the Roman Catholic Church in Germany to strengthen the royal office and subjected its clergy to his personal control.After putting down a brief civil war among the rebellious duchies, Otto defeated the Magyars at the Battle of Lechfeld in 955, thus ending the Hungarian invasions of Western Europe.'
p7322
aS'The victory against the pagan Magyars earned Otto a reputation as a savior of Christendom and secured his hold over the kingdom.'
p7323
aS"By 961, Otto had conquered the Kingdom of Italy and extended his realm's borders to the north, east, and south."
p7324
aS'The patronage of Otto and his immediate successors facilitated a limited cultural renaissance of the arts and architecture.'
p7325
aS'The Ottomans overthrew the Byzantine Empire with the 1453 conquest of Constantinople (present-day Istanbul) by Mehmed the Conqueror.During the 16th and 17th centuries, in particular at the height of its power under the reign of Suleiman_the_Magnificent, the Ottoman_Empire was a powerful multinational, multilingual empire controlling much of Southeast Europe, Western Asia, the Caucasus, North Africa, and the Horn of Africa.'
p7326
aS'At the beginning of the 17th century the empire contained 32 provinces and numerous vassal states.'
p7327
aS'Some of these were later absorbed into the Ottoman_Empire, while others were granted various types of autonomy during the course of centuries.With Constantinople as its capital and control of lands around the Mediterranean basin, the Ottoman_Empire was at the centre of interactions between the Eastern and Western worlds for six centuries.'
p7328
aS'Following a long period of military setbacks against European powers, the Ottoman_Empire gradually declined into the late nineteenth century.'
p7329
aS'The empire allied with Germany in the early 20th century, with the imperial ambition of recovering its lost territories, but it collapsed and was dissolved by the Allied Powers in the aftermath of World_War_I.'
p7330
aS'This resulted in the emergence of the new state of Turkey in the Ottoman Anatolian heartland, as well as the founding of modern Balkan and Middle Eastern states. Name The word "Ottoman" is a historical anglicisation of the name of Osman I, the founder of the Empire and of the ruling House of Osman (also known as the Ottoman dynasty).'
p7331
aS"Osman's name in turn was derived from the Persian form of the name 'Utman `thmn of ultimately Arabic origin."
p7332
aS'His musicological interest in 16th-, 17th- and 18th-century music led him to compose pieces based on the music of these periods.'
p7333
aS'He also wrote a number of operas, the most famous of which is La fiamma. Biography Ottorino_Respighi was born in Bologna, Italy.'
p7334
aS'He was taught piano and violin by his father, who was a local piano teacher.'
p7335
aS'He went on to study violin and viola with Federico Sarti at the Liceo Musicale in Bologna, composition with Giuseppe Martucci, and historical studies with Luigi Torchi, a scholar of early music.'
p7336
aS'A year after receiving his diploma in violin in 1899, Respighi went to Russia to be principal violist in the orchestra of the Russian Imperial Theatre in Saint_Petersburg during its season of Italian opera.'
p7337
aS'While there he studied composition for five months with Rimsky-Korsakov.'
p7338
aS'He then returned to Bologna, where he earned a second diploma in composition.'
p7339
aS'The book predates the Cuban Missile Crisis, but certain aspects of the plot, notably the role of missile installations, appear to anticipate the events of 1962.It was adapted into a film of the same name in 1959, directed by Carol Reed and starring Alec Guinness; in 1963 it was adapted into an opera by Malcolm Williamson, to a libretto by Sidney Gilliat, who had worked on the film.'
p7340
aS'In 2007, it was adapted into a play by Clive Francis. Background Greene joined MI6 in August 1941.'
p7341
aS'In London, Greene had been appointed to the subsection dealing with counter-espionage in the Iberian peninsula, where he had learned about German agents in Portugal sending the Germans fictitious reports which garnered them expenses and bonuses to add to their basic salary.'
p7342
aS'One of these agents was "Garbo", a Spanish double agent in Lisbon, who gave his German handlers disinformation, by pretending to control a ring of agents all over England.'
p7343
aS'In fact he invented armed forces movements and operations from maps, guides and standard military references.'
p7344
aS'Garbo was the main inspiration for Wormold, the protagonist of Our Man In Havana.Remembering the German agents in Portugal, Greene wrote the first version of the story in 1946, as an outline for a film script, with the story set in Estonia in 1938.'
p7345
aS'The film was never made, and Greene soon realised that Havana - which he had visited several times in the early 1950s - would be a much better setting, the absurdities of the Cold War being more appropriate for a comedy. Plot The novel, a black comedy, is set in Havana during the Fulgencio Batista regime.'
p7346
aS'The main character is the stage manager of the theatre who directly addresses the audience, brings in guests lecturers, fields questions from the audience, and fills in playing some of the roles.'
p7347
aS'The play is performed without a set and the actors mime their actions without the use of props.Our_Town was first performed at McCarter Theater in Princeton, New Jersey in 1938.'
p7348
aS'It later went on to success on Broadway and won the Pulitzer Prize for Drama.'
p7349
aS"It remains popular today and revivals are frequent. Synopsis  Act I: Daily Life The Stage Manager introduces the audience to the small town of Grover's Corners, New Hampshire, and the people living there as a morning begins in the year 1901."
p7350
aS'Professor Willard speaks to the audience about the history of the town.'
p7351
aS'Joe Crowell delivers the paper to Doc Gibbs, Howie Newsome delivers the milk, and the Webb and Gibbs households send their children (Emily and George, respectively) off to school on this beautifully simple morning. Act II: Love and Marriage Three years have passed, and George and Emily prepare to wed.'
p7352
aS'The day is filled with stress.'
p7353
aS"The transition between the inner core and outer core is located approximately 5,150 km (3,200 mi) beneath the Earth's surface. Properties The temperature of the outer core ranges from 4,300 K (4,030 degC; 7,280 degF) in the outer regions to 6,000 K (5,730 degC; 10,340 degF) near the inner core."
p7354
aS'Because of its high temperature, modeling work has shown that the outer core is a low viscosity fluid (about ten times the viscosity of liquid metals at the surface) that convects turbulently.'
p7355
aS"Eddy currents in the nickel iron fluid of the outer core are believed to influence the Earth's magnetic field."
p7356
aS"The average magnetic field strength in the Earth's outer core was measured to be 2.5 millitesla, 50 times stronger than the magnetic field at the surface."
p7357
aS'The outer core is not under enough pressure to be solid, so it is liquid even though it has a composition similar to that of the inner core.'
p7358
aS'Sulfur and oxygen could also be present in the outer core.As heat is transferred outward toward the mantle, the net trend is for the inner boundary of the liquid region to freeze, causing the solid inner core to grow.'
p7359
aS"This growth rate is estimated to be 1 mm per year. Effect on life Convection of liquid metals in the outer core creates the Earth's magnetic field, and without this, life would be significantly different then what we have today. See also Structure of the Earth References  External links Outer_core from universetoday.com"
p7360
aS'The Metamorphoses remains one of the most important sources of classical mythology.Ovid is traditionally ranked alongside Virgil and Horace, his older contemporaries, as one of the three canonic poets of Latin literature.'
p7361
aS'He was the first major Roman poet to begin his career during the reign of Augustus, and the Imperial scholar Quintilian considered him the last of the Latin love elegists.'
p7362
aS'He enjoyed enormous popularity, but in one of the mysteries of literary history he was sent by Augustus into exile in a remote province on the Black_Sea, where he remained until his death.'
p7363
aS'Ovid himself attributes his exile to carmen et error, "a poem and a mistake", but his discretion in discussing the causes has resulted in much speculation among scholars.Ovid\'s prolific poetry includes the Heroides, a collection of verse epistles written as though by mythological heroines to the lovers who abandoned them; the Fasti, an incomplete six-book exploration of Roman religion with a calendar structure; and the Tristia and Epistulae ex Ponto, two collections of elegies in the form of complaining letters from his exile.'
p7364
aS'His shorter works include the Remedia Amoris ("Cure for Love"), the curse-poem Ibis, and an advice poem on women\'s cosmetics.'
p7365
aS'He wrote a lost tragedy, Medea, and mentions that some of his other works were adapted for staged performance. Life Ovid talks more about his own life than most other Roman poets.'
p7366
aS'Information about his biography is drawn primarily from his poetry, especially Tristia 4.10, which gives a long autobiographical account of his life.'
p7367
aS'Photosynthesis releases oxygen, and respiration consumes oxygen.'
p7368
aS'Changes in phosphate are related to changes in oxygen concentrations.Oxygen was discovered independently by Carl Wilhelm Scheele, in Uppsala, in 1773 or earlier, and Joseph Priestley in Wiltshire, in 1774, but Priestley is often given priority because his work was published first.'
p7369
aS'The name oxygen was coined in 1777 by Antoine Lavoisier, whose experiments with oxygen helped to discredit the then-popular phlogiston theory of combustion and corrosion.'
p7370
aS'Its name derives from the Greek roots oxus oxys, "acid", literally "sharp", referring to the sour taste of acids and -genes -genes, "producer", literally "begetter", because at the time of naming, it was mistakenly thought that all acids required oxygen in their composition. Characteristics By mass, oxygen is the third-most abundant element in the universe, after hydrogen and helium.'
p7371
aS'At standardized conditions for temperature and pressure, two atoms of the element bind to form dioxygen, a diatomic gas that is colorless, odorless, and tasteless, with the formula O2.Many major classes of organic molecules in living organisms, such as proteins, nucleic acids, carbohydrates, and fats, contain oxygen, as do the major inorganic compounds that are constituents of animal shells, teeth, and bone.'
p7372
aS'Most of the mass of living organisms is oxygen as it is a part of water, the major constituent of lifeforms (for example, about two-thirds of human body mass).'
p7373
aS'Elemental oxygen is produced by cyanobacteria, algae and plants, and is used in cellular respiration for all complex life.Oxygen is toxic to obligately anaerobic organisms, which were the dominant form of early life on Earth until O2 began to accumulate in the atmosphere about 2.5 billion years ago during the Great Oxygenation Event, about a billion years after the first appearance of these organisms.'
p7374
aS'It is an allotrope of oxygen that is much less stable than the diatomic allotrope O2, breaking down in the lower atmosphere to normal dioxygen.'
p7375
aS"Ozone is formed from dioxygen by the action of ultraviolet light and also atmospheric electrical discharges, and is present in low concentrations throughout the Earth's atmosphere(stratosphere)."
p7376
aS"In total, ozone makes up only 69996000000000000000.6 ppm of the atmosphere.Ozone's odour is sharp, reminiscent of chlorine, and detectable by many people at concentrations of as little as 700110000000000000010 ppb in air."
p7377
aS"Ozone's O3 formula was determined in 1865."
p7378
aS'The molecule was later proven to have a bent structure and to be diamagnetic.'
p7379
aS'In standard conditions, ozone is a pale blue gas that condenses at progressively cryogenic temperatures to a dark blue liquid and finally a violet-black solid.'
p7380
aS"Ozone's instability with regard to more common dioxygen is such that both concentrated gas and liquid ozone may decompose explosively."
p7381
aS'"Ozymandias" is regarded as one of Shelley\'s most famous works and is frequently anthologised.In antiquity, Ozymandias was an alternative name for the Egyptian pharaoh Ramesses_II.'
p7382
aS"Shelley began writing his poem in 1817, soon after the announcement of the British Museum's acquisition of a large fragment of a statue of Ramesses_II from the thirteenth-century BC, and some scholars believe that Shelley was inspired by this."
p7383
aS"The 7.25-ton fragment of the statue's head and torso had been removed in 1816 from the mortuary temple of Ramesses at Thebes by the Italian adventurer Giovanni Battista Belzoni (1778-1823)."
p7384
aS'It was expected to arrive in London in 1818, but did not arrive until 1821.'
p7385
aS'Shelley wrote the poem in friendly competition with his friend and fellow poet Horace Smith (1779-1849) who also wrote a sonnet on the same topic with the very same title.'
p7386
aS"Smith's poem would be first published in The Examiner a few weeks after Shelley's sonnet."
p7387
aS'Both poems explore the fate of history and the ravages of time--that all prominent figures and the empires they build are impermanent and their legacies fated to decay and oblivion. Writing and publication history  Publication history The banker and political writer Horace Smith spent the Christmas season of 1817-1818 with Percy Bysshe Shelley and Mary Shelley.'
p7388
aS'As such, p53 has been described as "the guardian of the genome" because of its role in conserving stability by preventing genome mutation.'
p7389
aS'Hence TP53 is classified as a tumor suppressor gene.'
p7390
aS'The name p53 was given in 1979 describing the apparent molecular mass; SDS-PAGE analysis indicates that it is a 53-kilodalton (kDa) protein.'
p7391
aS'However, the actual mass of the full length p53 protein (p53a) based on the sum of masses of the amino acid residues is only 43.7 kDa.'
p7392
aS'This difference is due to the high number of proline residues in the protein, which slow its migration on SDS-PAGE, thus making it appear heavier than it actually is.'
p7393
aS'In addition to the full length protein, the human TP53 gene encodes at least 15 protein isoforms, ranging in size from 3.5 to 43.7 kDa.'
p7394
aS'All these p53 proteins are called the p53 isoforms.'
p7395
aS'He won the Nobel Prize for Literature in 1971.Neruda became known as a poet when he was 10 years old.'
p7396
aS'He wrote in a variety of styles, including surrealist poems, historical epics, overtly political manifestos, a prose autobiography, and erotically charged love poems such as the ones in his collection Twenty_Love_Poems_and_a_Song_of_Despair (1942).'
p7397
aS'He often wrote in green ink, which was his personal symbol for desire and hope.The Colombian novelist Gabriel Garcia Marquez once called Neruda "the greatest poet of the 20th century in any language."'
p7398
aS'Harold Bloom included Neruda as one of the 26 writers central to the "Western tradition" in his book The Western Canon.On July 15, 1945, at Pacaembu Stadium in Sao Paulo, Brazil, Neruda read to 100,000 people in honor of the Communist revolutionary leader Luis Carlos Prestes.During his lifetime, Neruda occupied many diplomatic positions and served a term as a Senator for the Chilean Communist Party.'
p7399
aS"When President Gonzalez Videla outlawed communism in Chile in 1948, a warrant was issued for Neruda's arrest."
p7400
aS'Friends hid him for months in the basement of a house in the port city of Valparaiso.'
p7401
aS"Later, Neruda escaped through a mountain pass near Maihue Lake into Argentina.Years later, Neruda was a close advisor to Chile's socialist President Salvador_Allende."
p7402
aS"Among his most famous works are the proto-Cubist Les_Demoiselles_d'Avignon (1907), and Guernica (1937), a portrayal of the Bombing of Guernica by the German and Italian airforces at the behest of the Spanish nationalist government during the Spanish_Civil_War.Picasso, Henri_Matisse and Marcel Duchamp are regarded as the three artists who most defined the revolutionary developments in the plastic arts in the opening decades of the 20th century, responsible for significant developments in painting, sculpture, printmaking and ceramics.Picasso demonstrated extraordinary artistic talent in his early years, painting in a naturalistic manner through his childhood and adolescence."
p7403
aS'During the first decade of the 20th century, his style changed as he experimented with different theories, techniques, and ideas.'
p7404
aS'His work is often categorized into periods.'
p7405
aS'While the names of many of his later periods are debated, the most commonly accepted periods in his work are the Blue Period (1901-1904), the Rose Period (1904-1906), the African-influenced Period (1907-1909), Analytic Cubism (1909-1912), and Synthetic Cubism (1912-1919), also referred to as the Crystal period.Exceptionally prolific throughout the course of his long life, Picasso achieved universal renown and immense fortune for his revolutionary artistic accomplishments, and became one of the best-known figures in 20th-century art. Early life Picasso was baptized Pablo, Diego, Jose, Francisco de Paula, Juan Nepomuceno, Maria de los Remedios, Cipriano de la Santisima Trinidad, a series of names honoring various saints and relatives.'
p7406
aS'Added to these were Ruiz and Picasso, for his father and mother, respectively, as per Spanish law.'
p7407
aS'Born in the city of Malaga in the Andalusian region of Spain, he was the first child of Don Jose Ruiz y Blasco (1838-1913) and Maria Picasso y Lopez.'
p7408
aS'Though baptized a Catholic, Picasso would later on become an atheist.'
p7409
aS'It is often staged by opera companies as a double bill with Cavalleria rusticana by Mascagni, known as Cav and Pag.Pagliacci premiered at the Teatro Dal Verme in Milan on 21 May 1892, conducted by Arturo Toscanini, with Adelina Stehle as Nedda, Fiorello Giraud as Canio, Victor Maurel as Tonio, and Mario Ancona as Silvio.'
p7410
aS"Nellie Melba played Nedda in London in 1892, soon after its Italian premiere, and was given in New York on 15 June 1893, with Agostino Montegriffo, as Canio. Composition history Around 1890, when Pietro Mascagni's Cavalleria rusticana premiered, Leoncavallo was a little-known composer."
p7411
aS"After seeing Mascagni's success, he decided to write an opera in response: one act composed in the verismo style."
p7412
aS'Leoncavallo claimed that he based the story of Pagliacci on an incident from his childhood: a murder in 1865, the victim of which was a Leoncavallo family servant, Gaetano Scavello.'
p7413
aS"The murderer was Gaetano D'Alessandro, with his brother Luigi an accomplice to the crime."
p7414
aS"The incident resulted from a series of perceived romantic entanglements involving Scavello, Luigi D'Alessandro, and a village girl with whom both men were infatuated."
p7415
aS"Leoncavallo's father, a judge, was the presiding magistrate over the criminal investigation.Upon learning of the plot of Leoncavallo's libretto in an 1894 French translation, the French author Catulle Mendes thought it resembled his 1887 play La Femme de Tabarin, such as the play-within-the-play and the clown murdering his wife."
p7416
aS'Pakistan has a 1,046-kilometre (650 mi) coastline along the Arabian Sea and the Gulf of Oman in the south and is bordered by India to the east, Afghanistan to the west, Iran to the southwest and China in the far northeast respectively.'
p7417
aS"It is separated from Tajikistan by Afghanistan's narrow Wakhan Corridor in the north, and also shares a maritime border with Oman.The territory that now constitutes Pakistan was previously home to several ancient cultures, including the Mehrgarh of the Neolithic and the Bronze Age Indus Valley Civilisation, and was later home to kingdoms ruled by people of different faiths and cultures, including Hindus, Indo-Greeks, Muslims, Turco-Mongols, Afghans and Sikhs."
p7418
aS'The area has been ruled by numerous empires and dynasties, including the Indian Mauryan Empire, the Persian Achaemenid Empire, Alexander of Macedonia, the Arab Umayyad_Caliphate, the Mongol Empire, the Mughal_Empire, the Durrani Empire, the Sikh Empire and the British Empire.'
p7419
aS"As a result of the Pakistan Movement led by Muhammad Ali Jinnah and the subcontinent's struggle for independence, Pakistan was created in 1947 as an independent nation for Muslims from the regions in the east and west of Subcontinent where there was a Muslim majority."
p7420
aS'Initially a dominion, Pakistan adopted a new constitution in 1956, becoming an Islamic republic.'
p7421
aS'A civil war in 1971 resulted in the secession of East Pakistan as the new country of Bangladesh.Pakistan is a federal parliamentary republic consisting of four provinces and four federal territories.'
p7422
aS'It is an ethnically and linguistically diverse country, with a similar variation in its geography and wildlife.'
p7423
aS'He has the hindquarters, legs, and horns of a goat, in the same manner as a faun or satyr.'
p7424
aS'With his homeland in rustic Arcadia, he is also recognized as the god of fields, groves, and wooded glens; because of this, Pan is connected to fertility and the season of spring.'
p7425
aS"The ancient Greeks also considered Pan to be the god of theatrical criticism.In Roman religion and myth, Pan's counterpart was Faunus, a nature god who was the father of Bona Dea, sometimes identified as Fauna; he was also closely associated with Sylvanus, due to their similar relationships with woodlands."
p7426
aS'In the 18th and 19th centuries, Pan became a significant figure in the Romantic movement of western Europe and also in the 20th-century Neopagan movement.An area in the Golan Heights known as the Panion or Panium is associated with Pan.'
p7427
aS"The city of Caesarea Philippi, the site of the Battle of Panium and the Banias natural spring, grotto or cave, and related shrines dedicated to Pan, may be found there. Origins In his earliest appearance in literature, Pindar's Pythian Ode iii."
p7428
aS"78, Pan is associated with a mother goddess, perhaps Rhea or Cybele; Pindar refers to virgins worshipping Cybele and Pan near the poet's house in Boeotia.The parentage of Pan is unclear; generally he is the son of Hermes, although occasionally in some myths he is the son of Zeus, or Dionysus, with whom his mother is said to be a nymph, sometimes Dryope or, even in the 5th-century AD source Dionysiaca by Nonnus (14.92), Penelope of Mantineia in Arcadia."
p7429
aS'In some early sources such as Pindar, his father is Apollo via Penelope, the wife of Odysseus.'
p7430
aS'The narrative of the film intertwines this real world with a mythical world centered on an overgrown abandoned labyrinth and a mysterious faun creature, with which the main character, Ofelia, interacts.'
p7431
aS"Ofelia's stepfather, the Falangist Captain Vidal, hunts the Spanish Maquis who fight against the Francoist regime in the region, while Ofelia's pregnant mother grows increasingly ill. Ofelia meets several strange and magical creatures who become central to her story, leading her through the trials of the old labyrinth garden."
p7432
aS"The film employs make-up, animatronics, and CGI effects to bring life to its creatures.Del Toro stated that he considers the story to be a parable, influenced by fairy tales, and that it addresses and continues themes related to his earlier film The Devil's Backbone (2001), to which Pan's_Labyrinth is a spiritual successor, according to del Toro in his director's commentary on the DVD."
p7433
aS'The original Spanish title refers to the fauns of Roman mythology, while the English, German, and French titles refer specifically to the faun-like Greek deity Pan.'
p7434
aS'However, del Toro has stated that the faun in the film is not Pan.The film premiered at the 2006 Cannes Film Festival.'
p7435
aS'It was released in the United Kingdom on 24 November 2006.'
p7436
aS'In the United_States and Canada, the film was given a limited release on 29 December 2006, with a wide release on 19 January 2007.'
p7437
aS"The capital and largest city is Panama City, whose metro area is home to nearly half of the country's 3.6 million people.Panama was inhabited by several indigenous tribes prior to settlement by the Spanish in the 16th century."
p7438
aS'Panama broke away from Spain in 1821 and joined a union of Nueva Granada, Ecuador, and Venezuela named the Republic of Gran Colombia.'
p7439
aS'When Gran Colombia dissolved in 1831, Panama and Nueva Granada remained joined, eventually becoming the Republic of Colombia.'
p7440
aS'With the backing of the United_States, Panama seceded from Colombia in 1903, allowing the Panama Canal to be built by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers between 1904 and 1914.'
p7441
aS"In 1977, an agreement was signed for the total transfer of the Canal from the United_States to Panama by the end of the 20th century, which culminated on 31 December 1999.Revenue from canal tolls continues to represent a significant portion of Panama's GDP, although commerce, banking, and tourism are major and growing sectors."
p7442
aS'Panama has the second largest economy in Central America and is also the fastest growing economy and largest per capita consumer in Central America.'
p7443
aS'In 2013, Panama ranked 5th among Latin American countries in terms of the Human Development Index, and 59th in the world.'
p7444
aS'It is an endocrine gland producing several important hormones, including insulin, glucagon, somatostatin, and pancreatic polypeptide which circulate in the blood.'
p7445
aS'The pancreas is also a digestive organ, secreting pancreatic juice containing digestive enzymes that assist digestion and absorption of nutrients in the small intestine.'
p7446
aS'These enzymes help to further break down the carbohydrates, proteins, and lipids in the chyme. Structure The pancreas is an endocrine organ that lies in the abdomen, specifically the upper left abdomen.'
p7447
aS'It is found behind the stomach, with the head of the pancreas surrounded by the duodenum.'
p7448
aS'The pancreas is about 15 cm (6 in) long.Anatomically, the pancreas is divided into a head, which rests within the concavity of the duodenum, a body lying behind the base of the stomach, and a tail, which ends abutting the spleen.'
p7449
aS'The neck of the pancreas lies between the body and head, and lies anterior to the superior mesenteric artery and vein.'
p7450
aS'The head of the pancreas surrounds these two vessels, and a small uncinate process emerges from the lower part of the head, lying behind the superior mesenteric artery.The pancreas is a secretory structure with a internal hormonal role (endocrine) and an external digestive role (exocrine).'
p7451
aS'Pessimism abounded during the time.'
p7452
aS'The panic had both domestic and foreign origins.'
p7453
aS'Speculative lending practices in western states, a sharp decline in cotton prices, a collapsing land bubble, international specie flows, and restrictive lending policies in Great Britain were all to blame.'
p7454
aS'On May 10, 1837, banks in New_York_City suspended specie payments, meaning that they would no longer redeem commercial paper in specie at full face value.'
p7455
aS'Despite a brief recovery in 1838, the recession persisted for approximately seven years.'
p7456
aS'Banks collapsed, businesses failed, prices declined, and thousands of workers lost their jobs.'
p7457
aS'Unemployment may have been as high as 25% in some locales.'
p7458
aS'Due to its central location in South America, it is sometimes referred to as Corazon de America ("Heart of America").The indigenous Guarani had been living in Paraguay for at least a millennium before the Spanish conquered the territory in the 16th century.'
p7459
aS'Spanish settlers and Jesuit missions introduced Christianity and Spanish culture to the region.'
p7460
aS"Paraguay was on the periphery of Spain's colonial empire, with few urban centers and a sparse population."
p7461
aS'Following independence from Spain in 1811, Paraguay was ruled by a series of dictators who implemented isolationist and protectionist policies.This development was truncated by the disastrous Paraguayan_War (1864-1870), in which the country lost 60 to 70 percent of its population through war and disease, and about 140,000 square kilometers (54,054 sq mi) of territory to Argentina and Brazil.'
p7462
aS"Through the 20th century, Paraguay continued to endure a succession of authoritarian governments, culminating in the regime of Alfredo Stroessner, who led South America's longest-lived military dictatorship from 1954 to 1989."
p7463
aS'He was toppled in an internal military coup, and free multi-party elections were organized and held for the first time in 1993.'
p7464
aS"A year later, Paraguay joined Argentina, Brazil and Uruguay to found Mercosur, a regional economic collaborative.As of 2009, Paraguay's population was estimated to be at around 6.5 million, most of whom are concentrated in the southeast region of the country."
p7465
aS'It was the longest and bloodiest inter-state war in the Latin American history.'
p7466
aS'It particularly devastated Paraguay, which suffered catastrophic losses in population--almost 70% of its adult male population died--and was forced to cede territory to Argentina and Brazil.There are several theories regarding the origins of the war.'
p7467
aS'The traditional view emphasizes the aggressive policy of Paraguayan president Francisco Solano Lopez to gain control in the Platine basin.'
p7468
aS'See also Fortress of Humaita.'
p7469
aS'Conversely, popular belief in Paraguay, and Argentine revisionism since the 1960s, blames the influence of the British Empire (though the academic consensus shows little evidence for this theory).'
p7470
aS"The war has also been attributed to the after-effects of colonialism in South America; the struggle for physical power among neighboring nations over the strategic Rio_de_la_Plata region; Brazilian and Argentine meddling in internal Uruguayan politics; Solano Lopez's efforts to help allies in Uruguay (previously defeated by Brazilians), as well as his presumed expansionist ambitions."
p7471
aS'Paraguay had recurring boundary disputes and tariff issues with Argentina and Brazil for many years; its aid to allies in Uruguay in the period before the war worsened its relations with those countries.The war began in late 1864 with combat operations between Brazil and Paraguay.'
p7472
aS'Paramagnetic materials include most chemical elements and some compounds; they have a relative magnetic permeability greater than or equal to 1 (i.e., a positive magnetic susceptibility) and hence are attracted to magnetic fields.'
p7473
aS'The magnetic moment induced by the applied field is linear in the field strength and rather weak.'
p7474
aS'It typically requires a sensitive analytical balance to detect the effect and modern measurements on paramagnetic materials are often conducted with a SQUID magnetometer.Paramagnetic materials have a small, positive susceptibility to magnetic fields.'
p7475
aS'These materials are slightly attracted by a magnetic field and the material does not retain the magnetic properties when the external field is removed.'
p7476
aS'Paramagnetic properties are due to the presence of some unpaired electrons, and from the realignment of the electron paths caused by the external magnetic field.'
p7477
aS'Paramagnetic materials include magnesium, molybdenum, lithium, and tantalum.Unlike ferromagnets, paramagnets do not retain any magnetization in the absence of an externally applied magnetic field because thermal motion randomizes the spin orientations.'
p7478
aS'(Some paramagnetic materials retain spin disorder even at absolute zero, meaning they are paramagnetic in the ground state, i.e.'
p7479
aS'In its stead rose a Third Republic at war with Prussia, who subjected Paris to a brutal four-month siege.'
p7480
aS"A hotbed of working-class radicalism, during this time France's capital was primarily defended not by the regular French Army, but by the often politicized and radical troops of National Guard."
p7481
aS'In February 1871 Adolphe Thiers, the new chief executive of the French national government, signed an armistice with Prussia that disarmed the Army but not the National Guard.The killing of two French army generals by soldiers of the Commune\'s National Guard and the refusal of the Commune to accept the authority of the French government led to its harsh suppression by the regular French Army in "La semaine sanglante" ("The Bloody Week") beginning on 21 May 1871.'
p7482
aS'Debates over the policies and outcome of the Commune had significant influence on the ideas of Karl_Marx, who described it as an example of the "dictatorship of the proletariat". PreludeEdit On 2 September 1870, after France\'s unexpected defeat at the Battle of Sedan in the Franco-Prussian_War, Emperor Napoleon III surrendered to the Prussian Chancellor Otto von Bismarck.'
p7483
aS'When the news reached Paris the next day, shocked and angry crowds came out into the streets.'
p7484
aS"Empress Eugenie de Montijo, the Emperor's regent, fled the city, and the Government of the Second Empire swiftly collapsed."
p7485
aS'Republican and radical deputies of the National Assembly went to the Hotel de Ville, proclaimed the new French Republic, and formed a Government of National Defense.'
p7486
aS'Mithridates I of Parthia (r. c. 171-138 BC) greatly expanded the empire by seizing Media and Mesopotamia from the Seleucids.'
p7487
aS'At its height, the Parthian_Empire stretched from the northern reaches of the Euphrates, in what is now central-eastern Turkey, to eastern Iran.'
p7488
aS'The empire, located on the Silk Road trade route between the Roman Empire in the Mediterranean Basin and the Han Empire of China, became a center of trade and commerce.The Parthians largely adopted the art, architecture, religious beliefs, and royal insignia of their culturally heterogeneous empire, which encompassed Persian, Hellenistic, and regional cultures.'
p7489
aS'For about the first half of its existence, the Arsacid court adopted elements of Greek culture, though it eventually saw a gradual revival of Iranian traditions.'
p7490
aS'The Arsacid rulers were titled the "King of Kings", as a claim to be the heirs to the Achaemenid Empire; indeed, they accepted many local kings as vassals where the Achaemenids would have had centrally appointed, albeit largely autonomous, satraps.'
p7491
aS'The court did appoint a small number of satraps, largely outside Iran, but these satrapies were smaller and less powerful than the Achaemenid potentates.'
p7492
aS'With the expansion of Arsacid power, the seat of central government shifted from Nisa to Ctesiphon along the Tigris (south of modern Baghdad, Iraq), although several other sites also served as capitals.The earliest enemies of the Parthians were the Seleucids in the west and the Scythians in the east.'
p7493
aS'It commemorates the story of the Exodus as described in the Hebrew Bible especially in the Book of Exodus, in which the Israelites were freed from slavery in Egypt.'
p7494
aS'According to standard biblical chronology, this event would have taken place at about 1300 BCE (AM 2450).Passover commences on the 15th of the Hebrew month of Nisan and lasts for either seven days (in Israel) and for Reform Jews and other progressive Jews around the world who adhere to the Biblical commandment or eight days for Orthodox,Hasidic, and most Conservative Jews (in the diaspora).'
p7495
aS'In Judaism, a day commences at dusk and lasts until the following dusk, thus the first day of Passover only begins after dusk of the 14th of Nisan and ends at dusk of the 15th day of the month of Nisan.'
p7496
aS'The rituals unique to the Passover celebrations commence with the Passover Seder when the 15th of Nisan has begun.'
p7497
aS'In the Northern Hemisphere Passover takes place in spring as the Torah prescribes it: "in the month of [the] spring" (bkhdsh hbyb Exodus 23:15).'
p7498
aS'It is one of the most widely observed Jewish holidays.In the narrative of the Exodus, the Bible tells that God helped the Children of Israel escape from their slavery in Egypt by inflicting ten plagues upon the ancient Egyptians before the Pharaoh would release his Israelite slaves; the tenth and worst of the plagues was the death of the Egyptian first-born.The Israelites were instructed to mark the doorposts of their homes with the blood of a slaughtered spring lamb and, upon seeing this, the spirit of the Lord knew to pass over the first-born in these homes, hence the English name of the holiday.When the Pharaoh freed the Israelites, it is said that they left in such a hurry that they could not wait for bread dough to rise (leaven).'
p7499
aS'In commemoration, for the duration of Passover no leavened bread is eaten, for which reason Passover was called the feast of unleavened bread in the Torah or Old Testament.'
p7500
aS'This led to growing differences with President Joseph Kasa-Vubu and chief-of-staff Joseph-Desire Mobutu as well as foreign opposition from the United_States and Belgium.'
p7501
aS'Lumumba was subsequently imprisoned by state authorities under Mobutu and executed by firing squad under the command of the Katangan authorities.'
p7502
aS'The United Nations, which he had asked to come to the Congo, did not intervene to save him.'
p7503
aS"Belgium, the United_States, and the United Kingdom have all been accused of involvement in Lumumba's death. Early life and career Lumumba was born to a farmer, Francois Tolenga Otetshima, and his wife, Julienne Wamato Lomendja, in Onalua in the Katakokombe region of the Kasai province of the Belgian Congo."
p7504
aS"He was a member of the Tetela ethnic group and was born with the name Elias Okit'Asombo."
p7505
aS'His original surname means "heir of the cursed" and is derived from the Tetela words okita/okito (\'heir, successor\') and asombo (\'cursed or bewitched people who will die quickly\').'
p7506
aS'He had three brothers (Charles Lokolonga, Emile Kalema, and Louis Onema Pene Lumumba) and one half-brother (Tolenga Jean).'
p7507
aS'He used planes of colour and small brushstrokes that build up to form complex fields.'
p7508
aS"The paintings convey Cezanne's intense study of his subjects.Cezanne is said to have formed the bridge between late 19th-century Impressionism and the early 20th century's new line of artistic enquiry, Cubism."
p7509
aS'Both Matisse and Picasso are said to have remarked that Cezanne "is the father of us all.'
p7510
aS'" Life and work  Early years and family The Cezannes lived in the town of Cesana Torinese, now in West Piedmont, Italy, and the surname is probably of Italian origin.'
p7511
aS'Paul_Cezanne was born on 19 January 1839 in Aix-en-Provence, in Provence in the South of France.'
p7512
aS'On 22 February, he was baptized in the Eglise de la Madeleine, with his grandmother and uncle Louis as godparents.'
p7513
aS'His father, Louis-Auguste Cezanne (1798-1886), was the co-founder of a banking firm that prospered throughout the artist\'s life, affording him financial security that was unavailable to most of his contemporaries and eventually resulting in a large inheritance.His mother, Anne Elisabeth Honorine Aubert (1814-1897), was "vivacious and romantic, but quick to take offence".'
p7514
aS"He entered Frankfurt's Hoch'sche Konservatorium, where he studied violin with Adolf Rebner, as well as conducting and composition with Arnold Mendelssohn and Bernhard Sekles."
p7515
aS'At first he supported himself by playing in dance bands and musical-comedy groups.'
p7516
aS'He became deputy leader of the Frankfurt Opera Orchestra in 1914, and was promoted to leader in 1917.'
p7517
aS'He played second violin in the Rebner String Quartet from 1914.'
p7518
aS'In 1921 he founded the Amar Quartet, playing viola, and extensively toured Europe.In 1922, some of his pieces were played in the International Society for Contemporary Music festival at Salzburg, which first brought him to the attention of an international audience.'
p7519
aS'The following year, he began to work as an organizer of the Donaueschingen Festival, where he programmed works by several avant garde composers, including Anton Webern and Arnold Schoenberg.'
p7520
aS'In 1927 he was appointed Professor at the Berliner Hochschule fur Musik in Berlin.'
p7521
aS"Klee was a natural draftsman who experimented with and eventually deeply explored color theory, writing about it extensively; his lectures Writings on Form and Design Theory (Schriften zur Form und Gestaltungslehre), published in English as the Paul_Klee Notebooks, are held to be as important for modern art as Leonardo da Vinci's A Treatise on Painting for the Renaissance."
p7522
aS'He and his colleague, Russian painter Wassily_Kandinsky, both taught at the Bauhaus school of art, design and architecture.'
p7523
aS'His works reflect his dry humor and his sometimes childlike perspective, his personal moods and beliefs, and his musicality. Early life and training First of all, the art of living; then as my ideal profession, poetry and philosophy, and as my real profession, plastic arts; in the last resort, for lack of income, illustrations.Paul_Klee was born in Munchenbuchsee, Switzerland, as the second child of German music teacher Hans Wilhelm Klee (1849-1940) and Swiss singer Ida Marie Klee, nee Frick (1855-1921).'
p7524
aS'His sister Mathilde (died 6 December 1953) was born on 28 January 1876 in Walzenhausen.'
p7525
aS'Their father came from Tann and studied at the Stuttgart Conservatory singing, piano, organ and violin, meeting there his future wife Ida Frick.'
p7526
aS'Hans Wilhelm Klee was active as a music teacher at the Bern State Seminary in Hofwil near Bern until 1931.'
p7527
aS'Klee was able to develop his music skills as his parents encouraged and inspired him until his death.'
p7528
aS'For two electrons residing in the same orbital, n, , and m are the same, so ms must be different and the electrons have opposite spins.'
p7529
aS'This principle was formulated by Austrian physicist Wolfgang Pauli in 1925.A more rigorous statement is that the total wave function for two identical fermions is antisymmetric with respect to exchange of the particles.'
p7530
aS'This means that the wave function changes its sign if the space and spin co-ordinates of any two particles are interchanged.Integer spin particles, bosons, are not subject to the Pauli_exclusion_principle: any number of identical bosons can occupy the same quantum state, as with, for instance, photons produced by a laser and Bose-Einstein_condensate. Overview The Pauli_exclusion_principle governs the behavior of all fermions (particles with "half-integer spin"), while bosons (particles with "integer spin") are not subject to it.'
p7531
aS'Fermions include elementary particles such as quarks (the constituent particles of protons and neutrons), electrons and neutrinos.'
p7532
aS'In addition, protons and neutrons (subatomic particles composed from three quarks) and some atoms are fermions, and are therefore subject to the Pauli_exclusion_principle as well.'
p7533
aS'Atoms can have different overall "spin", which determines whether they are fermions or bosons -- for example helium-3 has spin  and is therefore a fermion, in contrast to helium-4 which has spin 0 and is a boson.'
p7534
aS'As such, the Pauli_exclusion_principle underpins many properties of everyday matter, from its large-scale stability, to the chemical behavior of atoms.'
p7535
aS'The final trigger for the revolt was the intervention of a royal official, John Bampton, in Essex on 30 May 1381.'
p7536
aS'His attempts to collect unpaid poll taxes in Brentwood ended in a violent confrontation, which rapidly spread across the south-east of the country.'
p7537
aS'A wide spectrum of rural society, including many local artisans and village officials, rose up in protest, burning court records and opening the local gaols.'
p7538
aS"The rebels sought a reduction in taxation, an end to the system of unfree labour known as serfdom and the removal of the King's senior officials and law courts.Inspired by the sermons of the radical cleric John Ball, and led by Wat Tyler, a contingent of Kentish rebels advanced on London."
p7539
aS'They were met at Blackheath by representatives of the royal government, who unsuccessfully attempted to persuade them to return home.'
p7540
aS'King Richard II, then aged 14, retreated to the safety of the Tower of London, but most of the royal forces were abroad or in northern England.'
p7541
aS'On 13 June, the rebels entered London and, joined by many local townsfolk, attacked the gaols, destroyed the Savoy Palace, set fire to law books and buildings in the Temple, and killed anyone associated with the royal government.'
p7542
aS'Epithets of the goddess include Pele-honua-mea ("Pele of the sacred land") and Ka wahine `ai honua ("The earth-eating woman"). Legends There are several traditional legends associated with Pele in Hawaiian mythology.'
p7543
aS'In addition to being recognized as the goddess of volcanoes, Pele is also known for her power, passion, jealousy, and capriciousness.She has numerous siblings, including Kane Milohai, Kamohoali`i, Namaka and numerous sisters named Hi`iaka, the most famous being Hi`iakaikapoliopele (Hi`iaka in the bosom of Pele).'
p7544
aS'They are usually considered to be the offspring of Haumea.'
p7545
aS"Pele's siblings include deities of various types of wind, rain, fire, ocean wave forms, and cloud forms."
p7546
aS"Her home is believed to be the fire pit called Halema`uma`u crater, at the summit caldera of Kilauea, one of the Earth's most active volcanoes; but her domain encompasses all volcanic activity on the Big Island of Hawai`i.Pele shares features similar to other malignant deities inhabitants of volcanoes, as in the case of the devil Guayota of Guanche Mythology in Canary Islands (Spain), living on the volcano Teide and was considered by the aboriginal Guanches as responsible for the eruptions of the volcano. Expulsion version In one version of the story, Pele is daughter of Kanehoalani and Haumea in the mystical land of Kuaihelani, a floating free land like Fata Morgana."
p7547
aS'Kuaihelani was in the region of Kahiki (Kukulu o Kahiki).'
p7548
aS"She stays so close to her mother's fireplace with the fire-keeper Lono-makua."
p7549
aS'At the sanctuary at Olympia, chthonic night-time libations were offered each time to "dark-faced" Pelops in his sacrificial pit (bothros) before they were offered in the following daylight to the sky-god Zeus (Burkert 1983:96). Genealogy Pelops was a son of Tantalus and either Dione, Euryanassa or Eurythemista.'
p7550
aS"Of Phrygian or Lydian birth, he departed his homeland for Greece, and won the crown of Pisa or Olympia from King Oenomaus in a chariot race then married Oenomaus's daughter, Hippodameia.Pelops and Hippodameia had at least sixteen children."
p7551
aS'Their sons include Pittheus, Troezen, Alcathous, Dimoetes, Pleisthenes, Atreus, Thyestes, Copreus, Hippalcimus, Sciron, Cleones and Letreus.'
p7552
aS"Four of their daughters married into the House of Perseus: Astydameia (who married Alcaeus), Nicippe (who married Sthenelus), Lysidice (who married Mestor) and Eurydice (who married Electryon).By the nymph Axioche (Axiokhe) or Danais Pelops was father of Chrysippus Tantalus' savage banquet Pelops' father was Tantalus, king at Mount Sipylus in Anatolia."
p7553
aS'Wanting to make an offering to the Olympians, Tantalus cut Pelops into pieces and made his flesh into a stew, then served it to the gods.'
p7554
aS'Demeter, deep in grief after the abduction of her daughter Persephone by Hades, absentmindedly accepted the offering and ate the left shoulder.'
p7555
aS"The other gods sensed the plot, however, and held off from eating of the boy's body."
p7556
aS"When released, the restoring force combined with the pendulum's mass causes it to oscillate about the equilibrium position, swinging back and forth."
p7557
aS'The time for one complete cycle, a left swing and a right swing, is called the period.'
p7558
aS"The period depends on the length of the pendulum, and also to a slight degree on the amplitude, the width of the pendulum's swing.From its examination in around 1602 by Galileo Galilei, the regular motion of pendulums was used for timekeeping, and was the world's most accurate timekeeping technology until the 1930s."
p7559
aS'Pendulums are used to regulate pendulum clocks, and are used in scientific instruments such as accelerometers and seismometers.'
p7560
aS'Historically they were used as gravimeters to measure the acceleration of gravity in geophysical surveys, and even as a standard of length.'
p7561
aS"The word 'pendulum' is new Latin, from the Latin pendulus, meaning 'hanging'.The simple gravity pendulum is an idealized mathematical model of a pendulum."
p7562
aS'This is a weight (or bob) on the end of a massless cord suspended from a pivot, without friction.'
p7563
aS'The Appalachian Mountains run through the middle of the state.Pennsylvania is the 33rd largest, the 6th most populous, and the 9th most densely populated of the 50 United_States.'
p7564
aS"The state's five most populous cities are Philadelphia (1,560,297), Pittsburgh (305,801), Allentown (118,577), Erie (100,671), and Reading (89,893)."
p7565
aS'The state capital is Harrisburg.'
p7566
aS'Pennsylvania has 51 miles (82 km) of coastline along Lake Erie and 57 miles (92 km) of shoreline along the Delaware Estuary.'
p7567
aS'The state is one of the 13 original founding states of the United_States. Geography Pennsylvania is 170 miles (274 km) north to south and 283 miles (455 km) east to west.'
p7568
aS'Of a total 46,055 square miles (119,282 km2), 44,817 square miles (116,075 km2) are land, 490 square miles (1,269 km2) are inland waters, and 749 square miles (1,940 km2) are waters in Lake Erie.'
p7569
aS'It is the 33rd largest state in the United_States.'
p7570
aS'Attached to the N-acetylmuramic acid is a peptide chain of three to five amino acids.'
p7571
aS'The peptide chain can be cross-linked to the peptide chain of another strand forming the 3D mesh-like layer.'
p7572
aS'Some Archaea have a similar layer of pseudopeptidoglycan or pseudomurein, where the sugar residues are b-(1,3) linked N-acetylglucosamine and N-acetyltalosaminuronic acid.'
p7573
aS'That is why the cell wall of Archaea is insensitive to lysozyme.'
p7574
aS'Peptidoglycan serves a structural role in the bacterial cell wall, giving structural strength, as well as counteracting the osmotic pressure of the cytoplasm.'
p7575
aS'A common misconception is that peptidoglycan gives the cell its shape; however, whereas peptidoglycan helps maintain the structural strength of the cell, it is actually the MreB protein that facilitates cell shape.'
p7576
aS'Peptidoglycan is also involved in binary fission during bacterial cell reproduction.The peptidoglycan layer is substantially thicker in Gram-positive bacteria (20 to 80 nanometers) than in Gram-negative bacteria (7 to 8 nanometers), with the attachment of the S-layer.'
p7577
aS'At the end, about seven hundred Pequots had been killed or taken into captivity.'
p7578
aS'Hundreds of prisoners were sold into slavery to the West Indies.'
p7579
aS'Other survivors were dispersed.'
p7580
aS'The result was the elimination of the Pequot as a viable polity in what is present-day Southern New England.It would take the Pequot more than three and a half centuries to regain political and economic power in their traditional homeland along the Pequot (present-day Thames) and Mystic rivers in what is now southeastern Connecticut. Etymology The name Pequot is a Mohegan term, the meaning of which is in dispute among Algonquian-language specialists.'
p7581
aS'Most recent sources in claiming that "Pequot" comes from Paquatauoq, (the destroyers), rely on the speculations of an early 20th-century authority on Algonquian languages, Frank Speck; an anthropologist and specialist of Pequot-Mohegan in the 1920s-1930s, he had doubts about this etymology.'
p7582
aS'He believed that another term, translated as relating to the "shallowness of a body of water", seemed more plausible. Origins The Pequot and their traditional enemies, the Mohegan, were at one time a single sociopolitical entity.'
p7583
aS'Anthropologists and historians contend that sometime before contact with the Puritan English, they split into the two competing groups.'
p7584
aS'Persephone was abducted by Hades, the god-king of the underworld.'
p7585
aS'The myth of her abduction represents her function as the personification of vegetation, which shoots forth in spring and withdraws into the earth after harvest; hence, she is also associated with spring as well as the fertility of vegetation.'
p7586
aS'Similar myths appear in the Orient, in the cults of male gods like Attis, Adonis and Osiris, and in Minoan Crete.Persephone as a vegetation goddess and her mother Demeter were the central figures of the Eleusinian mysteries that predated the Olympian pantheon and promised the initiated a more enjoyable prospect after death.'
p7587
aS'Persephone is further said to have become by Zeus the mother of Dionysus, Iacchus, or Zagreus, usually in orphic tradition.'
p7588
aS'The origins of her cult are uncertain, but it was based on very old agrarian cults of agricultural communities.Persephone was commonly worshipped along with Demeter and with the same mysteries.'
p7589
aS'To her alone were dedicated the mysteries celebrated at Athens in the month of Anthesterion.'
p7590
aS'In Classical Greek art, Persephone is invariably portrayed robed, often carrying a sheaf of grain.'
p7591
aS'Perseus beheaded the Gorgon Medusa and saved Andromeda from the sea monster Cetus.'
p7592
aS"Perseus was the son of the mortal Danae and the god Zeus. Etymology Because of the obscurity of the name Perseus and the legendary character of its bearer, most etymologists pass it by, on the presumption that it might be pre-Greek; however, the name of Perseus' native city was Greek and so were the names of his wife and relatives."
p7593
aS'There is some prospect that it descended into Greek from the Proto-Indo-European language.'
p7594
aS'In that regard Robert Graves has espoused the only Greek derivation available.'
p7595
aS'Perseus might be from the Greek verb, "perthein" (perthein), "to waste, ravage, sack, destroy", some form of which appears in Homeric epithets.'
p7596
aS'According to Carl Darling Buck (Comparative Grammar of Greek and Latin), the -eus suffix is typically used to form an agent noun, in this case from the aorist stem, pers-.'
p7597
aS'Pers-eus therefore is a sacker of cities; that is, a soldier by occupation, a fitting name for the first Mycenaean warrior.The origin of perth- is more obscure.'
p7598
aS'The Persian_language is classified as a continuation of Middle Persian, the official religious and literary language of Sassanid Persia, itself a continuation of Old Persian, the language of the Achaemenid Persian Empire.'
p7599
aS'Persian is a pluricentric language and its grammar is similar to that of many contemporary European languages.'
p7600
aS'Persian is so-called due to its origin from the capital of the Achaemenid empire, Persis (Fars or Pars) hence the name Persian (Farsi or Parsi).'
p7601
aS'A Persian-speaking person may be referred to as Persophone.There are approximately 110 million Persian speakers worldwide, with the language holding official status in Iran, Afghanistan, and Tajikistan.'
p7602
aS'For centuries, Persian has also been a prestigious cultural language in other regions of Western Asia, Central Asia, and South Asia by the various empires based in the regions.Persian has had a considerable (mainly lexical) influence on neighboring languages, particularly the Turkic languages in Central Asia, Caucasus, and Anatolia, neighboring Iranian languages, as well as Armenian, Georgian, and Indo-Aryan languages, especially Urdu.'
p7603
aS"It also exerted some influence on Arabic, particularly Bahrani Arabic, while borrowing much vocabulary from it after the Muslim conquest of Persia.With a long history of literature in the form of Middle Persian before Islam, Persian was the first language in Muslim civilization to break through Arabic's monopoly on writing, and the writing of poetry in Persian was established as a court tradition in many eastern courts."
p7604
aS'Some of the famous works of Persian literature are the Shahnameh (\'Book of Kings\') of Ferdowsi, works of Rumi, Rubaiyat_of_Omar_Khayyam, Divan (\'miscellany\') of Hafiz and the two miscellanea of prose and verse by Sa\'di of Shiraz, the Golestan (lit., \'flower garden\') and the Bustan (also meaning "garden;" lit., \'a place of fragrance\'). Classification Persian belongs to the Western branch of the Iranian family of Indo-European languages, which also includes Kurdish, Gilaki, Mazandarani, Talyshi, and Baluchi.'
p7605
aS'He published his first paper, a mathematically elegant solution of a problem involving eddy currents, in 1907.'
p7606
aS'At Aachen, he studied under the theoretical physicist Arnold Sommerfeld, who later claimed that his most important discovery was Peter_Debye.In 1906, Sommerfeld received an appointment at Munich, Bavaria, and took Debye with him as his assistant.'
p7607
aS'Debye got his Ph.D. with a dissertation on radiation pressure in 1908.'
p7608
aS'In 1910, he derived the Planck radiation formula using a method which Max Planck agreed was simpler than his own.In 1911, when Albert Einstein took an appointment as a professor at Prague, Bohemia, Debye took his old professorship at the University of Zurich, Switzerland.'
p7609
aS"This was followed by moves to Utrecht in 1912, to Gottingen in 1913, to ETH Zurich in 1920, to Leipzig in 1927, and in 1934 to Berlin, where, succeeding Einstein, he became director of the Kaiser Wilhelm Institute for Physics (now named the Max-Planck-Institut) whose facilities were built only during Debye's era."
p7610
aS'He was awarded the Lorentz Medal in 1935.'
p7611
aS'From 1937 to 1939 he was the president of the Deutsche Physikalische Gesellschaft. Family In 1913, Debye married Mathilde Alberer.'
p7612
aS"His father, a Calvinist, and mother fled Antwerp for Cologne in 1568, after increased religious turmoil and persecution of Protestants during the rule of the Spanish Netherlands by the Duke of Alba.Jan Rubens became the legal advisor (and lover) of Anna of Saxony, the second wife of William I of Orange, and settled at her court in Siegen in 1570, fathering her daughter Christine who was born in 1571.Following Jan Rubens' imprisonment for the affair, Peter_Paul_Rubens was born in 1577."
p7613
aS'The family returned to Cologne the next year.'
p7614
aS'In 1589, two years after his father\'s death, Rubens moved with his mother Maria Pypelincks to Antwerp, where he was raised as a Catholic.Religion figured prominently in much of his work and Rubens later became one of the leading voices of the Catholic Counter-Reformation style of painting (he had said "My passion comes from the heavens, not from earthly musings"). Apprenticeship In Antwerp, Rubens received a humanist education, studying Latin and classical literature.'
p7615
aS'By fourteen he began his artistic apprenticeship with Tobias Verhaeght.'
p7616
aS"Subsequently, he studied under two of the city's leading painters of the time, the late Mannerist artists Adam van Noort and Otto van Veen."
p7617
aS"Much of his earliest training involved copying earlier artists' works, such as woodcuts by Hans Holbein the Younger and Marcantonio Raimondi's engravings after Raphael."
p7618
aS'Rubens completed his education in 1598, at which time he entered the Guild of St. Luke as an independent master. Italy (1600-1608) In 1600 Rubens travelled to Italy.'
p7619
aS"Pyotr I; IPA: ['pjotr 'pjervij]) or Peter Alexeyevich (Russian: Piotr Alekseevich; IPA: ['pjotr aljI'ksjejIvjItc]; 9 June [O.S."
p7620
aS'30 May] 1672 - 8 February [O.S.'
p7621
aS'28 January] 1725) ruled the Tsardom of Russia and later the Russian Empire from 7 May (O.S.'
p7622
aS'27 April) 1682 until his death, jointly ruling before 1696 with his half-brother.'
p7623
aS'Through a number of successful wars he expanded the Tsardom into a much larger empire that became a major European power.'
p7624
aS'He led a cultural revolution that replaced some of the traditionalist and medieval social and political systems with ones that were modern, scientific, westernized, and based on The Enlightenment.'
p7625
aS"Peter's reforms made a lasting impact on Russia and many institutions of Russian government traced their origins to his reign. Title The imperial title of Peter_the_Great was the following: Life  Early years From an early age, Peter's education (commissioned by Tsar Alexis I) was put in the hands of several tutors, most notably Nikita Zotov, Patrick Gordon, and Paul Menesius."
p7626
aS'In response, the Manchester Patriotic Union, a group agitating for parliamentary reform, organised a demonstration to be addressed by the well-known radical orator Henry Hunt.Shortly after the meeting began local magistrates called on the military authorities to arrest Hunt and several others on the hustings with him, and to disperse the crowd.'
p7627
aS'Cavalry charged into the crowd with sabres drawn, and in the ensuing confusion, 15 people were killed and 400-700 were injured.'
p7628
aS'The massacre was given the name Peterloo in an ironic comparison to the Battle of Waterloo, which had taken place four years earlier.Historian Robert Poole has called the Peterloo_Massacre one of the defining moments of its age.'
p7629
aS"In its own time, the London and national papers shared the horror felt in the Manchester region, but Peterloo's immediate effect was to cause the government to crack down on reform, with the passing of what became known as the Six Acts."
p7630
aS'It also led directly to the foundation of The Manchester Guardian (now The Guardian), but had little other effect on the pace of reform.'
p7631
aS'In a survey conducted by The Guardian in 2006, Peterloo came second to the Putney Debates as the event from radical British history that most deserved a proper monument or a memorial.'
p7632
aS'Peterloo is commemorated by a plaque close to the site, a replacement for an earlier one that was criticised as being inadequate as it did not reflect the scale of the massacre. Background  Suffrage In 1819, Lancashire was represented by two Members of Parliament (MPs).'
p7633
aS'Petrarch is often called the "Father of Humanism".'
p7634
aS"In the 16th century, Pietro Bembo created the model for the modern Italian language based on Petrarch's works, as well as those of Giovanni Boccaccio, and, to a lesser extent, Dante Alighieri."
p7635
aS'Petrarch would be later endorsed as a model for Italian style by the Accademia della Crusca.'
p7636
aS"Petrarch's sonnets were admired and imitated throughout Europe during the Renaissance and became a model for lyrical poetry."
p7637
aS'He is also known for being the first to develop the concept of the "Dark Ages.'
p7638
aS'" Biography  Youth and early career Petrarch was born in the Tuscan city of Arezzo in 1304.'
p7639
aS'He was the son of Ser Petracco and his wife Eletta Canigiani.'
p7640
aS'Igor Stravinsky composed the music, and, with Alexandre Benois, fashioned the libretto.'
p7641
aS'Michel Fokine choreographed the ballet; Benois designed the sets and costumes.'
p7642
aS"Petrushka was first performed by Diaghilev's Ballets Russes in Paris on 13 June 1911."
p7643
aS'Nijinsky portrayed Petrushka with Tamara Karsavina as the Ballerina.'
p7644
aS'Alexandre Orlov portrayed the Moor, and Enrico Cecchetti the Charlatan.Petrushka tells the story of the loves and jealousies of three puppets.'
p7645
aS'The three are brought to life by the Charlatan during 1830 Shrovetide Fair (Maslenitsa) in St. Petersburg, Russia.'
p7646
aS'Petrushka loves the Ballerina, but she rejects him.'
p7647
aS'Solutions with a pH less than 7 are acidic and solutions with a pH greater than 7 are alkaline or basic.'
p7648
aS'Pure water has a pH of 7 and is neutral, being neither an acid nor a base.'
p7649
aS'Contrary to popular belief, the pH value can be less than 0 or greater than 14 for very strong acids and bases respectively.'
p7650
aS'However, these extremes are difficult to measure precisely.pH measurements are important in medicine, biology, chemistry, agriculture, forestry, food science, environmental science, oceanography, civil engineering, chemical engineering, nutrition, water treatment & water purification, and many other applications.The pH scale is traceable to a set of standard solutions whose pH is established by international agreement.'
p7651
aS'Primary pH standard values are determined using a concentration cell with transference, by measuring the potential difference between a hydrogen electrode and a standard electrode such as the silver chloride electrode.'
p7652
aS'The pH of aqueous solutions can be measured with a glass electrode and a pH meter, or indicator.pH is the negative of the logarithm to base 10 of the activity of the (solvated) hydronium ion, more often (albeit somewhat inaccurately) expressed as the measure of the hydronium ion concentration.Note: The rest of this article uses the technically correct word "base" and its inflections in place of "alkaline", which specifically refers to a base dissolved in water, and its inflections. History The concept of p[H] was first introduced by Danish chemist Soren Peder Lauritz Sorensen at the Carlsberg Laboratory in 1909 and revised to the modern pH in 1924 to accommodate definitions and measurements in terms of electrochemical cells.'
p7653
aS'In the first papers, the notation had the "H" as a subscript to the lowercase "p", as so: pH.The exact meaning of the "p" in "pH" is disputed, but according to the Carlsberg Foundation pH stands for "power of hydrogen".'
p7654
aS'Phagocytosis is involved in the acquisition of nutrients for some cells.'
p7655
aS"The process is homologous to eating at the level of single-celled organisms; in multicellular animals, the process has been adapted to eliminate debris and pathogens, as opposed to taking in fuel for cellular processes, except in the case of the animal Trichoplax.In an organism's immune system, phagocytosis is a major mechanism used to remove pathogens and cell debris."
p7656
aS'For example, when a macrophage ingests a pathogenic microorganism, the pathogen becomes trapped in a phagosome which then fuses with a lysosome to form a phagolysosome.'
p7657
aS'Within the phagolysosome, enzymes and toxic peroxides digest the pathogen.'
p7658
aS'Bacteria, dead tissue cells, and small mineral particles are all examples of objects that may be phagocytized. In immune system Phagocytosis in mammalian immune cells is activated by attachment to pathogen-associated molecular patterns (PAMPS), which leads to NF-kB activation.'
p7659
aS'Opsonins such as C3b and antibodies can act as attachment sites and aid phagocytosis of pathogens.Engulfment of material is facilitated by the actin-myosin contractile system.'
p7660
aS'The phagosome of ingested material is then fused with the lysosome, forming a phagolysosome and leading to degradation.Degradation can be oxygen-dependent or oxygen-independent.Oxygen-dependent degradation depends on NADPH and the production of reactive oxygen species.'
p7661
aS'For this application, it turns colorless in acidic solutions and pink in basic solutions.Phenolphthalein is slightly soluble in water and usually is dissolved in alcohols for use in experiments.'
p7662
aS'It is a weak acid, which can lose H+ ions in solution.'
p7663
aS'The phenolphthalein molecule is colorless, and the phenolphthalein ion is pink.'
p7664
aS'When a base is added to the phenolphthalein, the molecule  ions equilibrium shifts to the right, leading to more ionization as H+ ions are removed.'
p7665
aS"This is predicted by Le Chatelier's principle. SynthesisEdit Phenolphthalein is synthesized by condensation of phthalic anhydride with two equivalents of phenol under acidic conditions (hence the name)."
p7666
aS'It was discovered in 1871 by Adolf von Baeyer.The reaction can be catalyzed by a mixture of zinc chloride and thionyl chloride.'
p7667
aS'U.S. Patent 2,522,939"Preparation of phenolphthalein using cation exchange resins and aryl phosphites."'
p7668
aS'During his marriage to Queen Mary I (1554-58), he was also King of England and Ireland.'
p7669
aS'From 1555, he was lord of the Seventeen Provinces of the Netherlands.'
p7670
aS'Known in Spanish as "Philip the Prudent" (Felipe el Prudente), his empire included territories on every continent then known to Europeans, including his namesake the Philippine Islands.'
p7671
aS'During his reign, Spain reached the height of its influence and power.'
p7672
aS'This is sometimes called the Golden Age.'
p7673
aS'The expression, "the empire on which the sun never sets," was coined during Philip\'s time to reflect the extent of his dominion.During Philip\'s reign there were separate state bankruptcies in 1557, 1560, 1569, 1575, and 1596.'
p7674
aS'This was partly the cause for the declaration of independence which created the Dutch Republic in 1581.'
p7675
aS'His profile rose significantly in 1969 after the publication of the controversial Portnoy\'s_Complaint, the humorous and sexually explicit psychoanalytical monologue of "a lust-ridden, mother-addicted young Jewish bachelor," filled with "intimate, shameful detail, and coarse, abusive language.'
p7676
aS'"Roth is one of the most awarded U.S. writers of his generation: his books have twice received the National Book Award, twice the National Book Critics Circle award, and three times the PEN/Faulkner Award.'
p7677
aS"He received a Pulitzer Prize for his 1997 novel, American Pastoral, which featured one of his best-known characters, Nathan Zuckerman, the subject of many other of Roth's novels."
p7678
aS"The Human Stain (2000), another Zuckerman novel, was awarded the United Kingdom's WH Smith Literary Award for the best book of the year."
p7679
aS'In 2001, Roth received the inaugural Franz_Kafka Prize. Personal life Philip_Roth was born in Newark, New Jersey, and grew up in its Weequahic neighborhood.'
p7680
aS'He is the second child of Bess (nee Finkel) and Herman Roth, an insurance broker.'
p7681
aS'His family was Jewish, and his parents were first-generation Americans, whose families were from Galicia.'
p7682
aS'In 1968, Milton Friedman asserted that the Phillips Curve was only applicable in the short-run and that in the long-run, inflationary policies will not decrease unemployment.'
p7683
aS'Friedman then correctly predicted that, in the upcoming years after 1968, both inflation and unemployment would increase.'
p7684
aS'The long-run Phillips Curve is now seen as a vertical line at the natural rate of unemployment, where the rate of inflation has no effect on unemployment.'
p7685
aS'Accordingly, the Phillips_curve is now seen as too simplistic, with the unemployment rate supplanted by more accurate predictors of inflation based on velocity of money supply measures such as the MZM ("money zero maturity") velocity, which is affected by unemployment in the short but not the long term. History William Phillips, a New Zealand born economist, wrote a paper in 1958 titled The Relation between Unemployment and the Rate of Change of Money Wage Rates in the United Kingdom, 1861-1957, which was published in the quarterly journal Economica.'
p7686
aS'In the paper Phillips describes how he observed an inverse relationship between money wage changes and unemployment in the British economy over the period examined.'
p7687
aS"Similar patterns were found in other countries and in 1960 Paul Samuelson and Robert Solow took Phillips' work and made explicit the link between inflation and unemployment: when inflation was high, unemployment was low, and vice versa.In the 1920s an American economist Irving Fisher noted this kind of Phillips_curve relationship."
p7688
aS"However, Phillips' original curve described the behavior of money wages.In the years following Phillips' 1958 paper, many economists in the advanced industrial countries believed that his results showed that there was a permanently stable relationship between inflation and unemployment."
p7689
aS'She was purchased by the Wheatley family of Boston, who taught her to read and write, and encouraged her poetry when they saw her talent.The publication of her Poems on Various Subjects, Religious and Moral (1773) brought her fame both in England and the American colonies; figures such as George_Washington praised her work.'
p7690
aS"During Wheatley's visit to England with her master's son, the African-American poet Jupiter Hammon praised her work in his own poem."
p7691
aS'Wheatley was emancipated after the death of her master John Wheatley.'
p7692
aS'She married soon after.'
p7693
aS'Two of her children died as infants.'
p7694
aS'After her husband was imprisoned for debt in 1784, Wheatley fell into poverty and died of illness, quickly followed by the death of her surviving infant son. Early life Although the date and place of her birth are not documented, scholars believe that Phillis_Wheatley was born in 1753 in West Africa, most likely in present-day Gambia or Senegal.'
p7695
aS'Wheatley was brought to British-ruled Boston, Massachusetts on July 11, 1761, on a slave ship called The Phillis.'
p7696
aS'The study of phonons is an important part of condensed matter physics.The concept of phonons was introduced in 1932 by Soviet physicist Igor Tamm.'
p7697
aS'The name phonon comes from the Greek word phone (phone), which translates to sound or voice because long-wavelength phonons give rise to sound.'
p7698
aS'Shorter-wavelength higher-frequency phonons give rise to heat. Definition A phonon is a quantum mechanical description of an elementary vibrational motion in which a lattice of atoms or molecules uniformly oscillates at a single frequency.'
p7699
aS'In classical mechanics this is designated a normal mode.'
p7700
aS'Normal modes are important because any arbitrary lattice vibration can be considered to be a superposition of these elementary vibrations (cf.'
p7701
aS'Fourier analysis).'
p7702
aS'While normal modes are wave-like phenomena in classical mechanics, phonons have particle-like properties too, in a way related to the wave-particle duality of quantum mechanics. Lattice dynamics The equations in this section either do not use axioms of quantum mechanics or use relations for which there exists a direct correspondence in classical mechanics.For example, a rigid regular, crystalline, i.e.'
p7703
aS'Instead phosphorus-containing minerals are almost always present in their maximally oxidised state, as inorganic phosphate rocks.The first form of elemental phosphorus to be produced (white phosphorus, in 1669) emits a faint glow upon exposure to oxygen - hence its name given from Greek mythology, Phosphoros meaning "light-bearer" (Latin Lucifer), referring to the "Morning Star", the planet Venus (or Mercury).'
p7704
aS'The term "phosphorescence", meaning glow after illumination, originally derives from this property of phosphorus, although this word has since been used for a different physical process that produces a glow.'
p7705
aS'The glow of phosphorus itself originates from oxidation of the white (but not red) phosphorus-- a process now termed chemiluminescence.'
p7706
aS'Together with nitrogen, arsenic, and antimony, phosphorus is classified as a pnictogen.Phosphorus is essential for life.'
p7707
aS'Phosphates (compounds containing the phosphate ion, PO4-3) are a component of DNA, RNA, ATP, and also the phospholipids, which form all cell membranes.'
p7708
aS'Demonstrating the link between phosphorus and life, elemental phosphorus was first isolated from human urine, and bone ash was an important early phosphate source.'
p7709
aS'Phosphate minerals are fossils.'
p7710
aS'The phenomenon is commonly studied in electronic physics, as well as in fields of chemistry, such as quantum chemistry or electrochemistry.According to classical electromagnetic theory, this effect can be attributed to the transfer of energy from the light to an electron in the metal.'
p7711
aS'From this perspective, an alteration in either the amplitude or wavelength of light would induce changes in the rate of emission of electrons from the metal.'
p7712
aS'Furthermore, according to this theory, a sufficiently dim light would be expected to show a lag time between the initial shining of its light and the subsequent emission of an electron.'
p7713
aS'However, the experimental results did not correlate with either of the two predictions made by this theory.Instead, as it turns out, electrons are only dislodged by the photoelectric effect if light reaches or exceeds a threshold frequency, below which no electrons can be emitted from the metal regardless of the amplitude and temporal length of exposure of light.'
p7714
aS'To make sense of the fact that light can eject electrons even if its intensity is low, Albert Einstein proposed that a beam of light is not a wave propagating through space, but rather a collection of discrete wave packets (photons), each with energy hf.'
p7715
aS"This shed light on Max Planck's previous discovery of the Planck relation (E  hf) linking energy (E) and frequency (f) as arising from quantization of energy."
p7716
aS'The factor h is known as the Planck constant.In 1887, Heinrich Hertz discovered that electrodes illuminated with ultraviolet light create electric sparks more easily.'
p7717
aS"Although the piano is not portable and often expensive, its versatility and ubiquity have made it one of the world's most familiar musical instruments.An acoustic piano usually has a protective wooden case surrounding the soundboard and metal strings, and a row of 88 black and white keys (52 white, 36 black)."
p7718
aS'The strings are sounded when the keys are pressed, and silenced when the keys are released.'
p7719
aS"The note can be sustained, even when the keys are released, by the use of pedals.Pressing a key on the piano's keyboard causes a padded (often with felt) hammer to strike strings."
p7720
aS'The hammer rebounds, and the strings continue to vibrate at their resonant frequency.'
p7721
aS'These vibrations are transmitted through a bridge to a soundboard that amplifies by more efficiently coupling the acoustic energy to the air.'
p7722
aS"When the key is released, a damper stops the strings' vibration, ending the sound."
p7723
aS'Although an acoustic piano has strings, it is usually classified as a percussion instrument because the strings are struck rather than plucked (as with a harpsichord or spinet); in the Hornbostel-Sachs system of instrument classification, pianos are considered chordophones.'
p7724
aS'Building upon the theories of Martin_Heidegger, Ludwig_Wittgenstein, Maurice Merleau-Ponty, Edmund_Husserl, Georges Canguilhem, Karl_Marx, Gaston Bachelard, Max_Weber, Emile_Durkheim, Claude Levi-Strauss, Erwin Panofsky, and Marcel_Mauss (among others), his research pioneered novel investigative frameworks and methods, and introduced such influential concepts as cultural, social, and symbolic forms of capital (as opposed to traditional economic forms of capital), the cultural reproduction, the habitus, the field or location, and symbolic violence.'
p7725
aS'Another notable influence on Bourdieu was Blaise Pascal, after whom Bourdieu titled his Pascalian Meditations.'
p7726
aS"Bourdieu's major contributions to the sociology of education, the theory of sociology, and sociology of aesthetics have achieved wide influence in several related academic fields (e.g."
p7727
aS"anthropology, media and cultural studies, education), popular culture, and the arts.Bourdieu's best known book is Distinction: A Social Critique of the Judgment of Taste (1979)."
p7728
aS'The book was judged the sixth most important sociological work of the twentieth century by the International Sociological Association.'
p7729
aS'In it, Bourdieu argues that judgments of taste are related to social position, or more precisely, are themselves acts of social positioning.'
p7730
aS'His argument is put forward by an original combination of social theory and data from quantitative surveys, photographs and interviews, in an attempt to reconcile difficulties such as how to understand the subject within objective structures.'
p7731
aS'His younger brother, Thomas Corneille, also became a noted playwright.'
p7732
aS'He was given a rigorous Jesuit education at the then named College de Bourbon  where acting on the stage was part of the training.'
p7733
aS'(The college has been known as the Lycee Pierre-Corneille since 1873).'
p7734
aS'At 18 he began to study law but his practical legal endeavors were largely unsuccessful.'
p7735
aS"Corneille's father secured two magisterial posts for him with the Rouen department of Forests and Rivers."
p7736
aS'During his time with the department, he wrote his first play.'
p7737
aS'It is unknown exactly when he wrote it, but the play, the comedy Melite, surfaced when Corneille brought it to a group of traveling actors in 1629.'
p7738
aS'"He was the father of actor Pierre Renoir (1885-1952), filmmaker Jean Renoir (1894-1979) and ceramic artist Claude Renoir (1901-69).'
p7739
aS'He was the grandfather of the filmmaker Claude Renoir (1913-1993), son of Pierre. Youth Pierre-Auguste_Renoir was born in Limoges, Haute-Vienne, France, the child of a working-class family.'
p7740
aS'As a boy, he worked in a porcelain factory where his drawing talents led to his being chosen to paint designs on fine china.'
p7741
aS'Before he enrolled in art school, he also painted hangings for overseas missionaries and decorations on fans.'
p7742
aS'During those early years, he often visited the Louvre to study the French master painters.In 1862, he began studying art under Charles Gleyre in Paris.'
p7743
aS'There he met Alfred Sisley, Frederic Bazille, and Claude Monet.'
p7744
aS'At times, during the 1860s, he did not have enough money to buy paint.'
p7745
aS"Piers is considered by many critics to be one of the greatest works of English literature of the Middle Ages, along with Chaucer's Canterbury Tales and the Pearl poet's Sir Gawain and the Green Knight. Summary The poem--part theological allegory, part social satire--concerns the narrator's intense quest for the true Christian life, from the perspective of medieval Catholicism."
p7746
aS'This quest entails a series of dream-visions and an examination into the lives of three allegorical characters, Dowel ("Do-Well"), Dobet ("Do-Better"), and Dobest ("Do-Best").'
p7747
aS"The following summary is based on the B-version of the poem--the most widely edited and translated.The poem is divided into passus ('steps'). Vision 1 Prologue: The poem begins in the Malvern Hills between Worcestershire and Herefordshire."
p7748
aS'A man named Will (which can be understood simply as a personal name or as an allegory for a person\'s will, in the sense of \'desire, intention\') falls asleep and has a vision of a tower set upon a hill and a fortress (donjon) in a deep valley; between these symbols of heaven and hell is a "fair field full of folk", representing the world of mankind.'
p7749
aS"A satirical account of different sections of society follows, along with a dream-like fable representing the King as a cat and his people as rodents.Passus 1: Holy Church visits Will and explains the tower of Truth, and discusses Truth more generally.Passus 2: Will sees Lady Mede ('payment') and finds out about her planned marriage to False.Passus 3: Lady Mede travels to the royal court; the King proposes she marry Conscience; but Conscience denounces her.Passus 4: Conscience and Reason convince the King not to marry Mede to False."
p7750
aS'Will wakes up. Vision 2 Passus 5: Will falls back to sleep.'
p7751
aS'Reason gives a sermon to the Field of Folk and the people decide to repent.'
p7752
aS"This consisted of white ground, upon which he painted a grid of vertical and horizontal black lines and the three primary colors.Mondrian's arrival in Paris from Holland in 1911 marked the beginning of a period of profound change."
p7753
aS"He encountered experiments in Cubism and with the intent of integrating himself within the Parisian avant-garde removed an 'a' from the Dutch spelling of his name (Mondriaan). The Netherlands (1872-1911) Mondrian was born in Amersfoort in the Netherlands, the second of his parents' children."
p7754
aS'He was descended from Christian Dirkzoon Monderyan who lived in The Hague as early as 1670.'
p7755
aS'The family moved to Winterswijk in the east of the country when his father, Pieter Cornelius Mondriaan, was appointed Head Teacher at a local primary school.'
p7756
aS'Mondrian was introduced to art from a very early age.'
p7757
aS'His father was a qualified drawing teacher, and, with his uncle, Fritz Mondriaan (a pupil of Willem Maris of the Hague School of artists), the younger Piet often painted and drew along the river Gein.After a strictly Protestant upbringing, in 1892, Mondrian entered the Academy for Fine Art in Amsterdam.'
p7758
aS'He already was qualified as a teacher.'
p7759
aS'From 1559, he dropped the "h" from his name and signed his paintings as Bruegel. Life Bruegel\'s place of birth is unclear.'
p7760
aS'Lampsone calls him Pietro Brueghel di Breda (1564/5), which is soon adopted by Guicciardini (1567) and Vasari (1568).'
p7761
aS'If Brueghel is a patronym, only Breda indicates a place of birth: Breda (then Brabant) or Bree (then Liege).'
p7762
aS'According to van Mander on the contrary, Brueghel is a toponymic surname, suggesting the interpretation "from Bruegel in the Breda area".'
p7763
aS'He situates these places in Brabant, yet given ambiguities he may have been mistaken, as Bree lays just 4 mi.'
p7764
aS'east of the village that then was called Bruegel, now Grote-Brogel.He was an apprentice of Pieter Coecke van Aelst, whose daughter Mayken he later married.'
p7765
aS"He spent some time in France and Italy, and then went to Antwerp, where in 1551 he was accepted as a master in the painter's guild."
p7766
aS'Although sometimes used to refer to other risings in northern England at the time, including the Lincolnshire rising which occurred twelve days before the Pilgrimage_of_Grace, this term technically refers only to the uprising in Yorkshire.'
p7767
aS'The traditional historical view portrays it as "a spontaneous mass protest of the conservative elements in the North of England angry with the religious upheavals instigated by King Henry VIII."'
p7768
aS'Historians have also studied the economic grievances involved, while giving priority to religious issues. Lincolnshire Rising The Lincolnshire Rising was a brief dissent by Roman Catholics against the establishment of the Church of England by Henry VIII and the dissolution of the monasteries set in motion by Thomas Cromwell.'
p7769
aS"He planned to assert the nation's religious autonomy and the king's supremacy over religious matters."
p7770
aS'The dissolution of the monasteries resulted in much property being transferred to the Crown.The rising began on 2 October 1536 at St. James Church in Louth, after evensong, shortly after the closure of Louth Park Abbey.'
p7771
aS'The stated aim of the uprising was to protest the suppression of Catholic religious houses, not the rule of Henry VIII himself.'
p7772
aS'It quickly gained support in Horncastle, Market Rasen, Caistor and other nearby towns.'
p7773
aS'Pions are the lightest mesons (and, more generally, the lightest hadrons), because they are composed of the lightest quarks (the u and d quarks).'
p7774
aS'They are unstable, with the charged pions p+ and p- decaying with a mean lifetime of 26 nanoseconds (69922600000000000002.6x10-8 seconds), and the neutral pion p0 decaying with a much shorter lifetime of 69838400000000000008.4x10-17 seconds.'
p7775
aS'Charged pions most often decay into muons and muon neutrinos, and neutral pions into gamma rays.The exchange of virtual pions, along with the vector, rho and omega mesons, provides an explanation for the residual strong force between nucleons.'
p7776
aS'Pions are not produced in radioactive decay, but are produced commonly in high energy accelerators in collisions between hadrons.'
p7777
aS"All types of pions are also produced in natural processes when high energy cosmic ray protons and other hadronic cosmic ray components interact with matter in the Earth's atmosphere."
p7778
aS'Recently, detection of characteristic gamma rays originating from decay of neutral pions in two supernova remnant stars has shown that pions are produced copiously in supernovas, most probably in conjunction with production of high energy protons that are detected on Earth as cosmic rays.The concept of mesons as the carrier particles of the nuclear force was first proposed in 1935 by Hideki Yukawa.'
p7779
aS'While the muon was first proposed to be this particle after its discovery in 1936, later work found that it did not participate in the strong nuclear interaction.'
p7780
aS'It does not normally include crimes committed against people traveling on the same vessel as the perpetrator (e.g.'
p7781
aS'one passenger stealing from others on the same vessel).'
p7782
aS'The term has been used throughout history to refer to raids across land borders by non-state agents.Piracy or pirating is the name of a specific crime under customary international law and also the name of a number of crimes under the municipal law of a number of states.'
p7783
aS'It is distinguished from privateering, which is authorized by national authorities and therefore a legitimate form of war-like activity by non-state actors.'
p7784
aS'Privateering is considered commerce raiding, and was outlawed by the Peace of Westphalia (1648) for signatories to those treaties.Those who engage in acts of piracy are called pirates.In the 21st century, the international community is facing many problems in bringing pirates to justice. Etymology The English "pirate" is derived from the Latin term pirata and that from Greek peirates (peirates), "brigand", in turn from peiraomai (peiraomai), "I attempt", from peira (peira), "attempt, experience".'
p7785
aS'The word is also cognate to peril.Also, particularly in the 1600s and 1700s, spelling was haphazard due to variations by printers, and words such as "Pyrate" or "an act of Pyracy" are examples of some of the accepted ways of spelling in past years. History by region It may be reasonable to assume that piracy has existed for as long as the oceans were plied for commerce.'
p7786
aS'The following will examine the history of piracy in a few central regions. Europe and Mediterranean  Antiquity The earliest documented instances of piracy are the exploits of the Sea Peoples who threatened the Aegean and Mediterranean in the 14th century BC.'
p7787
aS'The hypophysis rests upon the hypophysial fossa of the sphenoid bone in the center of the middle cranial fossa and is surrounded by a small bony cavity (sella turcica) covered by a dural fold (diaphragma sellae).'
p7788
aS'The anterior pituitary (or adenohypophysis) is a lobe of the gland that regulates several physiological processes (including stress, growth, reproduction, and lactation).'
p7789
aS'The intermediate lobe synthesizes and secretes melanocyte-stimulating hormone.'
p7790
aS'The posterior pituitary (or neurohypophysis) is a lobe of the gland that is functionally connected to the hypothalamus by the median eminence via a small tube called the pituitary stalk (also called the infundibular stalk or the infundibulum).Hormones secreted from the pituitary gland help control: growth, blood pressure, certain functions of the sex organs, thyroid glands and metabolism as well as some aspects of pregnancy, childbirth, nursing, water/salt concentration and the kidneys, temperature regulation and pain relief. StructureEdit The pituitary gland is a pea-sized gland that sits in a protective bony enclosure called the sella turcica.'
p7791
aS'It is composed of three lobes: anterior, intermediate, and posterior.'
p7792
aS'In many animals, these three lobes are distinct.'
p7793
aS'However, in humans, the intermediate lobe is but a few cell layers thick and indistinct; as a result, it is often considered part of the anterior pituitary.'
p7794
aS'This decreases or increases the number of electrons, creating positive or negative charged particles called ions, and is accompanied by the dissociation of molecular bonds, if present.The presence of a significant number of charge carriers makes plasma electrically conductive so that it responds strongly to electromagnetic fields.'
p7795
aS'Like gas, plasma does not have a definite shape or a definite volume unless enclosed in a container.'
p7796
aS'Unlike gas, under the influence of a magnetic field, it may form structures such as filaments, beams and double layers.Plasma is the most abundant form of ordinary matter in the Universe, most of which is in the rarefied intergalactic regions, particularly the intracluster medium, and in stars, including the Sun.'
p7797
aS'A common form of plasmas on Earth is seen in neon signs.Much of the understanding of plasmas has come from the pursuit of controlled nuclear fusion and fusion power, for which plasma physics provides the scientific basis. Properties and parametersEdit  DefinitionEdit Plasma is loosely described as an electrically neutral medium of unbound positive and negative particles (i.e.'
p7798
aS'the overall charge of a plasma is roughly zero).'
p7799
aS"It is important to note that although they are unbound, these particles are not 'free' in the sense of not experiencing forces."
p7800
aS"When the charges move, they generate electric currents with magnetic fields, and as a result, they are affected by each other's fields."
p7801
aS'In nature, plasmids often carry genes that may benefit the survival of the organism, for example antibiotic resistance.'
p7802
aS'While the chromosomes are big and contain all the essential information for living (an adequate analogy is the hard-drive of a computer), plasmids usually are very small and contain additional information (in this analogy, plasmids are the USB flash drives).'
p7803
aS'Artificial plasmids are widely used as vectors in molecular cloning, serving to drive the replication of recombinant DNA sequences within host organisms.Plasmids are considered replicons, a unit of DNA capable of replicating autonomously within a suitable host.'
p7804
aS'However, plasmids, like viruses, are not generally classified as life.'
p7805
aS'Plasmids can be transmitted from one bacterium to another (even of another species) via three main mechanisms: transformation, transduction, and conjugation.'
p7806
aS'This host-to-host transfer of genetic material is called horizontal gene transfer, and plasmids can be considered part of the mobilome.'
p7807
aS'Unlike viruses (which encase their genetic material in a protective protein coat called a capsid), plasmids are "naked" DNA and do not encode genes necessary to encase the genetic material for transfer to a new host.'
p7808
aS'Along with his teacher Socrates and his most famous student, Aristotle, Plato laid the foundations of Western philosophy and science.'
p7809
aS'Alfred North Whitehead once noted: "the safest general characterization of the European philosophical tradition is that it consists of a series of footnotes to Plato.'
p7810
aS'"Plato\'s dialogues have been used to teach a range of subjects, including philosophy, logic, ethics, rhetoric, religion and mathematics.'
p7811
aS'His lasting themes include Platonic love, the theory of forms, the five regimes, and innate knowledge, among others.'
p7812
aS'His theory of forms launched a unique perspective on abstract objects, and led to a school of thought called Platonism.'
p7813
aS"Plato's writings have been published in several fashions; this has led to several conventions regarding the naming and referencing of Plato's texts. Biography  Early life Little can be known about Plato's early life and education, due to very few accounts."
p7814
aS'The philosopher came from one of the wealthiest and most politically active families in Athens.'
p7815
aS'He wrote Palliata comoedia, the genre devised by the innovator of Latin literature, Livius Andronicus.'
p7816
aS"The word Plautine /'plo:taIn/ refers to both Plautus's own works and works similar to or influenced by his. Biography Not much is known about Titus Maccius Plautus' early life."
p7817
aS'It is believed that he was born in Sarsina, a small town in Emilia Romagna in northern Italy, in around 254 BC.'
p7818
aS'According to Morris Marples, Plautus worked as a stage-carpenter or scene-shifter in his early years.'
p7819
aS'It is from this work, perhaps, that his love of the theater originated.'
p7820
aS'His acting talent was eventually discovered; and he adopted the names "Maccius" (a clownish stock-character in popular farces) and "Plautus" (a term meaning either "flat-footed" or "flat-eared," like the ears of a hound).'
p7821
aS'Tradition holds that he made enough money to go into the nautical business, but that the venture collapsed.'
p7822
aS'It is the largest and second-most-massive known dwarf planet in the Solar System and the ninth-largest and tenth-most-massive known object directly orbiting the Sun.'
p7823
aS'It is the largest known trans-Neptunian object by volume but is less massive than Eris, a dwarf planet in the scattered disc.'
p7824
aS'Like other Kuiper_belt objects, Pluto is primarily made of ice and rock and is relatively small--about one-sixth the mass of the Moon and one-third its volume.'
p7825
aS'It has a moderately eccentric and inclined orbit during which it ranges from 30 to 49 astronomical units (4.4-7.3 billion km) from the Sun.'
p7826
aS'This means that Pluto periodically comes closer to the Sun than Neptune, but a stable orbital resonance with Neptune prevents them from colliding.'
p7827
aS'In 2014, Pluto was 32.6 AU from the Sun.'
p7828
aS'Light from the Sun takes about 5.5 hours to reach Pluto at its average distance (39.4 AU).Pluto was discovered in 1930 by Clyde Tombaugh, and was originally considered the ninth planet from the Sun.'
p7829
aS'As such, he became the leader of Cambodia on 17 April 1975, when his forces captured Phnom Penh.'
p7830
aS'From 1976 to 1979, he also served as the prime minister of Democratic Kampuchea.He presided over a totalitarian dictatorship, in which his government made urban dwellers move to the countryside to work in collective farms and on forced labour projects.'
p7831
aS'The combined effects of executions, strenuous working conditions, malnutrition and poor medical care caused the deaths of approximately 25 percent of the Cambodian population.'
p7832
aS'In all, an estimated 1 to 3 million people (out of a population of slightly over 8 million) died due to the policies of his four-year premiership.In 1979, after the Cambodian-Vietnamese War, Pol_Pot relocated to the jungles of southwest Cambodia, and the Khmer Rouge government collapsed.'
p7833
aS'From 1979 to 1997, he and a remnant of the old Khmer Rouge operated near the border of Cambodia and Thailand, where they clung to power, with nominal United Nations recognition as the rightful government of Cambodia.'
p7834
aS'Pol_Pot died in 1998, while under house arrest by the Ta Mok faction of the Khmer Rouge.'
p7835
aS'Since his death, rumours that he committed suicide or was poisoned have persisted. Biography  Early life Saloth Sar was born on 19 May 1925, the eighth of nine children and the second of three sons to Pen Saloth and Sok Nem.'
p7836
aS'With a population of over 38.5 million people, Poland is the 34th most populous country in the world, the sixth most populous member of the European Union, and the most populous post-communist member of the European Union.'
p7837
aS'Poland is a unitary state divided into 16 administrative subdivisions.The establishment of a Polish state can be traced back to 966, when Mieszko I, ruler of a territory roughly coextensive with that of present-day Poland, converted to Christianity.'
p7838
aS'The Kingdom of Poland was founded in 1025, and in 1569 it cemented a longstanding political association with the Grand Duchy of Lithuania by signing the Union of Lublin.'
p7839
aS'This union formed the Polish-Lithuanian Commonwealth, one of the largest and most populous countries of 16th and 17th-century Europe.'
p7840
aS'The Commonwealth ceased to exist in the years 1772-1795, when its territory was partitioned among Prussia, the Russian Empire, and Austria.'
p7841
aS'Poland regained its independence (as the Second Polish Republic) at the end of World_War_I, in 1918.In September 1939 World_War_II started with the invasions of Poland by Nazi Germany and the Soviet Union (as part of the Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact).'
p7842
aS'More than six million Polish citizens died in the war.'
p7843
aS'Sound waves in a gas or liquid do not exhibit polarization, since the oscillation is always in the direction the wave travels.In an electromagnetic wave, both the electric field and magnetic field are oscillating but in different directions; by convention the "polarization" of light refers to the polarization of the electric field.'
p7844
aS"Light which can be approximated as a plane wave in free space or in an isotropic medium propagates as a transverse wave--both the electric and magnetic fields are perpendicular to the wave's direction of travel."
p7845
aS'The oscillation of these fields may be in a single direction (linear polarization), or the field may rotate at the optical frequency (circular or elliptical polarization).'
p7846
aS"In that case the direction of the fields' rotation, and thus the specified polarization, may be either clockwise or counter clockwise; this is referred to as the wave's chirality or handedness.The most common optical materials (such as glass) are isotropic and simply preserve the polarization of a wave but do not differentiate between polarization states."
p7847
aS"However there are important classes of materials classified as birefringent or optically active in which this is not the case and a wave's polarization will generally be modified or will affect propagation through it."
p7848
aS'A polarizer is an optical filter that transmits only one polarization.Polarization is an important parameter in areas of science dealing with transverse wave propagation, such as optics, seismology, radio, and microwaves.'
p7849
aS'Especially impacted are technologies such as lasers, wireless and optical fiber telecommunications, and radar. Introduction  Wave propagation and polarization Most sources of light are classified as incoherent and unpolarized (or only "partially polarized") because they consist of a random mixture of waves having different spatial characteristics, frequencies (wavelengths), phases, and polarization states.'
p7850
aS'In 1993, Mullis was awarded the Nobel Prize in Chemistry along with Michael Smith for his work on PCR.The method relies on thermal cycling, consisting of cycles of repeated heating and cooling of the reaction for DNA melting and enzymatic replication of the DNA.'
p7851
aS'Primers (short DNA fragments) containing sequences complementary to the target region along with a DNA polymerase, which the method is named after, are key components to enable selective and repeated amplification.'
p7852
aS'As PCR progresses, the DNA generated is itself used as a template for replication, setting in motion a chain reaction in which the DNA template is exponentially amplified.'
p7853
aS'PCR can be extensively modified to perform a wide array of genetic manipulations.Almost all PCR applications employ a heat-stable DNA polymerase, such as Taq polymerase (an enzyme originally isolated from the bacterium Thermus aquaticus).'
p7854
aS'This DNA polymerase enzymatically assembles a new DNA strand from DNA building-blocks, the nucleotides, by using single-stranded DNA as a template and DNA oligonucleotides (also called DNA primers), which are required for initiation of DNA synthesis.'
p7855
aS'The vast majority of PCR methods use thermal cycling, i.e., alternately heating and cooling the PCR sample through a defined series of temperature steps.In the first step, the two strands of the DNA double helix are physically separated at a high temperature in a process called DNA melting.'
p7856
aS'In the second step, the temperature is lowered and the two DNA strands become templates for DNA polymerase to selectively amplify the target DNA.'
p7857
aS'For example, they are used to form polynomial equations, which encode a wide range of problems, from elementary word problems to complicated problems in the sciences; they are used to define polynomial functions, which appear in settings ranging from basic chemistry and physics to economics and social science; they are used in calculus and numerical analysis to approximate other functions.'
p7858
aS'In advanced mathematics, polynomials are used to construct polynomial rings and algebraic varieties, central concepts in algebra and algebraic geometry. Etymology According to the Oxford English Dictionary, polynomial succeeded the term binomial, and was made simply by replacing the Latin root bi- with the Greek poly-, which comes from the Greek word for many.'
p7859
aS'The word polynomial was first used in the 17th century. Notation and terminology The x occurring in a polynomial is commonly called either a variable or an indeterminate.'
p7860
aS'When the polynomial is considered for itself, x is a fixed symbol which does not have any value (its value is "indeterminate").'
p7861
aS'It is thus more correct to call it an "indeterminate".'
p7862
aS'However, when one considers the function defined by the polynomial, then x represents the argument of the function, and is therefore called a "variable".'
p7863
aS'Many authors use these two words indifferently, but this may be sometimes confusing and is not done in this article.It is a common convention to use uppercase letters for the indeterminates and the corresponding lowercase letters for the variables (arguments) of the associated function.It may be confusing that a polynomial P in the indeterminate X may appear in the formulas either as P or as P(X).Normally, the name of the polynomial is P, not P(X).'
p7864
aS"Pompey's immense success as a general while still very young enabled him to advance directly to his first consulship without meeting the normal requirements for office."
p7865
aS'Military success in Sulla\'s Second Civil War led him to adopt the nickname Magnus, "the Great".'
p7866
aS"He was consul three times and celebrated three triumphs.In the mid-60 BC, Pompey joined Marcus_Licinius_Crassus and Gaius Julius Caesar in the unofficial military-political alliance known as the First Triumvirate, which Pompey's marriage to Caesar's daughter Julia helped secure."
p7867
aS'After the deaths of Julia and Crassus, Pompey sided with the optimates, the conservative faction of the Roman Senate.'
p7868
aS'Pompey and Caesar then contended for the leadership of the Roman state, leading to a civil war.'
p7869
aS'When Pompey was defeated at the Battle of Pharsalus, he sought refuge in Egypt, where he was assassinated.'
p7870
aS"His career and defeat are significant in Rome's subsequent transformation from Republic to Principate and Empire. Early life and political debut Pompey's father, Gnaeus Pompeius Strabo, was a wealthy landed Italian provincial from Picenum, one of the homines novi (new men)."
p7871
aS"Pontiac's importance in the war that bears his name has been debated."
p7872
aS'Nineteenth-century accounts portrayed him as the mastermind and leader of the revolt, but some subsequent scholars argued that his role had been exaggerated.'
p7873
aS'Historians today generally view him as an important local leader who influenced a wider movement that he did not command.The war began in May 1763 when Pontiac and 300 followers attempted to take Fort Detroit by surprise.'
p7874
aS'His plan foiled, Pontiac laid siege to the fort, where he was eventually joined by more than 900 warriors from a half-dozen tribes.'
p7875
aS"Meanwhile, messengers spread the word of Pontiac's actions, and the war expanded far beyond Detroit."
p7876
aS'In July 1763, Pontiac defeated a British detachment at the Battle of Bloody Run, but he was unable to capture the fort.'
p7877
aS"In October he lifted the siege and withdrew to the Illinois Country.Although Pontiac's influence had declined around Detroit because of the unsuccessful siege, he gained stature as he continued to encourage resistance to the British."
p7878
aS'Some sources put it as late as 1453.'
p7879
aS'Giuliano della Rovere was the son of Rafaello della Rovere Francesco della Rovere (later Pope Sixtus IV) was his uncle.He was educated among the Franciscans by his uncle, who took him under his special charge and later sent him to a Franciscan friary in Perugia with the purpose of obtaining knowledge of the sciences.'
p7880
aS'However, he does not appear to have joined the Order of St Francis, but rather remained a member of the secular clergy until his elevation to bishop of Carpentras, in France, in 1471; very shortly after his uncle succeeded to the papal chair. Cardinalate Della Rovere was promoted to cardinal, taking the same title formerly held by his uncle, Cardinal of San Pietro in Vincoli.'
p7881
aS'With his uncle as Pope, he obtained great influence, and he held no fewer than eight bishoprics, including Lausanne from 1472, and Coutances from 1476, along with the archbishopric of Avignon.In the capacity of papal legate, della Rovere was sent to France in 1480, where he remained four years, and acquitted himself with such ability that he soon acquired a paramount influence in the College of Cardinals, an influence which increased rather than diminished during the pontificate of Pope Innocent VIII.'
p7882
aS'Around this time, in 1483, an illegitimate daughter was born, Felice della RovereRivalry grew over time between him and Cardinal Rodrigo Borgia, and on the death of Innocent VIII, in 1492, Borgia was elected Pope Alexander VI.'
p7883
aS'Della Rovere, jealous and angry, accused Borgia of being elected over him by means of simony and a secret agreement with Ascanio Sforza.'
p7884
aS"He at once determined to take refuge from Borgia's wrath at Ostia, and a few months afterwards went to Paris, where he incited Charles VIII of France to undertake a conquest of Naples.Accompanying the young King on his campaign, he entered Rome along with him, and endeavoured to instigate the convocation of a council to inquire into the conduct of the pontiff with a view to his deposition; but Pope Alexander, having gained a friend in Charles VIII's minister Guillaume Briconnet by offering him the position of cardinal, succeeded in defeating the machinations of his enemy.Pope Alexander died in 1503, and his son, Cesare Borgia, fell ill at the same time."
p7885
aS"Many of its characteristics (comedic prose; themes of sexual desire and sexual frustration; a self-conscious literariness) went on to become Roth trademarks.In 1998, the Modern Library ranked Portnoy's_Complaint 52nd on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century."
p7886
aS'Time included this novel in its "TIME 100 Best English-language Novels from 1923 to 2005.'
p7887
aS'" Structure and themes Structurally, Portnoy\'s_Complaint is a continuous monologue as narrated by its speaker, Alexander Portnoy, to his psychoanalyst, Dr. Spielvogel; Roth later explained that the artistic choice to frame the story as a psychoanalytic session was motivated by "the permissive conventions of the patient-analyst situation," which would "permit me to bring into my fiction the sort of intimate, shameful detail, and coarse, abusive language that [...] in another fictional environment would have struck me as pornographic, exhibitionistic, and nothing but obscene.'
p7888
aS'"Portnoy is "a lust-ridden, mother addicted young Jewish bachelor," and the narration weaves through time describing scenes from each stage of his life; every recollection in some way touches upon his central dilemma: his inability to enjoy the fruits of his sexual adventures even as his extreme libidinal urges force him to seek release in ever more creative (and, in his mind, degrading and shameful) acts of eroticism; also, much of his dilemma is that "his sense of himself, his past, and his ridiculous destiny is so fixed".'
p7889
aS'Roth is not subtle about defining this as the main theme of his book.'
p7890
aS'On the first page of the novel, one finds this clinical definition of "Portnoy\'s_Complaint", as if taken from a manual on sexual dysfunction:" Portnoy\'s_Complaint: A disorder in which strongly felt ethical and altruistic impulses are perpetually warring with extreme sexual longings, often of a perverse nature..."The title also alludes to the common literary form of complaint, such as The Lover\'s Complaint, which typically presents the speaker\'s comments on being a spurned lover.Other topics touched on in the book include the assimilation experiences of American Jews, their relationship to the Jews of Israel, and the pleasures and perils the narrator sees as inherent in being the son of a Jewish family.Portnoy\'s_Complaint is also emblematic of the times during which it was published.'
p7891
aS"Most obviously, the book's sexual frankness was both a product of and a reflection on the sexual revolution that was in full swing during the late 1960s."
p7892
aS'It is a study in opposition.'
p7893
aS'Sargent shows a woman posing in a black satin dress with jeweled straps, a dress that reveals and hides at the same time.'
p7894
aS"The portrait is characterized by the pale flesh tone of the subject contrasted against a dark colored dress and background.For Sargent, the scandal resulting from the painting's controversial reception at the Paris Salon of 1884 amounted to the failure of a strategy to build a long-term career as a portrait painter in France, though it may have helped him establish a successful career in Britain and America. Background Renowned for her beauty, Gautreau represented the parisienne, a new type of Frenchwoman recognized for her sophistication."
p7895
aS'The English-language term "professional beauty", referring to a woman who uses personal skills to advance to elite status, was also used to describe her.'
p7896
aS'Her unconventional beauty made her an object of fascination for artists; the American painter Edward Simmons claimed that he "could not stop stalking her as one does a deer."'
p7897
aS'Sargent was also impressed, and anticipated that a portrait of Gautreau would garner much attention at the upcoming Paris Salon, and increase interest in portrait commissions.'
p7898
aS'He wrote to a friend:"I have a great desire to paint her portrait and have reason to think she would allow it and is waiting for someone to propose this homage to her beauty.'
p7899
aS'His main domain is the ocean, and he is called the "God of the Sea".'
p7900
aS'Additionally, he is referred to as "Earth-Shaker" due to his role in causing earthquakes, and has been called the "tamer of horses".'
p7901
aS'He is usually depicted as an older male with curly hair and beard.The name of the sea-god Nethuns in Etruscan was adopted in Latin for Neptune in Roman mythology; both were sea gods analogous to Poseidon.'
p7902
aS'Linear B tablets show that Poseidon was venerated at Pylos and Thebes in pre-Olympian Bronze Age Greece as a chief deity, but he was integrated into the Olympian gods as the brother of Zeus and Hades.'
p7903
aS'According to some folklore, he was saved by his mother Rhea, who concealed him among a flock of lambs and pretended to have given birth to a colt, which was devoured by Cronos.There is a Homeric hymn to Poseidon, who was the protector of many Hellenic cities, although he lost the contest for Athens to Athena.'
p7904
aS'According to the references from Plato in his dialogues Timaeus and Critias, the island of Atlantis was the chosen domain of Poseidon. EtymologyEdit The earliest attested occurrence of the name, written in Linear B, is  Po-se-da-o or  Po-se-da-wo-ne, which correspond to Poseidaon and Poseidawonos in Mycenean Greek; in Homeric Greek it appears as Poseidaon (Poseidaon); in Aeolic as Poteidaon (Poteidaon); and in Doric as Poteidan (Poteidan), Poteidaon (Poteidaon), and Poteidas (Poteidas).'
p7905
aS'A common epithet of Poseidon is Gaieokhos Gaieochos, "Earth-shaker," an epithet which is also identified in Linear B tablets.'
p7906
aS'In the SI system, the unit of power is the joule per second (J/s), known as the watt in honour of James Watt, the eighteenth-century developer of the steam engine.The integral of power over time defines the work performed.'
p7907
aS'Because this integral depends on the trajectory of the point of application of the force and torque, this calculation of work is said to be path dependent.As a physical concept, power requires both a change in the physical universe and a specified time in which the change occurs.'
p7908
aS'This is distinct from the concept of work, which is only measured in terms of a net change in the state of the physical universe.'
p7909
aS'The same amount of work is done when carrying a load up a flight of stairs whether the person carrying it walks or runs, but more power is needed for running because the work is done in a shorter amount of time.The output power of an electric motor is the product of the torque that the motor generates and the angular velocity of its output shaft.'
p7910
aS'The power involved in moving a vehicle is the product of the traction force of the wheels and the velocity of the vehicle.'
p7911
aS'The rate at which a light bulb converts electrical energy into light and heat is measured in watts--the higher the wattage, the more power, or equivalently the more electrical energy is used per unit time. Units The dimension of power is energy divided by time.'
p7912
aS'The SI unit of power is the watt (W), which is equal to one joule per second.'
p7913
aS'Instead, pragmatists consider thought an instrument or tool for prediction, problem solving and action.'
p7914
aS'Pragmatists contend that most philosophical topics--such as the nature of knowledge, language, concepts, meaning, belief, and science--are all best viewed in terms of their practical uses and successes.A few of the various but interrelated positions often characteristic of philosophers working from a pragmatist approach include:Epistemology (justification): a coherentist theory of justification that rejects the claim that all knowledge and justified belief rest ultimately on a foundation of noninferential knowledge or justified belief.'
p7915
aS'Coherentists hold that justification is solely a function of some relationship between beliefs, none of which are privileged beliefs in the way maintained by foundationalist theories of justification.Epistemology (truth): a deflationary or pragmatist theory of truth; the former is the epistemological claim that assertions that predicate truth of a statement do not attribute a property called truth to such a statement while the latter is the epistemological claim that assertions that predicate truth of a statement attribute the property of useful-to-believe to such a statement.Metaphysics: a pluralist view that there is more than one sound way to conceptualize the world and its content.Philosophy of science: an instrumentalist and scientific anti-realist view that a scientific concept or theory should be evaluated by how effectively it explains and predicts phenomena, as opposed to how accurately it describes objective reality.Philosophy of language: an anti-representationalist view that rejects analyzing the semantic meaning of propositions, mental states, and statements in terms of a correspondence or representational relationship and instead analyzes semantic meaning in terms of notions like dispositions to action, inferential relationships, and/or functional roles (e.g.'
p7916
aS'behaviorism and inferentialism).'
p7917
aS'Not to be confused with pragmatics, a sub-field of linguistics with no relation to philosophical pragmatism.Additionally, forms of empiricism, fallibilism, verificationism, and a Quineian naturalist metaphilosophy are all commonly elements of pragmatist philosophies.'
p7918
aS'Many pragmatists are epistemological relativists and see this to be an important facet of their pragmatism (e.g.'
p7919
aS'Richard Rorty), but this is controversial and other pragmatists argue such relativism to be seriously misguided (e.g.'
p7920
aS'The freedoms granted included a loosening of restrictions on the media, speech and travel.'
p7921
aS'After national discussion of dividing the country into a federation of three republics, Bohemia, Moravia-Silesia and Slovakia, Dubcek oversaw the decision to split into two, the Czech_Republic and Slovak Republic.'
p7922
aS'This was the only formal change that survived the end of Prague_Spring, though the relative success of the nonviolent resistance undoubtedly prefigured and facilitated the peaceful transition to liberal democracy with the collapse of Soviet hegemony in 1989.The reforms, especially the decentralization of administrative authority, were not received well by the Soviets, who, after failed negotiations, sent half a million Warsaw Pact troops and tanks to occupy the country.'
p7923
aS'A large wave of emigration swept the nation.'
p7924
aS"A spirited non-violent resistance was mounted throughout the country, involving attempted fraternization, painting over and turning street signs (on one occasion an entire invasion force from Poland was routed back out of the country after a day's wandering), defiance of various curfews, etc."
p7925
aS'While the Soviet military had predicted that it would take four days to subdue the country the resistance held out for eight months, and was only circumvented by diplomatic stratagems (see below).'
p7926
aS'There were sporadic acts of violence and several suicides by self-immolation (such as that of Jan Palach), but there was no military resistance.'
p7927
aS'It is also the historical capital of Bohemia.'
p7928
aS'Situated in the north-west of the country on the Vltava River, the city is home to about 1.24 million people, while its larger urban zone is estimated to have a population of nearly 2 million.'
p7929
aS'The city has a temperate climate, with warm summers and chilly winters.'
p7930
aS"The origin of the name Praha is rather associated with the word prah (that means a 'threshold'), which is a rapid on the river."
p7931
aS'Prague has the lowest unemployment rate in the European Union.Prague has been a political, cultural, and economic centre of central Europe with waxing and waning fortunes during its 1,100-year existence.'
p7932
aS'Founded during the Romanesque and flourishing by the Gothic and Renaissance eras, Prague was not only the capital of the Czech state, but also the seat of two Holy Roman Emperors and thus also the capital of the Holy Roman Empire.'
p7933
aS'It was an important city to the Habsburg Monarchy and its Austro-Hungarian Empire and after World_War_I became the capital of Czechoslovakia.'
p7934
aS"Elizabeth is the second of five daughters of a country gentleman living near the fictional town of Meryton in Hertfordshire, near London.Set in England in the early 19th century, Pride_and_Prejudice tells the story of Mr and Mrs Bennet's five unmarried daughters after the rich and eligible Mr Bingley and his status-conscious friend, Mr Darcy, have moved into their neighbourhood."
p7935
aS'While Bingley takes an immediate liking to the eldest Bennet daughter, Jane, Darcy has difficulty adapting to local society and repeatedly clashes with the second-eldest Bennet daughter, Elizabeth.Pride_and_Prejudice retains a fascination for modern readers, continuing near the top of lists of "most loved books."'
p7936
aS'It has become one of the most popular novels in English literature, selling over 20 million copies, and receives considerable attention from literary scholars.'
p7937
aS"Modern interest in the book has resulted in a number of dramatic adaptations and an abundance of novels and stories imitating Austen's memorable characters or themes. Plot summary The novel centres on Elizabeth Bennet, the second of the five daughters of a country gentleman."
p7938
aS"Elizabeth's father, Mr Bennet, is a bookish man, and somewhat neglectful of his responsibilities."
p7939
aS"In contrast Elizabeth's mother, Mrs Bennet, a woman who lacks social graces, is primarily concerned with finding suitable husbands for her five daughters."
p7940
aS"Jane Bennet, the eldest daughter, is distinguished by her kindness and beauty; Elizabeth Bennet shares her father's keen wit and occasionally sarcastic outlook; Mary is not pretty, but is studious, devout and musical albeit lacking in taste; Catherine, sometimes called Kitty, the fourth sister, follows where her younger sister leads, while Lydia is flirtatious and lacks maturity.The narrative opens with news in the Bennet family that Mr Bingley, a wealthy, charismatic and sociable young bachelor, is moving into Netherfield Park in the neighbourhood."
p7941
aS'1482, the painting is described in Culture & Values (2009) as "[o]ne of the most popular paintings in Western art".'
p7942
aS'It is also, according to Botticelli, Primavera (1998), "one of the most written about, and most controversial paintings in the world.'
p7943
aS'"Most critics agree that the painting, depicting a group of mythological figures in a garden, is allegorical for the lush growth of Spring.'
p7944
aS'Other meanings have also been explored.'
p7945
aS'Among them, the work is sometimes cited as illustrating the ideal of Neoplatonic love.'
p7946
aS'The painting itself carries no title and was first called La Primavera by the art historian Giorgio Vasari who saw it at Villa Castello, just outside Florence, in 1550.The history of the painting is not certainly known, though it seems to have been commissioned by one of the Medici family.'
p7947
aS'It contains references to the Roman poets Ovid and Lucretius, and may also reference a poem by Poliziano.'
p7948
aS'For example, 5 is prime because 1 and 5 are its only positive integer factors, whereas 6 is composite because it has the divisors 2 and 3 in addition to 1 and 6.'
p7949
aS'The fundamental theorem of arithmetic establishes the central role of primes in number theory: any integer greater than 1 can be expressed as a product of primes that is unique up to ordering.'
p7950
aS'The uniqueness in this theorem requires excluding 1 as a prime because one can include arbitrarily many instances of 1 in any factorization, e.g., 3, 1 * 3, 1 * 1 * 3, etc.'
p7951
aS'are all valid factorizations of 3.The property of being prime (or not) is called primality.'
p7952
aS'A simple but slow method of verifying the primality of a given number n is known as trial division.'
p7953
aS'It consists of testing whether n is a multiple of any integer between 2 and .'
p7954
aS'Algorithms much more efficient than trial division have been devised to test the primality of large numbers.'
p7955
aS"The word prion, coined in 1982 by Stanley B. Prusiner, is derived from the words protein and infection, in reference to a prion's ability to self-propagate and transmit its conformation to other prions."
p7956
aS'While several yeast proteins have been identified as having prionogenic properties, the first prion protein was discovered in mammals and is referred to as the major prion protein (PrP).'
p7957
aS'This infectious agent causes mammalian transmissible spongiform encephalopathies, including bovine spongiform encephalopathy (BSE, also known as "mad cow disease") and scrapie in sheep.'
p7958
aS'In humans, PrP causes Creutzfeldt-Jakob Disease (CJD), variant Creutzfeldt-Jakob Disease (vCJD), Gerstmann-Straussler-Scheinker syndrome, Fatal Familial Insomnia and kuru.A protein as an infectious agent stands in contrast to all other known infectious agents, like viruses, bacteria, fungi, or parasites--all of which must contain nucleic acids (either DNA, RNA, or both).'
p7959
aS'All known prion diseases in mammals affect the structure of the brain or other neural tissue and all are currently untreatable and universally fatal.While PrP is considered the only mammalian prion, prion-like domains have been found in a variety of other mammalian proteins.'
p7960
aS"Some of these proteins have been implicated in the ontogeny of age-related degenerative disorders such as amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), frontotemporal lobar degeneration with ubiquitin-positive inclusions (FTLD-U), Alzheimer's_disease, and Huntington's disease."
p7961
aS"This has given rise to the 'prion paradigm', where otherwise harmless proteins can be converted to a pathogenic form by a small number of misfolded, nucleating proteins.Prions are not considered living organisms because they are misfolded protein molecules which may propagate by transmitting a misfolded protein state."
p7962
aS'Albert W. Tucker formalized the game with prison sentence rewards and gave it the name "prisoner\'s dilemma" (Poundstone, 1992), presenting it as follows:Two members of a criminal gang are arrested and imprisoned.'
p7963
aS'Each prisoner is in solitary confinement with no means of speaking to or exchanging messages with the other.'
p7964
aS'The prosecutors do not have enough evidence to convict the pair on the principal charge.'
p7965
aS'They hope to get both sentenced to a year in prison on a lesser charge.'
p7966
aS'Simultaneously, the prosecutors offer each prisoner a bargain.'
p7967
aS'Each prisoner is given the opportunity either to: betray the other by testifying that the other committed the crime, or to cooperate with the other by remaining silent.'
p7968
aS'Here is the offer:If A and B each betray the other, each of them serves 2 years in prisonIf A betrays B but B remains silent, A will be set free and B will serve 3 years in prison (and vice versa)If A and B both remain silent, both of them will only serve 1 year in prison (on the lesser charge)It is implied that the prisoners will have no opportunity to reward or punish their partner other than the prison sentences they get, and that their decision will not affect their reputation in the future.'
p7969
aS"Despite these doubts of authorship, the play's designation as Aeschylean has remained conventional."
p7970
aS'The tragedy is based on the myth of Prometheus, a Titan who defies the gods and gives fire to humanity, acts for which he is subjected to perpetual punishment. Synopsis The play is composed almost entirely of speeches and contains little action since its protagonist is chained and immobile throughout.'
p7971
aS'At the beginning, Kratos (strength), Bia (force), and the smith-god Hephaestus chain the Titan Prometheus to a mountain in the Caucasus, with Hephaestus alone expressing reluctance and pity, and then departing.'
p7972
aS"According to the author, Prometheus is being punished not only for stealing fire, but also for thwarting Zeus's plan to obliterate the human race."
p7973
aS"This punishment is especially galling since Prometheus was instrumental in Zeus's victory in the Titanomachy.The Oceanids appear and attempt to comfort Prometheus by conversing with him."
p7974
aS"Prometheus cryptically tells them that he knows of a potential marriage that would lead to Zeus's downfall."
p7975
aS'A Titan named Oceanus commiserates with Prometheus and urges him to make peace with Zeus.'
p7976
aS'Prometheus was therefore on the conquering side of the cataclysmic war of the Greek gods, the Titanomachy, where Zeus and the Olympian gods ultimately defeated Cronus and the other Titans.Ancient myths and legends relate at least four versions of the narratives describing Prometheus, his exploits with Zeus, and his eternal punishment as also inflicted by Zeus.'
p7977
aS'There is a single somewhat comprehensive version of the birth of Prometheus and several variant versions of his subjection to eternal suffering at the will of Zeus.'
p7978
aS'The most significant narratives of his origin appear in the Theogony of Hesiod which relates Prometheus as being the son of the Titan Iapetus by Clymene, one of the Oceanids.'
p7979
aS"Hesiod then presents Prometheus as subsequently being a lowly challenger to Zeus's omnipotence."
p7980
aS'In the trick at Mecone, Prometheus tricks Zeus into eternally claiming the inedible parts of cows and bulls for the sacrificial ceremonies of the gods, while conceding the nourishing parts to humans for the eternal benefit of humankind.'
p7981
aS'The two remaining central episodes regarding Prometheus as written by Hesiod include his theft of fire from Olympus for the benefit of humanity against the will of Zeus, and the eternal punishment which Prometheus would endure for these acts as inflicted upon him by the judgment of Zeus.'
p7982
aS'For the greater part, the pre-Athenian ancient sources are selective in which of these narrative elements they chose by their own preferences to honor and support, and which ones they chose to exclude.'
p7983
aS'Since the genetic material has been replicated in the prior interphase of the cell cycle, there are two identical copies of each chromosome in the cell.'
p7984
aS'Those copies are called sister chromatids and they are attached to each other at a DNA element present on every chromosome called the centromere.'
p7985
aS'Also during prophase, giemsa staining can be applied to elicit G-banding in chromosomes.An important organelle in mitosis is the centrosome, the microtubule organizing center in metazoans.'
p7986
aS'During prophase, the two centrosomes, which replicate independently of mitosis, have their microtubule-activity increased due to the recruitment of g-tubulin.'
p7987
aS'The centrosomes will be pushed apart to opposite ends of the cell nucleus by the action of molecular motors acting on the microtubules.At the end of prophase, the tiny nucleolus within the nucleus dissolves.'
p7988
aS'The nucleolus starts moving towards the nuclear membrane at the beginning of prophase, and its disintegration occurs near the nuclear envelope.'
p7989
aS'Its contents are dispersed in masses.Basically, the chromatin in the nucleus coils into chromosomes.'
p7990
aS'He is often equated with the divine son figure of Mabon ap Modron, while Jeffrey Gantz compares him to Peredur fab Efrawg, who is himself associated with the continental figure of Sir Percival de Galles.Ifor Williams speculated that he was once the focal character of the Mabinogi as a whole, although some subsequent scholars disagree with this theory.Pryderi is described by Jeffrey Gantz as "bold and enterprising, but brash to the point of foolishness."'
p7991
aS'He goes on to say that "his downfall, while pathetic, is not entirely undeserved.'
p7992
aS'" Role in Welsh mythology  Birth and early life Pryderi was born in Arberth to Pwyll, Lord of Dyfed, and Rhiannon, daughter of Hyfaidd Hen.'
p7993
aS"On the night of his birth, he disappeared while in the care of six of Rhiannon's ladies-in-waiting."
p7994
aS"To avoid the king's wrath, they smeared dog's blood onto a sleeping Rhiannon, claiming that she had committed infanticide and cannibalism through eating her child.Teyrnon, Lord of Gwent Is Coed, had a mare who gave birth each year but whose foals had all disappeared."
p7995
aS"Teyrnon watched his stables and saw a mysterious clawed beast coming to take the foal; Teyrnon cut off the beast's arm and found the child outside the stable."
p7996
aS'He and his wife claimed the boy as their own and named him Gwri Wallt Euryn (English: Gwri of the Golden hair), for "all the hair was as yellow as gold.'
p7997
aS'The capital and largest city is San Juan.'
p7998
aS'Puerto_Rico has a tropical climate with warm weather year round and does not observe daylight saving time.'
p7999
aS'Its official languages are Spanish, which is predominant, and English.Originally populated for centuries by the aboriginal Taino people, the island was claimed in 1493 by Christopher Columbus for the Kingdom of Spain during his second voyage to the Americas.'
p8000
aS'Like Cuba, Puerto_Rico remained a Spanish colony until 1898.'
p8001
aS'Despite the Laws of Burgos of 1512 and other decrees for the protection of the indigenous population, some Taino Indians were forced into slavery in the early years of colonization.'
p8002
aS"The population suffered extremely high fatalities from epidemics of European infectious diseases.During the four centuries of Spanish rule, the island's culture and physical landscape were transformed."
p8003
aS'European knowledge, customs and traditions were introduced, especially Roman Catholicism, the Spanish language, and advances such as agriculture, construction in stone, and the printing press.'
p8004
aS'Neutron_stars are very dense, and have short, regular rotational periods.'
p8005
aS'This produces a very precise interval between pulses that range roughly from milliseconds to seconds for an individual pulsar.'
p8006
aS'Pulsars are believed to be one of the candidates of high and ultra-high energy astroparticles (see also Centrifugal mechanism of acceleration).The precise periods of pulsars make them useful tools.'
p8007
aS'Observations of a pulsar in a binary neutron star system were used to indirectly confirm the existence of gravitational radiation.'
p8008
aS'The first extrasolar planets were discovered around a pulsar, PSR B1257+12.'
p8009
aS'Certain types of pulsars rival atomic clocks in their accuracy in keeping time. History of observation  Discovery The first pulsar was observed on November 28, 1967, by Jocelyn Bell Burnell and Antony Hewish.'
p8010
aS'They observed pulses separated by 1.33 seconds that originated from the same location on the sky, and kept to sidereal time.'
p8011
aS'Cladogenesis is the process by which a species splits into two distinct species, rather than one species gradually transforming into another.'
p8012
aS'Punctuated_equilibrium is commonly contrasted against phyletic gradualism, the belief that evolution generally occurs uniformly and by the steady and gradual transformation of whole lineages (called anagenesis).'
p8013
aS'In this view, evolution is seen as generally smooth and continuous.In 1972, paleontologists Niles Eldredge and Stephen Jay Gould published a landmark paper developing their theory and called it punctuated equilibria.'
p8014
aS"Their paper built upon Ernst Mayr's model of geographic speciation, I. Michael Lerner's theories of developmental and genetic homeostasis, as well as their own empirical research."
p8015
aS"Eldredge and Gould proposed that the degree of gradualism commonly attributed to Charles Darwin is virtually nonexistent in the fossil record, and that stasis dominates the history of most fossil species. History Punctuated_equilibrium originated as a logical extension of Ernst Mayr's concept of genetic revolutions by allopatric and especially peripatric speciation as applied to the fossil record."
p8016
aS'Although some of the basic workings of the theory were proposed and identified by Mayr in 1954, historians of science generally recognize the 1972 paper by Niles Eldredge and Stephen Jay Gould as the foundation of the new paleobiological research program.'
p8017
aS'Punctuated_equilibrium differs from Mayr\'s theory mainly in that Eldredge and Gould placed considerably greater emphasis on stasis, whereas Mayr was generally concerned with explaining the morphological discontinuity (or "sudden jumps") found in the fossil record.'
p8018
aS"The play is a sharp lampoon of the rigid British class system of the day and a commentary on women's independence.In ancient Greek mythology, Pygmalion fell in love with one of his sculptures, which then came to life."
p8019
aS"The general idea of that myth was a popular subject for Victorian era English playwrights, including one of Shaw's influences, W. S. Gilbert, who wrote a successful play based on the story called Pygmalion and Galatea first presented in 1871."
p8020
aS'Shaw would also have been familiar with the burlesque version, Galatea, or Pygmalion Reversed.'
p8021
aS"Shaw's play has been adapted numerous times, most notably as the musical My Fair Lady and the film of that name.Shaw mentioned that the character of Professor Henry Higgins was inspired by several British professors of phonetics: Alexander Melville Bell, Alexander J. Ellis, Tito Pagliardini, but above all, the cantankerous Henry Sweet. First productions Shaw wrote the play in early 1912 and read it to famed actress Mrs. Patrick Campbell in June."
p8022
aS'She came on board almost immediately, but her mild nervous breakdown contributed to the delay of a London production.'
p8023
aS"Pygmalion premiered at the Hofburg Theatre in Vienna on 16 October 1913, in a German translation by Shaw's Viennese literary agent and acolyte, Siegfried Trebitsch."
p8024
aS'Its first New York production opened on 24 March 1914 at the German-language Irving Place Theatre.'
p8025
aS'Some of these are among the most popular theatrical music in the classical repertoire.'
p8026
aS'He was the first Russian composer whose music made a lasting impression internationally, which he bolstered with appearances as a guest conductor later in his career in Europe and the United_States.'
p8027
aS'One of these appearances was at the inaugural concert of Carnegie Hall in New_York_City in 1891.'
p8028
aS'Tchaikovsky was honored in 1884 by Emperor Alexander III, and awarded a lifetime pension.Although musically precocious, Tchaikovsky was educated for a career as a civil servant.'
p8029
aS'There was scant opportunity for a musical career in Russia at that time, and no system of public music education.'
p8030
aS'When an opportunity for such an education arose, he entered the nascent Saint_Petersburg Conservatory, from which he graduated in 1865.'
p8031
aS'The formal Western-oriented teaching he received there set him apart from composers of the contemporary nationalist movement embodied by the Russian composers of The Five, with whom his professional relationship was mixed.'
p8032
aS'The theorem can be written as an equation relating the lengths of the sides a, b and c, often called the "Pythagorean equation":where c represents the length of the hypotenuse and a and b the lengths of the triangle\'s other two sides.Although it is often argued that knowledge of the theorem predates him, the theorem is named after the ancient Greek mathematician Pythagoras (c. 570 - c. 495 BC) as it is he who, by tradition, is credited with its first recorded proof.'
p8033
aS'There is some evidence that Babylonian mathematicians understood the formula, although little of it indicates an application within a mathematical framework.'
p8034
aS'Mesopotamian, Indian and Chinese mathematicians all discovered the theorem independently and, in some cases, provided proofs for special cases.The theorem has been given numerous proofs - possibly the most for any mathematical theorem.'
p8035
aS'They are very diverse, including both geometric proofs and algebraic proofs, with some dating back thousands of years.'
p8036
aS'The theorem can be generalized in various ways, including higher-dimensional spaces, to spaces that are not Euclidean, to objects that are not right triangles, and indeed, to objects that are not triangles at all, but n-dimensional solids.'
p8037
aS'The Pythagorean_theorem has attracted interest outside mathematics as a symbol of mathematical abstruseness, mystique, or intellectual power; popular references in literature, plays, musicals, songs, stamps and cartoons abound. Pythagorean proof The Pythagorean Theorem was known long before Pythagoras, but he may well have been the first to prove it.'
p8038
aS'In any event, the proof attributed to him is very simple, and is called a proof by rearrangement.The two large squares shown in the figure each contain four identical triangles, and the only difference between the two large squares is that the triangles are arranged differently.'
p8039
aS'The language provides constructs intended to enable clear programs on both a small and large scale.Python supports multiple programming paradigms, including object-oriented, imperative and functional programming or procedural styles.'
p8040
aS'It features a dynamic type system and automatic memory management and has a large and comprehensive standard library.Python interpreters are available for installation on many operating systems, allowing Python code execution on a wide variety of systems.'
p8041
aS'Using third-party tools, such as Py2exe or Pyinstaller, Python code can be packaged into stand-alone executable programs for some of the most popular operating systems, allowing for the distribution of Python-based software for use on those environments without requiring the installation of a Python interpreter.CPython, the reference implementation of Python, is free and open-source software and has a community-based development model, as do nearly all of its alternative implementations.'
p8042
aS'CPython is managed by the non-profit Python Software Foundation. History Python was conceived in the late 1980s and its implementation was started in December 1989 by Guido van Rossum at CWI in the Netherlands as a successor to the ABC language (itself inspired by SETL) capable of exception handling and interfacing with the Amoeba operating system.'
p8043
aS'Van Rossum is Python\'s principal author, and his continuing central role in deciding the direction of Python is reflected in the title given to him by the Python community, benevolent dictator for life (BDFL).About the origin of Python, Van Rossum wrote in 1996:Over six years ago, in December 1989, I was looking for a "hobby" programming project that would keep me occupied during the week around Christmas.'
p8044
aS'My office ... would be closed, but I had a home computer, and not much else on my hands.'
p8045
aS'I decided to write an interpreter for the new scripting language I had been thinking about lately: a descendant of ABC that would appeal to Unix/C hackers.'
p8046
aS'It has important applications to modern devices such as the tunnel diode, quantum computing, and the scanning tunnelling microscope.'
p8047
aS'The effect was predicted in the early 20th century and its acceptance as a general physical phenomenon came mid-century.Tunnelling is often explained using the Heisenberg uncertainty principle and the wave-particle duality of matter.'
p8048
aS'Pure quantum mechanical concepts are central to the phenomenon, so quantum tunnelling is one of the novel implications of quantum mechanics. History Quantum_tunnelling was developed from the study of radioactivity, which was discovered in 1896 by Henri Becquerel.'
p8049
aS'Radioactivity was examined further by Marie Curie and Pierre Curie, for which they earned the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1903.'
p8050
aS'Ernest Rutherford and Egon Schweidler studied its nature, which was later verified empirically by Friedrich Kohlrausch.'
p8051
aS'The idea of the half-life and the impossibility of predicting decay was created from their work.Friedrich Hund was the first to take notice of tunnelling in 1927 when he was calculating the ground state of the double-well potential.'
p8052
aS'Its first application was a mathematical explanation for alpha decay, which was done in 1928 by George Gamow and independently by Ronald Gurney and Edward Condon.'
p8053
aS'Due to a phenomenon known as color confinement, quarks are never directly observed or found in isolation; they can be found only within hadrons, such as baryons (of which protons and neutrons are examples), and mesons.'
p8054
aS'For this reason, much of what is known about quarks has been drawn from observations of the hadrons themselves.Quarks have various intrinsic properties, including electric charge, mass, color charge and spin.'
p8055
aS'Quarks are the only elementary particles in the Standard Model of particle physics to experience all four fundamental interactions, also known as fundamental forces (electromagnetism, gravitation, strong interaction, and weak interaction), as well as the only known particles whose electric charges are not integer multiples of the elementary charge.There are six types of quarks, known as flavors: up, down, strange, charm, top, and bottom.'
p8056
aS'Up and down quarks have the lowest masses of all quarks.'
p8057
aS'The heavier quarks rapidly change into up and down quarks through a process of particle decay: the transformation from a higher mass state to a lower mass state.'
p8058
aS'Because of this, up and down quarks are generally stable and the most common in the universe, whereas strange, charm, bottom, and top quarks can only be produced in high energy collisions (such as those involving cosmic rays and in particle accelerators).'
p8059
aS'For every quark flavor there is a corresponding type of antiparticle, known as an antiquark, that differs from the quark only in that some of its properties have equal magnitude but opposite sign.The quark model was independently proposed by physicists Murray Gell-Mann and George Zweig in 1964.'
p8060
aS'Since antiquity, varieties of quartz have been the most commonly used minerals in the making of jewelry and hardstone carvings, especially in Europe and the Middle East. Etymology The word "quartz" is derived from the German word "Quarz" and its Middle High German ancestor "twarc", which probably originated in Slavic, cf.'
p8061
aS'Czech tvrdy ("hard"), Polish twardy ("hard"), Croatian tvrd ("hard"). Crystal habit and structure Quartz belongs to the trigonal crystal system.'
p8062
aS'The ideal crystal shape is a six-sided prism terminating with six-sided pyramids at each end.'
p8063
aS'In nature quartz crystals are often twinned, distorted, or so intergrown with adjacent crystals of quartz or other minerals as to only show part of this shape, or to lack obvious crystal faces altogether and appear massive.'
p8064
aS"Well-formed crystals typically form in a 'bed' that has unconstrained growth into a void; usually the crystals are attached at the other end to a matrix and only one termination pyramid is present."
p8065
aS'However doubly-terminated crystals do occur where they develop freely without attachment, for instance within gypsum.'
p8066
aS'A quartz geode is such a situation where the void is approximately spherical in shape, lined with a bed of crystals pointing inward.a-quartz crystallizes in the trigonal crystal system, space group P3121 and P3221 respectively.'
p8067
aS'Their spectra contain very broad emission lines, unlike any known from stars, hence the name "quasi-stellar."'
p8068
aS'Their luminosity can be 100 times greater than that of the Milky Way.'
p8069
aS'Most quasars were formed approximately 12 billion years ago caused by collisions of galaxies and their central black holes merging to form a supermassive black hole.Although the true nature of these objects were controversial until the early 1980s, there is now a scientific consensus that a quasar is a compact region in the center of a massive galaxy surrounding a central supermassive black hole.'
p8070
aS'Its size is 10-10,000 times the Schwarzschild radius of the black hole.'
p8071
aS'The energy emitted by a quasar derives from mass falling onto the accretion disc around the black hole. Overview Because of their distance, quasars show a very high redshift, which is an effect of the metric expansion of space between the quasar and the Earth.'
p8072
aS"When the observed redshift of quasars is interpreted in terms of Hubble's law, it is inferred that quasars are very distant objects."
p8073
aS'Quasars inhabit the very center of active, young galaxies, and are among the most luminous, powerful, and energetic objects known in the universe, emitting up to a thousand times the energy output of the Milky Way, which contains 200-400 billion stars.'
p8074
aS'That period lies within the Late Preclassic to Early Classic period (400 BC - 600 AD) of Mesoamerican chronology, and veneration of the figure appears to have spread throughout Mesoamerica by the Late Classic (600-900 AD).In the Postclassic period (900-1519 AD), the worship of the feathered serpent deity was based in the primary Mexican religious center of Cholula.'
p8075
aS'It is in this period that the deity is known to have been named "Quetzalcoatl" by his Nahua followers.'
p8076
aS'In the Maya area he was approximately equivalent to Kukulcan and Gukumatz, names that also roughly translate as "feathered serpent" in different Mayan languages.A prominent symbol of the priests of Quetzalcoatl was a symbol known in Nahuatl as a "ehecacozcatl" which translates in to English as a "wind jewel."'
p8077
aS'This talisman was a conch shell cut at the cross-section and was likely worn as a necklace by religious rulers as they have been discovered in burials in archaeological sites throughout Mesoamerica and potentially symbolized patterns witnessed in hurricanes, dust devils, seashells, and whirlpools which were elemental forces that had meaning in the Aztec religious mythology.'
p8078
aS'In codex illustrations depicting Quetzalcoatl and Xolotl they are both depicted wearing an ehecaicozcatl around each of their necks.'
p8079
aS'There has also been at least one major cache of offerings with knives and idols adorned with the symbols of multiple gods, some of which were adorned with wind jewels.In the era following the 16th-century Spanish Conquest, a number of sources were written that conflate Quetzalcoatl with Ce Acatl Topiltzin, a ruler of the mythico-historic city of Tollan.'
p8080
aS'It is a matter of much debate among historians to which degree, or whether at all, these narratives about this legendary Toltec ruler describe historical events.'
p8081
aS'When implemented well, it can be about two or three times faster than its main competitors, merge sort and heapsort.Quicksort is a comparison sort, meaning that it can sort items of any type for which a "less-than" relation (formally, a total order) is defined.'
p8082
aS'In efficient implementations it is not a stable sort, meaning that the relative order of equal sort items is not preserved.'
p8083
aS'Quicksort can operate in-place on an array, requiring small additional amounts of memory to perform the sorting.Mathematical analysis of quicksort shows that, on average, the algorithm takes O(n log n) comparisons to sort n items.'
p8084
aS'In the worst case, it makes O(n2) comparisons, though this behavior is rare. History The quicksort algorithm was developed in 1960 by Tony Hoare while in the Soviet Union, as a visiting student at Moscow State University.'
p8085
aS'At that time, Hoare worked in a project on machine translation for the National Physical Laboratory.'
p8086
aS'As a part of translation process, he needed to sort the words of Russian sentence prior to looking them up in a Russian-English dictionary which was already sorted in alphabetic order on magnetic tape.'
p8087
aS'After recognizing that his first idea, insertion sort, would be bit slow, he quickly came up with new idea that was Quicksort.'
p8088
aS'By the Fifth Dynasty (2494 to 2345 BCE) he had become a major god in ancient Egyptian religion, identified primarily with the midday sun.In later Egyptian dynastic times, Ra was merged with the god Horus, as Ra-Horakhty ("Ra, who is Horus of the Two Horizons").'
p8089
aS'He was believed to rule in all parts of the created world: the sky, the earth, and the underworld.'
p8090
aS'He was associated with the falcon or hawk.'
p8091
aS'When in the New Kingdom the god Amun rose to prominence he was fused with Ra as Amun-Ra.'
p8092
aS'During the Amarna Period, Akhenaten suppressed the cult of Ra in favour of another solar deity, the Aten, the deified solar disc, but after the death of Akhenaten the cult of Ra was restored.The cult of the Mnevis bull, an embodiment of Ra, had its centre in Heliopolis and there was a formal burial ground for the sacrificed bulls north of the city.All forms of life were believed to have been created by Ra, who called each of them into existence by speaking their secret names.'
p8093
aS'Alternatively humans were created from Ra\'s tears and sweat, hence the Egyptians call themselves the "Cattle of Ra."'
p8094
aS'In the myth of the Celestial Cow it is recounted how mankind plotted against Ra and how he sent his eye as the goddess Sekhmet to punish them.'
p8095
aS'There are many other species of rabbit, and these, along with pikas and hares, make up the order Lagomorpha.'
p8096
aS'The male is called a buck and the female is a doe; a young rabbit is a kitten or kit. Habitat and range Rabbit habitats include meadows, woods, forests, grasslands, deserts and wetlands.'
p8097
aS'Rabbits live in groups, and the best known species, the European rabbit, lives in underground burrows, or rabbit holes.'
p8098
aS"A group of burrows is called a warren.More than half the world's rabbit population resides in North America."
p8099
aS'They are also native to southwestern Europe, Southeast Asia, Sumatra, some islands of Japan, and in parts of Africa and South America.'
p8100
aS'They are not naturally found in most of Eurasia, where a number of species of hares are present.'
p8101
aS'Rabbits first entered South America relatively recently, as part of the Great American Interchange.'
p8102
aS'In translation his poetry was viewed as spiritual and mercurial; however, his "elegant prose and magical poetry" remain largely unknown outside Bengal.'
p8103
aS'Tagore introduced new prose and verse forms and the use of colloquial language into Bengali literature, thereby freeing it from traditional models based on classical Sanskrit.'
p8104
aS'He was highly influential in introducing the best of Indian culture to the West and vice versa, and he is generally regarded as the outstanding creative artist of the modern Indian subcontinent.A Pirali Brahmin from Calcutta with ancestral gentry roots in Jessore, Tagore wrote poetry as an eight-year-old.'
p8105
aS'At age sixteen, he released his first substantial poems under the pseudonym Bhanusimha ("Sun Lion"), which were seized upon by literary authorities as long-lost classics.'
p8106
aS'By 1877 he graduated to his first short stories and dramas, published under his real name.'
p8107
aS'As a humanist, universalist internationalist, and strident nationalist he denounced the British Raj and advocated independence from Britain.'
p8108
aS'As an exponent of the Bengal Renaissance, he advanced a vast canon that comprised paintings, sketches and doodles, hundreds of texts, and some two thousand songs; his legacy endures also in the institution he founded, Visva-Bharati University.Tagore modernised Bengali art by spurning rigid classical forms and resisting linguistic strictures.'
p8109
aS'Two other examples are triplet oxygen and triplet carbene (:CH2) which have two unpaired electrons.'
p8110
aS'In contrast, the hydroxyl anion (HO-) is not a radical, since the unpaired electron is resolved by the addition of an electron; singlet oxygen and singlet carbene are not radicals as the two electrons are paired.Free radicals may be created in a number of ways, including synthesis with very dilute or rarefied reagents, reactions at very low temperatures, or breakup of larger molecules.'
p8111
aS'The latter can be affected by any process that puts enough energy into the parent molecule, such as ionizing radiation, heat, electrical discharges, electrolysis, and chemical reactions.'
p8112
aS'Indeed, radicals are intermediate stages in many chemical reactions.Free radicals play an important role in combustion, atmospheric chemistry, polymerization, plasma chemistry, biochemistry, and many other chemical processes.'
p8113
aS'In living organisms, the free radicals superoxide and nitric oxide and their reaction products regulate many processes, such as control of vascular tone and thus blood pressure.'
p8114
aS'They also play a key role in the intermediary metabolism of various biological compounds.'
p8115
aS'Such radicals can even be messengers in a process dubbed redox signaling.'
p8116
aS'Arminia.'
p8117
aS'He served in the army as a nurse in 1870-1871 and continued his studies at Gottingen University.'
p8118
aS'He returned to the University of Bonn in 1872 and started his academic career at the same university in 1874.'
p8119
aS'He died in 1930 in Godesberg am Rhein (near Bonn). Career  Scientific contributions Described the condensation of aromatic aldehydes with aliphatic aldehydes or ketones in 1881.'
p8120
aS'This variation of the now well-known aldol condensation reaction is called the Claisen-Schmidt condensation.Discovered (1887) the condensation reaction of an ester with an activated methylene group, now known as the Claisen_condensation.Synthesis of cinnamates by reacting aromatic aldehydes with esters.'
p8121
aS'The reaction is known as the Claisen reaction and was described by Claisen for the first time in 1890.Discovered the thermally induced rearrangement of allyl phenyl ether in 1912.'
p8122
aS'He details its reaction mechanism in his last scientific publication (1925).'
p8123
aS'His writings include one novel, several collections of poetry, and several volumes of correspondence in which he invokes haunting images that focus on the difficulty of communion with the ineffable in an age of disbelief, solitude, and profound anxiety.'
p8124
aS'These deeply existential themes tend to position him as a transitional figure between the traditional and the modernist writers.Rilke was born in the Austro-Hungarian Empire, travelled extensively throughout Europe, including Russia, Spain, Germany, France, Italy, and in his later years settled in Switzerland--settings that were key to the genesis and inspiration for many of his poems.'
p8125
aS'While Rilke is most known for his contributions to German literature, over 400 poems were originally written in French and dedicated to the canton of Valais in Switzerland.'
p8126
aS'Among English-language readers, his best-known works include the poetry collections Duino Elegies (Duineser Elegien) and Sonnets to Orpheus (Die Sonette an Orpheus), the semi-autobiographical novel The Notebooks of Malte Laurids Brigge (Die Aufzeichnungen des Malte Laurids Brigge), and a collection of ten letters that was published after his death under the title Letters to a Young Poet (Briefe an einen jungen Dichter).'
p8127
aS'In the later 20th century, his work has found new audiences through its use by New Age theologians and self-help authors, and through frequent quoting in television programs, books and motion pictures.'
p8128
aS'In the United_States, Rilke is one of the more popular, best-selling poets--along with 13th-century Sufi mystic Rumi and 20th-century Lebanese-American poet Khalil Gibran. Biography  Early life (1875-1896) He was born Rene Karl Wilhelm Johann Josef Maria Rilke in Prague, capital of Bohemia (then part of Austria-Hungary, now the Czech_Republic).'
p8129
aS'His childhood and youth in Prague were not especially happy.'
p8130
aS'The effect had been predicted theoretically by Adolf Smekal in 1923.When photons are scattered from an atom or molecule, most photons are elastically scattered (Rayleigh scattering), such that the scattered photons have the same energy (frequency and wavelength) as the incident photons.'
p8131
aS'A small fraction of the scattered photons (approximately 1 in 10 million) are scattered by an excitation, with the scattered photons having a frequency different from, and usually lower than, that of the incident photons.'
p8132
aS'In a gas, Raman_scattering can occur with a change in energy of a molecule due to a transition to another (usually higher) energy level.'
p8133
aS'Chemists are primarily concerned with the transitional Raman effect. History The inelastic scattering of light was predicted by Adolf Smekal in 1923 (and in German-language literature it may be referred to as the Smekal-Raman effect).'
p8134
aS'In 1922, Indian physicist C. V. Raman published his work on the "Molecular Diffraction of Light," the first of a series of investigations with his collaborators that ultimately led to his discovery (on 28 February 1928) of the radiation effect that bears his name.'
p8135
aS'The Raman effect was first reported by C. V. Raman and K. S. Krishnan, and independently by Grigory Landsberg and Leonid Mandelstam, on 21 February 1928 (that is why in the former Soviet Union the priority of Raman was always disputed; thus in Russian scientific literature this effect is usually referred to as "combination scattering" or "combinatory scattering").'
p8136
aS'Raman received the Nobel Prize in 1930 for his work on the scattering of light.In 1998 the Raman effect was designated a National Historic Chemical Landmark by the American Chemical Society in recognition of its significance as a tool for analyzing the composition of liquids, gases, and solids. Description  Degrees of freedom For any given chemical compound, there are a total of 3N degrees of freedom, where N is the number of atoms in the compound.'
p8137
aS'His successors and later Egyptians called him the "Great Ancestor".'
p8138
aS'Ramesses_II led several military expeditions into the Levant, reasserting Egyptian control over Canaan.'
p8139
aS'He also led expeditions to the south, into Nubia, commemorated in inscriptions at Beit el-Wali and Gerf Hussein.At age fourteen, Ramesses was appointed Prince Regent by his father Seti I.'
p8140
aS'He is believed to have taken the throne in his late teens and is known to have ruled Egypt from 1279 BC to 1213 BC.'
p8141
aS'Estimates of his age at death vary; 90 or 91 is considered most likely.'
p8142
aS"Ramesses_II celebrated an unprecedented 14 sed festivals (the first held after thirty years of a pharaoh's reign, and then every three years) during his reign--more than any other pharaoh."
p8143
aS'On his death, he was buried in a tomb in the Valley of the Kings; his body was later moved to a royal cache where it was discovered in 1881, and is now on display in the Cairo Museum.The early part of his reign was focused on building cities, temples and monuments.'
p8144
aS'Together with Michelangelo and Leonardo da Vinci, he forms the traditional trinity of great masters of that period.Raphael was enormously productive, running an unusually large workshop and, despite his death at 37, leaving a large body of work.'
p8145
aS'Many of his works are found in the Vatican Palace, where the frescoed Raphael Rooms were the central, and the largest, work of his career.'
p8146
aS'The best known work is The School of Athens in the Vatican Stanza della Segnatura.'
p8147
aS'After his early years in Rome much of his work was executed by his workshop from his drawings, with considerable loss of quality.'
p8148
aS'He was extremely influential in his lifetime, though outside Rome his work was mostly known from his collaborative printmaking.'
p8149
aS"After his death, the influence of his great rival Michelangelo was more widespread until the 18th and 19th centuries, when Raphael's more serene and harmonious qualities were again regarded as the highest models."
p8150
aS'His career falls naturally into three phases and three styles, first described by Giorgio Vasari: his early years in Umbria, then a period of about four years (1504-1508) absorbing the artistic traditions of Florence, followed by his last hectic and triumphant twelve years in Rome, working for two Popes and their close associates. Urbino Raphael was born in the small but artistically significant Central Italian city of Urbino in the Marche region, where his father Giovanni Santi was court painter to the Duke.'
p8151
aS'Members of the Rastafari way of life are known as Rastafari, Rastas, Rastafarians, or simply Ras.'
p8152
aS'Rastafari are also known by their official church titles, such as Elder or High Priest.'
p8153
aS'The way of life is sometimes referred to as "Rastafarianism", but this term is considered offensive by most Rastafari, who, being critical of "isms" (which they see as a typical part of Babylon culture), dislike being labelled as an "ism" themselves.The name Rastafari is taken from Ras Tafari, the title (Ras) and first name (Tafari Makonnen) of Haile Selassie I before his coronation.'
p8154
aS'In Amharic, Ras, literally "head", is an Ethiopian title equivalent to prince or chief, while the personal given name Tafari (teferi) means one who is revered.'
p8155
aS'Jah is a Biblical name of God, from a shortened form of Jahweh or Jehovah found in Psalms 68:4 in the King James Version of the Bible.'
p8156
aS'Most adherents see Haile Selassie I as Jah or Jah Rastafari, an incarnation of God the Father, the Second Advent of Christ "the Anointed One", i.e.'
p8157
aS'the Second Coming of Jesus Christ the King to Earth.Many elements of Rastafari reflect its origins in Jamaica and Ethiopia.'
p8158
aS'He wrote and consulted on many screenplays and television scripts, including Moby Dick and It Came from Outer Space.'
p8159
aS'Many of his works have been adapted into comic books, television shows, and films. Early life Ray_Bradbury was born on 22 August 1920 in Waukegan, Illinois, to Esther (nee Moberg) Bradbury, a Swedish immigrant, and Leonard Spaulding Bradbury, a power and telephone lineman of English descent.'
p8160
aS'He was given the middle name "Douglas," after the actor Douglas Fairbanks.'
p8161
aS'Bradbury was related to the American Shakespeare scholar Douglas Spaulding and was descended from Mary Bradbury, who was tried at one of the Salem witch trials in 1692.Bradbury was surrounded by an extended family during his early childhood and formative years in Waukegan, Illinois.'
p8162
aS'An aunt read him short stories when he was a child.'
p8163
aS'This period provided foundations for both the author and his stories.'
p8164
aS'In Bradbury\'s works of fiction, 1920s Waukegan becomes "Green Town," Illinois.The Bradbury family lived in Tucson, Arizona, in 1926-27 and 1932-33 as the father pursued employment, each time returning to Waukegan, but eventually settled in Los Angeles in 1934, when Bradbury was 14.'
p8165
aS'The term has a variety of meanings specific to a variety of disciplines ranging from linguistics to logic.'
p8166
aS'The most common application of recursion is in mathematics and computer science, in which it refers to a method of defining functions in which the function being defined is applied within its own definition.'
p8167
aS'Specifically, this defines an infinite number of instances (function values), using a finite expression that for some instances may refer to other instances, but in such a way that no loop or infinite chain of references can occur.'
p8168
aS"The term is also used more generally to describe a process of repeating objects in a self-similar way. Formal definitions In mathematics and computer science, a class of objects or methods exhibit recursive behavior when they can be defined by two properties:A simple base case (or cases)--a terminating scenario that does not use recursion to produce an answerA set of rules that reduce all other cases toward the base caseFor example, the following is a recursive definition of a person's ancestors:One's parents are one's ancestors (base case).The ancestors of one's ancestors are also one's ancestors (recursion step).The Fibonacci sequence is a classic example of recursion:Many mathematical axioms are based upon recursive rules."
p8169
aS'For example, the formal definition of the natural numbers by the Peano axioms can be described as: 0 is a natural number, and each natural number has a successor, which is also a natural number.'
p8170
aS'By this base case and recursive rule, one can generate the set of all natural numbers.Recursively defined mathematical objects include functions, sets, and especially fractals.There are various more tongue-in-cheek "definitions" of recursion; see recursive humor. Informal definition Recursion is the process a procedure goes through when one of the steps of the procedure involves invoking the procedure itself.'
p8171
aS"A procedure that goes through recursion is said to be 'recursive'.To understand recursion, one must recognize the distinction between a procedure and the running of a procedure."
p8172
aS'The cell membrane is composed of proteins and lipids, and this structure provides properties essential for physiological cell function such as deformability and stability while traversing the circulatory system and specifically the capillary network.In humans, mature red blood cells are flexible and oval biconcave disks.'
p8173
aS'They lack a cell nucleus and most organelles, in order to accommodate maximum space for hemoglobin.'
p8174
aS'Approximately 2.4 million new erythrocytes are produced per second in human adults.'
p8175
aS'The cells develop in the bone marrow and circulate for about 100-120 days in the body before their components are recycled by macrophages.'
p8176
aS'Each circulation takes about 20 seconds.'
p8177
aS'Approximately a quarter of the cells in the human body are red blood cells.Red_blood_cells are also known as RBCs, red cells, red blood corpuscles (an archaic term), haematids, erythroid cells or erythrocytes (from Greek erythros for "red" and kytos for "hollow vessel", with -cyte translated as "cell" in modern usage).'
p8178
aS'Packed red blood cells (pRBC) are red blood cells that have been donated, processed, and stored in a blood bank for blood transfusion. HistoryEdit The first person to describe red blood cells was the young Dutch biologist Jan Swammerdam, who had used an early microscope in 1658 to study the blood of a frog.'
p8179
aS'Indeed, an adaptation in a population of one species (e.g.'
p8180
aS'predators, parasites) may change the natural selection pressure on a population of another species (e.g.'
p8181
aS'prey, hosts), giving rise to an antagonistic coevolution.'
p8182
aS'If this positive feedback occurs reciprocally, a potential dynamic coevolution may result.In another idea, the Red_Queen_hypothesis is used independently by Hartung  and Bell to explain the evolution of sex, by John Jaenike to explain the maintenance of sex and W. D. Hamilton to explain the role of sex in response to parasites.'
p8183
aS'In all cases, sexual reproduction confers species variability and a faster generational response to selection by making offspring genetically unique.'
p8184
aS'Sexual species are able to improve their genotype in changing conditions.'
p8185
aS'Consequently co-evolutionary interactions, between host and parasite for example, may select for sexual reproduction in hosts in order to reduce the risk of infection.'
p8186
aS'In the north, there is the Sinai Peninsula, the Gulf of Aqaba, and the Gulf of Suez (leading to the Suez Canal).'
p8187
aS'The Red_Sea is a Global 200 ecoregion.'
p8188
aS'The sea is underlain by the Red_Sea Rift which is part of the Great Rift Valley.The Red_Sea has a surface area of roughly 438,000 km2 (169,100 mi2).'
p8189
aS'It is about 2250 km (1398 mi) long and, at its widest point, 355 km (220.6 mi) wide.'
p8190
aS'It has a maximum depth of 2211 m (7254 ft) in the central median trench, and an average depth of 490 m (1,608 ft).'
p8191
aS'However, there are also extensive shallow shelves, noted for their marine life and corals.'
p8192
aS'The sea is the habitat of over 1,000 invertebrate species, and 200 soft and hard corals.'
p8193
aS'Like acid-base reactions, redox reactions are a matched set, that is, there cannot be an oxidation reaction without a reduction reaction happening simultaneously.'
p8194
aS'The oxidation alone and the reduction alone are each called a half-reaction, because two half-reactions always occur together to form a whole reaction.'
p8195
aS'When writing half-reactions, the gained or lost electrons are typically included explicitly in order that the half-reaction be balanced with respect to electric charge.Though sufficient for many purposes, these descriptions are not precisely correct.'
p8196
aS'Oxidation and reduction properly refer to a change in oxidation state -- the actual transfer of electrons may never occur.'
p8197
aS'The oxidation state of an atom is the fictitious charge that an atom would have if all bonds between atoms of different elements were 100% ionic.'
p8198
aS'Thus, oxidation is better defined as an increase in oxidation state, and reduction as a decrease in oxidation state.'
p8199
aS'In practice, the transfer of electrons will always cause a change in oxidation state, but there are many reactions that are classed as "redox" even though no electron transfer occurs (such as those involving covalent bonds).There are simple redox processes, such as the oxidation of carbon to yield carbon dioxide (CO2) or the reduction of carbon by hydrogen to yield methane (CH4), and more complex processes such as the oxidation of glucose (C6H12O6) in the human body through a series of complex electron transfer processes. Etymology "Redox" is a combination of "reduction" and "oxidation".The word oxidation originally implied reaction with oxygen to form an oxide, since dioxygen (O2 (g)) was historically the first recognized oxidizing agent.'
p8200
aS'The law of reflection says that for specular reflection the angle at which the wave is incident on the surface equals the angle at which it is reflected.'
p8201
aS'Mirrors exhibit specular reflection.In acoustics, reflection causes echoes and is used in sonar.'
p8202
aS'In geology, it is important in the study of seismic waves.'
p8203
aS'Reflection is observed with surface waves in bodies of water.'
p8204
aS'Reflection is observed with many types of electromagnetic wave, besides visible light.'
p8205
aS'Reflection of VHF and higher frequencies is important for radio transmission and for radar.'
p8206
aS'Even hard X-rays and gamma rays can be reflected at shallow angles with special "grazing" mirrors. Reflection of light Reflection of light is either specular (mirror-like) or diffuse (retaining the energy, but losing the image) depending on the nature of the interface.'
p8207
aS"This is the historically first use of refractive indices and is described by Snell's law of refraction, n1 sin th1  n2 sin th2, where th1 and th2 are the angles of incidence and refraction, respectively, of a ray crossing the interface between two media with refractive indices n1 and n2."
p8208
aS"The refractive indices also determine the amount of light that is reflected when reaching the interface, as well as the critical angle for total internal reflection and Brewster's angle.The refractive index can be seen as the factor by which the speed and the wavelength of the radiation are reduced with respect to their vacuum values: the phase velocity of light in a medium is v  c/n, and similarly the wavelength in that medium is l  l0/n, where l0 is the wavelength of that light in vacuum."
p8209
aS'This implies that vacuum has a refractive index of 1, and that the frequency (f  v/l) of the wave is not affected by the refractive index.The refractive index varies with the wavelength of light.'
p8210
aS'This is called dispersion and causes the splitting of white light into its constituent colors in prisms and rainbows, and chromatic aberration in lenses.'
p8211
aS'Light propagation in absorbing materials can be described using a complex-valued refractive index.'
p8212
aS'The imaginary part then handles the attenuation, while the real part accounts for refraction.The concept of refractive index is widely used within the full electromagnetic spectrum, from X-rays to radio waves.'
p8213
aS'It can also be used with wave phenomena such as sound.'
p8214
aS"Descartes's influence in mathematics is equally apparent; the Cartesian coordinate system -- allowing reference to a point in space as a set of numbers, and allowing algebraic equations to be expressed as geometric shapes in a two- or three-dimensional coordinate system (and conversely, shapes to be described as equations) -- was named after him."
p8215
aS'He is credited as the father of analytical geometry, the bridge between algebra and geometry, crucial to the discovery of infinitesimal calculus and analysis.'
p8216
aS'Descartes was also one of the key figures in the scientific revolution and has been described as an example of genius.Descartes refused to accept the authority of previous philosophers, and refused to trust his own senses.'
p8217
aS'He frequently set his views apart from those of his predecessors.'
p8218
aS'In the opening section of the Passions of the Soul, a treatise on the early modern version of what are now commonly called emotions, Descartes goes so far as to assert that he will write on this topic "as if no one had written on these matters before".'
p8219
aS'Many elements of his philosophy have precedents in late Aristotelianism, the revived Stoicism of the 16th century, or in earlier philosophers like Augustine.'
p8220
aS'In his natural philosophy, he differs from the schools on two major points: First, he rejects the splitting of corporeal substance into matter and form; second, he rejects any appeal to final ends--divine or natural--in explaining natural phenomena.'
p8221
aS'This is because the system stores vibrational energy.Resonance occurs when a system is able to store and easily transfer energy between two or more different storage modes (such as kinetic energy and potential energy in the case of a pendulum).'
p8222
aS'However, there are some losses from cycle to cycle, called damping.'
p8223
aS'When damping is small, the resonant frequency is approximately equal to the natural frequency of the system, which is a frequency of unforced vibrations.'
p8224
aS'Some systems have multiple, distinct, resonant frequencies.Resonance phenomena occur with all types of vibrations or waves: there is mechanical resonance, acoustic resonance, electromagnetic resonance, nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR), electron spin resonance (ESR) and resonance of quantum wave functions.'
p8225
aS"Resonant systems can be used to generate vibrations of a specific frequency (e.g., musical instruments), or pick out specific frequencies from a complex vibration containing many frequencies (e.g., filters).The term Resonance (from Latin resonantia, 'echo', from resonare, 'resound') originates from the field of acoustics, particularly observed in musical instruments, e.g."
p8226
aS'when strings started to vibrate and to produce sound without direct excitation by the player. Examples One familiar example is a playground swing, which acts as a pendulum.'
p8227
aS'Pushing a person in a swing in time with the natural interval of the swing (its resonant frequency) will make the swing go higher and higher (maximum amplitude), while attempts to push the swing at a faster or slower tempo will result in smaller arcs.'
p8228
aS'Light striking the retina initiates a cascade of chemical and electrical events that ultimately trigger nerve impulses.'
p8229
aS'These are sent to various visual centres of the brain through the fibres of the optic nerve.In vertebrate embryonic development, the retina and the optic nerve originate as outgrowths of the developing brain, so the retina is considered part of the central nervous system (CNS) and is actually brain tissue.'
p8230
aS'It is the only part of the CNS that can be visualized non-invasively.The retina is a layered structure with several layers of neurons interconnected by synapses.'
p8231
aS'The only neurons that are directly sensitive to light are the photoreceptor cells.'
p8232
aS'These are mainly of two types: the rods and cones.'
p8233
aS'Rods function mainly in dim light and provide black-and-white vision, while cones support daytime vision and the perception of colour.'
p8234
aS'A third, much rarer type of photoreceptor, the intrinsically photosensitive ganglion cell, is important for reflexive responses to bright daylight.Neural signals from the rods and cones undergo processing by other neurons of the retina.'
p8235
aS'Ribosomes consist of two major components -- the small ribosomal subunit which reads the RNA, and the large subunit which joins amino acids to form a polypeptide chain.'
p8236
aS'Each subunit is composed of one or more ribosomal RNA (rRNA) molecules and a variety of proteins.'
p8237
aS'The ribosomes and associated molecules are also known as the translational apparatus.The sequence of DNA encoding for a protein may be copied many times into RNA chains of a similar sequence.'
p8238
aS'Ribosomes can bind to an RNA chain and use it as a template for determining the correct sequence of amino acids in a particular protein.'
p8239
aS'Amino_acids are selected, collected and carried to the ribosome by transfer RNA (tRNA molecules), which enter one part of the ribosome and bind to the messenger RNA chain.'
p8240
aS'The attached amino acids are then linked together by another part of the ribosome.'
p8241
aS"Once the protein is produced, it can then 'fold' to produce a specific functional three-dimensional structure.A ribosome is made from complexes of RNAs and proteins and is therefore a ribonucleoprotein."
p8242
aS'The most common activities of natural or in vitro-evolved ribozymes are the cleavage or ligation of RNA and DNA and peptide bond formation.'
p8243
aS'Within the ribosome, ribozymes function as part of the large subunit ribosomal RNA to link amino acids during protein synthesis.'
p8244
aS'They also participate in a variety of RNA processing reactions, including RNA splicing, viral replication, and transfer RNA biosynthesis.'
p8245
aS'Examples of ribozymes include the hammerhead ribozyme, the VS ribozyme, Leadzyme and the hairpin ribozyme.Investigators studying the origin of life have produced ribozymes in the laboratory that are capable of catalyzing their own synthesis under very specific conditions, such as an RNA polymerase ribozyme.'
p8246
aS'Mutagenesis and selection has been performed resulting in isolation of improved variants of the "Round-18" polymerase ribozyme from 2001.'
p8247
aS'"B6.61" is able to add up to 20 nucleotides to a primer template in 24 hours, until it decomposes by cleavage of its phosphodiester bonds.'
p8248
aS'The "tC19Z" ribozyme can add up to 95 nucleotides with a fidelity of 0.0083 mutations/nucleotide.Attempts have been made to develop ribozymes as therapeutic agents, as enzymes which target defined RNA sequences for cleavage, as biosensors, and for applications in functional genomics and gene discovery. Discovery Before the discovery of ribozymes, enzymes, which are defined as catalytic proteins, were the only known biological catalysts.'
p8249
aS"The first Act begins with King Richard sitting majestically on his throne in full state, having been requested that he arbitrate a dispute between Thomas Mowbray and Richard's cousin, Henry Bolingbroke, who has accused Mowbray of squandering money given to him by Richard for the King's soldiers and of murdering his uncle, the Duke of Gloucester."
p8250
aS"Bolingbroke's father, John of Gaunt, meanwhile, believes it was Richard himself who was responsible for his brother's murder."
p8251
aS'After several attempts to calm both men, Richard acquiesces and Bolingbroke and Mowbray challenge each other to a duel, over the objections of both Richard and Gaunt.The tournament scene is very formal with a long, ceremonial introduction, but as the combatants begin to fight, Richard interrupts and sentences both to banishment from England.'
p8252
aS'Bolingbroke is originally sentenced to leave for ten years, but Richard changes this to six years, while Mowbray is banished permanently.'
p8253
aS"The king's decision can be seen as the first mistake in a series leading eventually to his overthrow and death, since it is an error which highlights many of his character flaws, displaying as it does indecisiveness (both in terms of whether to allow the duel to go ahead and in terms of how long to exile Bolingbroke for), abruptness (Richard waits until the last possible moment to cancel the duel), and arbitrariness (there is no apparent reason why Bolingbroke should be allowed to return and Mowbray not)."
p8254
aS"In addition, the decision fails to dispel the suspicions surrounding Richard's involvement in the death of the Duke of Gloucester - in fact, by handling the situation so high-handedly and offering no coherent explanation for his reasoning, Richard only manages to appear more guilty."
p8255
aS'Mowbray predicts that the king will sooner or later fall at the hands of Bolingbroke.John of Gaunt dies and Richard II seizes all of his land and money.'
p8256
aS'After completing his undergraduate work at Whittier College, he graduated from Duke University School of Law in 1937 and returned to California to practice law.'
p8257
aS'He and his wife, Pat Nixon, moved to Washington to work for the federal government in 1942.'
p8258
aS'He subsequently served in the United_States Navy during World_War_II.'
p8259
aS'Nixon was elected to the House of Representatives in 1946 and to the Senate in 1950.'
p8260
aS'His pursuit of the Hiss Case established his reputation as a leading anti-communist, and elevated him to national prominence.'
p8261
aS'He was the running mate of Dwight D. Eisenhower, the Republican Party presidential nominee in the 1952 election.'
p8262
aS'Nixon served for eight years as vice president.'
p8263
aS"Literary critics believe his work helped change race relations in the United_States in the mid-20th century. Early life and education  Childhood in the South Richard Nathaniel Wright was born on September 4, 1908, at Rucker's Plantation, between Roxie and the larger community of Natchez, Mississippi."
p8264
aS'His autobiography, Black_Boy, covers the interval in his life from 1912 until May 1936.'
p8265
aS"Richard's father left the family when the boy was six years old, and he did not see him for another twenty-five years."
p8266
aS'After his single parent mother became incapacitated with a stroke, he was separated from his younger brother and lived briefly with his uncle.'
p8267
aS'At that time, twelve years of age, he had not yet had a single complete year of schooling.'
p8268
aS'Soon Richard and his mother moved to the home of his maternal grandmother in Jackson, Mississippi, where he lived from early 1920 until late 1925.'
p8269
aS'Finally he was able to attend school regularly, and after a year at age thirteen entered the Jim Hill public school where he was shortly promoted to sixth grade, after only two weeks.'
p8270
aS'The Riemann_zeta_function plays a pivotal role in analytic number theory and has applications in physics, probability theory, and applied statistics.This function, as a function of a real argument, was introduced and studied by Leonhard Euler in the first half of the eighteenth century without using complex analysis, which was not available at that time.'
p8271
aS'Bernhard_Riemann in his article "On the Number of Primes Less Than a Given Magnitude" published in 1859 extended the Euler definition to a complex variable, proved its meromorphic continuation and functional equation and established a relation between its zeros and the distribution of prime numbers.The values of the Riemann_zeta_function at even positive integers were computed by Euler.'
p8272
aS'The first of them, z(2), provides a solution to the Basel problem.'
p8273
aS'In 1979 Apery proved the irrationality of z(3).'
p8274
aS'The values at negative integer points, also found by Euler, are rational numbers and play an important role in the theory of modular forms.'
p8275
aS'Many generalizations of the Riemann_zeta_function, such as Dirichlet series, Dirichlet L-functions and L-functions, are known. Definition The Riemann_zeta_function z(s) is a function of a complex variable s  s + it.'
p8276
aS'(The notation with s, s, and t is traditionally used in the study of the z-function, following Riemann.'
p8277
aS"Despite serious initial problems with the Austrian censors who had control over northern Italian theatres at the time, the opera had a triumphant premiere at La Fenice in Venice on 11 March 1851.It is considered by many to be the first of the operatic masterpieces of Verdi's middle-to-late career."
p8278
aS"Its tragic story revolves around the licentious Duke of Mantua, his hunch-backed court jester Rigoletto, and Rigoletto's beautiful daughter Gilda."
p8279
aS"The opera's original title, La maledizione (The Curse), refers to the curse placed on both the Duke and Rigoletto by a courtier whose daughter had been seduced by the Duke with Rigoletto's encouragement."
p8280
aS'The curse comes to fruition when Gilda likewise falls in love with the Duke and eventually sacrifices her life to save him from the assassins hired by her father. Composition history Verdi was commissioned to write a new opera by the La Fenice opera house in Venice in 1850.'
p8281
aS'By this time he was already a well-known composer and had a degree of freedom in choosing the works he would prefer to set to music.'
p8282
aS"He then asked Francesco Maria Piave (with whom he had already created Ernani, I due Foscari, Macbeth, Il Corsaro and Stiffelio) to examine the play Kean by Alexandre Dumas, pere, but he felt he needed a more energetic subject to work on.Verdi soon stumbled upon Victor_Hugo's five-act play Le roi s'amuse."
p8283
aS'He later explained that "The subject is grand, immense, and there is a character that is one of the greatest creations that the theatre can boast of, in any country and in all history."'
p8284
aS"Rio_de_Janeiro is the capital of the state of Rio_de_Janeiro, Brazil's third-most populous state."
p8285
aS'Part of the city has been designated as a World Heritage Site, named "Rio_de_Janeiro: Carioca Landscapes between the Mountain and the Sea", by UNESCO on 1 July 2012 as a Cultural Landscape.Founded in 1565 by the Portuguese, the city was initially the seat of the Captaincy of Rio_de_Janeiro, a domain of the Portuguese Empire.'
p8286
aS'Later, in 1763, it became the capital of the State of Brazil, a state of the Portuguese Empire.'
p8287
aS'In 1808, when the Portuguese Royal Court transferred itself from Portugal to Brazil, Rio_de_Janeiro became the chosen seat of the court of Queen Maria I of Portugal, who subsequently, in 1815, under the leadership of her son, the Prince Regent, and future King Joao VI of Portugal, raised Brazil to the dignity of a kingdom, within the United Kingdom of Portugal, Brazil, and Algarves.'
p8288
aS'Rio stayed the capital of the pluricontinental lusitanian monarchy until 1822, when the War of Brazilian Independence began.'
p8289
aS'This is one of the few instances in history that the capital of a colonising country officially shifted to a city in one of its colonies.'
p8290
aS'Rio_de_Janeiro subsequently served as the capital of the independent monarchy, the Empire of Brazil, until 1889, and then the capital of a republican Brazil until 1960 when the capital was transferred to Brasilia.Rio_de_Janeiro has the second largest municipal GDP in the country, and 30th largest in the world in 2008, estimated at about R$343 billion (IBGE, 2008) (nearly US$201 billion).'
p8291
aS'It forms part of the border between Argentina and Uruguay, with the major ports and capital cities of Buenos_Aires and Montevideo on its western and northern shores, respectively.'
p8292
aS'The coasts of the Rio_de_la_Plata are the most densely populated areas of Argentina and Uruguay.In its waters took place the first naval battle in the Second World War and the first one of Battle of the Atlantic, the Battle of the River Plate. GeographyEdit Some geographers consider the Rio_de_la_Plata a gulf or marginal sea of the Atlantic Ocean, while others consider it a river.'
p8293
aS'For those who regard it to be a river, it is the widest in the world, with a maximum width of about 220 kilometres (140 mi) and a total surface area of about 35,000 square kilometres (14,000 sq mi).The Rio_de_la_Plata behaves as an estuary in which freshwater and seawater mix.'
p8294
aS"Its freshwater comes from the Parana River, one of the world's longest and the Rio's main tributary, as well as from the Uruguay River and other smaller streams."
p8295
aS'Currents in the Rio_de_la_Plata are controlled by tides reaching to its source and beyond, into the Uruguay and Parana rivers.'
p8296
aS'Both rivers are tidally influenced for about 190 kilometres (120 mi).'
p8297
aS'The tidal ranges in the Rio_de_la_Plata are small, but its large width allows for a tidal prism important enough to dominate the flow regime despite the huge discharge received by the tributary rivers.'
p8298
aS'Small rivers can be referred to using names such as stream, creek, brook, rivulet, and rill.'
p8299
aS'There are no official definitions for the generic term river as applied to geographic features, although in some countries or communities a stream is defined by its size.'
p8300
aS'Many names for small rivers are specific to geographic location; examples are "run" in some parts of the United_States, "burn" in Scotland and northeast England, and "beck" in northern England.'
p8301
aS'Sometimes a river is defined as being larger than a creek, but not always: the language is vague.Rivers are part of the hydrological cycle.'
p8302
aS'Water generally collects in a river from precipitation through a drainage basin from surface runoff and other sources such as groundwater recharge, springs, and the release of stored water in natural ice and snowpacks (e.g.'
p8303
aS'from glaciers).'
p8304
aS'Potamology is the scientific study of rivers while limnology is the study of inland waters in general.Extraterrestrial rivers have recently been found on Titan.'
p8305
aS'On the way he encounters the larger-than-life title character, Rob Roy MacGregor.'
p8306
aS"Though Rob Roy is not the lead character (in fact, the narrative does not move to Scotland until halfway through the book), his personality and actions are key to the novel's development.The book was loosely adapted into a film in 1995, starring Liam Neeson, Tim Roth, and Jessica Lange. Plot introduction The story takes place just before the Jacobite rising of 1715, with much of Scotland in turmoil.Frank Osbaldistone, the narrator, quarrels with his father and is sent to stay with an uncle, Sir Hildebrand Osbaldistone, in Northumberland."
p8307
aS"Frank falls in love with Diana Vernon, Sir Hildebrand's niece, whose father has been forced to go into hiding because of his Jacobite sympathies."
p8308
aS"Frank's cousin, Rashleigh, steals important documents vital to the honour and economic solvency of Frank's father, William, and Frank pursues Rashleigh to Scotland."
p8309
aS'Several times his path crosses the mysterious and powerful figure Rob Roy MacGregor, known as Rob Roy, an associate of Sir Hildebrand.'
p8310
aS'There is much confusion as the action shifts to the beautiful mountains and valleys around Loch Lomond.'
p8311
aS'A British army detachment is ambushed and there is bloodshed.'
p8312
aS'He is the best known of the poets who have written in the Scots language, although much of his writing is also in English and a light Scots dialect, accessible to an audience beyond Scotland.'
p8313
aS'He also wrote in standard English, and in these writings his political or civil commentary is often at its bluntest.He is regarded as a pioneer of the Romantic movement, and after his death he became a great source of inspiration to the founders of both liberalism and socialism, and a cultural icon in Scotland and among the Scottish Diaspora around the world.'
p8314
aS'Celebration of his life and work became almost a national charismatic cult during the 19th and 20th centuries, and his influence has long been strong on Scottish literature.'
p8315
aS'In 2009 he was chosen as the greatest Scot by the Scottish public in a vote run by Scottish television channel STV.As well as making original compositions, Burns also collected folk songs from across Scotland, often revising or adapting them.'
p8316
aS'His poem (and song) "Auld Lang Syne" is often sung at Hogmanay (the last day of the year), and "Scots Wha Hae" served for a long time as an unofficial national anthem of the country.'
p8317
aS'Other poems and songs of Burns that remain well known across the world today include "A Red, Red Rose"; "A Man\'s a Man for A\' That"; "To a Louse"; "To a Mouse"; "The Battle of Sherramuir"; "Tam o\' Shanter"; and "Ae Fond Kiss". Ayrshire  Alloway Burns was born two miles (3 km) south of Ayr, in Alloway, Ayrshire, Scotland, the eldest of the seven children of William Burnes (1721-1784) (Robert_Burns spelled his surname Burnes until 1786), a self-educated tenant farmer from Dunnottar, The Mearns, and Agnes Broun (or Brown) (1732-1820), the daughter of a tenant farmer from Kirkoswald, Ayrshire.He was born in a house built by his father (now the Burns Cottage Museum), where he lived until Easter 1766, when he was seven years old.'
p8318
aS'William Burnes sold the house and took the tenancy of the 70-acre (280,000 m2) Mount Oliphant farm, southeast of Alloway.'
p8319
aS'During this time, he served throughout the United_States, distinguished himself during the Mexican-American War, served as Superintendent of the United_States Military Academy, and married Mary Custis.When Virginia declared its secession from the Union in April 1861, Lee chose to follow his home state, despite his personal desire for the country to remain intact and despite an offer of a senior Union command.'
p8320
aS'During the first year of the Civil War, Lee served as a senior military adviser to President Jefferson_Davis.'
p8321
aS'Once he took command of the main field army in 1862 he soon emerged as a shrewd tactician and battlefield commander, winning most of his battles, all against far superior Union armies.'
p8322
aS"Lee's strategic foresight was more questionable, and both of his major offensives into the North ended in defeat."
p8323
aS"Lee's aggressive tactics, which resulted in high casualties at a time when the Confederacy had a shortage of manpower, have come under criticism in recent years."
p8324
aS"Union General Ulysses S. Grant's campaigns bore down on the Confederacy in 1864 and 1865, and despite inflicting heavy casualties, Lee was unable to turn the war's tide."
p8325
aS'He surrendered to Grant at Appomattox Court House on April 9, 1865.'
p8326
aS'He is highly regarded for his realistic depictions of rural life and his command of American colloquial speech.'
p8327
aS'His work frequently employed settings from rural life in New England in the early twentieth century, using them to examine complex social and philosophical themes.'
p8328
aS'One of the most popular and critically respected American poets of the twentieth century, Frost was honored frequently during his lifetime, receiving four Pulitzer Prizes for Poetry.'
p8329
aS'He became one of America\'s rare "public literary figures, almost an artistic institution."'
p8330
aS'He was awarded the Congressional Gold Medal in 1960 for his poetical works.'
p8331
aS'On July 22, 1961, Frost was named Poet laureate of Vermont. Biography  Early years Robert_Frost was born in San_Francisco, California, to journalist William Prescott Frost, Jr., and Isabelle Moodie.'
p8332
aS"His mother was a Scottish immigrant, and his father descended from Nicholas Frost of Tiverton, Devon, England, who had sailed to New Hampshire in 1634 on the Wolfrana.Frost's father was a teacher and later an editor of the San_Francisco Evening Bulletin (which later merged with The San_Francisco Examiner), and an unsuccessful candidate for city tax collector."
p8333
aS'In 1994 Merton won the National Medal of Science for his contributions to the field and for having founded the sociology of science.'
p8334
aS'He is considered to be one of the founding fathers of modern-day sociology.Merton developed notable concepts such as "unintended consequences", the "reference group", and "role strain" but is perhaps best known for having created the terms "role model" and "self-fulfilling prophecy".'
p8335
aS'A central element of modern sociological, political and economic theory, the "self-fulfilling prophecy" is a process whereby a belief or an expectation, correct or incorrect, affects the outcome of a situation or the way a person or a group will behave.'
p8336
aS'Merton\'s work on the "role model" first appeared in a study on the socialization of medical students at Columbia.'
p8337
aS'The term grew from his theory of a reference group, or the group to which individuals compare themselves, but to which they do not necessarily belong.'
p8338
aS"Social roles were a central piece of Merton's theory of social groups."
p8339
aS'Merton emphasized that, rather than a person assuming one role and one status, they have a status set in the social structure that has attached to it a whole set of expected behaviors. Life  Early life Robert K. Merton was born on July 4, 1910, in Philadelphia as Meyer Robert Schkolnick in a family of Yiddish speaking Russian Jews that had immigrated to the United_States in 1904.'
p8340
aS'While serving as Home Secretary, Peel reformed and liberalised the criminal law, and created the modern police force, leading to a new type of officer known in tribute to him as "bobbies" (in England) and "peelers" (in Ireland).'
p8341
aS'He cut tariffs to stimulate business; to replace the lost revenue he pushed through a 3% income tax.'
p8342
aS'He played a central role in making Free Trade a reality and set up a modern banking system.'
p8343
aS'Initially a supporter of legal discrimination against Catholics, Peel eventually supported the Roman Catholic Relief Act 1829, claiming "though emancipation was a great danger, civil strife was a greater danger".'
p8344
aS'In 1834, Peel issued the Tamworth Manifesto, laying down the principles upon which the modern British Conservative Party is based.'
p8345
aS'Peel often started from a traditional Tory position in opposition to a measure, then reversed himself and became the leader in supporting liberal legislation.'
p8346
aS'This happened with the Test Act (1828), Catholic Emancipation (1829), the Reform Act of 1832, the income tax (1842) and most notably the repeal of the Corn Laws (1846) as the first two years of the Irish famine forced this resolution because of the urgent need for new food supplies.'
p8347
aS'Rococo artists and architects used a more jocular, florid, and graceful approach to the Baroque.'
p8348
aS'Their style was ornate and used light colours, asymmetrical designs, curves, and gold.Unlike the political Baroque, the Rococo had playful and witty themes.'
p8349
aS'The interior decoration of Rococo rooms was designed as a total work of art with elegant and ornate furniture, small sculptures, ornamental mirrors, and tapestry complementing architecture, reliefs, and wall paintings.'
p8350
aS'The Rococo was also important in theatre.'
p8351
aS'The book The Rococo states that no other culture "has produced a wittier, more elegant, and teasing dialogue full of elusive and camouflaging language and gestures, refined feelings and subtle criticism" than Rococo theatre, especially that of France.By the end of the 18th century, Rococo was largely replaced by the Neoclassic style.'
p8352
aS'In 1835 the Dictionary of the French Academy stated that the word Rococo "usually covers the kind of ornament, style and design associated with Louis XV\'s reign and the beginning of that of Louis XVI".'
p8353
aS'It includes therefore, all types of art from around the middle of the 18th century in France.'
p8354
aS'He is sometimes credited (mainly since the nineteenth century) as one of the earliest European advocates of the modern scientific method inspired by Aristotle and later Arabic scholars such as the Muslim scientist Alhazen.'
p8355
aS'However, more recent re-evaluations emphasise that he was essentially a medieval thinker, with much of his "experimental" knowledge obtained from books, in the scholastic tradition.'
p8356
aS"A survey of how Bacon's work was received over the centuries found that it often reflected the concerns and controversies that were central to his readers.Roger_Bacon was born in Ilchester in Somerset, England, possibly in 1213 or 1214 at the Ilchester Friary."
p8357
aS'The only source for his birth date is his statement in the Opus Tertium, written in 1267, that "forty years have passed since I first learned the alphabet".'
p8358
aS'The 1214 birth date assumes he meant exactly 40 years had passed since he matriculated at Oxford at age 13.'
p8359
aS'If he had been literal, it is more likely he was born around 1220 to 1222, but the figure forty was also widely used in the Middle Ages simply as a synonym for many, leaving his actual date of birth in doubt.'
p8360
aS'In the same passage he said that for all but two of the forty years he had been engaged in study.'
p8361
aS'He was the son of naval officer Louis Barthes, who was killed in a battle in the North Sea before his son was one year old.'
p8362
aS'His mother, Henriette Barthes, and his aunt and grandmother raised him in the village of Urt and the city of Bayonne.'
p8363
aS'When Barthes was eleven, his family moved to Paris, though his attachment to his provincial roots would remain strong throughout his life.Barthes showed great promise as a student and spent the period from 1935 to 1939 at the Sorbonne, where he earned a license in classical letters.'
p8364
aS'He was plagued by ill health throughout this period, suffering from tuberculosis, which often had to be treated in the isolation of sanatoria.'
p8365
aS'His repeated physical breakdowns disrupted his academic career, affecting his studies and his ability to take qualifying examinations.'
p8366
aS'It also kept him out of military service during World_War_II and, while being kept out of the major French universities meant that he had to travel a great deal for teaching positions, Barthes later professed an intentional avoidance of major degree-awarding universities, and did so throughout his career.His life from 1939 to 1948 was largely spent obtaining a license in grammar and philology, publishing his first papers, taking part in a medical study, and continuing to struggle with his health.'
p8367
aS'In 1948, he returned to purely academic work, gaining numerous short-term positions at institutes in France, Romania, and Egypt.'
p8368
aS'The novel deals with the plots, personal and military battles, intrigues, and struggles of these states to achieve dominance for almost 100 years.Romance_of_the_Three_Kingdoms is acclaimed as one of the Four Great Classical Novels of Chinese literature; it has a total of 800,000 words and nearly a thousand dramatic characters (mostly historical) in 120 chapters.'
p8369
aS'The novel is among the most beloved works of literature in East Asia, and its literary influence in the region has been compared to that of the works of Shakespeare on English literature.'
p8370
aS'It is arguably the most widely read historical novel in late imperial and modern China. Overview Myths from the Three Kingdoms era existed as oral traditions before written compilations.'
p8371
aS'With their focus on the history of Han Chinese, the stories grew in popularity during the reign of the Mongol emperors of the Yuan dynasty.'
p8372
aS'During the succeeding Ming dynasty an interest in plays and novels resulted in further expansions and retelling of the stories.The earliest written work to combine these stories was a pinghua, Sanguozhi Pinghua (simplified Chinese: San Guo Zhi Ping Hua ; traditional Chinese: San Guo Zhi Ping Hua ; pinyin: Sanguozhi Pinghua; literally: "Story of Records of the Three Kingdoms"), published sometime between 1321 and 1323.'
p8373
aS'This version combined themes of legend, magic, and morality to appeal to the common people, who did not have education in literary Chinese.'
p8374
aS'Elements of reincarnation and karma were woven into this version of the story. Expansion of the history Romance_of_the_Three_Kingdoms is traditionally attributed to Luo Guanzhong, who lived sometime between 1330 and 1400 (late Yuan to early Ming period).'
p8375
aS'It covers 238,391 square kilometres (92,043 sq mi) and has a temperate-continental climate.'
p8376
aS'With its 19.9 million inhabitants, it is the seventh most populous member of the European Union.'
p8377
aS"Its capital and largest city, Bucharest, is the sixth largest city in the EU.The River Danube, which is Europe's second longest river after the Volga, rises in Germany and flows southeastwards for a distance of 2,857 km course through ten countries before emptying in Romania's Danube Delta."
p8378
aS'Some of its 1,075 km length bordering the country drains the whole of it.'
p8379
aS'The Carpathian Mountains (the tallest peak is Moldoveanu at 2,544 m, 8346 ft) cross Romania from the north to the southwest.Modern Romania emerged within the territories of the ancient Roman province of Dacia, and was formed in 1859 through a personal union of the principalities of Moldavia and Wallachia.'
p8380
aS'The new state, officially named Romania since 1866, gained independence from the Ottoman_Empire in 1877.'
p8381
aS'At the end of World_War_I, Transylvania, Bukovina and Bessarabia united with the sovereign Kingdom of Romania.'
p8382
aS"With 2.9 million residents in 1,285 km2 (496.1 sq mi), it is also the country's largest and most populated comune and fourth-most populous city in the European Union by population within city limits."
p8383
aS'The Metropolitan City of Rome has a population of 4.3 million residents.'
p8384
aS'The city is located in the central-western portion of the Italian Peninsula, within Lazio (Latium), along the shores of Tiber river.'
p8385
aS"Vatican City is an independent country within the city boundaries of Rome, the only existing example of a country within a city: for this reason Rome has been often defined as capital of two states.Rome's history spans more than two and a half thousand years."
p8386
aS'While Roman mythology dates the founding of Rome at only around 753 BC, the site has been inhabited for much longer, making it one of the oldest continuously occupied cities in Europe.'
p8387
aS"The city's early population originated from a mix of Latins, Etruscans and Sabines."
p8388
aS'Eventually, the city successively became the capital of the Roman Kingdom, the Roman Republic and the Roman Empire, and is regarded as one of the birthplaces of Western civilization.'
p8389
aS'Their mother was Rhea Silvia, daughter of Numitor, king of Alba Longa.'
p8390
aS"Before their conception, Numitor's brother Amulius seized power, killed Numitor's male heirs and forced Rhea Silvia to become a Vestal Virgin, sworn to chastity."
p8391
aS'Rhea Silvia conceived the twins by the god Mars, or by the god Hercules.'
p8392
aS'Once the twins were born, Amulius had them abandoned to die in the Tiber river.'
p8393
aS'They were saved by a series of miraculous interventions: the river carried them to safety, a she-wolf (in Latin, lupa) found and suckled them, and a woodpecker fed them.'
p8394
aS'A shepherd and his wife found them and fostered them to manhood as simple shepherds.'
p8395
aS'The twins, still ignorant of their true origins, proved to be natural leaders.'
p8396
aS'After studying with the University of London External Programme in 1927-29, Coase entered the London School of Economics, where he took courses with Arnold Plant.'
p8397
aS'He received the Nobel Prize in Economics in 1991.Coase, who believed economists should study real markets and not theoretical ones, established the case for the corporation as a means to pay the costs of operating a marketplace.'
p8398
aS'Coase is best known for two articles in particular: "The Nature of the Firm" (1937), which introduces the concept of transaction costs to explain the nature and limits of firms, and "The Problem of Social Cost" (1960), which suggests that well-defined property rights could overcome the problems of externalities (see Coase theorem).'
p8399
aS'Coase is also often referred to as the "father" of reform in the policy for allocation of the electromagnetic spectrum, based on his article "The Federal Communications Commission" (1959), where he criticises spectrum licensing, suggesting property rights as a more efficient method of allocating spectrum to users.'
p8400
aS"Additionally, Coase's transaction costs approach is currently influential in modern organizational economics, where it was reintroduced by Oliver E. Williamson. Biography Ronald Harry Coase was born in Willesden, a suburb of London, on 29 December 1910."
p8401
aS'His father, Henry Joseph Coase (1884-1973) was a telegraphist for the post office, as was his mother, Rosalie Elizabeth Coase (nee Giles; 1882-1972), before marriage.'
p8402
aS'As a child, Coase had a weakness in his legs, for which he was required to wear leg-irons.'
p8403
aS'It is the first of the High Holy Days or yamiym nvoraiym Yamim Nora\'im ("Days of Awe") which usually occur in the early autumn of the Northern Hemisphere.'
p8404
aS'Rosh_Hashanah is a two-day celebration, which begins on the first day of Tishrei.'
p8405
aS"Tishrei is the first month of the Jewish civil year, but the seventh month of the ecclesiastical year.The day is said to be the anniversary of the creation of Adam and Eve, the first man and woman, and their first actions toward the realization of humanity's role in God's world."
p8406
aS'Rosh_Hashanah customs include sounding the shofar (a hollowed-out ram\'s horn) and eating symbolic foods such as apples dipped in honey to evoke a "sweet new year". Greetings and stages The Hebrew common greeting on Rosh_Hashanah is shanah tvobah "Shanah Tovah", which, in Hebrew, means "[have a] good year" or similar greetings.'
p8407
aS'Thus, in Yiddish the greeting is a gvt yar "a gut yor" ("a good year") or a gvt g`b`ntsht yar "a gut gebentsht yor" ("a good blessed year").'
p8408
aS'Sephardic Jews traditionally say "tizku l\'shanim rabot" or "munchos anyos", both of which mean "many years".Serious greetings and blessings, based on the nature of the day, commonly used among religiously observant Jews are k@\'tiybah vakhatiymah tvobah "Ketivah VaChatimah Tovah" which means "[may you be] written/inscribed and sealed [for a good new year i.e.'
p8409
aS'by God]."'
p8410
aS'The fact that the rubaiyat is a collection of quatrains--and may be selected and rearranged subjectively to support one interpretation or another--has led to widely differing versions.'
p8411
aS'Nicolas took the view that Khayyam himself clearly was a Sufi.'
p8412
aS'Others have seen signs of mysticism, even atheism, or conversely devout and orthodox Islam.'
p8413
aS"FitzGerald gave the Rubaiyat a distinct fatalistic spin, although it has been claimed that he softened the impact of Khayyam's nihilism and his preoccupation with the mortality and transience of all things."
p8414
aS'Even such a question as to whether Khayyam was pro- or anti-alcohol gives rise to more discussion than might at first glance have seemed plausible. Edward FitzGerald versions The translations best known in English are those by Edward FitzGerald (1809-1883).1st edition - 1859 [75 quatrains]2nd edition - 1868 [110 quatrains]3rd edition - 1872 [101 quatrains]4th edition - 1879 [101 quatrains]5th edition - 1889 [101 quatrains]Of the five editions published, four were published under the authorial control of FitzGerald.'
p8415
aS"The fifth edition, which contained only minor changes from the fourth, was edited after his death on the basis of manuscript revisions FitzGerald had left.FitzGerald also produced Latin translations of certain rubaiyat.As a work of English literature FitzGerald's version is a high point of the 19th century and has been greatly influential."
p8416
aS'Indeed, the term "Rubaiyat" by itself has come to be used to describe the quatrain rhyme scheme that FitzGerald used in his translations: AABA.However, as a translation of Omar Khayyam\'s quatrains, it is not noted for its fidelity.'
p8417
aS"However, Manuel's conduct of allegedly engaging in excessive consumption of alcohol prompted Rosa to abandon her conjugal home and flee to the city of Metapa in Matagalpa where she gave birth to Felix Ruben."
p8418
aS'The couple made up and Rosa even gave birth to a second child, a daughter named Candida Rosa, who died a few days after being born.'
p8419
aS'The marriage deteriorated again to the point where Rosa left her husband and moved in with her aunt, Bernarda Sarmiento.'
p8420
aS'After a brief period of time, Rosa Sarmiento established a relationship with another man and moved with him to San Marcos de Colon, in Choluteca, Honduras.Ruben_Dario was born in Metapa, Matagalpa, Nicaragua.'
p8421
aS"Although, according to his baptism, Ruben's true surname was Garcia, his paternal family had been known by the surname Dario for many years."
p8422
aS'Ruben_Dario explained it as follows in his autobiography:According to what some of the old people in that town of my childhood have referred to me, my great-grandfather had Dario as his nickname or first name.'
p8423
aS'In this small town he was known by everyone as "Don Dario" and his entire family as the Darios.'
p8424
aS'He was born in Bombay, in the Bombay Presidency of British India, and was taken by his family to England when he was five years old.Kipling\'s works of fiction include The_Jungle Book (1894), Kim (1901), and many short stories, including "The Man Who Would Be King" (1888).'
p8425
aS'His poems include "Mandalay" (1890), "Gunga Din" (1890), "The Gods of the Copybook Headings" (1919), "The White Man\'s Burden" (1899), and "If--" (1910).'
p8426
aS'He is regarded as a major innovator in the art of the short story; his children\'s books are classics of children\'s literature; and one critic described his work as exhibiting "a versatile and luminous narrative gift".Kipling was one of the most popular writers in England, in both prose and verse, in the late 19th and early 20th centuries.'
p8427
aS'Henry_James said: "Kipling strikes me personally as the most complete man of genius (as distinct from fine intelligence) that I have ever known."'
p8428
aS'In 1907, he was awarded the Nobel Prize in Literature, making him the first English-language writer to receive the prize, and its youngest recipient to date.'
p8429
aS"Among other honours, he was sounded out for the British Poet Laureateship and on several occasions for a knighthood, all of which he declined.Kipling's subsequent reputation has changed according to the political and social climate of the age and the resulting contrasting views about him continued for much of the 20th century."
p8430
aS'George_Orwell called him a "prophet of British imperialism".'
p8431
aS"Rossiyskaya Federatsiya; IPA: [ra'sjijsk@j@ fjIdjI'ratsij@]), is a country in northern Eurasia."
p8432
aS'It is a federal semi-presidential republic.'
p8433
aS"At 17,075,400 square kilometres (6,592,800 sq mi), Russia is the largest country in the world, covering more than one-eighth of the Earth's inhabited land area."
p8434
aS"Russia is also the world's ninth most populous nation with nearly 144 million people as at November of 2014.Extending across the entirety of northern Asia and much of Eastern Europe, Russia spans nine time zones and incorporates a wide range of environments and landforms."
p8435
aS'From northwest to southeast, Russia shares land borders with Norway, Finland, Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania and Poland (both with Kaliningrad Oblast), Belarus, Ukraine, Georgia, Azerbaijan, Kazakhstan, China, Mongolia, and North Korea.'
p8436
aS"It shares maritime borders with Japan by the Sea of Okhotsk and the U.S. state of Alaska across the Bering Strait.The nation's history began with that of the East Slavs, who emerged as a recognizable group in Europe between the 3rd and 8th centuries AD."
p8437
aS'Founded and ruled by a Varangian warrior elite and their descendants, the medieval state of Rus arose in the 9th century.'
p8438
aS'She received her Ph.D and joined the faculty in 1923.'
p8439
aS"Margaret Mead, with whom she may have shared a romantic relationship, and Marvin Opler, were among her students and colleagues.Franz Boas, her teacher and mentor, has been called the father of American anthropology and his teachings and point of view are clearly evident in Benedict's work."
p8440
aS'Ruth_Benedict was affected by the passionate love of Boas, her mentor, and continued it in her research and writing.Benedict held the post of President of the American Anthropological Association and was also a prominent member of the American Folklore Society.'
p8441
aS'She became the first woman to be recognized as a prominent leader of a learned profession.'
p8442
aS'She can be viewed as a transitional figure in her field, redirecting both anthropology and folklore away from the limited confines of culture-trait diffusion studies and towards theories of performance as integral to the interpretation of culture.'
p8443
aS'She studied the relationships between personality, art, language and culture, insisting that no trait existed in isolation or self-sufficiency, a theory which she championed in her 1934 Patterns of Culture. Early life  Childhood Benedict was born Ruth Fulton in New_York_City on June 5, 1887, to Beatrice and Frederick Fulton.'
p8444
aS'Her mother worked in the city as a schoolteacher, while her father pursued a promising career as a homeopathic doctor and surgeon.'
p8445
aS'When the Civil War began, he left a fledgling political career to join the Union Army as an officer.'
p8446
aS'Hayes was wounded five times, most seriously at the Battle of South Mountain; he earned a reputation for bravery in combat and was promoted to the rank of major general.'
p8447
aS'After the war, he served in the U.S. Congress from 1865 to 1867 as a Republican.'
p8448
aS'Hayes left Congress to run for Governor of Ohio and was elected to two consecutive terms, from 1868 to 1872, and then to a third term, from 1876 to 1877.In 1876, Hayes was elected president in one of the most contentious and confused elections in national history.'
p8449
aS'He lost the popular vote to Democrat Samuel J. Tilden but he won an intensely disputed electoral college vote after a Congressional commission awarded him twenty contested electoral votes.'
p8450
aS"The result was the Compromise of 1877, in which the Democrats acquiesced to Hayes's election and Hayes ended all U.S. military involvement in Southern politics.Hayes believed in meritocratic government, equal treatment without regard to race, and improvement through education."
p8451
aS'He ordered federal troops to crush the Great Railroad Strike of 1877.'
p8452
aS'The genocide was planned by members of the core political elite known as the akazu, many of whom occupied positions at top levels of the national government.'
p8453
aS'Perpetrators came from the ranks of the Rwandan army, the National Police (gendarmerie), government-backed militias including the Interahamwe and Impuzamugambi, and the Hutu civilian population.The genocide took place in the context of the Rwandan Civil War, an ongoing conflict beginning in 1990 between the Hutu-led government and the Rwandan Patriotic Front (RPF), which was largely composed of Tutsi refugees whose families had fled to Uganda following earlier waves of Hutu violence against the Tutsi.'
p8454
aS'International pressure on the Hutu-led government of Juvenal Habyarimana resulted in a ceasefire in 1993 with a roadmap to implement the Arusha Accords that would create a power-sharing government with the RPF.'
p8455
aS'This agreement displeased many conservative Hutu, including members of the Akazu, who viewed it as conceding to enemy demands.'
p8456
aS'Among the broader Hutu populace, the RPF military campaign had also intensified support for the so-called "Hutu Power" ideology, which portrayed the RPF as an alien force intent on reinstating the Tutsi monarchy and enslaving Hutus, a prospect met with extreme opposition.On April 6, 1994, an airplane carrying Habyarimana and Burundian president Cyprien Ntaryamira was shot down on its descent into Kigali, killing all on board.'
p8457
aS"Genocidal killings began the following day: soldiers, police and militia quickly executed key Tutsi and moderate Hutu leaders, then erected checkpoints and barricades and used Rwandans' national identity cards to systematically kill Tutsi."
p8458
aS'These forces recruited or pressured Hutu civilians to arm themselves with machetes, clubs, blunt objects and other weapons to rape, maim and kill their Tutsi neighbors and to destroy or steal their property.'
p8459
aS'He committed suicide at the age of 35 through an overdose of barbital. Early life Ryunosuke_Akutagawa was born in the Kyobashi district of Tokyo, the third child and only son of father Toshizo Niihara and mother Fuku Niihara (nee Akutagawa).'
p8460
aS'He was named "Ryunosuke" ("Son [of] Dragon") because he was born in the Year of the Dragon, in the Month of the Dragon, on the Day of the Dragon, and at the Hour of the Dragon.'
p8461
aS'His mother went insane shortly after his birth, so he was adopted and raised by his maternal uncle, Akutagawa Dosho, from whom he received the Akutagawa family name.'
p8462
aS'He was interested in classical Chinese literature from an early age, as well as the works of Mori Ogai and Natsume Soseki.He entered the First High School in 1910, developing relationships with classmates such as Kan Kikuchi, Kume Masao, Yamamoto Yuzo, and Tsuchiya Bunmei, all of whom would later become authors.'
p8463
aS'He began writing after entering Tokyo Imperial University in 1913, where he studied English literature.While still a student he proposed marriage to a childhood friend, Yayoi Yoshida, but his adoptive family did not approve the union.'
p8464
aS'In 1916 he became engaged to Fumi Tsukamoto, whom he married in 1918.'
p8465
aS'They had three children: Hiroshi Akutagawa (1920-1981) was an actor, Takashi Akutagawa (1922-1945) was killed as a student draftee in Burma, and Yasushi Akutagawa (1925-1989) was a composer.After graduation, he taught briefly at the Naval Engineering School in Yokosuka, Kanagawa as an English language instructor, before deciding to devote his full efforts to writing. Literary career In 1914, Akutagawa and his former high school friends revived the literary journal Shinshicho ("New Currents of Thought"), publishing translations of William Butler Yeats and Anatole_France along with their own works.'
p8466
aS'It is located on the Neva River at the head of the Gulf of Finland on the Baltic Sea.'
p8467
aS'In 1914 the name of the city was changed from Saint_Petersburg to Petrograd (Russian: Petrograd; IPA: [pjItra\'grat]), in 1924 to Leningrad (Russian: Leningrad; IPA: [ljInjIn\'grat]), and in 1991, back to Saint_Petersburg.In Russian literature, informal documents, and discourse, the word "Saint" (Russian: Sankt) is usually omitted, leaving "Petersburg" (Russian: Peterburg).'
p8468
aS'In casual conversation Russians may drop the "burg" (Russian: burg) as well, referring to it as "Piter" (Russian: Piter).Saint_Petersburg was founded by Tsar Peter_the_Great on May 27 [O.S.'
p8469
aS'16] 1703.'
p8470
aS'Between 1713-1728 and 1732-1918, Saint_Petersburg was the imperial capital of Russia.'
p8471
aS'In 1918, the central government bodies moved from Saint_Petersburg (then named Petrograd) to Moscow.'
p8472
aS"It is Russia's 2nd largest city after Moscow with 5 million inhabitants (2012) and the fourth most populated federal subject."
p8473
aS'Influenced by Oscar Wilde, Lewis Carroll and Rudyard_Kipling, he himself influenced A.'
p8474
aS'A. Milne, Noel Coward and P. G. Wodehouse.Besides his short stories (which were first published in newspapers, as was customary at the time, and then collected into several volumes), he wrote a full-length play, The Watched Pot, in collaboration with Charles Maude; two one-act plays; a historical study, The Rise of the Russian Empire, the only book published under his own name; a short novel, The Unbearable Bassington; the episodic The Westminster Alice (a parliamentary parody of Alice in Wonderland); and When William Came, subtitled A Story of London Under the Hohenzollerns, a fantasy about a future German invasion and occupation of Britain. Life Hector Hugh Munro was born in Akyab, British Burma, which was then still part of the British Raj, and was governed from Calcutta under the authority of the Viceroy of India.'
p8475
aS'Saki was the son of Charles Augustus Munro, an Inspector General for the Indian Imperial Police, by his marriage to Mary Frances Mercer (1843-1872), the daughter of Rear Admiral Samuel Mercer.'
p8476
aS'Her nephew, Cecil William Mercer, later became a famous novelist as Dornford Yates.In 1872, on a home visit to England, Mary Munro was charged by a cow, and the shock caused her to miscarry.'
p8477
aS'She never recovered and soon died.'
p8478
aS'Charles Munro sent his children, including two-year-old Hector, home to England, where they were brought up by their grandmother and aunts in a strict and puritanical household.The young Hector Munro was educated at Pencarwick School in Exmouth and then as a boarder at Bedford School.'
p8479
aS'On a few occasions after he retired from Burma, Charles Munro travelled with Hector and his sister to fashionable European spas and resorts.In 1893 Hector Munro followed his father into the Indian Imperial Police and was posted to Burma.'
p8480
aS'At the height of his power, his sultanate included Egypt, Syria, Mesopotamia, Hejaz, Yemen and other parts of North Africa.Originally sent to Fatimid Egypt by his Zengid lord Nur ad-Din in 1163, Saladin climbed the ranks of the Fatimid government by virtue of his military successes against Crusader assaults on its territory and his personal closeness to the caliph al-Adid.'
p8481
aS"When Saladin's uncle Shirkuh died in 1169, al-Adid appointed Saladin vizier, a rare nomination of a Sunni Muslim to such an important position in the Shia Muslim-led caliphate."
p8482
aS"During his term as vizier Saladin began to undermine the Fatimid establishment, and following al-Adid's death in 1171 he took over the government and realigned the country's allegiance with the Baghdad-based Abbasid_Caliphate."
p8483
aS'In the following years, he led forays against the Crusaders in Palestine, ordered the successful conquest of Yemen and staved off pro-Fatimid rebellions in Upper Egypt.Not long after the death of Nur ad-Din in 1174, Saladin personally led the conquest of Syria, peacefully entering Damascus at the request of its governor.'
p8484
aS'By mid-1175, Saladin had conquered Hama and Homs, inviting the animosity of his former Zengid lords, who had been the official rulers of Syria.'
p8485
aS'Soon after, he defeated the Zengid army in battle and was thereafter proclaimed the "Sultan of Egypt and Syria" by the Abbasid caliph al-Mustadi.'
p8486
aS'He made further conquests in northern Syria and Jazira, escaping two attempts on his life by the Assassins, before returning to Egypt in 1177 to address issues there.'
p8487
aS'He unsuccessfully ran for the presidency in the 1952, 1958, and 1964 elections.'
p8488
aS'In 1970, he won the presidency in a close three-way race.'
p8489
aS'He was elected in a run-off by Congress as no candidate had gained a majority.As president, Allende adopted a policy of nationalization of industries and collectivization; due to these and other factors, increasingly strained relations between him and the legislative and judicial branches of the Chilean government - who did not share his enthusiasm for socialization - culminated in a declaration of a "constitutional breakdown" by the congress.'
p8490
aS"A centre-right majority including the Christian Democrats, whose support had enabled Allende's election, denounced his rule as unconstitutional and called for his overthrow by force."
p8491
aS"On 11 September 1973 the military moved to oust Allende in a coup d'etat sponsored by the United_States Central Intelligence Agency."
p8492
aS'As troops surrounded La Moneda Palace, Allende gave his last speech vowing not to resign.'
p8493
aS"He died later that day in uncertain and controversial circumstances.Following Allende's deposition, army General Augusto Pinochet declined to return authority to the civilian government; and Chile became ruled by a military junta that was in power from 1973 to 1990, ending almost 41 years of Chilean democratic rule."
p8494
aS'These vulnerabilities ultimately proved fatal for him.Samson is believed by some Jews and Christian traditions to have been buried in Tel Tzora in Israel overlooking the Sorek valley.'
p8495
aS'There reside two large gravestones of Samson and his father Manoah.'
p8496
aS"Nearby stands Manoah's altar (Judges 13:19-24)."
p8497
aS'It is located between the cities of Zorah and Eshtaol. Biblical narrative Samson\'s activity takes place during a time when God was punishing the Israelites, by giving them "into the hand of the Philistines".'
p8498
aS'The Angel of the Lord appears to Manoah, an Israelite from the tribe of Dan, in the city of Zorah, and to his wife, who had been unable to conceive.'
p8499
aS'The Angel of the Lord proclaims that the couple will soon have a son who will begin to deliver the Israelites from the Philistines.'
p8500
aS"The wife believed the Angel of the Lord, but her husband was not present, at first, and wanted the heavenly messenger to return, asking that he himself could also receive instruction about the child who was going to be born.Requirements were set up by the Angel of the Lord that Manoah's wife (as well as the child) were to abstain from all alcoholic beverages, and her promised child was not to shave or cut his hair."
p8501
aS'He is considered one of the last modernists.'
p8502
aS'As an inspiration to many later writers, he is also sometimes considered one of the first postmodernists.'
p8503
aS'He is one of the key writers in what Martin Esslin called the "Theatre of the Absurd".'
p8504
aS'His work became increasingly minimalist in his later career.Beckett was awarded the 1969 Nobel Prize in Literature "for his writing, which--in new forms for the novel and drama--in the destitution of modern man acquires its elevation".'
p8505
aS'He was elected Saoi of Aosdana in 1984. Biography  Early life and education The Becketts were members of the Anglican Church of Ireland.'
p8506
aS"The family home, Cooldrinagh in the Dublin suburb of Foxrock, was a large house and garden complete with tennis court built in 1903 by Samuel's father, William."
p8507
aS'The house and garden, together with the surrounding countryside where he often went walking with his father, the nearby Leopardstown Racecourse, the Foxrock railway station and Harcourt Street station at the city terminus of the line, all feature in his prose and plays.Samuel_Beckett was born on Good Friday, 13 April 1906 to William Frank Beckett, quantity surveyor and Maria Jones Roe, a nurse, when both were 35.'
p8508
aS'He was descended from Nathaniel Tilden, an early English settler who came to America in 1634.'
p8509
aS"His father and other family members were the makers of Tilden's Extract, a popular patent medicine of the 1800s and early 1900s derived from cannabis.He studied at Yale University, then studied law at New York University."
p8510
aS'He was admitted to the bar in 1841, becoming a skilled corporate lawyer, with many railroad companies as clients in the shaky railroad boom decade of the 1850s.'
p8511
aS'His legal practice, combined with shrewd investments, made him rich.'
p8512
aS"Tilden's success at money management and investing caused many of Tilden's friends, relatives and political allies, including Martin Van Buren, to allow Tilden to manage their finances.From 1843 to 1844, he served as New_York_City's Corporation Counsel.He was a member of the New York State Assembly (New York Co.) in 1846, and a delegate to the New York State Constitutional Convention of 1846."
p8513
aS'In 1848, largely on account of his personal attachment to Martin Van Buren, he participated in the revolt of the "Barnburners" or Free-Soil faction of the New York Democrats, which nominated Van Buren for President and helped ensure the defeat of Democrat Lewis_Cass and victory by Whig nominee Zachary Taylor.'
p8514
aS'He was among the few such who did not join the Republican Party and, in 1855, was the candidate of the Soft faction for New York State Attorney General.'
p8515
aS'Johnson was a devout Anglican and committed Tory, and has been described as "arguably the most distinguished man of letters in English history".'
p8516
aS'He is also the subject of "the most famous single work of biographical art in the whole of literature": James Boswell\'s Life of Samuel_Johnson.Born in Lichfield, Staffordshire, Johnson attended Pembroke College, Oxford for just over a year, before his lack of funds forced him to leave.'
p8517
aS"After working as a teacher he moved to London, where he began to write for The Gentleman's Magazine."
p8518
aS"His early works include the biography Life of Mr Richard Savage, the poems London and The Vanity of Human Wishes, and the play Irene.After nine years of work, Johnson's A Dictionary of the English Language was published in 1755."
p8519
aS'It had a far-reaching effect on Modern English and has been described as "one of the greatest single achievements of scholarship".'
p8520
aS'This work brought Johnson popularity and success.'
p8521
aS"Until the completion of the Oxford English Dictionary 150 years later, Johnson's was viewed as the pre-eminent British dictionary."
p8522
aS'His critical work, especially on Shakespeare, was highly influential, and he helped introduce German idealist philosophy to English-speaking culture.'
p8523
aS'Coleridge coined many familiar words and phrases, including suspension of disbelief.'
p8524
aS'He was a major influence on Emerson and American transcendentalism.Throughout his adult life Coleridge suffered from crippling bouts of anxiety and depression; it has been speculated that he suffered from bipolar disorder, a condition not identified during his lifetime.'
p8525
aS'He also suffered from poor physical health that may have stemmed from a bout of rheumatic fever and other childhood illnesses.'
p8526
aS'He was treated for these conditions with laudanum, which fostered a lifelong opium addiction. Early life Coleridge was born on 21 October 1772 in the country town of Ottery St Mary, Devon, England.'
p8527
aS"Samuel's father, the Reverend John Coleridge (1718-1781), was a well-respected vicar of the parish and headmaster of Henry VIII's Free Grammar School in the town."
p8528
aS'He had three children by his first wife.'
p8529
aS"He is also known as a prophet and is mentioned in the second chapter of the Qur'an, although not by name.His status, as viewed by rabbinical literature, is that he was the last of the Hebrew Judges and the first of the major prophets who began to prophesy inside the Land of Israel."
p8530
aS'He was thus at the cusp between two eras.'
p8531
aS"According to the text of the Books of Samuel, he also anointed the first two kings of the Kingdom of Israel: Saul and David. Biblical account  Family Samuel's mother was Hannah and his father was Elkanah."
p8532
aS'Elkanah lived at Rama-thaim in the district of Zuph.'
p8533
aS'His genealogy is also found in a pedigree of the Kohathites (1 Chron.'
p8534
aS'6:3-15) and in that of Heman, his great-grandson (ib.'
p8535
aS'vi.'
p8536
aS'It has a density of about 18,187 people per square mile (7,022 people per km2), making it the most densely settled large city (population greater than 200,000) in the state of California and the second-most densely populated major city in the United_States after New_York_City.'
p8537
aS'San_Francisco is the fourth-most populous city in California, after Los Angeles, San Diego and San Jose, and the 14th-most populous city in the United_States--with a Census-estimated 2014 population of 852,469.'
p8538
aS'The city and its surrounding areas are known as the San_Francisco Bay Area, which is a part of the larger OMB designated San Jose-San_Francisco-Oakland combined statistical area, the fifth most populous in the nation with an estimated population of 8.6 million.San_Francisco (Spanish for Saint Francis) was founded on June 29, 1776, when colonists from Spain established Presidio of San_Francisco at the Golden Gate and Mission San_Francisco de Asis named for St. Francis of Assisi a few miles away.'
p8539
aS'The California Gold Rush of 1849 brought rapid growth, making it the largest city on the West Coast at the time.'
p8540
aS'San_Francisco became a consolidated city-county in 1856.'
p8541
aS'After three-quarters of the city was destroyed by the 1906 earthquake and fire, San_Francisco was quickly rebuilt, hosting the Panama-Pacific International Exposition nine years later.'
p8542
aS'In World_War_II, San_Francisco was the port of embarkation for service members shipping out to the Pacific Theater.'
p8543
aS"Botticelli's posthumous reputation suffered until the late 19th century; since then his work has been seen to represent the linear grace of Early Renaissance painting."
p8544
aS"Among his best known works are The Birth of Venus and Primavera. Early life He was born in the city of Florence in a house in the Via Nuova, Borg'Ognissanti to Mariano di Vanni d'Amedeo Filipepi."
p8545
aS'Vasari reported that he was initially trained as a goldsmith by his brother Antonio.'
p8546
aS"There are very few details of Botticelli's life, but it is known that he became an apprentice when he was about fourteen years old, which would indicate that he received a fuller education than other Renaissance artists."
p8547
aS'Probably by 1462 he was apprenticed to Fra Filippo Lippi; many of his early works have been attributed to the elder master, and attributions continue to be uncertain.'
p8548
aS"Influenced also by the monumentality of Masaccio's painting, it was from Lippi that Botticelli learned a more intimate and detailed manner."
p8549
aS'As recently discovered, during this time, Botticelli could have traveled to Hungary, participating in the creation of a fresco in Esztergom, ordered in the workshop of Filippo Lippi by Janos Vitez, then archbishop of Hungary.By 1470, Botticelli had his own workshop.'
p8550
aS"Santiago is located in the country's central valley, at an elevation of 520 m (1,706 ft) above mean sea level.Founded in 1541, Santiago has been the capital city of Chile since colonial times."
p8551
aS'The city has a downtown core of 19th century neoclassical architecture and winding side-streets, dotted by art deco, neo-gothic, and other styles.'
p8552
aS"Santiago's cityscape is shaped by several stand-alone hills and the fast-flowing Mapocho River, lined by parks such as Parque Forestal."
p8553
aS'Mountains of the Andes chain can be seen from most points in the city.'
p8554
aS'These mountains contribute to a considerable smog problem, particularly during winter.'
p8555
aS"The city outskirts are surrounded by vineyards, and Santiago is within a few hours of both the mountains and the Pacific Ocean.Santiago's steady economic growth over the past few decades has transformed it into a modern metropolis."
p8556
aS'The city is now home to growing theater and restaurant scenes, extensive suburban development, dozens of shopping centers, and a rising skyline, including the tallest building in Latin America, the Gran Torre Santiago.'
p8557
aS'Cuneiform sources agree that he was cup-bearer (official in charge of wine) of king Ur-Zababa of Kish, and some later historians have speculated that he killed the king and usurped his throne before embarking on the quest to conquer Mesopotamia.'
p8558
aS"He was originally referred to as Sargon I until records concerning an Assyrian king also named Sargon (now usually referred to as Sargon I) were unearthed.Sargon's vast empire is thought to have included large parts of Mesopotamia, and included parts of modern-day Iran, Asia Minor and Syria."
p8559
aS'He ruled from a new, but as yet archaeologically unidentified capital, Akkad, which the Sumerian king list claims he built (or possibly renovated).'
p8560
aS'He is sometimes regarded as the first person in recorded history to create a multiethnic, centrally ruled empire, although the Sumerians Lugal-anne-mundu and Lugal-zage-si also have a claim.'
p8561
aS"His dynasty controlled Mesopotamia for around a century and a half. Origins and rise to power The exact dates of Sargon's birth or even death are unknown."
p8562
aS'According to the short chronology, he reigned from 2270 to 2215 BC (the Middle Chronology lists his reign as 2334 to 2279 BC).'
p8563
aS'These dates are based on the Sumerian king list.'
p8564
aS'He is the only writer to win the National Book Award for Fiction three times and he received the Foundation\'s lifetime Medal for Distinguished Contribution to American Letters in 1990.In the words of the Swedish Nobel Committee, his writing exhibited "the mixture of rich picaresque novel and subtle analysis of our culture, of entertaining adventure, drastic and tragic episodes in quick succession interspersed with philosophic conversation, all developed by a commentator with a witty tongue and penetrating insight into the outer and inner complications that drive us to act, or prevent us from acting, and that can be called the dilemma of our age."'
p8565
aS"His best-known works include The Adventures of Augie March, Henderson the Rain King, Herzog, Mr. Sammler's Planet, Seize the Day, Humboldt's Gift and Ravelstein."
p8566
aS'Widely regarded as one of the 20th century\'s greatest authors, Bellow has had a "huge literary influence.'
p8567
aS'"Bellow said that of all his characters Eugene Henderson, of Henderson the Rain King, was the one most like himself.'
p8568
aS'Bellow grew up as an insolent slum kid, a "thick-necked" rowdy, and an immigrant from Quebec.'
p8569
aS'As Christopher Hitchens describes it, Bellow\'s fiction and principal characters reflect his own yearning for transcendence, a battle "to overcome not just ghetto conditions but also ghetto psychoses."'
p8570
aS'Bellow\'s protagonists, in one shape or another, all wrestle with what Corde (Albert Corde, the dean in "The Dean\'s December") called "the big-scale insanities of the 20th century."'
p8571
aS'Reflections that undergo scattering are often called diffuse reflections and unscattered reflections are called specular (mirror-like) reflections.Scattering may also refer to particle-particle collisions between molecules, atoms, electrons, photons and other particles.'
p8572
aS"Examples are: cosmic rays scattering by the Earth's upper atmosphere; particle collisions inside particle accelerators; electron scattering by gas atoms in fluorescent lamps; and neutron scattering inside nuclear reactors.The types of non-uniformities which can cause scattering, sometimes known as scatterers or scattering centers, are too numerous to list, but a small sample includes particles, bubbles, droplets, density fluctuations in fluids, crystallites in polycrystalline solids, defects in monocrystalline solids, surface roughness, cells in organisms, and textile fibers in clothing."
p8573
aS'The effects of such features on the path of almost any type of propagating wave or moving particle can be described in the framework of scattering theory.Some areas where scattering and scattering theory are significant include radar sensing, medical ultrasound, semiconductor wafer inspection, polymerization process monitoring, acoustic tiling, free-space communications and computer-generated imagery.'
p8574
aS'Particle-particle scattering theory is important in areas such as particle physics, atomic, molecular, and optical physics, nuclear physics and astrophysics. Single and multiple scattering When radiation is only scattered by one localized scattering center, this is called single scattering, It is very common that scattering centers are grouped together, and in those cases the radiation may scatter many times, which is known as multiple scattering.'
p8575
aS'The main difference between the effects of single and multiple scattering is that single scattering can usually be treated as a random phenomenon and multiple scattering is usually more stochastic.'
p8576
aS'Because the location of a single scattering center is not usually well known relative to the path of the radiation, the outcome, which tends to depend strongly on the exact incoming trajectory, appears random to an observer.'
p8577
aS'This type of scattering would be exemplified by an electron being fired at an atomic nucleus.'
p8578
aS'The First Amendment did not alter the well-established law in cases where the attempt was made through expressions that would be protected in other circumstances.'
p8579
aS'In this opinion, Holmes said that expressions which in the circumstances were intended to result in a crime, and posed a "clear and present danger" of succeeding, could be punished.The Court continued to follow this reasoning to uphold a series of convictions arising out of prosecutions during war time, but Holmes began to dissent in the case of Abrams v. United_States, insisting that the Court had departed from the standard he had crafted for them, and had begun to allow punishment for ideas.'
p8580
aS'The "clear and present danger" standard remains the test of criminal prosecutions, but the Court has set another line of precedents to govern cases in which the constitutionality of a statute is challenged on its face. Background of the case Schenck v. United_States is the first in a line of Supreme Court Cases defining the modern understanding of the First Amendment.'
p8581
aS'Supreme Court Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr. wrote the often-cited opinion in the case, because of events that were not publicly known at the time.'
p8582
aS"The United_States' entry into the First World War had caused deep divisions in society, and was vigorously opposed, especially by those on the radical left and by those who had ties to Ireland or Germany."
p8583
aS'The Woodrow_Wilson Administration launched a broad campaign of criminal enforcement that resulted in thousands of prosecutions.'
p8584
aS'Many of these were for trivial acts of dissent.'
p8585
aS'Scopes was unsure whether he had ever actually taught evolution, but he purposely incriminated himself so that the case could have a defendant.Scopes was found guilty and fined $100 (equivalent to $1,345 in 2015), but the verdict was overturned on a technicality.'
p8586
aS'The trial served its purpose of drawing intense national publicity, as national reporters flocked to Dayton to cover the big-name lawyers who had agreed to represent each side.'
p8587
aS'William_Jennings_Bryan, three-time presidential candidate, argued for the prosecution, while Clarence Darrow, the famed defense attorney, spoke for Scopes.'
p8588
aS'The trial publicized the Fundamentalist-Modernist Controversy, which set Modernists, who said evolution was not inconsistent with religion, against Fundamentalists, who said the word of God as revealed in the Bible took priority over all human knowledge.'
p8589
aS'The case was thus seen as both a theological contest and a trial on whether modern science regarding the creation-evolution controversy should be taught in schools. Origins State Representative John W. Butler, a Tennessee farmer and head of the World Christian Fundamentals Association, lobbied state legislatures to pass anti-evolution laws; he succeeded when the Butler Act was passed in Tennessee on 21 March 1925.'
p8590
aS'Butler later stated, "I didn\'t know anything about evolution...'
p8591
aS'I\'d read in the papers that boys and girls were coming home from school and telling their fathers and mothers that the Bible was all nonsense."'
p8592
aS"In addition to the mainland, the country is made up of more than 790 islands, including the Northern Isles and the Hebrides.Edinburgh, the country's capital and second-largest city, was the hub of the Scottish Enlightenment of the 18th century, which transformed Scotland into one of the commercial, intellectual, and industrial powerhouses of Europe."
p8593
aS"Glasgow, Scotland's largest city, was once one of the world's leading industrial cities and now lies at the centre of the Greater Glasgow conurbation."
p8594
aS'Scottish waters consist of a large sector of the North Atlantic and the North Sea, containing the largest oil reserves in the European Union.'
p8595
aS"This has given Aberdeen, the third-largest city in Scotland, the title of Europe's oil capital.The Kingdom of Scotland emerged as an independent sovereign state in the Early Middle Ages and continued to exist until 1707."
p8596
aS'By inheritance in 1603, King James VI of Scotland became King of England and King of Ireland, thus forming a personal union of the three kingdoms.'
p8597
aS'Scotland subsequently entered into a political union with England on 1 May 1707 to create the new Kingdom of Great Britain.'
p8598
aS'The union also created a new Parliament of Great Britain, which succeeded both the Parliament of Scotland and the Parliament of England.'
p8599
aS'During his brief career, he wrote 44 original ragtime pieces, one ragtime ballet, and two operas.'
p8600
aS'One of his first pieces, the "Maple Leaf Rag", became ragtime\'s first and most influential hit, and has been recognized as the archetypal rag.Joplin was born into a musical family of railway laborers in Northeast Texas, and developed his musical knowledge with the help of local teachers.'
p8601
aS'Joplin grew up in Texarkana, where he formed a vocal quartet, and taught mandolin and guitar.'
p8602
aS'During the late 1880s he left his job as a laborer with the railroad, and travelled around the American South as an itinerant musician.'
p8603
aS"He went to Chicago for the World's Fair of 1893, which played a major part in making ragtime a national craze by 1897.Joplin moved to Sedalia, Missouri, in 1894 and earned a living as a piano teacher; there he taught future ragtime composers Arthur Marshall, Scott Hayden and Brun Campbell."
p8604
aS'Joplin began publishing music in 1895, and publication of his "Maple Leaf Rag" in 1899 brought him fame.'
p8605
aS'This piece had a profound influence on subsequent writers of ragtime.'
p8606
aS'The idiom "between Scylla and Charybdis" has come to mean being between two dangers, choosing either of which brings harm. MythologyEdit Various Greek myths account for Scylla\'s origins and fate.'
p8607
aS'According to some, she was one of the children of Phorcys and Ceto.'
p8608
aS'Other sources, including Stesichorus, cite her parents as Triton and Lamia.'
p8609
aS"According to John Tzetzes and Servius' commentary on the Aeneid, Scylla was a beautiful naiad who was claimed by Poseidon, but the jealous Amphitrite turned her into a monster by poisoning the water of the spring where Scylla would bathe.A similar story is found in Hyginus, according to whom Scylla was the daughter of the river god Crataeis and was loved by Glaucus, but Glaucus himself was also loved by the sorceress Circe."
p8610
aS'While Scylla was bathing in the sea, the jealous Circe poured a potion into the sea water which caused Scylla to transform into a monster with four eyes and six long necks equipped with grisly heads, each of which contained three rows of sharp teeth.'
p8611
aS"Her body consisted of 12 tentacle-like legs and a cat's tail, while four to six dog-heads ringed her waist."
p8612
aS"In this form, she attacked the ships of passing sailors, seizing one of the crew with each of her heads.In a late Greek myth, recorded in Eustathius' commentary on Homer and John Tzetzes, Heracles encountered Scylla during a journey to Sicily and slew her."
p8613
aS'When oceanic plates diverge, tensional stress causes fractures to occur in the lithosphere.'
p8614
aS'Basaltic magma rises up the fractures and cools on the ocean floor to form new sea floor.'
p8615
aS'Older rocks will be found farther away from the spreading zone while younger rocks will be found nearer to the spreading zone.Earlier theories (e.g.'
p8616
aS'by Alfred Wegener and Alexander du Toit) of continental drift were that continents "ploughed" through the sea.'
p8617
aS'The idea that the seafloor itself moves (and carries the continents with it) as it expands from a central axis was proposed by Harry Hess from Princeton University in the 1960s.'
p8618
aS'The theory is well accepted now, and the phenomenon is known to be caused by convection currents in the plastic, very weak upper mantle, or asthenosphere. Incipient spreading In the general case, sea floor spreading starts as a rift in a continental land mass, similar to the Red_Sea-East Africa Rift System today.'
p8619
aS'The process starts with heating at the base of the continental crust which causes it to become more plastic and less dense.'
p8620
aS'Severud Associates were the structural engineering consultants.The building stands 515 feet (157 m) tall with 38 stories, and was completed in 1958.'
p8621
aS'It stands as one of the finest examples of the functionalist aesthetic and a masterpiece of corporate modernism.'
p8622
aS"It was designed as the headquarters for the Canadian distillers Joseph E. Seagram's & Sons with the active interest of Phyllis Lambert, the daughter of Samuel Bronfman, Seagram's CEO."
p8623
aS"It has the worst Energy Star rating of any building in New York, at 3 out of 100.The building is owned by Aby Rosen's RFR Holdings. Architecture This structure, and the International style in which it was built, had enormous influences on American architecture."
p8624
aS"One of the style's characteristic traits was to express or articulate the structure of buildings externally."
p8625
aS"It was a style that argued that the functional utility of the building's structural elements when made visible, could supplant a formal decorative articulation; and more honestly converse with the public than any system of applied ornamentation."
p8626
aS"A building's structural elements should be visible, Mies thought."
p8627
aS'The Seattle metropolitan area of around 3.6 million inhabitants is the 15th largest metropolitan area in the United_States.'
p8628
aS'The city is situated on a narrow isthmus between Puget Sound (an inlet of the Pacific Ocean) and Lake Washington, about 100 miles (160 km) south of the Canada-United_States border.'
p8629
aS'A major gateway for trade with Asia, Seattle is the 8th largest port in the United_States and 9th largest in North America in terms of container handling.The Seattle area was previously inhabited by Native Americans for at least 4,000 years before the first permanent European settlers.'
p8630
aS'Arthur A. Denny and his group of travelers, subsequently known as the Denny Party, arrived on the schooner Exact at Alki Point on November 13, 1851.'
p8631
aS'The settlement was moved to its current site and named "Seattle" in 1852, after Chief Si\'ahl of the local Duwamish and Suquamish tribes.Logging was Seattle\'s first major industry, but by the late 19th century the city had become a commercial and shipbuilding center as a gateway to Alaska during the Klondike Gold Rush.'
p8632
aS'By 1910, Seattle was one of the 25 largest cities in the country.'
p8633
aS"However, the Great Depression severely damaged the city's economy."
p8634
aS'The war ended in victory for the British and the annexation of both republics.'
p8635
aS'Both would eventually be incorporated into the Union of South Africa in 1910. Name The conflict is commonly referred to as simply the Boer War, since the First Boer War (December 1880 to March 1881) is much less well known.'
p8636
aS'"Boers" was the common term for Afrikaans-speaking settlers in southern Africa at the time.'
p8637
aS'It is also known as the South African War outside South Africa and as the (Second) Anglo-Boer War among South Africans.'
p8638
aS'In Afrikaans it may be called the Anglo-Boereoorlog ("Anglo-Boer War"), Tweede Boereoorlog ("Second_Boer_War"), Tweede Vryheidsoorlog ("Second Freedom War", i.e.'
p8639
aS'a war of liberation) or Engelse oorlog ("English War"). Origins The complex origins of the war resulted from more than a century of conflict between the Boers and the British Empire, but of particular immediate importance was the question as to which nation would control and benefit most from the very lucrative Witwatersrand gold mines.'
p8640
aS'During the Napoleonic Wars, a British military expedition landed in the Cape Colony and defeated the defending Dutch forces at the Battle of Blaauwberg (1806).'
p8641
aS'for reversible processes, the sum of the entropies remains unchanged.The second law is an empirical finding that has been accepted as an axiom of thermodynamic theory.Statistical thermodynamics, classical or quantum, explains the law.The second law has been expressed in many ways.'
p8642
aS'Its first formulation is credited to the French scientist Sadi Carnot in 1824 (see Timeline of thermodynamics). Introduction The first law of thermodynamics provides the basic definition of thermodynamic energy, also called internal energy, associated with all thermodynamic systems, but unknown in classical mechanics, and states the rule of conservation of energy in nature.The concept of energy in the first law does not, however, account for the observation that natural processes have a preferred direction of progress.'
p8643
aS'The first law is symmetrical with respect to the initial and final states of an evolving system.'
p8644
aS'But the second law asserts that a natural process runs only in one sense, and is not reversible.'
p8645
aS'For example, heat always flows spontaneously from hotter to colder bodies, and never the reverse, unless external work is performed on the system.'
p8646
aS'The key concept for the explanation of this phenomenon through the second law of thermodynamics is the definition of a new physical quantity, the entropy.For mathematical analysis of processes, entropy is introduced as follows.'
p8647
aS'In a fictive reversible process, an infinitesimal increment in the entropy (dS) of a system results from an infinitesimal transfer of heat (dQ) to a closed system divided by the common temperature (T) of the system and the surroundings which supply the heat.The zeroth law of thermodynamics in its usual short statement allows recognition that two bodies in a relation of thermal equilibrium have the same temperature, especially that a test body has the same temperature as a reference thermometric body.'
p8648
aS'He was also granted the title of "Khadim ul Haramain ish Sharifain" (Servant of the Holy Cities of Mecca and Medina) by the Sharif of Mecca in 1517.'
p8649
aS"Through conquering and unification of Muslim lands, Selim became the defender of the Holy Cities of Mecca and Medina which strengthened the Ottoman claim to caliphate in the Muslim world.Selim's expansion into the Middle East represented a sudden change in the expansion policy of the empire, which, before his reign, had mostly been within the Balkans (Southeast Europe) and Anatolia (Asia Minor)."
p8650
aS"On the eve of his death in 1520, the Ottoman_Empire spanned almost 1 billion acres (about 4 million square kilometers), having tripled in size during Selim's reign. Biography Born in Amasya around 1470, Selim was the youngest son of Bayezid II (1481-1512)."
p8651
aS"Selim's mother was Ayse Hatun, a Turkish princess from the Dulkadir State centered around Elbistan in Maras; her father was Alauddevle Bozkurt Bey, the eleventh ruler of the Dulkadirs."
p8652
aS"Some academics state that Selim's mother was a Pontic Greek lady named Gulbahar Hatun, however, chronological analysis suggests that this is highly unlikely and that his biological mother was Ayse Hatun.By 1512, Sehzade Ahmet was the favorite candidate to succeed his father."
p8653
aS'Bayezid, who was really reluctant to continue his rule over the empire, announced Ahmet as heir apparent to the throne.'
p8654
aS'Angered with this announcement, Selim rebelled.'
p8655
aS'Semiconducting materials exist in two types - elemental materials and compound materials.'
p8656
aS'The modern understanding of the properties of a semiconductor relies on quantum physics to explain the movement of electrons and holes in a crystal lattice.'
p8657
aS'The unique arrangement of the crystal lattice makes silicon and germanium the most commonly used elements in the preparation of semiconducting materials.'
p8658
aS'An increased knowledge of semiconductor materials and fabrication processes has made possible continuing increases in the complexity and speed of microprocessors and memory devices.'
p8659
aS'Some of the information on this page may be outdated within a year, due to the fact that new discoveries are made in the field frequently.The electrical conductivity of a semiconductor material increases with increasing temperature, which is behaviour opposite to that of a metal.'
p8660
aS'Semiconductor devices can display a range of useful properties such as passing current more easily in one direction than the other, showing variable resistance, and sensitivity to light or heat.'
p8661
aS'Because the electrical properties of a semiconductor material can be modified by controlled addition of impurities, or by the application of electrical fields or light, devices made from semiconductors can be used for amplification, switching, and energy conversion.Current conduction in a semiconductor occurs through the movement of free electrons and "holes", collectively known as charge carriers.'
p8662
aS'Held in Seneca Falls, New York, it spanned two days over July 19-20, 1848.'
p8663
aS"Attracting widespread attention, it was soon followed by other women's rights conventions, including one in Rochester, New York two weeks later."
p8664
aS"In 1850 the first in a series of annual National Women's Rights Conventions met in Worcester, Massachusetts.Female Quakers local to the area organized the meeting along with Elizabeth Cady Stanton, who was not a Quaker."
p8665
aS'They planned the event during a visit to the area by Philadelphia-based Lucretia Mott.'
p8666
aS'Mott, a Quaker, was famous for her oratorical ability, which was rare during an era which women were often not allowed to speak in public.The meeting had six sessions, included a lecture on law, a humorous presentation, and multiple discussions about the role of women in society.'
p8667
aS'Stanton and the Quaker women presented two prepared documents, the Declaration of Sentiments and an accompanying list of resolutions, to be debated and modified before being put forward for signatures.'
p8668
aS"A heated debate sprang up regarding women's right to vote, with many including Mott urging the removal of this concept, but Frederick Douglass argued eloquently for its inclusion, and the suffrage resolution was retained."
p8669
aS'Senegal covers a land area of almost 197,000 square kilometres (76,000 sq mi), and has an estimated population of about 13 million.'
p8670
aS'The climate is tropical and alternates between a dry season and rainy season.'
p8671
aS"Senegal's capital and largest city is Dakar.The territory of modern Senegal has been inhabited by various ethnic groups since the prehistoric era."
p8672
aS'Organized kingdoms emerged around the seventh century, and parts of the country were ruled by prominent regional empires such as the Jolof.'
p8673
aS'The present state of Senegal has its roots in European colonialism, which began during the mid-15th century, when various European powers began competing for trade in the area.'
p8674
aS'The establishment of coastal trading posts gradually gave way to control of the mainland, culminating in French rule of the area by the 19th century, albeit amid much local resistance.'
p8675
aS"Senegal peacefully attained independence from France in 1960, and has since been among the more politically stable countries in Africa.Senegal's economy is centered mostly on commodities and natural resources."
p8676
aS'As the creator of acknowledged masterpieces across numerous musical genres, he is regarded as one of the major composers of the 20th century.'
p8677
aS'His works include such widely heard works as the March from The Love for Three Oranges, the suite Lieutenant Kije, the ballet Romeo and Juliet - from which "Dance of the Knights" is taken - and Peter and the Wolf.'
p8678
aS'Of the established forms and genres in which he worked, he created - excluding juvenilia - seven completed operas, seven symphonies, eight ballets, five piano concertos, two violin concertos, a cello concerto, and nine completed piano sonatas.A graduate of the St Petersburg Conservatory, Prokofiev initially made his name as an iconoclastic composer-pianist, achieving notoriety with a series of ferociously dissonant and virtuosic works for his instrument, including his first two piano concertos.'
p8679
aS'In 1915 Prokofiev made a decisive break from the standard composer-pianist category with his orchestral Scythian Suite, compiled from music originally composed for a ballet commissioned by Sergei Diaghilev of the Ballets Russes.'
p8680
aS"Diaghilev commissioned three further ballets from Prokofiev - Chout, Le pas d'acier and The Prodigal Son - which at the time of their original production all caused a sensation among both critics and colleagues."
p8681
aS"Prokofiev's greatest interest, however, was opera, and he composed several works in that genre, including The Gambler and The Fiery Angel."
p8682
aS"Prokofiev's one operatic success during his lifetime was The Love for Three Oranges, composed for the Chicago Opera and subsequently performed over the following decade in Europe and Russia.After the Revolution, Prokofiev left Russia with the official blessing of the Soviet minister Anatoly Lunacharsky, and resided in the United_States, then Germany, then Paris, making his living as a composer, pianist and conductor."
p8683
aS'Rachmaninoff is widely considered as one of the finest pianists of his day and, as a composer, one of the last great representatives of Romanticism in Russian classical music.Early influences of Tchaikovsky, Rimsky-Korsakov, and other Russian composers gave way to a personal style notable for its song-like melodicism, expressiveness and his use of rich orchestral colors.'
p8684
aS"The piano is featured prominently in Rachmaninoff's compositional output, and through his own skills as a performer he explored the expressive possibilities of the instrument. Life  Childhood and youth The Rachmaninoff family, of Russian and distant Moldavian (allegedly from one of Stephen the Great sons) was part of the Russian aristocracy, having been in the service of the Russian tsars since the 16th century, and had strong musical and military leanings."
p8685
aS"The composer's father, Vasily Arkadyevich Rachmaninoff (1841-1916), an amateur pianist and army officer, married Lyubov Petrovna Butakova (1853-1929), gained five estates as a dowry, and had three boys and three girls."
p8686
aS'Sergei was born on 1 April [O.S.'
p8687
aS'20 March] 1873 at the estate of Semyonovo, in Oneg, near Great Novgorod in north-western Russia.When he was four, his mother gave him casual piano lessons, but it was his paternal grandfather, Arkady Alexandrovich, who brought Anna Ornatskaya, a teacher from Saint_Petersburg, to teach Sergei in 1882.'
p8688
aS'Ornatskaya remained for "two or three years", until Vasily had to auction off their home due to his financial incompetence--the five estates had been reduced to one; he was described as "a wastrel, a compulsive gambler, a pathological liar, and a skirt chaser"--and they moved to a small flat in Saint_Petersburg.Ornatskaya returned to her home, and arranged for Sergei to study at the Saint_Petersburg Conservatory, which he entered in 1883, at age ten.'
p8689
aS'That year his sister Sofia died of diphtheria, and his father left the family, with their approval, for Moscow.'
p8690
aS"It is popularly thought to be a contributor to feelings of well-being and happiness.Approximately 90% of the human body's total serotonin is located in the enterochromaffin cells in the GI tract, where it is used to regulate intestinal movements."
p8691
aS'The remainder is synthesized in serotonergic neurons of the CNS, where it has various functions.'
p8692
aS'These include the regulation of mood, appetite, and sleep.'
p8693
aS'Serotonin also has some cognitive functions, including memory and learning.'
p8694
aS'Modulation of serotonin at synapses is thought to be a major action of several classes of pharmacological antidepressants.Serotonin secreted from the enterochromaffin cells eventually finds its way out of tissues into the blood.'
p8695
aS'There, it is actively taken up by blood platelets, which store it.'
p8696
aS'When the platelets bind to a clot, they release serotonin, where it serves as a vasoconstrictor and helps to regulate hemostasis and blood clotting.'
p8697
aS'Set is not, however, a god to be ignored or avoided; he has a positive role where he is employed by Ra on his solar boat to repel the serpent of Chaos Apep.'
p8698
aS'Set had a vital role as a reconciled combatant.'
p8699
aS"He was lord of the red (desert) land where he was the balance to Horus' role as lord of the black (soil) land.In Egyptian mythology, Set is portrayed as the usurper who killed and mutilated his own brother Osiris."
p8700
aS"Osiris' wife Isis reassembled Osiris' corpse and resurrected him long enough to conceive his son and heir Horus."
p8701
aS'Horus sought revenge upon Set, and the myths describe their conflicts.'
p8702
aS"The death of Osiris and the battle between Horus and Set is a popular theme in Egyptian mythology. Family Set's siblings are Osiris, Isis, and Nephthys."
p8703
aS'He married Nephthys and fathered Anubis; and in some accounts he had relationships with other goddesses: Hathor, Neith and the foreign goddesses Anat, and Astarte. Origin The meaning of the name Seth is unknown, thought to have been originally pronounced *Sutah based on the occurrence of his name in Egyptian hieroglyphs (swth), and his later mention in the Coptic documents with the name Set. Set animal In art, Set is mostly depicted as a fabulous creature, referred to by Egyptologists as the Set animal.'
p8704
aS'Other nearby island countries and territories include Comoros, Mayotte, Madagascar, Reunion, and Mauritius to the south.Seychelles, with a population of 90,024, has the smallest population of any African state.'
p8705
aS'Seychelles is a member of the African Union. History The Seychelles was uninhabited throughout most of recorded history.'
p8706
aS'Some scholars assume that Austronesian seafarers and later Maldivian and Arab traders were the first to visit the uninhabited Seychelles.'
p8707
aS'The earliest recorded sighting by Europeans took place in 1502 by the Portuguese Admiral Vasco da Gama, who passed through the Amirantes and named them after himself (islands of the Admiral).'
p8708
aS'The earliest recorded landing was in January 1609, by the crew of the "Ascension" under Captain Sharpeigh during the fourth voyage of the English East India Company.A transit point for trade between Africa and Asia, the islands were occasionally used by pirates until the French began to take control starting in 1756 when a Stone of Possession was laid by Captain Nicholas Morphey.'
p8709
aS"The islands were named after Jean Moreau de Sechelles, Louis XV's Minister of Finance.The British contested control over the islands between 1794 and 1810."
p8710
aS'Jean Baptiste Queau de Quincy, French administrator of Seychelles during the years of war with the United Kingdom, declined to resist when armed enemy warships arrived.'
p8711
aS'The holiday is one of the Shalosh Regalim, the three Biblical pilgrimage festivals.'
p8712
aS'It marks the conclusion of the Counting of the Omer, and its date is directly linked to that of Passover.'
p8713
aS'The Torah mandates the seven-week Counting of the Omer, beginning on the second day of Passover, to be immediately followed by Shavuot.'
p8714
aS'This counting of days and weeks is understood to express anticipation and desire for the giving of the Torah.'
p8715
aS'On Passover, the people of Israel were freed from their enslavement to Pharaoh; on Shavuot they were given the Torah and became a nation committed to serving God.'
p8716
aS'The word Shavuot means weeks, and the festival of Shavuot marks the completion of the seven-week counting period between Passover and Shavuot.Shavuot is one of the lesser-known Jewish holidays among secular Jews in the Jewish diaspora, while those in Israel are more aware of it.'
p8717
aS'According to Jewish law, Shavuot is celebrated in Israel for one day and in the Diaspora (outside of Israel) for two days.'
p8718
aS'It is one of the few plays from the 18th century to have an enduring appeal, and is still regularly performed today.'
p8719
aS'It has been adapted into a film several times, including in 1914 and 1923.'
p8720
aS'Initially the play was titled Mistakes of a Night, and indeed, the events within the play take place in one long night.'
p8721
aS"In 1778 John O'Keeffe wrote a loose sequel, Tony Lumpkin in Town. Plot Wealthy countryman Mr. Hardcastle arranges for his daughter Kate to meet Charles Marlow, the son of a rich Londoner, hoping the pair will marry."
p8722
aS'Unfortunately, Marlow is nervous around upper-class women, yet the complete opposite around working-class women.'
p8723
aS"On his first acquaintance with Kate, the latter realises she will have to pretend to be 'common', or Marlow will not woo her."
p8724
aS"Thus Kate 'stoops to conquer', by posing as a maid, hoping to put Marlow at his ease so he falls for her."
p8725
aS'SSSS 1-7) is a landmark federal statute in the history of United_States antitrust law (or "competition law") passed by Congress in 1890.'
p8726
aS'It prohibits certain business activities that federal government regulators deem to be anti-competitive, and requires the federal government to investigate and pursue trusts.It has since, more broadly, been used to oppose the combination of entities that could potentially harm competition, such as monopolies or cartels.According to its authors, it was not intended to impact market gains obtained by honest means, by benefiting the consumers more than the competitors.'
p8727
aS'Senator George Hoar of Massachusetts, another author of the Sherman Act, said the following:"... [a person] who merely by superior skill and intelligence...got the whole business because nobody could do it as well as he could was not a monopolist..(but was if) it involved something like the use of means which made it impossible for other persons to engage in fair competition.'
p8728
aS'"The Act\'s reference to "trusts", and to "antitrust" law in general, is sometimes misunderstood by modern readers.'
p8729
aS'In 19th century America, the term "trust" was synonymous with monopolistic practice, because the trust was a popular way for monopolists to hold their businesses, and a way for cartel participants to create enforceable agreements.'
p8730
aS'In most countries outside the United_States, antitrust law is known as "competition law", instead.In 1879, C. T. Dodd, an attorney for the Standard Oil Company of Ohio, devised a new type of trust agreement to overcome prohibitions in Ohio against corporations owning stock in other corporations.'
p8731
aS'A trust is an otherwise neutral, centuries-old form of a contract whereby one party entrusts its property to a second party.'
p8732
aS'He is one of the five primary forms of God in the Smarta tradition, and "the Destroyer" or "the Transformer" among the Trimurti, the Hindu Trinity of the primary aspects of the divine.At the highest level, Shiva is regarded as limitless, transcendent, unchanging and formless.'
p8733
aS'Shiva also has many benevolent and fearsome forms.'
p8734
aS'In benevolent aspects, he is depicted as an omniscient Yogi who lives an ascetic life on Mount Kailash, as well as a householder with wife Parvati and his two children, Ganesha and Kartikeya, and in fierce aspects, he is often depicted slaying demons.'
p8735
aS'Shiva is also regarded as the patron god of yoga and arts.The main iconographical attributes of Shiva are the third eye on his forehead, the snake Vasuki around his neck, the adorning crescent moon, the holy river Ganga flowing from his matted hair, the trishula as his weapon and the damaru as his musical instrument.'
p8736
aS'Shiva is usually worshiped in the aniconic form of Lingam. Etymology and other names The Sanskrit word Shiva (Devanagari: shiv, siva) comes from Shri Rudram Chamakam of Taittiriya Samhita (TS 4.5, 4.7) of Krishna Yajurveda.'
p8737
aS'The root word [?'
p8738
aS']si means auspicious.'
p8739
aS'As a poet he used dialects.'
p8740
aS'He became a flautist and sold poems to publications.'
p8741
aS'He eventually became a university professor and is known for his adaptation of musical meter to poetry.'
p8742
aS'Many schools, other structures and two lakes are named for him. Biography Sidney Clopton Lanier was born February 3, 1842, in Macon, Georgia, to parents Robert Sampson Lanier and Mary Jane Anderson; he was mostly of English ancestry.'
p8743
aS'His distant French Huguenot ancestors immigrated to England in the 16th century, fleeing religious persecution.'
p8744
aS'He began playing the flute at an early age, and his love of that musical instrument continued throughout his life.'
p8745
aS'He attended Oglethorpe University, which at the time was near Milledgeville, Georgia, and he was a member of the Sigma Alpha Epsilon fraternity.'
p8746
aS'This part of the opera is primarily inspired by the story of the legendary hero Sigurd in Norse mythology. Composition historyEdit  SourcesEdit Siegfried is a man without fear, and he expresses to his foster father Mime his wish to learn to fear.'
p8747
aS'Mime tells him that the wise learn fear quickly, but the stupid find it more difficult.'
p8748
aS'In a letter to his friend Theodor Uhlig, Wagner recounted The Story of the Youth Who Went Forth to Learn What Fear Was, about a boy so stupid he had never learned to be afraid.'
p8749
aS'Wagner wrote that the boy and Siegfried are the same character.'
p8750
aS"The boy is taught to fear by his wife, and Siegfried learns it when he discovers the sleeping Brunnhilde.Act 3, Scene 1 (between The Wanderer and Erda) is based on the Eddic poem Baldrs draumar. RolesEdit  SynopsisEdit  Act 1Edit In a cave in the forest, the Nibelung dwarf Mime, Alberich's brother, is forging a sword."
p8751
aS'Mime is plotting to obtain the ring for himself.'
p8752
aS'He has raised the human boy Siegfried as a foster child, to kill the dragon, Fafner, who guards the ring and other treasures.'
p8753
aS'Upon completing his habilitation in 1885, he was appointed a docent in neuropathology in the same year and became an affiliated professor (professor extraordinarius) in 1902.In creating psychoanalysis, a clinical method for treating psychopathology through dialogue between a patient and a psychoanalyst, Freud developed therapeutic techniques such as the use of free association and discovered transference, establishing its central role in the analytic process.'
p8754
aS"Freud's redefinition of sexuality to include its infantile forms led him to formulate the Oedipus complex as the central tenet of psychoanalytical theory."
p8755
aS'His analysis of dreams as wish-fulfillments provided him with models for the clinical analysis of symptom formation and the mechanisms of repression as well as for elaboration of his theory of the unconscious as an agency disruptive of conscious states of mind.'
p8756
aS'Freud postulated the existence of libido, an energy with which mental processes and structures are invested and which generates erotic attachments, and a death drive, the source of repetition, hate, aggression and neurotic guilt.'
p8757
aS'In his later work Freud developed a wide-ranging interpretation and critique of religion and culture.Psychoanalysis remains influential within psychotherapy, within some areas of psychiatry, and across the humanities.'
p8758
aS'As such, it continues to generate extensive and highly contested debate with regard to its therapeutic efficacy, its scientific status, and whether it advances or is detrimental to the feminist cause.'
p8759
aS"Nonetheless, Freud's work has suffused contemporary Western thought and popular culture."
p8760
aS'She fled Norway for the United_States in 1940 because of her opposition to Nazi Germany and the German occupation, but returned after World_War_II ended in 1945.Her best-known work is Kristin_Lavransdatter, a trilogy about life in Scandinavia in the Middle Ages, portrayed through the experiences of a woman from birth until death.'
p8761
aS'Its three volumes were published between 1920 and 1922.'
p8762
aS"Undset's Nobel Prize was awarded partly for this work, and partly for her four-volume work The Master of Hestviken, published between 1925 and 1927 and dealing with similar themes. Biography  Early life Sigrid_Undset was born on 20 May 1882, in the small town of Kalundborg, Denmark, at the childhood home of her mother, Charlotte Undset (1855-1939, nee Anna Maria Charlotte Gyth)."
p8763
aS'Sigrid was the eldest of three daughters.'
p8764
aS'She and her family moved to Norway when she was two.She grew up in the Norwegian capital, Oslo (or Kristiania, as it was known until 1925).'
p8765
aS"When she was only 11 years old, her father, the Norwegian archaeologist Ingvald Martin Undset (1853-1893), died at the age of 40 after a long illness.The family's economic situation meant that Undset had to give up hope of a university education and after a one-year secretarial course she obtained work at the age of 16 as a secretary with an engineering company in Kristiania, a post she was to hold for 10 years.She joined the Norwegian Authors' Union in 1907 and in the years 1933-1935 headed its Literary Council, eventually serving as the union's chairman from 1936 until 1940. Writer While employed at office work, Sigrid_Undset wrote and studied."
p8766
aS'She was 16 years old when she made her first attempt at writing a novel set in the Nordic Middle Ages.'
p8767
aS'It is the fifth-largest organized religion in the world, with approximately 30 million adherents.'
p8768
aS'Punjab, India is the only state in the world with a majority Sikh population.Adherents of Sikhism are known as Sikhs (students or disciples).'
p8769
aS'According to Devinder Singh Chahal, "The word \'Sikhi\' (commonly known as Gurmat) gave rise to the modern anglicized word \'Sikhism\' for the modern world."'
p8770
aS'Gurmat means literally \'wisdom of the Guru\' in contrast to Manmat, or self-willed impulses.According to Sewa Singh Kalsi, "The central teaching in Sikhism is the belief in the concept of the oneness of God."'
p8771
aS'Sikhism considers spiritual life and secular life to be intertwined.'
p8772
aS'Guru_Nanak, the first Sikh Guru established the system of the Langar, or communal kitchen, in order to demonstrate the need to share and have equality between all people.'
p8773
aS'Sikhs also believe that "all religious traditions are equally valid and capable of enlightening their followers".'
p8774
aS'Silas_Marner, a weaver, is a member of a small Calvinist congregation in Lantern Yard, a slum street in an unnamed city in Northern England.'
p8775
aS"He is falsely accused of stealing the congregation's funds while watching over the very ill deacon."
p8776
aS'Two clues are given against Silas: a pocket-knife and the discovery in his own house of the bag formerly containing the money.'
p8777
aS"There is the strong suggestion that Silas' best friend, William Dane, has framed him, since Silas had lent his pocket-knife to William shortly before the crime was committed."
p8778
aS'Silas is proclaimed guilty.'
p8779
aS'The woman he was to marry casts him off, and later marries William Dane.'
p8780
aS'With his life shattered and his heart broken, Silas leaves Lantern Yard and the city.Marner heads south to the Midlands and settles near the village of Raveloe, where he lives as a recluse, lapsing into bouts of catalepsy, and existing only for work and the gold he has hoarded from his earnings.'
p8781
aS"It was the follow-up to 2005's Pushing the Senses and in terms of all albums, the highly successful singles album in 2006."
p8782
aS'The first single, "We Are the People", preceded the album, being released on 9 June.'
p8783
aS'It was the last album to feature Mark Richardson on Drums before departing in 2009.The album was recorded at the Crypt Studios in North London, England, with the help of long-time friend of the band Matt Sime.'
p8784
aS'Like their 1999 album Yesterday Went Too Soon, the album was self-produced.'
p8785
aS'Three tracks ("We Are the People", "Itsumo" and "Fires") feature backing vocals by Sarah Clark- bassist and backing vocals singer with Bang Bangs, a project signed to Sime\'s publishing company Black Circle.Despite the problems that occurred behind the scenes at the band\'s then record label Echo, which resulted in their dissolution, the album managed to reach #3 on the UK iTunes album chart, and debuted at #8 in the official UK Albums Chart, but still became their first ever album not to go silver.'
p8786
aS'The song "Miss You" is also credited to being featured on the video game Midnight Club: Los Angeles.The album\'s second and final single, "Tracing Lines / Silent_Cry", was released on 25 August as a download only, but failed to chart. Reception The album was given a mixed response critically, only scoring a 56/100 on the reviews aggregator Metacritic, indicating "average or mixed reviews".'
p8787
aS'Commercially the album also had a poor response in terms of overall sales, failing to gain a silver sales certification.'
p8788
aS'The base of the Silurian is set at a major extinction event when 60% of marine species were wiped out.'
p8789
aS'See Ordovician-Silurian extinction events.A significant evolutionary milestone during the Silurian was the diversification of jawed and bony fish.'
p8790
aS'Life also began to appear on land in the form of small, moss-like, vascular plants that grew beside lakes, streams, and coastlines, and also in the form of small terrestrial arthropods.'
p8791
aS'However, terrestrial life would not greatly diversify and affect the landscape until the Devonian. History of study The Silurian system was first identified by British geologist Sir Roderick Impey Murchison, who was examining fossil-bearing sedimentary rock strata in south Wales in the early 1830s.'
p8792
aS'He named the sequences for a Celtic tribe of Wales, the Silures, inspired by his friend Adam Sedgwick, who had named the period of his study the Cambrian, the Latin name for Wales.'
p8793
aS'This naming does not indicate any correlation between the occurrence of the Silurian rocks and the land inhabited by the Silures; cf.'
p8794
aS'Geology of Wales, Tribes of Wales.'
p8795
aS'He is nicknamed Il Cavaliere (The Knight) for his Order of Merit for Labour, although he voluntarily resigned from this order in March 2013.'
p8796
aS'In 2015, Forbes magazine ranked him as the 141st richest man in the world with a net worth of US$8.0 billion.'
p8797
aS"In 2009, Forbes ranked him 12th in the List of The World's Most Powerful People due to his domination in Italian politics.Berlusconi was Prime Minister for nine years in total, making him the longest-serving post-war Prime Minister of Italy, and the third longest-serving since the Unification of Italy, after Benito Mussolini and Giovanni Giolitti."
p8798
aS'He was the leader of the centre-right party Forza Italia from 1994 to 2009, and its successor party The People of Freedom from 2009 to 2013.'
p8799
aS"Since November 2013, he is acting as the current leader of a revived Forza Italia.After serving nearly 19 years as member of the Chamber of Deputies, Italy's lower house, after the 2013 general election he became a member of the Senate.On 1 August 2013, he was convicted of tax-fraud by the final appeal instance, Court of Cassation (of which three years are automatically pardoned) along with a public office ban for two years."
p8800
aS'As his age exceeds 70 years, he will be exempted from direct imprisonment, and instead serve his sentence by doing unpaid social community work.'
p8801
aS'Because of being sentenced to a gross imprisonment for more than two years, a new Italian anticorruption law made the Italian Senate expel and bar him from serving any legislative office for six years.'
p8802
aS'Taking advantage of the disorder in Spain prompted by the Peninsular War, Bolivar inaugurated his campaign for independence in 1808, and within three years an organized national congress had been established.'
p8803
aS'Despite a number of hindrances, including the arrival of an unprecedentedly large Spanish expeditionary force, the revolutionaries eventually prevailed, culminating in a patriot victory at the Battle of Carabobo in 1821, which effectively made Venezuela his.Following this triumph over the Spanish monarchy, Bolivar participated in the foundation of the first union of independent nations in Latin America, Gran Colombia, of which he was president from 1819 to 1830.'
p8804
aS'Through further military conquest, he also conquered Ecuador, Peru, and finally, Bolivia (which was named after him), assuming the presidency of each of these new nations.'
p8805
aS"At the peak of his power, Bolivar ruled over a vast territory from the Argentine border to the Caribbean.Modern-day historians consider Bolivar to be a deeply polarizing individual, with criticism aimed especially at his belief that a strong presidency, maintained for life, is essential to a state's survival."
p8806
aS'Nevertheless, many Latin Americans laud him as a meritorious liberator, whose revolutionary ideas and reforms continue to leave a lasting legacy today. Family history The surname Bolivar derives from the Bolivar aristocrats who came from a small village in the Basque Country, Spain, called La Puebla de Bolivar.'
p8807
aS'His father came from the male line of the Ardanza family.'
p8808
aS'His maternal grandmother was descended from families from the Canary Islands that settled in the country.The Bolivars settled in Venezuela in the sixteenth century.'
p8809
aS'De Beauvoir wrote novels, essays, biographies, autobiography and monographs on philosophy, politics and social issues.'
p8810
aS"She is known for her 1949 treatise The Second Sex, a detailed analysis of women's oppression and a foundational tract of contemporary feminism; her novels, including She Came to Stay and The Mandarins; and her open relationship with French philosopher Jean-Paul_Sartre. Early years Simone_de_Beauvoir was born in Paris on 9 January 1908."
p8811
aS"Her parents were Georges Bertrand de Beauvoir, a legal secretary who once aspired to be an actor, and Francoise Beauvoir (nee Brasseur), a wealthy banker's daughter and devout Catholic."
p8812
aS"Simone's sister, Helene, was born two years later."
p8813
aS'The family struggled to maintain their bourgeois status after losing much of their fortune shortly after World_War_I, and Francoise insisted that the two daughters be sent to a prestigious convent school.'
p8814
aS'De Beauvoir herself was deeply religious as a child, at one point intending to become a nun.'
p8815
aS'She experienced a crisis of faith at age 14, after which she remained an atheist for the rest of her life.De Beauvoir was intellectually precocious, fueled by her father\'s encouragement; he reportedly would boast, "Simone thinks like a man!"'
p8816
aS'In some later, rationalised traditions, the literal geography of the "flowery" island of Anthemoessa, or Anthemusa, is fixed: sometimes on Cape Pelorum and at others in the islands known as the Sirenuse, near Paestum, or in Capreae.'
p8817
aS'All such locations were surrounded by cliffs and rocks.When the Sirens were given a name of their own, they were considered the daughters of the river god Achelous, fathered upon Terpsichore, Melpomene, Sterope, or Chthon (the Earth).'
p8818
aS'In Euripides\' play, Helen (167), Helen in her anguish calls upon "Winged maidens, daughters of the Earth").'
p8819
aS'Although they lured mariners, the Greeks portrayed the Sirens in their "meadow starred with flowers" and not as sea deities.'
p8820
aS'Roman writers linked the Sirens more closely to the sea, as daughters of Phorcys.'
p8821
aS"Sirens are found in many Greek stories, particularly in Homer's Odyssey.Their number is variously reported as between two and five."
p8822
aS'In the Odyssey, Homer says nothing of their origin or names, but gives the number of the Sirens as two.'
p8823
aS'The name "Sirius" is derived from the Ancient Greek: Seirios Seirios ("glowing" or "scorcher").'
p8824
aS'The system has the Bayer designation Alpha Canis Majoris (a CMa).'
p8825
aS'What the naked eye perceives as a single star is actually a binary star system, consisting of a white main-sequence star of spectral type A1V, termed Sirius A, and a faint white dwarf companion of spectral type DA2, called Sirius B.'
p8826
aS'The distance separating Sirius A from its companion varies between 8.2 and 31.5 AU.Sirius appears bright because of both its intrinsic luminosity and its proximity to Earth.'
p8827
aS"At a distance of 2.6 parsecs (8.6 ly), as determined by the Hipparcos astrometry satellite, the Sirius system is one of Earth's near neighbors."
p8828
aS'Sirius is gradually moving closer to the Solar System, so it will slightly increase in brightness over the next 60,000 years.'
p8829
aS"After that time its distance will begin to increase, but it will continue to be the brightest star in the Earth's sky for the next 210,000 years.Sirius A is about twice as massive as the Sun (M) and has an absolute visual magnitude of 1.42."
p8830
aS'" Plot summary Dissatisfied with life in her rural Wisconsin home, 18-year-old Caroline "Sister_Carrie" Meeber takes the train to Chicago, where her older sister Minnie, and Minnie\'s husband, Sven Hanson, have agreed to take her in.'
p8831
aS'On the train, Carrie meets Charles Drouet, a traveling salesman, who is attracted to her because of her simple beauty and unspoiled manner.'
p8832
aS'They exchange contact information, but upon discovering the "steady round of toil" and somber atmosphere at her sister\'s flat, she writes to Drouet and discourages him from calling on her there.Carrie soon embarks on a quest for work to pay rent to her sister and her husband, and takes a job running a machine in a shoe factory.'
p8833
aS'Before long, however, she is shocked by the coarse manners of both the male and female factory workers, and the physical demands of the job, as well as the squalid factory conditions, begin to take their toll.'
p8834
aS"She also senses Minnie and Sven's disapproval of her interest in Chicago's recreational opportunities, particularly the theatre."
p8835
aS'One day, after an illness that costs her job, she encounters Drouet on a downtown street.'
p8836
aS'Once again taken by her beauty, and moved by her poverty, he encourages her to dine with him, where, over sirloin and asparagus, he persuades her to leave her sister and move in with him.'
p8837
aS'Since that time, the chapel has served as a place of both religious and functionary papal activity.'
p8838
aS'Today it is the site of the Papal conclave, the process by which a new pope is selected.'
p8839
aS"The fame of the Sistine_Chapel lies mainly in the frescos that decorate the interior, and most particularly the Sistine_Chapel ceiling and The Last Judgment by Michelangelo.During the reign of Sixtus IV, a team of Renaissance painters that included Sandro_Botticelli, Pietro Perugino, Pinturicchio, Domenico Ghirlandaio and Cosimo Roselli, created a series of frescos depicting the Life of Moses and the Life of Christ, offset by papal portraits above and trompe l'oeil drapery below."
p8840
aS'These paintings were completed in 1482, and on 15 August 1483 Sixtus IV celebrated the first mass in the Sistine_Chapel for the Feast of the Assumption, at which ceremony the chapel was consecrated and dedicated to the Virgin Mary.Between 1508 and 1512, under the patronage of Pope_Julius_II, Michelangelo painted the Sistine_Chapel ceiling, a masterpiece without precedent, that was to change the course of Western art.'
p8841
aS'In a different climate after the Sack of Rome, he returned and between 1535 and 1541, painted The Last Judgement for Popes Clement VII and Paul III.'
p8842
aS"The fame of Michelangelo's paintings has drawn multitudes of visitors to the chapel, ever since they were revealed five hundred years ago. History While known as the location of Papal conclaves, the primary function of the Sistine_Chapel is as the chapel of the Papal Chapel (Cappella Pontificia), one of the two bodies of the Papal household, called until 1968 the Papal Court (Pontificalis Aula)."
p8843
aS'At the time of Pope Sixtus IV in the late 15th century, the Papal Chapel comprised about 200 people, including clerics, officials of the Vatican and distinguished laity.'
p8844
aS'S. P. Beekes has suggested a Pre-Greek origin and a connection with the root of the word sophos, "wise". Mythology Sisyphus was the son of King Aeolus of Thessaly and Enarete, and the founder and first king of Ephyra (supposedly the original name of Corinth) .'
p8845
aS'He was the father of Glaucus, Ornytion, Almus, and Thersander by the nymph Merope, the brother of Salmoneus, and the grandfather of Bellerophon through Glaucus King Sisyphus promoted navigation and commerce but was avaricious and deceitful.'
p8846
aS"He also killed travellers and guests, a violation of Xenia which fell under Zeus' domain."
p8847
aS'He took pleasure in these killings because they allowed him to maintain his iron-fisted rule.'
p8848
aS'Sisyphus and Salmoneus were known to hate each other as Sisyphus had consulted with the Oracle of Delphi on just how to kill Salmoneus without incurring any severe consequences for himself.'
p8849
aS'From Homer onwards, Sisyphus was famed as the craftiest of men.'
p8850
aS"He seduced Salmoneus's daughter Tyro in one of his plots to kill Salmoneus, only for Tyro to slay the children she bore by him when she discovered that Sisyphus was planning on eventually using them to dethrone her father."
p8851
aS'At 1,078 miles (1,735 km) long, it is the largest tributary of the Columbia River, the largest North American river that empties into the Pacific Ocean.'
p8852
aS'Rising in western Wyoming, the river flows through the Snake_River Plain of southern Idaho then through the rugged Hells Canyon area via northeastern Oregon and the rolling Palouse Hills to reach its mouth near the Washington Tri-Cities area, where it continues as part of the Columbia.'
p8853
aS'Its drainage basin encompasses parts of six U.S. states, and its average discharge is over 54,000 cubic feet per second (1,500 m3/s).Rugged mountains divided by rolling plains characterize the physiographically diverse watershed of the Snake_River.'
p8854
aS'The Snake_River Plain was created by a volcanic hotspot which now lies underneath Yellowstone National Park, the headwaters of the Snake_River.'
p8855
aS'Gigantic glacial-retreat flooding episodes that occurred during the previous Ice Age carved out many topographical features including various canyons and ridges along the middle and lower Snake.'
p8856
aS'Two of these catastrophic flooding events significantly affected the river and its surrounds.More than 11,000 years ago, prehistoric Native Americans lived along the Snake.'
p8857
aS'Salmon from the Pacific Ocean spawned in the millions in the river.'
p8858
aS'Many species of snakes have skulls with several more joints than their lizard ancestors, enabling them to swallow prey much larger than their heads with their highly mobile jaws.'
p8859
aS"To accommodate their narrow bodies, snakes' paired organs (such as kidneys) appear one in front of the other instead of side by side, and most have only one functional lung."
p8860
aS'Some species retain a pelvic girdle with a pair of vestigial claws on either side of the cloaca.Living snakes are found on every continent except Antarctica, and on most smaller land masses -- exceptions include some large islands, such as Ireland and New Zealand, and many small islands of the Atlantic and central Pacific.'
p8861
aS'Additionally, sea snakes are widespread throughout the Indian and Pacific Oceans.'
p8862
aS'More than 20 families are currently recognized, comprising about 500 genera and about 3,400 species.'
p8863
aS'They range in size from the tiny, 10 cm-long thread snake to the reticulated python of up to 6.95 meters (22.8 ft) in length.'
p8864
aS'The fossil species Titanoboa cerrejonensis was 13 meters (43 ft) long.'
p8865
aS'The story encapsulates many of the political and cultural tensions of modern Turkey and successfully combines humor, social commentary, mysticism, and a deep sympathy with its characters.Kar is the word for Snow, but the main character also abbreviates his name to Ka (his initials) with the novel set in the eastern Turkish city of Kars.'
p8866
aS"An opening (and recurring) theme concerns reasons behind a suicide epidemic among teenage girls (which actually took place in the city of Batman). Plot summary Though most of the early part of the story is told in the third person from Ka's point of view, an omniscient narrator sometimes makes his presence known, posing as a friend of Ka's who is telling the story based on Ka's journals and correspondence."
p8867
aS'This narrator sometimes provides the reader with information before Ka knows it or foreshadows later events in the story.'
p8868
aS'At times, the action seems somewhat dream-like.'
p8869
aS'The story is set in the city of Kars which creates a sense of alienation for Ka as the city is unlike anywhere else in Turkey, due to its history as a Russian garrison townKa is a poet, who returns to Turkey after 12 years of political exile in Germany.'
p8870
aS'He has several motives, first, as a journalist, to investigate a spate of suicides but also in the hope of meeting a woman he used to know.'
p8871
aS'Heavy snow cuts off the town for about three days during which time Ka is in conversation with a former communist, a secularist, a fascist nationalist, a possible Islamic extremist, Islamic moderates, young Kurds, the military, the Secret Service, the police and in particular, an actor-revolutionary.'
p8872
aS'To the very grave social and economic problems he faced, he could add the growing political instability that was gripping the country.'
p8873
aS"He was pictured as an inefficient and unpopular and the number of conspiracies that sought to displace him was growing by the day.On June 4, 1932, a group of young socialists under the leadership of Eugenio Matte; some air force personnel under colonel Marmaduke Grove; and some army personnel (followers of former president Carlos Ibanez del Campo) under Carlos Davila staged a coup d'etat by taking over the Air Force base of El Bosque, in Santiago, demanding the resignation of President Montero.Montero refused to call on the army to put down the coup, and instead chose to resign."
p8874
aS'That same night, the victorious revolutionaries organized a Government Junta composed of retired General Arturo Puga, Eugenio Matte and Carlos Davila, with colonel Grove as their minister of Defense.'
p8875
aS'They immediately proceeded to proclaim the Socialist_Republic_of_Chile. Creation and fall The proclamation took by surprise and divided public opinion immediately.'
p8876
aS'The Communist Party of Chile (PCCh) and the trade unions manifested their opposition, because they considered the coup as "militarist".'
p8877
aS'At the same time, businessmen, professionals and students of the Pontifical Catholic University of Chile also heatedly opposed it, also on ideological grounds.'
p8878
aS'At the end the new republic received only the guarded support of the socialists and the employees\' associations.A few days following the proclamation of the new "Socialist_Republic_of_Chile," the Junta dissolved Congress and, among other measures, stopped evictions from low-rental properties, decreed a three-day bank holiday (which was followed by strict controls on withdrawals), and ordered the "Caja de Credito Popular" (a savings and loan bank for Chileans of modest means) to return clothes and tools which had been pawned there.The new Junta ordered a half-million free meals served daily by the Government to Chile\'s unemployed.'
p8879
aS'The stream of particles varies in density, temperature, and speed over time and over solar longitude.'
p8880
aS"These particles can escape the Sun's gravity because of their high energy, from the high temperature of the corona and magnetic, electrical and electromagnetic phenomena in it.The solar wind flows outward supersonically to great distances, filling a region known as the heliosphere, an enormous bubble-like volume surrounded by the interstellar medium."
p8881
aS'Other related phenomena include the aurora (northern and southern lights), the plasma tails of comets that always point away from the Sun, and geomagnetic storms that can change the direction of magnetic field lines and create strong currents in power grids on Earth. History The existence of a continuous stream of particles flowing outward from the Sun was first suggested by British astronomer Richard C. Carrington.'
p8882
aS'In 1859, Carrington and Richard Hodgson independently made the first observation of what would later be called a solar flare.'
p8883
aS"This is a sudden outburst of energy from the Sun's atmosphere."
p8884
aS'On the following day, a geomagnetic storm was observed, and Carrington suspected that there might be a connection.'
p8885
aS'George FitzGerald later suggested that matter was being regularly accelerated away from the Sun and was reaching the Earth after several days.In 1910 British astrophysicist Arthur Eddington essentially suggested the existence of the solar wind, without naming it, in a footnote to an article on Comet Morehouse.'
p8886
aS'The extent of the solubility of a substance in a specific solvent is measured as the saturation concentration, where adding more solute does not increase the concentration of the solution and begins to precipitate the excess amount of solute.Most often, the solvent is a liquid, which can be a pure substance or a mixture.'
p8887
aS'One may also speak of solid solution, but rarely of solution in a gas (see vapor-liquid equilibrium instead).The extent of solubility ranges widely, from infinitely soluble (without limit) (fully miscible) such as ethanol in water, to poorly soluble, such as silver chloride in water.'
p8888
aS'The term insoluble is often applied to poorly or very poorly soluble compounds.'
p8889
aS'A common threshold to describe something as insoluble is less than 0.1 g per 100 mL of solvent.Under certain conditions, the equilibrium solubility can be exceeded to give a so-called supersaturated solution, which is metastable.'
p8890
aS'Metastability of crystals can also lead to apparent differences in the amount of a chemical that dissolves depending on its crystalline form or particle size.'
p8891
aS"A supersaturated solution generally crystallises when 'seed' crystals are introduced and rapid equilibration occurs."
p8892
aS"Phenylsalicylate is one such simple observable substance when fully melted and then cooled below its fusion point.Solubility is not to be confused with the ability to 'dissolve' a substance, because the solution might also occur because of a chemical reaction."
p8893
aS'It was the first government in world history to nationally issue banknotes or true paper money, and the first Chinese government to establish a permanent standing navy.'
p8894
aS'This dynasty also saw the first known use of gunpowder, as well as the first discernment of true north using a compass.The Song dynasty is divided into two distinct periods, Northern and Southern.'
p8895
aS'During the Northern Song (Chinese: Bei Song , 960-1127), the Song capital was in the northern city of Bianjing (now Kaifeng) and the dynasty controlled most of China proper.'
p8896
aS'The Southern Song (Chinese: Nan Song , 1127-1279) refers to the period after the Song lost control of northern China to the Jurchen Jin dynasty in the Jin-Song Wars.'
p8897
aS"During this time, the Song court retreated south of the Yangtze and established their capital at Lin'an (now Hangzhou)."
p8898
aS"Although the Song dynasty had lost control of the traditional birthplace of Chinese civilization along the Yellow River, the Song economy was not in ruins, as the Southern Song Empire contained 60 percent of China's population and a majority of the most productive agricultural land."
p8899
aS'The Southern Song dynasty considerably bolstered its naval strength to defend its waters and land borders and to conduct maritime missions abroad.To repel the Jin, and later the Mongols, the Song developed revolutionary new military technology augmented by the use of gunpowder.'
p8900
aS"While the novel initially incited a lukewarm critical reception, along with allegations of obscenity, it is today regarded as a masterpiece by many critics and is often regarded as Lawrence's finest achievement. Plot introduction and history The third published novel of D. H. Lawrence, taken by many to be his earliest masterpiece, tells the story of Paul Morel, a young man and budding artist."
p8901
aS'Richard Aldington explains the semi-autobiographical nature of this masterpiece:When you have experienced Sons_and_Lovers you have lived through the agonies of the young Lawrence striving to win free from his old life.'
p8902
aS'Generally, it is not only considered as an evocative portrayal of working-class life in a mining community, but also an intense study of family, class and early sexual relationships.The original 1913 edition was heavily edited by Edward Garnett who removed 80 passages, roughly a tenth of the text.'
p8903
aS'The novel is dedicated to Garnett.'
p8904
aS'Garnett, as the literary advisor to the publishing firm Duckworth, was an important figure in leading Lawrence further into the London literary world during the years 1911 and 1912.'
p8905
aS"It was not until the 1992 Cambridge University Press edition was released that the missing text was restored.Lawrence began working on the novel in the period of his mother's illness, and often expresses this sense of his mother's wasted life through his female protagonist Gertrude Morel."
p8906
aS"Letters written around the time of its development clearly demonstrate the admiration he felt for his mother - viewing her as a 'clever, ironical, delicately moulded woman' -- and her apparently unfortunate marriage to his coal-miner father, a man of 'sanguine temperament' and instability."
p8907
aS'According to the Suda, a 10th-century encyclopedia, Sophocles wrote 123 plays during the course of his life, but only seven have survived in a complete form: Ajax, Antigone, The Women of Trachis, Oedipus the King, Electra, Philoctetes and Oedipus at Colonus.'
p8908
aS'For almost 50 years, Sophocles was the most-feted playwright in the dramatic competitions of the city-state of Athens that took place during the religious festivals of the Lenaea and the Dionysia.'
p8909
aS'He competed in around 30 competitions, won perhaps 24, and was never judged lower than second place.'
p8910
aS'Aeschylus won 14 competitions, and was sometimes defeated by Sophocles, while Euripides won only 4 competitions.The most famous tragedies of Sophocles feature Oedipus and also Antigone: they are generally known as the Theban plays, although each play was actually a part of a different tetralogy, the other members of which are now lost.'
p8911
aS'Sophocles influenced the development of the drama, most importantly by adding a third actor, thereby reducing the importance of the chorus in the presentation of the plot.'
p8912
aS'He also developed his characters to a greater extent than earlier playwrights such as Aeschylus. Life Sophocles, the son of Sophilus, was a wealthy member of the rural deme (small community) of Colonus Hippius in Attica, which was to become a setting for one of his plays, and he was probably born there.'
p8913
aS'Sophocles was born a few years before the Battle_of_Marathon in 490 BC: the exact year is unclear, although 497/6 is the most likely.'
p8914
aS'It shares land borders with North Korea to the north, and oversea borders with Japan to the east and China to the west.'
p8915
aS"Roughly half of the country's 50 million people reside in the metropolitan area surrounding its capital, the Seoul Capital Area, which is the second largest in the world with over 25 million residents.Korea was inhabited as early as the Lower Paleolithic period and its civilization began with the founding of Gojoseon."
p8916
aS'After the unification of the Three Kingdoms of Korea in 668, Korea enjoyed over a millennium of relative tranquility under dynasties lasting for centuries in which its trade, culture, literature, science and technology flourished.'
p8917
aS'In 1910 it was annexed by the Japanese Empire, after whose surrender in 1945, Korea was divided into Soviet and U.S. zones of occupation, with the latter becoming the Republic of Korea in August 1948.'
p8918
aS"The United Nations declared the Republic to be Korea's only lawful government, but a communist regime was soon set up in the North that invaded the South in 1950, leading to the Korean War that ended in 1953 with an armistice."
p8919
aS"Despite occasional saber noise from the North, peace has since continued with the two agreeing to reunify peacefully and the South dominating inter-Korean politics as a regional power with the world's 10th largest defence budget.Between 1962 and 1994, South_Korea's tiger economy soared at an average of 10% annually, fueled by annual export growth of 20%, in a period called the Miracle on the Han River that rapidly and successfully transformed it into a high-income advanced economy and the world's 11th largest economy by 1995."
p8920
aS"Today, South_Korea is the world's fifth largest exporter and seventh largest importer and member of the G-20 and OECD's Development Assistance Committee."
p8921
aS'Along with France and Morocco, it is one of only three countries to have both Atlantic and Mediterranean coastlines.'
p8922
aS"Spain's 1,214 km (754 mi) border with Portugal is the longest uninterrupted border within the European Union.Spanish territory also includes two archipelagos; the Balearic Islands, in the Mediterranean Sea, and the Canary Islands, in the Atlantic Ocean off the African coast; two major exclaves, Ceuta and Melilla, in continental North Africa; and the islands and penones (rocks) of Alboran, Alhucemas, Chafarinas and Velez de la Gomera."
p8923
aS'With an area of 505,990 km2 (195,360 sq mi), Spain is the second largest country in Western Europe and the European Union, and the fourth largest country in Europe.'
p8924
aS'By population, Spain is the sixth largest in Europe and the fifth in the European Union.Modern humans first arrived in the Iberian Peninsula around 35,000 years ago.'
p8925
aS'Iberian cultures along with ancient Phoenician, Greek and Carthaginian settlements developed on the peninsula until it came under Roman rule around 200 BCE, after which the region was named Hispania.'
p8926
aS'In the Middle Ages, the area was conquered by Germanic tribes and later by the Moors.'
p8927
aS'Spain emerged as a unified country in the 15th century, following the marriage of the Catholic Monarchs and the completion of the centuries-long reconquest, or Reconquista, of the peninsula from the Moors in 1492.'
p8928
aS'The rebel coup was supported by a number of conservative groups, including the Spanish Confederation of Autonomous Right-wing Groups (Confederacion Espanola de Derechas Autonomas, or CEDA), monarchists such as the religious conservative (Catholic) Carlists, and the Falange Espanola Tradicionalista y de las Juntas de Ofensiva Nacional Sindicalista, a fascist group.'
p8929
aS'Sanjurjo was killed in an aircraft accident while attempting to return from exile in Portugal, whereupon Franco emerged as the leader of the Nationalists.The coup was supported by military units in the Spanish protectorate in Morocco, Pamplona, Burgos, Valladolid, Cadiz, Cordoba, and Seville.'
p8930
aS'However, rebelling units in important cities--such as Madrid, Barcelona, Valencia, Bilbao, and Malaga--were unable to capture their objectives, and those cities remained under the control of the government.'
p8931
aS'Spain was thus left militarily and politically divided.'
p8932
aS'The Nationalists and the Republican government fought for control of the country.'
p8933
aS'The Nationalist forces received munitions and soldiers from Nazi Germany and Fascist Italy, while the Soviet Union and Mexico offered lesser support to the "Loyalist" or "Republican" side.'
p8934
aS"Other countries, such as Britain and France, operated an official policy of non-intervention, although France did send in some munitions.The Nationalists advanced from their strongholds in the south and west, capturing most of Spain's northern coastline in 1937."
p8935
aS'Around 650 BC, it rose to become the dominant military land-power in ancient Greece.Given its military pre-eminence, Sparta was recognized as the overall leader of the combined Greek forces during the Greco-Persian Wars.'
p8936
aS'Between 431 and 404 BC, Sparta was the principal enemy of Athens during the Peloponnesian War, from which it emerged victorious, though at great cost of lives lost.'
p8937
aS"Sparta's defeat by Thebes in the Battle of Leuctra in 371 BC ended Sparta's prominent role in Greece."
p8938
aS'However, it maintained its political independence until the Roman conquest of Greece in 146 BC.'
p8939
aS'It then underwent a long period of decline, especially in the Middle Ages, when many Spartans moved to live in Mystras.'
p8940
aS'Modern Sparta is the capital of the Greek regional unit of Laconia and a center for the processing of goods such as citrus and olives.Sparta was unique in ancient Greece for its social system and constitution, which completely focused on military training and excellence.'
p8941
aS'Its inhabitants were classified as Spartiates (Spartan citizens, who enjoyed full rights), mothakes (non-Spartan free men raised as Spartans), perioikoi (freedmen), and helots (state-owned serfs, enslaved non-Spartan local population).'
p8942
aS'identical) in all inertial systems (non-accelerating frames of reference); and (2) that the speed of light in a vacuum is the same for all observers, regardless of the motion of the light source.'
p8943
aS'It was originally proposed in 1905 by Albert Einstein in the paper "On the Electrodynamics of Moving Bodies".'
p8944
aS"The inconsistency of Newtonian mechanics with Maxwell's equations of electromagnetism and the inability to discover Earth's motion through a luminiferous aether led to the development of special relativity, which corrects mechanics to handle situations involving motions nearing the speed of light."
p8945
aS'As of today, special relativity is the most accurate model of motion at any speed.'
p8946
aS'Even so, Newtonian mechanics is still useful (due to its simplicity and high accuracy) as an approximation at small velocities relative to the speed of light.Special_relativity implies a wide range of consequences, which have been experimentally verified, including length contraction, time dilation, relativistic mass, mass-energy equivalence, a universal speed limit, and relativity of simultaneity.'
p8947
aS'It has replaced the conventional notion of an absolute universal time with the notion of a time that is dependent on reference frame and spatial position.'
p8948
aS'Rather than an invariant time interval between two events, there is an invariant spacetime interval.'
p8949
aS'Whether genetic drift is a minor or major contributor to speciation is the subject matter of much ongoing discussion.There are four geographic modes of speciation in nature, based on the extent to which speciating populations are isolated from one another: allopatric, peripatric, parapatric, and sympatric.'
p8950
aS'Speciation may also be induced artificially, through animal husbandry, agriculture, or laboratory experiments.Charles Darwin was the first to describe the role of natural selection in speciation.'
p8951
aS'There is research into the effects of sexual selection on speciation but no firm conclusions have yet been drawn. Natural speciation All forms of natural speciation have taken place over the course of evolution; however, debate persists as to the relative importance of each mechanism in driving biodiversity.One example of natural speciation is the diversity of the three-spined stickleback, a marine fish that, after the last ice age, has undergone speciation into new freshwater colonies in isolated lakes and streams.'
p8952
aS'Over an estimated 10,000 generations, the sticklebacks show structural differences that are greater than those seen between different genera of fish including variations in fins, changes in the number or size of their bony plates, variable jaw structure, and color differences. Speciation rate There is debate as to the rate at which speciation events occur over geologic time.'
p8953
aS'While some evolutionary biologists claim that speciation events have remained relatively constant over time, some palaeontologists such as Niles Eldredge and Stephen Jay Gould have argued that species usually remain unchanged over long stretches of time, and that speciation occurs only over relatively brief intervals, a view known as punctuated equilibrium.'
p8954
aS"(See last subheading under Darwin's dilemma below."
p8955
aS') Allopatric During allopatric (from the ancient Greek allos, "other" + Greek patra, "fatherland") speciation, a population splits into two geographically isolated populations (for example, by habitat fragmentation due to geographical change such as mountain building).'
p8956
aS'In dry air at 20 degC, the speed of sound is 343.2 metres per second (1,126 ft/s).'
p8957
aS'This is 1,236 kilometres per hour (768 mph; 667 kn), or a kilometre in 2.914 s or a mile in 4.689 s.The speed of sound in an ideal gas is independent of frequency, but does vary slightly with frequency in a real gas.'
p8958
aS'It is proportional to the square root of the absolute temperature, but is independent of pressure or density for a given ideal gas.'
p8959
aS'Sound speed in air varies slightly with pressure only because air is not quite an ideal gas.'
p8960
aS'Although (in the case of gases only) the speed of sound is expressed in terms of a ratio of both density and pressure, these quantities cancel in ideal gases at any given temperature, composition, and heat capacity.'
p8961
aS'This leads to a velocity formula for ideal gases which includes only the latter independent variables.In common everyday speech, speed of sound refers to the speed of sound waves in air.'
p8962
aS'However, the speed of sound varies from substance to substance.'
p8963
aS'Spiders are found worldwide on every continent except for Antarctica, and have become established in nearly every habitat with the exceptions of air and sea colonization.'
p8964
aS'As of 2008, at least 43,678 spider species, and 109 families have been recorded by taxonomists; however, there has been dissension within the scientific community as to how all these families should be classified, as evidenced by the over 20 different classifications that have been proposed since 1900.Anatomically, spiders differ from other arthropods in that the usual body segments are fused into two tagmata, the cephalothorax and abdomen, and joined by a small, cylindrical pedicel.'
p8965
aS'Unlike insects, spiders do not have antennae.'
p8966
aS'In all except the most primitive group, the Mesothelae, spiders have the most centralized nervous systems of all arthropods, as all their ganglia are fused into one mass in the cephalothorax.'
p8967
aS'Unlike most arthropods, spiders have no extensor muscles in their limbs and instead extend them by hydraulic pressure.Their abdomens bear appendages that have been modified into spinnerets that extrude silk from up to six types of silk glands within their abdomen.'
p8968
aS'Spider webs vary widely in size, shape and the amount of sticky thread used.'
p8969
aS'It now appears that the spiral orb web may be one of the earliest forms, and spiders that produce tangled cobwebs are more abundant and diverse than orb-web spiders.'
p8970
aS'Sponges have unspecialized cells that can transform into other types and that often migrate between the main cell layers and the mesohyl in the process.'
p8971
aS'Sponges do not have nervous, digestive or circulatory systems.'
p8972
aS'Instead, most rely on maintaining a constant water flow through their bodies to obtain food and oxygen and to remove wastes. Overview Sponges are similar to other animals in that they are multicellular, heterotrophic, lack cell walls and produce sperm cells.'
p8973
aS'Unlike other animals, they lack true tissues and organs, and have no body symmetry.'
p8974
aS'The shapes of their bodies are adapted for maximal efficiency of water flow through the central cavity, where it deposits nutrients, and leaves through a hole called the osculum.'
p8975
aS'Many sponges have internal skeletons of spongin and/or spicules of calcium carbonate or silicon dioxide.'
p8976
aS'All sponges are sessile aquatic animals.'
p8977
aS'The collection includes two hundred and twelve separate characters, all providing two-hundred forty-four accounts of their lives and losses.'
p8978
aS'The poems were originally published in the magazine Reedy\'s Mirror. Content The first poem serves as an introduction:"The Hill"Where are Elmer, Herman, Bert, Tom and Charley,The weak of will, the strong of arm, the clown, the boozer, the fighter?All, all are sleeping on the hill.One passed in a fever,One was burned in a mine,One was killed in a brawl,One died in a jail,One fell from a bridge toiling for children and wife--All, all are sleeping, sleeping, sleeping on the hill.Where are Ella, Kate, Mag, Lizzie and Edith,The tender heart, the simple soul, the loud, the proud, the happy one?--All, all are sleeping on the hill.One died in shameful child-birth,One of a thwarted love,One at the hands of a brute in a brothel,One of a broken pride, in the search for heart\'s desire;One after life in far-away London and ParisWas brought to her little space by Ella and Kate and Mag--All, all are sleeping, sleeping, sleeping on the hill.Where are Uncle Isaac and Aunt Emily,And old Towny Kincaid and Sevigne Houghton,And Major Walker who had talkedWith venerable men of the revolution?--All, all are sleeping on the hill.They brought them dead sons from the war,And daughters whom life had crushed,And their children fatherless, crying--All, all are sleeping, sleeping, sleeping on the hill.Where is Old Fiddler JonesWho played with life all his ninety years,Braving the sleet with bared breast,Drinking, rioting, thinking neither of wife nor kin,Nor gold, nor love, nor heaven?Lo!'
p8979
aS"he babbles of the fish-frys of long ago,Of the horse-races of long ago at Clary's Grove,Of what Abe Lincoln saidOne time at Springfield.Each following poem is an epitaph of a dead citizen, delivered by the dead themselves."
p8980
aS'They speak about the sorts of things one might expect: some recite their histories and turning points, others make observations of life from the outside, and petty ones complain of the treatment of their graves, while few tell how they really died.'
p8981
aS'Speaking without reason to lie or fear the consequences, they construct a picture of life in their town that is shorn of facades.'
p8982
aS'The interplay of various villagers -- e.g.'
p8983
aS"a bright and successful man crediting his parents for all he's accomplished, and an old woman weeping because he is secretly her illegitimate child -- forms a gripping, if not pretty, whole.The subject of afterlife receives only the occasional brief mention, and even those seem to be contradictory.The work features such characters as Tom Merritt, Amos Sibley, Carl Hamblin, Fiddler Jones and A.D."
p8984
aS'Its geographic location and deep harbours made it of great strategic importance from the time of the ancient Silk Road through to World_War_II.A diverse and multicultural country, Sri_Lanka is home to many religions, ethnic groups, and languages.'
p8985
aS'In addition to the majority Sinhalese, it is home to large groups of Sri_Lankan and Indian Tamils, Moors, Burghers, Malays, Kaffirs and the aboriginal Vedda.'
p8986
aS'Sri_Lanka has a rich Buddhist heritage, and the first known Buddhist writings of Sri_Lanka, the Pali Canon, dates back to the Fourth Buddhist council in 29 BC.'
p8987
aS"The country's recent history has been marred by a thirty-year civil war which decisively ended when Sri_Lankan military defeated Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam in 2009.Sri_Lanka is a republic and a unitary state governed by a presidential system."
p8988
aS'The legislative capital, Sri Jayawardenepura Kotte, is a suburb of the commercial capital and largest city, Colombo.'
p8989
aS'An important producer of tea, coffee, gemstones, coconuts, rubber, and the native cinnamon, the island contains tropical forests and diverse landscapes with much biodiversity.Sri_Lanka has had a long history of international engagement, as a founding member of the South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation (SAARC), and a member of the United Nations, the Commonwealth of Nations, the G77, and the Non-Aligned Movement.'
p8990
aS'It is the only country in South Asia that is currently rated "high" on the Human Development Index. Etymology In antiquity, Sri_Lanka was known to travelers by a variety of names.'
p8991
aS'It was funded by the U.S. Office of Naval Research and was of interest to both the U.S. Navy and Marine Corps as an investigation into the causes of conflict between military guards and prisoners.'
p8992
aS'The experiment is a classic study on the psychology of imprisonment and is a topic covered in most introductory psychology textbooks.Twenty-four male students were selected, from an initial pool of seventy-five, to adopt randomly assigned roles of prisoner and guard, in a mock prison, situated in the basement of the Stanford Psychology Department building, for a period of between seven and fourteen days.'
p8993
aS"The participants adapted to their roles well beyond Zimbardo's expectations, as the guards enforced authoritarian measures and ultimately subjected some of the prisoners to psychological torture."
p8994
aS'Many of the prisoners passively accepted psychological abuse and, at the request of the guards, readily harassed other prisoners who attempted to prevent it.'
p8995
aS'The experiment even affected Zimbardo himself, who, in his role as the superintendent, permitted the abuse to continue.'
p8996
aS'Two of the prisoners quit the experiment early, and the entire experiment was abruptly stopped after only six days, to an extent because of the objections of Christina Maslach.'
p8997
aS'Certain portions of the experiment were filmed, and excerpts of footage are publicly available. Goals and methods Zimbardo and his team aimed to test the hypothesis that the inherent personality traits of prisoners and guards are the chief cause of abusive behavior in prison.'
p8998
aS'Later in his career, Milgram developed a technique for creating interactive hybrid social agents (cyranoids), which has since been used to explore aspects of social- and self-perception.'
p8999
aS'He is widely regarded as one of the most important figures in the history of social psychology.'
p9000
aS'A Review of General Psychology survey, published in 2002, ranked Milgram as the 46th most cited psychologist of the 20th century. Biography  Early life Stanley_Milgram was born in 1933 to a Jewish family in New_York_City, the child of a Romanian-born mother, Adele (nee Israel), and a Hungarian-born father, Samuel Milgram (1902-1953).'
p9001
aS"Milgram's father worked as a baker to provide a modest income for his family until his death in 1953 (upon which Stanley's mother took over the bakery)."
p9002
aS'Milgram excelled academically and was a great leader among his peers.'
p9003
aS"In 1954, Milgram received his Bachelor's Degree in Political Science from Queens College, New York where he attended tuition-free."
p9004
aS'He applied to a Ph.D. program in social psychology at Harvard University and was initially rejected due to an insufficient background in psychology (he had not taken one undergraduate course in psychology while attending Queens College).'
p9005
aS'In general, one distinguishes first- and second-order Stark_effects.'
p9006
aS'The first-order effect is linear in the applied electric field, while the second-order effect is quadratic in the field.The Stark_effect is responsible for the pressure broadening (Stark broadening) of spectral lines by charged particles.'
p9007
aS'When the split/shifted lines appear in absorption, the effect is called the inverse Stark_effect.The Stark_effect is the electric analogue of the Zeeman effect where a spectral line is split into several components due to the presence of a magnetic field.The Stark_effect can be explained with fully quantum-mechanical approaches, but it has also been a fertile testing ground for semiclassical methods. History The effect is named after Johannes Stark, who discovered it in 1913.'
p9008
aS'It was independently discovered in the same year by the Italian physicist Antonino Lo Surdo, and in Italy it is thus sometimes called the Stark-Lo Surdo effect.'
p9009
aS'The discovery of this effect contributed importantly to the development of quantum theory.'
p9010
aS"Curiously, after their discoveries, both Stark and Lo Surdo rejected developments in modern physics and allied themselves with the political and racial programs of Hitler and Mussolini.Inspired by the magnetic Zeeman effect, and especially by Lorentz's explanation of it, Woldemar Voigt performed classical mechanical calculations of quasi-elastically bound electrons in an electric field."
p9011
aS'By using experimental indices of refraction he gave an estimate of the Stark splittings.'
p9012
aS"It was founded with the intent of becoming the fourteenth state of the new United_States.Franklin's first capital was Jonesborough."
p9013
aS'After the summer of 1785, the government of Franklin (which was by then based in Greeneville), ruled as a "parallel government" running alongside (but not harmoniously with) a re-established North Carolina bureaucracy.'
p9014
aS'Franklin was never admitted into the union.'
p9015
aS'The extra-legal state existed for only about four and a half years, ostensibly as a republic, after which North Carolina re-assumed full control of the area.The creation of Franklin is novel, in that it resulted from both a cession (an offering from North Carolina to Congress) and a secession (seceding from North Carolina, when its offer to Congress was not acted upon, and the original cession was rescinded). Cession and rescissionEdit The concept of a new western state came from Arthur Campbell of Washington County Virginia who began to agitate for what he called the State of Frankland (Land of the Free)in 1782.'
p9016
aS"Campbell's proposed state would have included Southwest Virginia, East Tennessee and parts of Kentucky, Georgia, and Alabama."
p9017
aS'He received much support in Far Southwest Virginia as well in what was then North Carolina.'
p9018
aS'He also faced much opposition in Virginia where Patrick Henry and William Russell, brother in law to Henry, eventually defeated him by passing a treason law which forbade anyone to attempt to create a new state from Virginia.'
p9019
aS'He spent "the happiest years of his life" at the Beyle country house in Claix near Grenoble.'
p9020
aS'His closest friend was his younger sister, Pauline, with whom he maintained a steady correspondence throughout the first decade of the 19th century.The military and theatrical worlds of the First French Empire were a revelation to Beyle.'
p9021
aS"He was named an auditor with the Conseil d'Etat on 3 August 1810, and thereafter took part in the French administration and in the Napoleonic wars in Italy."
p9022
aS"He travelled extensively in Germany and was part of Napoleon's army in the 1812 invasion of Russia."
p9023
aS'Stendhal witnessed the burning of Moscow from just outside the city.'
p9024
aS'Stendhal was appointed Commissioner of War Supplies and sent to Smolensk to prepare provisions for the returning army.'
p9025
aS'He crossed the Berezina River by finding a usable ford rather than the overwhelmed pontoon bridge, which probably saved his life and those of his companions.'
p9026
aS'Douglas had previously defeated Lincoln in a senate contest, noted for the famous Lincoln-Douglas debates of 1858.'
p9027
aS'He was nicknamed the "Little Giant" because he was short in physical stature, but a forceful and dominant figure in politics.Douglas was well known as a resourceful party leader, and an adroit, ready, skillful tactician in debate and passage of legislation.'
p9028
aS'He was a champion of the Young America movement which sought to modernize politics and replace the agrarian and strict constructionist orthodoxies of the past.'
p9029
aS'Douglas was a leading proponent of democracy, and believed in the principle of popular sovereignty: that the majority of citizens should decide contentious issues such as slavery and territorial expansion.'
p9030
aS'As chairman of the Committee on Territories, Douglas dominated the Senate in the 1850s.'
p9031
aS'He was largely responsible for the Compromise_of_1850 that apparently settled slavery issues; however, in 1854 he reopened the slavery question with the Kansas-Nebraska Act, which opened some previously prohibited territories to slavery under popular sovereignty.'
p9032
aS'Opposition to this led to the formation of the Republican Party.Douglas initially endorsed the Dred Scott decision of 1857.'
p9033
aS'He is recognized by modern critics as one of the most innovative writers of his generation.The eighth surviving child of Protestant Methodist parents, Crane began writing at the age of four and had published several articles by the age of 16.'
p9034
aS'Having little interest in university studies, he left college in 1891 to work as a reporter and writer.'
p9035
aS"Crane's first novel was the 1893 Bowery tale Maggie:_A_Girl_of_the_Streets, generally considered by critics to be the first work of American literary Naturalism."
p9036
aS'He won international acclaim in 1895 for his Civil War novel The Red Badge of Courage, which he wrote without having any battle experience.In 1896, Crane endured a highly publicized scandal after appearing as a witness in the trial of a suspected prostitute, an acquaintance named Dora Clark.'
p9037
aS'Late that year he accepted an offer to travel to Cuba as a war correspondent.'
p9038
aS'As he waited in Jacksonville, Florida, for passage, he met Cora Taylor, the madam of a brothel, with whom he began a lasting relationship.'
p9039
aS"En route to Cuba, Crane's vessel the SS Commodore, sank off the coast of Florida, leaving him and others adrift for several days in a dinghy."
p9040
aS'Originally published in Germany in 1927, it was first translated into English in 1929.'
p9041
aS'Combining autobiographical and psychoanalytic elements, the novel was named after the lonesome Coyote of the steppes.'
p9042
aS"The story in large part reflects a profound crisis in Hesse's spiritual world during the 1920s while memorably portraying the protagonist's split between his humanity and his wolf-like aggression and homelessness."
p9043
aS'Hesse would later assert that the book was largely misunderstood. Background and publication history In 1924 Hermann_Hesse married singer Ruth Wenger.'
p9044
aS'After several weeks, however, he left Basel, only returning near the end of the year.'
p9045
aS'Upon his return he rented a separate apartment, adding to his isolation.'
p9046
aS'After a short trip to Germany with Wenger, Hesse stopped seeing her almost completely.'
p9047
aS'Because of this, the Stoics presented their philosophy as a way of life, and they thought that the best indication of an individual\'s philosophy was not what a person said but how that person behaved.Later Stoics--such as Seneca and Epictetus--emphasized that, because "virtue is sufficient for happiness", a sage was immune to misfortune.'
p9048
aS'This belief is similar to the meaning of the phrase "stoic calm", though the phrase does not include the "radical ethical" Stoic views that only a sage can be considered truly free, and that all moral corruptions are equally vicious.From its founding, Stoic doctrine was popular with a following in Roman Greece and throughout the Roman Empire -- including the Emperor Marcus Aurelius -- until the closing of all pagan philosophy schools in 529 AD by order of the Emperor Justinian_I, who perceived them as being at odds with Christian faith. Basic tenets The Stoics provided a unified account of the world, consisting of formal logic, monistic physics and naturalistic ethics.'
p9049
aS'Of these, they emphasized ethics as the main focus of human knowledge, though their logical theories were of more interest for later philosophers.Stoicism teaches the development of self-control and fortitude as a means of overcoming destructive emotions; the philosophy holds that becoming a clear and unbiased thinker allows one to understand the universal reason (logos).'
p9050
aS'A primary aspect of Stoicism involves improving the individual\'s ethical and moral well-being: "Virtue consists in a will that is in agreement with Nature."'
p9051
aS'This principle also applies to the realm of interpersonal relationships; "to be free from anger, envy, and jealousy," and to accept even slaves as "equals of other men, because all men alike are products of nature.'
p9052
aS'"The Stoic ethic espouses a deterministic perspective; in regard to those who lack Stoic virtue, Cleanthes once opined that the wicked man is "like a dog tied to a cart, and compelled to go wherever it goes."'
p9053
aS'A Stoic of virtue, by contrast, would amend his will to suit the world and remain, in the words of Epictetus, "sick and yet happy, in peril and yet happy, dying and yet happy, in exile and happy, in disgrace and happy," thus positing a "completely autonomous" individual will, and at the same time a universe that is "a rigidly deterministic single whole".'
p9054
aS'It secretes protein-digesting enzymes called proteases and gastric acid to aid in food digestion, (sent to it via esophageal peristalsis) through smooth muscular contractions before sending partially digested food (chyme) to the small intestines. Structure The stomach lies between the esophagus and the duodenum (the first part of the small intestine).'
p9055
aS'It is in the left upper part of the abdominal cavity.'
p9056
aS'The top of the stomach lies against the diaphragm.'
p9057
aS'Lying behind the stomach is the pancreas.'
p9058
aS'The greater omentum hangs down from the greater curvature.Two sphincters keep the contents of the stomach contained; the lower esophageal sphincter (found in the cardiac region), at the junction of the oesophagus and stomach, and the pyloric sphincter at the junction of the stomach with the duodenum.The stomach is surrounded by parasympathetic (stimulant) and orthosympathetic (inhibitor) plexuses (networks of blood vessels and nerves in the anterior gastric, posterior, superior and inferior, celiac and myenteric), which regulate both the secretions activity and the motor (motion) activity of its muscles.In adult humans, the stomach has a relaxed, near empty volume of about 45 to 75 milliliters.'
p9059
aS'Because it is a distensible organ, it normally expands to hold about one litre of food.'
p9060
aS'The stomach of a newborn human baby will only be able to retain about 30 milliliters. Sections In classical anatomy, the stomach is divided into four sections, beginning at the cardia, each of which has different cells and functions.The cardia is where the contents of the esophagus empty into the stomach.'
p9061
aS"This is in contrast to the troposphere near the Earth's surface, which is cooler higher up and warmer farther down."
p9062
aS'The border of the troposphere and stratosphere, the tropopause, is marked by where this inversion begins, which in terms of atmospheric thermodynamics is the equilibrium level.'
p9063
aS'At moderate latitudes the stratosphere is situated between about 10-13 km (33,000-43,000 ft; 6.2-8.1 mi) and 50 km (160,000 ft; 31 mi) altitude above the surface, while at the poles it starts at about 8 km (26,000 ft; 5.0 mi) altitude, and near the equator it may start at altitudes as high as 18 km (59,000 ft; 11 mi). Ozone and temperature Within this layer, temperature increases as altitude increases (see temperature inversion); the top of the stratosphere has a temperature of about 270 K (-3degC or 26.6degF), just slightly below the freezing point of water.'
p9064
aS'The stratosphere is layered in temperature because ozone (O3) here absorbs high energy UVB and UVC energy waves from the Sun and is broken down into atomic oxygen (O1D) and diatomic oxygen (O2) at wavelengths of below 1180 nm.'
p9065
aS'Atomic oxygen is found prevalent in the upper stratosphere due to the bombardment of UV light and the destruction of both ozone and diatomic oxygen.'
p9066
aS'The mid stratosphere has less UV light passing through it; O and O2 are able to combine, and this is where the majority of natural ozone is produced.'
p9067
aS'It is when these two forms of oxygen recombine to form ozone that they release the heat found in the stratosphere.'
p9068
aS"Ever since Haydn's day the string quartet has been considered a prestigious form and represents one of the true tests of the composer's art."
p9069
aS'With four parts to play with, a composer working in anything like the classical key system has enough lines to fashion a full argument, but none to spare for padding.'
p9070
aS'The closely related characters of the four instruments, moreover, while they cover in combination an ample compass of pitch, do not lend themselves to indulgence in purely colouristic effects.'
p9071
aS'Thus, where the composer of symphonies commands the means for textural enrichment beyond the call of his harmonic discourse, and where the concerto medium offers the further resource of personal characterization and drama in the individual-pitted-against-the-mass vein, the writer of string quartets must perforce concentrate on the bare bones of musical logic.'
p9072
aS'Thus, in many ways the string quartet is pre-eminently the dialectical form of instrumental music, the one most naturally suited to the activity of logical disputation and philosophical enquiry.Quartet composition flourished in the Classical era, with Mozart, Beethoven and Schubert following Haydn in each writing a number of quartets.'
p9073
aS'A slight slackening in the pace of quartet composition occurred in the later 19th century, in part due to a movement away from classical forms by composers such as Liszt, Wagner and Richard Strauss, though it received a resurgence in the 20th with the Second Viennese School, Bartok, Shostakovich and Elliot Carter producing highly regarded examples of the genre.'
p9074
aS'In the 21st century it remains an important and refined musical form.The standard structure for a string quartet is four movements, with the 1st movement in Sonata form, Allegro, in the tonic key; 2nd movement is a slow movement, in the subdominant key; 3rd movement is a Minuet and Trio, in the tonic key; and the 4th movement is often in Rondo form or Sonata rondo form, in the tonic key.Some quartets play together for many years in ensembles which may be named after the first violinist (e.g.'
p9075
aS'Some argue that it is not a case study, which makes it unique among other scholarly work on the same subject. Findings Durkheim explores the differing suicide rates among Protestants and Catholics, arguing that stronger social control among Catholics results in lower suicide rates.'
p9076
aS'According to Durkheim, Catholic society has normal levels of integration while Protestant society has low levels.'
p9077
aS'There are at least two problems with this interpretation.'
p9078
aS'First, Durkheim took most of his data from earlier researchers, notably Adolph Wagner and Henry Morselli, who were much more careful in generalizing from their own data.'
p9079
aS'Second, later researchers found that the Protestant-Catholic differences in suicide seemed to be limited to German-speaking Europe and thus may always have been the spurious reflection of other factors.'
p9080
aS"Despite its limitations, Durkheim's work on suicide has influenced proponents of control theory, and is often mentioned as a classic sociological study.Durkheim concluded that:Suicide rates are higher in men than women (although married women who remained childless for a number of years ended up with a high suicide rate).Suicide rates are higher for those who are single than those who are married.Suicide rates are higher for people without children than people with children.Suicide rates are higher among Protestants than Catholics and Jews.Suicide rates are higher among soldiers than civilians.Suicide rates are higher in times of peace than in times of war (the suicide rate in France fell after the coup d'etat of Louis-Napoleon Bonaparte, for example."
p9081
aS'War also reduced the suicide rate: after war broke out in 1866 between Austria and Italy, the suicide rate fell by 14% in both countries.'
p9082
aS'When the slave completed the work, he asked the farmer to keep his end of the bargain.'
p9083
aS"Freedom was easy, the farmer had no objection to that, but he didn't want to give up any land, so he told the slave that he was very sorry that he had to give him valley land."
p9084
aS'He had hoped to give him a piece of the bottom land.'
p9085
aS'The slave blinked and said he thought valley land was bottom land.'
p9086
aS'The master said, "Oh no!'
p9087
aS'See those hills?'
p9088
aS"That's bottom land; rich and fertile."
p9089
aS'He annexed much of the Middle East in his conflict with the Safavids and large areas of North Africa as far west as Algeria.'
p9090
aS'Under his rule, the Ottoman fleet dominated the seas from the Mediterranean to the Red_Sea and through the Persian Gulf.At the helm of an expanding empire, Suleiman personally instituted major legislative changes relating to society, education, taxation, and criminal law.'
p9091
aS'His canonical law (or the Kanuns) fixed the form of the empire for centuries after his death.'
p9092
aS'Not only was Suleiman a distinguished poet and goldsmith; he also became a great patron of culture, overseeing the "Golden" age of the Ottoman_Empire in its artistic, literary and architectural development.Breaking with Ottoman tradition, Suleiman married Roxelana, a former Christian girl converted to Islam from his harem, who became subsequently known and influential as Hurrem Sultan.'
p9093
aS'Their son, Selim_II, succeeded Suleiman following his death in 1566 after 46 years of rule.'
p9094
aS"Suleiman's previous heir apparent, Mustafa, had been strangled to death 13 years prior at the sultan's order."
p9095
aS'His other son Bayezid had been killed by his support and Selim\'s order in 1561 with four of his sons. Alternative names and titles Suleiman was known as Ottoman Turkish: slTn slymn wl, Sultan Suleiman-i evvel or lslTn slymn lqnwn~, Kanuni Sultan Suleiman, Modern Turkish: I. Suleyman (Turkish pronunciation: [sylej\'man]) or Kanuni Sultan Suleyman; and in the East, as "The Lawgiver" (Turkish: Kanuni; Arabic: lqnwn~, al-Qanuni) where evvel means "the first" and kanuni means "lawgiver" for his complete reconstruction of the Ottoman legal system. Early life Suleiman was born in Trabzon along the east coast of the Black_Sea, probably on 6 November 1494.'
p9096
aS'Under normal conditions, sulfur atoms form cyclic octatomic molecules with chemical formula S8.'
p9097
aS'Elemental sulfur is a bright yellow crystalline solid when at room temperature.'
p9098
aS'Chemically, sulfur can react as either an oxidant or a reducing agent.'
p9099
aS'It oxidizes most metals and several nonmetals, including carbon, which leads to its negative charge in most organosulfur compounds, but it reduces several strong oxidants, such as oxygen and fluorine.Sulfur occurs naturally as the pure element (native sulfur) and as sulfide and sulfate minerals.'
p9100
aS'Elemental sulfur crystals are commonly sought after by mineral collectors for their distinct, brightly colored polyhedron shapes.'
p9101
aS'Being abundant in native form, sulfur was known in ancient times, mentioned for its uses in ancient India, ancient Greece, China and Egypt.'
p9102
aS'Fumes from burning sulfur were used as fumigants, and sulfur-containing medicinal mixtures were used as balms and antiparasitics.'
p9103
aS'Sometimes, it is dyed dark brown during production to alert people to its hazards.'
p9104
aS'The historical name of this acid is oil of vitriol.Sulfuric_acid is a diprotic acid and shows different properties depending upon its concentration.'
p9105
aS'Its corrosiveness on other materials, like metals, living tissues or even stones, can be mainly ascribed to its strong acidic nature and, if concentrated, strong dehydrating and oxidizing properties.'
p9106
aS'Sulfuric_acid at a high concentration can cause very serious damage upon contact, since not only does it cause chemical burns via hydrolysis, but also secondary thermal burns through dehydration.'
p9107
aS'It can lead to permanent blindness if splashed onto eyes and irreversible damage if swallowed.'
p9108
aS'Accordingly, safety precautions should be strictly observed when handling it.'
p9109
aS'Moreover, it is hygroscopic, readily absorbing water vapour from the air.Sulfuric_acid has a wide range of applications including domestic acidic drain cleaner, electrolyte in lead-acid batteries and various cleaning agents.'
p9110
aS'Its Kulliye contains a tomb of the founder, a madrasah and a hospice.'
p9111
aS'The Sultan_Ahmed_Mosque is still popularly used as a mosque. History After the Peace of Zsitvatorok and the crushing loss in the 1604-1618 war with Persia, Sultan Ahmet I, decided to build a big mosque in Istanbul to reassert Ottoman power.'
p9112
aS'It would be the first imperial mosque for more than forty years.'
p9113
aS'While his predecessors had paid for their mosques with their spoil of war, Ahmet the First had to remove the funds of the Treasury, because he had not gained remarkable victories.'
p9114
aS'It caused the anger of the ulema, the Muslim jurists.'
p9115
aS'The mosque was built on the site of the palace of the Byzantine emperors, in front of the basilica Ayasofya (at that time, the primary imperial mosque in Istanbul) and the hippodrome, a site of significant symbolic meaning as it dominated the city skyline from the south.'
p9116
aS'Big parts of the south shore of the mosque rest on the foundations, the vaults of the old Grand Palace. Architecture The Sultan_Ahmed_Mosque has one main dome, six minarets, and eight secondary domes.'
p9117
aS'Its diameter is about 109 times that of Earth, and it has a mass about 330,000 times that of Earth, accounting for about 99.86% of the total mass of the Solar System.'
p9118
aS"Chemically, about three quarters of the Sun's mass consists of hydrogen, whereas the rest is mostly helium, and much smaller quantities of heavier elements, including oxygen, carbon, neon and iron.The Sun is a G-type main-sequence star (G2V) based on spectral class and it is informally referred to as a yellow dwarf."
p9119
aS'It formed approximately 4.567 billion years ago from the gravitational collapse of matter within a region of a large molecular cloud.'
p9120
aS'Most of this matter gathered in the center, whereas the rest flattened into an orbiting disk that became the Solar System.'
p9121
aS'The central mass became increasingly hot and dense, eventually initiating thermonuclear fusion in its core.'
p9122
aS'It is thought that almost all stars form by this process.'
p9123
aS'The Sun is roughly middle age and has not changed dramatically for four billion years, and will remain fairly stable for four billion more.'
p9124
aS'Sunspots usually appear as pairs, with each spot having the opposite magnetic polarity of the other.Although they are at temperatures of roughly 3,000-4,500 K (2,700-4,200 degC), the contrast with the surrounding material at about 5,780 K (5,500 degC) leaves them clearly visible as dark spots.'
p9125
aS'This is because the luminance (which is essentially "brightness" in visible light) of a heated black body (closely approximated by the photosphere) at these temperatures varies extremely rapidly with temperature - considerably more rapidly than the (temperature to the fourth power) variation in the total black-body radiation at all wavelengths (see Stefan-Boltzmann law).'
p9126
aS'If the sunspot were isolated from the surrounding photosphere it would be brighter than the Moon.'
p9127
aS'Sunspots expand and contract as they move across the surface of the Sun and can be as small as 16 kilometers (10 mi) and as large as 160,000 kilometers (100,000 mi) in diameter, making the larger ones visible from Earth without the aid of a telescope.'
p9128
aS'They may also travel at relative speeds ("proper motions") of a few hundred meters per second when they first emerge onto the solar photosphere.Manifesting intense magnetic activity, sunspots host secondary phenomena such as coronal loops (prominences) and reconnection events.'
p9129
aS'Most solar flares and coronal mass ejections originate in magnetically active regions around visible sunspot groupings.'
p9130
aS'Similar phenomena indirectly observed on stars other than the sun are commonly called starspots and both light and dark spots have been measured. History  Prehistoric evidence Studies of stratigraphic data have suggested that the solar cycles have been active for hundreds of millions of years, if not longer; measuring varves in precambrian sedimentary rock has revealed repeating peaks in layer thickness, with a pattern repeating approximately every eleven years.'
p9131
aS'Like ferromagnetism and atomic spectral lines, superconductivity is a quantum mechanical phenomenon.'
p9132
aS'It is characterized by the Meissner_effect, the complete ejection of magnetic field lines from the interior of the superconductor as it transitions into the superconducting state.'
p9133
aS'The occurrence of the Meissner_effect indicates that superconductivity cannot be understood simply as the idealization of perfect conductivity in classical physics.The electrical resistivity of a metallic conductor decreases gradually as temperature is lowered.'
p9134
aS'In ordinary conductors, such as copper or silver, this decrease is limited by impurities and other defects.'
p9135
aS'Even near absolute zero, a real sample of a normal conductor shows some resistance.'
p9136
aS'In a superconductor, the resistance drops abruptly to zero when the material is cooled below its critical temperature.'
p9137
aS'An electric current flowing through a loop of superconducting wire can persist indefinitely with no power source.In 1986, it was discovered that some cuprate-perovskite ceramic materials have a critical temperature above 90 K (-183 degC).'
p9138
aS'The phenomenon is related to Bose-Einstein condensation, but it is not identical: not all Bose-Einstein_condensates can be regarded as superfluids, and not all superfluids are Bose-Einstein_condensates. Superfluidity of liquid helium In liquid helium, the superfluidity effect was discovered by Pyotr Kapitsa and John F. Allen.'
p9139
aS'It has since been described through phenomenological and microscopic theories.'
p9140
aS'In liquid helium-4, the superfluidity occurs at far higher temperatures than it does in helium-3.'
p9141
aS'Each atom of helium-4 is a boson particle, by virtue of its integer spin.'
p9142
aS'A helium-3 atom is a fermion particle; it can form bosons only by pairing with itself at much lower temperatures.'
p9143
aS'This process is similar to the electron pairing in superconductivity. Ultracold atomic gases Superfluidity in an ultracold fermionic gas was experimentally proven by Wolfgang Ketterle and his team who observed quantum vortices in 6Li at a temperature of 50 nK at MIT in April 2005.'
p9144
aS'Such vortices had previously been observed in an ultracold bosonic gas using 87Rb in 2000, and more recently in two-dimensional gases.'
p9145
aS'This shock wave sweeps up an expanding shell of gas and dust called a supernova remnant.'
p9146
aS'Supernovae are potentially strong galactic sources of gravitational waves.'
p9147
aS'A great proportion of primary cosmic rays comes from supernovae.Supernovae are more energetic than novae.'
p9148
aS'Nova means "new" in Latin, referring to what appears to be a very bright new star shining in the celestial sphere; the prefix "super-" distinguishes supernovae from ordinary novae, which are far less luminous.'
p9149
aS'The word supernova was coined by Walter Baade and Fritz Zwicky in 1931.'
p9150
aS'It is pronounced /,su:p@rnoUv@/ with the plural supernovae /,su:p@rnoUvi:/ or supernovas (abbreviated SN, plural SNe after "supernovae").Supernovae can be triggered in one of two ways: by the sudden re-ignition of nuclear fusion in a degenerate star; or by the gravitational collapse of the core of a massive star.'
p9151
aS'In the first case, a degenerate white dwarf may accumulate sufficient material from a companion, either through accretion or via a merger, to raise its core temperature, ignite carbon fusion, and trigger runaway nuclear fusion, completely disrupting the star.'
p9152
aS'Surface_tension is responsible, for example, when an object or insect (e.g.'
p9153
aS'water striders) that is denser than water is able to float or run along the water surface.At liquid-air interfaces, surface tension results from the greater attraction of water molecules to each other (due to cohesion) than to the molecules in the air (due to adhesion).'
p9154
aS'The net effect is an inward force at its surface that causes water to behave as if its surface were covered with a stretched elastic membrane.'
p9155
aS'Because of the relatively high attraction of water molecules for each other, water has a high surface tension (72.8 millinewtons per meter at 20 degC) compared to that of most other liquids.'
p9156
aS'Surface_tension is an important factor in the phenomenon of capillarity.Surface_tension has the dimension of force per unit length, or of energy per unit area.'
p9157
aS'The two are equivalent--but when referring to energy per unit of area, people use the term surface energy--which is a more general term in the sense that it applies also to solids and not just liquids.In materials science, surface tension is used for either surface stress or surface free energy. Causes The cohesive forces among liquid molecules are responsible for the phenomenon of surface tension.'
p9158
aS'In the bulk of the liquid, each molecule is pulled equally in every direction by neighboring liquid molecules, resulting in a net force of zero.'
p9159
aS'For the more general meaning, surface active agent/s is the heading. Composition and structure Surfactants are usually organic compounds that are amphiphilic, meaning they contain both hydrophobic groups (their tails) and hydrophilic groups (their heads).'
p9160
aS'Therefore, a surfactant contains both a water-insoluble (or oil-soluble) component and a water-soluble component.'
p9161
aS'Surfactants will diffuse in water and adsorb at interfaces between air and water or at the interface between oil and water, in the case where water is mixed with oil.'
p9162
aS'The water-insoluble hydrophobic group may extend out of the bulk water phase, into the air or into the oil phase, while the water-soluble head group remains in the water phase.World production of surfactants is estimated at 15 Mton/y, of which about half are soaps.'
p9163
aS'Other surfactants produced on a particularly large scale are linear alkylbenzenesulfonates (1700 kton/y), lignin sulfonates (600 kton/y), fatty alcohol ethoxylates (700 ktons/y), and alkylphenol ethoxylates (500 kton/y). Structure of surfactant phases in water In the bulk aqueous phase, surfactants form aggregates, such as micelles, where the hydrophobic tails form the core of the aggregate and the hydrophilic heads are in contact with the surrounding liquid.'
p9164
aS'Other types of aggregates can also be formed, such as spherical or cylindrical micelles or lipid bilayers.'
p9165
aS'The shape of the aggregates depends on the chemical structure of the surfactants, namely the balance in size between hydrophilic head and hydrophobic tail.'
p9166
aS'At 450,295 square kilometres (173,860 sq mi), Sweden is the third-largest country in the European Union by area, with a total population of over 9.7 million.'
p9167
aS'Sweden consequently has a low population density of 21 inhabitants per square kilometre (54/sq mi), with the highest concentration in the southern half of the country.'
p9168
aS'Approximately 85% of the population lives in urban areas.'
p9169
aS'Southern Sweden is predominantly agricultural, while the north is heavily forested.'
p9170
aS'Sweden is part of the geographical area of Fennoscandia.Germanic peoples have inhabited Sweden since prehistoric times, emerging into history as the Geats/Gotar and Swedes/Svear and constituting the sea peoples known as the Norsemen.'
p9171
aS'Sweden emerged as an independent and unified country during the Middle Ages.'
p9172
aS'In the 17th century, it expanded its territories to form the Swedish Empire, which became one of the great powers of Europe until the early 18th century.'
p9173
aS'The country is situated in Western and Central Europe, where it is bordered by Italy to the south, France to the west, Germany to the north, and Austria and Liechtenstein to the east.'
p9174
aS'Switzerland is a landlocked country geographically divided between the Alps, the Swiss Plateau and the Jura, spanning an area of 41,285 km2 (15,940 sq mi).'
p9175
aS'While the Alps occupy the greater part of the territory, the Swiss population of approximately 8 million people is concentrated mostly on the Plateau, where the largest cities are to be found; among them are the two global and economic centres of Zurich and Geneva.The establishment of the Swiss Confederation is traditionally dated to 1 August 1291, which is celebrated annually as Swiss National Day.'
p9176
aS'The country has a long history of armed neutrality--it has not been in a state of war internationally since 1815--and did not join the United Nations until 2002.'
p9177
aS'Nevertheless, it pursues an active foreign policy and is frequently involved in peace-building processes around the world.'
p9178
aS'In addition to being the birthplace of the Red Cross, Switzerland is home to numerous international organizations, including the second largest UN office.'
p9179
aS'On the European level, it is a founding member of the European Free Trade Association, but notably, it is not part of the European Union, nor the European Economic Area (and thus does not use the Euro currency).'
p9180
aS'A sword in the most narrow sense consists of a straight blade with two edges and a hilt.'
p9181
aS'However, in nearly every case, the term may also be used to refer to weapons with a single edge (backsword).The word sword comes from the Old English sweord, cognate to swert, Old Norse sverd, from a Proto-Indo-European root *swer- "to wound, to cut".'
p9182
aS'Non-European weapons called "sword" include single-edged weapons such as the Middle Eastern saif, the Chinese dao and the related Japanese katana.'
p9183
aS'The Chinese jian is an example of a non-European double-edged sword, like the European models derived from the double-edged Iron Age sword.Historically, the sword developed in the Bronze Age, evolving from the dagger; the earliest specimens date to ca.'
p9184
aS'1600 BC.'
p9185
aS'The Iron Age sword remained fairly short and without a crossguard.'
p9186
aS'The spatha as it developed in the Late Roman army became the predecessor of the European sword of the Middle Ages, at first adopted as the Migration period sword, and only in the High Middle Ages developed into the classical arming sword with crossguard.The use of a sword is known as swordsmanship or (in an early modern or modern context) as fencing.'
p9187
aS'She married fellow poet Ted Hughes in 1956; they lived together in the United_States and then England, and had two children, Frieda and Nicholas.'
p9188
aS'Plath was clinically depressed for most of her adult life.'
p9189
aS'She committed suicide in 1963.Plath is credited with advancing the genre of confessional poetry and is best known for her two published collections, The Colossus and Other Poems and Ariel.'
p9190
aS'In 1982, she won a posthumous Pulitzer Prize for The Collected Poems.'
p9191
aS"She also wrote The Bell Jar, a semi-autobiographical novel published shortly before her death. Life and career  Early life Plath was born on October 27, 1932, in Massachusetts Memorial Hospital, in Boston's Jamaica Plain neighborhood."
p9192
aS'Her mother, Aurelia Schober Plath (1906-1994), was a first-generation American of Austrian descent and her father, Otto Plath (1885-1940), was from Grabow, Germany.'
p9193
aS"Plath's father was an entomologist and a professor of biology at Boston University; he also authored a book about bumblebees."
p9194
aS'It was composed while Mahler was second conductor at the Leipzig Opera, Germany.'
p9195
aS'Although in his letters Mahler almost always referred to the work as a symphony, the first two performances described it as a symphonic poem or tone poem.'
p9196
aS'The work was premiered at the Vigado Concert Hall, Budapest in 1889, but was not well received.'
p9197
aS'Mahler made some major revisions for the second performance, given at Hamburg in October 1893; further alterations were made in the years prior to the first publication, in late 1898.'
p9198
aS'Some modern performances and recordings give the work the title Titan, despite the fact that Mahler only used this label for two early performances, and never after the work had reached its definitive four-movement form in 1896. Instrumentation The symphony is scored for a large orchestra consisting of approximately 100 musicians.'
p9199
aS'Unlike his later symphonies, Mahler does not use the entire forces in every movement.'
p9200
aS'Several instruments are used in the last movement only, especially in the woodwinds and brass.Woodwinds: 4 flutes (flutes 3 & 4 doubling piccolos) (flute 2 doubling piccolo in movements 1 & 4 briefly) (flute 4 tacet in movements 1, 2), 4 oboes (oboe 3 doubling English horn) (oboe 4 tacet movements 1-3), 3 clarinets in B-flat, C, A (clarinet 3 doubling bass clarinet in B-flat and clarinet in E-flat), clarinet in E-flat (doubling clarinet 4 in B-flat in movement 3 briefly, "doubled at least" in movement 4) (clarinet 4 tacet in movement 2), 3 bassoons (bassoon 3 doubling contrabassoon)Brass: 7 horns (reinforced by 3 horns in the last movement), 4 trumpets in F (trumpets 1, 2 "from a wide distance" in movement 1).'
p9201
aS'Because it requires huge instrumental and vocal forces it is frequently called the "Symphony of a Thousand", although the work is often performed with fewer than a thousand, and Mahler himself did not sanction the name.'
p9202
aS'The work was composed in a single inspired burst, at Maiernigg in southern Austria in the summer of 1906.'
p9203
aS"The last of Mahler's works that was premiered in his lifetime, the symphony was a critical and popular success when he conducted its first performance in Munich on 12 September 1910.The fusion of song and symphony had been a characteristic of Mahler's early works."
p9204
aS'In his "middle" compositional period after 1901, a change of direction led him to produce three purely instrumental symphonies.'
p9205
aS'The Eighth, marking the end of the middle period, returns to a combination of orchestra and voice in a symphonic context.'
p9206
aS'The structure of the work is unconventional; instead of the normal framework of several movements, the piece is in two parts.'
p9207
aS'Part I is based on the Latin text of a 9th-century Christian hymn for Pentecost, Veni creator spiritus ("Come, Creator Spirit"), and Part II is a setting of the words from the closing scene of Goethe\'s Faust.'
p9208
aS'125 (also known as "the Choral"), is Ludwig_van_Beethoven\'s final complete symphony.'
p9209
aS'Completed in 1824, the symphony is one of the best-known works in classical music.'
p9210
aS"Among critics, it is almost universally considered Beethoven's greatest work, and many consider it one of the greatest compositions in the western musical canon.The symphony was the first example of a major composer using voices in a symphony (thus making it a choral symphony)."
p9211
aS'The words are sung during the final movement by four vocal soloists and a chorus.'
p9212
aS'They were taken from the "Ode to Joy", a poem written by Friedrich_Schiller in 1785 and revised in 1803, with additions made by the composer.'
p9213
aS"Today, it stands as one of the most played symphonies in the world.In 2001, Beethoven's autograph score of the Ninth Symphony, held by the Berlin State Library, was added to the United Nations Memory of the World Programme Heritage list, becoming the first musical score so honoured. History  Composition The Philharmonic Society of London originally commissioned the symphony in 1817."
p9214
aS'The main composition work was done between autumn 1822 and the completion of the autograph in February 1824.The symphony emerged from other pieces by Beethoven that, while completed works in their own right, are also in some sense sketches for the future symphony.'
p9215
aS'It is similar to cyclotron radiation except that synchrotron radiation is generated by the acceleration of ultrarelativistic charged particles through magnetic fields.'
p9216
aS'Synchrotron_radiation may be achieved artificially in synchrotrons or storage rings, or naturally by fast electrons moving through magnetic fields.'
p9217
aS'The radiation produced in this way has a characteristic polarization and the frequencies generated can range over the entire electromagnetic spectrum. History Synchrotron_radiation was named after its discovery in a General Electric synchrotron accelerator built in 1946 and announced in May 1947 by Frank Elder, Anatole Gurewitsch, Robert Langmuir, and Herb Pollock in a letter entitled "Radiation from Electrons in a Synchrotron".'
p9218
aS'Pollock recounts:"On April 24, Langmuir and I were running the machine and as usual were trying to push the electron gun and its associated pulse transformer to the limit.'
p9219
aS'Some intermittent sparking had occurred and we asked the technician to observe with a mirror around the protective concrete wall.'
p9220
aS'He immediately signaled to turn off the synchrotron as "he saw an arc in the tube."'
p9221
aS'The vacuum was still excellent, so Langmuir and I came to the end of the wall and observed.'
p9222
aS'This 2,700-year-old city played a key role in ancient times, when it was one of the major powers of the Mediterranean world.'
p9223
aS'Syracuse is located in the southeast corner of the island of Sicily, right by the Gulf of Syracuse next to the Ionian Sea.The city was founded by Ancient Greek Corinthians and Teneans and became a very powerful city-state.'
p9224
aS'Syracuse was allied with Sparta and Corinth and exerted influence over the entirety of Magna Graecia, of which it was the most important city.'
p9225
aS'Described by Cicero as "the greatest Greek city and the most beautiful of them all", it equaled Athens in size during the fifth century BC.'
p9226
aS'It later became part of the Roman Republic and Byzantine Empire.'
p9227
aS'After this Palermo overtook it in importance, as the capital of the Kingdom of Sicily.'
p9228
aS'Eventually the kingdom would be united with the Kingdom of Naples to form the Two Sicilies until the Italian unification of 1860.In the modern day, the city is listed by UNESCO as a World Heritage Site along with the Necropolis of Pantalica.'
p9229
aS'A country of fertile plains, high mountains, and deserts, it is home to diverse ethnic and religious groups, including Arabs, Greeks, Armenians, Assyrians, Kurds, Circassians, Mandeans and Turks.'
p9230
aS'Religious groups include Sunni, Christians, Alawite, Druze religion, Mandeanism and Yezidi.'
p9231
aS'Sunni Arabs make up the largest population group in Syria.In English, the name "Syria" was formerly synonymous with the Levant (known in Arabic as al-Sham) while the modern state encompasses the sites of several ancient kingdoms and empires, including the Eblan civilization of the 3rd millennium BC.'
p9232
aS'In the Islamic era, Damascus was the seat of the Umayyad_Caliphate and a provincial capital of the Mamluk Sultanate in Egypt.The modern Syrian state was established after World_War_I as a French mandate, and represented the largest Arab state to emerge from the formerly Ottoman-ruled Arab Levant.'
p9233
aS'It gained independence as a parliamentary republic on 24 October 1945 when Syria became a founding member of the United Nations, an act which legally ended the former French Mandate - although French troops did not leave the country until April 1946.'
p9234
aS'The post-independence period was tumultuous, and a large number of military coups and coup attempts shook the country in the period 1949-1971.'
p9235
aS'Between 1958-61, Syria entered a brief union with Egypt, which was terminated by a military coup.'
p9236
aS'He emigrated to England in 1914 (at age 25), settling, working and marrying there.'
p9237
aS'He was eventually naturalised as a British subject in 1927 at age 39, renouncing his American citizenship.Eliot attracted widespread attention for his poem The Love Song of J. Alfred Prufrock (1915), which is seen as a masterpiece of the Modernist movement.'
p9238
aS'It was followed by some of the best-known poems in the English language, including The_Waste_Land (1922), The_Hollow_Men (1925), Ash Wednesday (1930), and Four Quartets (1945).'
p9239
aS'He is also known for his seven plays, particularly Murder in the Cathedral (1935).'
p9240
aS'He was awarded the Nobel Prize in Literature in 1948, "for his outstanding, pioneer contribution to present-day poetry.'
p9241
aS'" Life  Early life and education Eliot was born into the Eliot family, a Boston Brahmin family with roots in England and New England.'
p9242
aS'His paternal grandfather, William Greenleaf Eliot, had moved to St. Louis, Missouri, to establish a Unitarian church there.'
p9243
aS'At least 20 million people died, mainly civilians, in one of the deadliest military conflicts in history.Hong established the Taiping Heavenly Kingdom with its capital at Nanjing.'
p9244
aS"The Kingdom's army controlled large parts of southern China, at its height ruling about 30 million people."
p9245
aS'The rebel agenda included social reforms such as shared "property in common", equality for women, and the replacement of Confucianism, Buddhism, Daoism and Chinese folk religion with their form of Christianity.'
p9246
aS'Because of their refusal to wear their hair in the customary queue, the Taiping combatants were nicknamed "long hair" (simplified Chinese: Chang Mao ; traditional Chinese: Chang Mao ; pinyin: Changmao) by Qing forces.'
p9247
aS'The Qing government eventually crushed the rebellion with the aid of French and British forces.The Taiping_Rebellion was a source of inspiration for Sun Yat-sen, who led the Xinhai Revolution that overthrew the Qing dynasty in 1911.'
p9248
aS'Mao Zedong glorified the Taiping rebels as early heroic revolutionaries against a corrupt feudal monarchy. HistoryEdit  OriginsEdit China, while under the Qing dynasty in the mid-19th century, suffered a series of natural disasters, economic problems, and defeats at the hands of the Western powers; in particular, the humiliating defeat in 1842 by the British Empire in the First Opium War.'
p9249
aS'The Qing government, led by ethnic Manchus, was seen by much of the Chinese population, comprising mainly Han Chinese, as an ineffective and corrupt regime.'
p9250
aS"Neighboring states include the People's Republic of China to the west, Japan to the east and northeast, and the Philippines to the south."
p9251
aS'Taiwan is one of the most densely populated countries in the world with a population density of 648 people per km2 in March 2015.'
p9252
aS'Taipei is the seat of the central government, and together with the surrounding cities of New Taipei and Keelung forms the largest metropolitan area on the island.The island of Taiwan (formerly known as "Formosa") was mainly inhabited by Taiwanese aborigines until the Dutch and Spanish settlement during the Age of Discovery in the 17th century, when Han Chinese began immigrating to the island.'
p9253
aS'In 1662, the pro-Ming loyalist Koxinga expelled the Dutch and established the first Han Chinese polity on the island, the Kingdom of Tungning.'
p9254
aS'The Qing dynasty of China later defeated the kingdom and annexed Taiwan.'
p9255
aS"By the time Taiwan was ceded to Japan in 1895, the majority of Taiwan's inhabitants were Han Chinese either by ancestry or by assimilation."
p9256
aS'The Republic of China (ROC) was established in mainland China in 1912.'
p9257
aS'For Parsons, voluntarism established a third alternative between these two.'
p9258
aS'More than a theory of society, Parsons presented a theory of social evolution and a concrete interpretation of the "drives" and directions of world history.Parsons analyzed the work of Emile_Durkheim and Vilfredo_Pareto and evaluated their contributions through the paradigm of voluntaristic action.'
p9259
aS"Parsons was also largely responsible for introducing and interpreting Max_Weber's work to American audiences."
p9260
aS'Although he was generally considered a major structuralist functionalist scholar, in an article late in life, Parsons explicitly wrote that the term "functional" or "structural functionalist" were inappropriate ways to describe the character of his theory.'
p9261
aS'For Parsons, "structural functionalism" was a particular stage in the methodological development of the social science, and "functionalism" was a universal method; neither term was a name for any specific school.'
p9262
aS'In the same way, the concept "grand theory" is a derogatory term, which Parsons himself never used. Biography Talcott_Parsons was born 13 December 1902 in Colorado Springs.'
p9263
aS'He was the son of Edward Smith Parsons (1863-1943) and Mary Augusta Ingersoll (1863-1949).'
p9264
aS'Taliesin was a renowned bard who is believed to have sung at the courts of at least three Brythonic kings.Eleven of the preserved poems have been dated to as early as the 6th century, and were ascribed to the historical Taliesin.'
p9265
aS"The bulk of this work praises King Urien of Rheged and his son Owain mab Urien, although several of the poems indicate that he also served as the court bard to King Brochfael Ysgithrog of Powys and his successor Cynan Garwyn, either before or during his time at Urien's court."
p9266
aS'Some of the events to which the poems refer, such as the Battle of Arfderydd (c. 583), are referred to in other sources.His name, spelled as Taliessin in Alfred, Lord Tennyson\'s Idylls of the King and in some subsequent works, means "shining brow" in Middle Welsh.'
p9267
aS'In legend and medieval Welsh poetry, he is often referred to as Taliesin Ben Beirdd ("Taliesin, Chief of Bards" or chief of poets).'
p9268
aS'He is mentioned as one of the five British poets of renown, along with Talhaearn Tad Awen ("Talhaearn Father of the Muse"), Aneirin, Blwchfardd, and Cian Gwenith Gwawd ("Cian Wheat of Song"), in the Historia Brittonum, and is also mentioned in the collection of poems known as Y Gododdin.'
p9269
aS'Taliesin was highly regarded in the mid-12th century as the supposed author of a great number of romantic legends.According to legend Taliesin was adopted as a child by Elffin, the son of Gwyddno Garanhir, and prophesied the death of Maelgwn Gwynedd from the Yellow Plague.'
p9270
aS'In later stories he became a mythic hero, companion of Bran the Blessed and King Arthur.'
p9271
aS'He was the father of Pelops, Niobe and Broteas, and was a son of Zeus and the nymph Plouto.'
p9272
aS'Thus, like other heroes in Greek mythology such as Theseus and the Dioskouroi, Tantalus had both a hidden, divine parent and a mortal one. Etymology Plato in the Cratylus (395e) interprets Tantalos as talantatos talantatos (acc.'
p9273
aS'talantaton in the original), "who has to bear much" from talas talas "wretched" (now the word talas is held to be inherited from Proto-Indo-European).'
p9274
aS'R. S. P. Beekes has rejected an Indo-European interpretation. Historical background There may have been a historical Tantalus - possibly the ruler of an Anatolian city named "Tantalis", "the city of Tantalus", or of a city named "Sipylus".'
p9275
aS'Pausanias reports that there was a port under his name and a sepulchre of him "by no means obscure", in the same region.Tantalus is referred to as "Phrygian", and sometimes even as "King of Phrygia", although his city was located in the western extremity of Anatolia where Lydia was to emerge as a state before the beginning of the first millennium BC, and not in the traditional heartland of Phrygia, situated more inland.'
p9276
aS'References to his son as "Pelops the Lydian" led some scholars to the conclusion that there would be good grounds for believing that he belonged to a primordial house of Lydia.Other versions name his father as Tmolus, the name of a king of Lydia and, like Sipylus, of another mountain in ancient Lydia.'
p9277
aS"The location of Tantalus' mortal mountain-fathers generally placed him in Lydia; and more seldom in Phrygia or Paphlagonia, all in Asia Minor.The identity of his wife is variously given: generally as Dione the daughter of Atlas; the Pleiad Taygete, daughter of Atlas; Eurythemista, a daughter of the river-god Xanthus; Euryanassa, daughter of Pactolus, another river-god of Anatolia, like the Xanthus; Clytia, the child of Amphidamantes; and Eupryto."
p9278
aS'In Taoism, however, Tao denotes something that is both the source of, and the force behind, everything that exists.'
p9279
aS'The "way" becomes clear when one is in constant meditation with all thoughts being subconsciously regulated outside the state of mental stillness, although emotions will drive thoughts, they remain an absolute choice.Taoism is practiced as a religion in various Asian communities, but its theology is not dependent on the existence of an anthropomorphic godlike figurehead (even though some communities do worship Laozi as the attributed founder of the philosophical doctrine), and has more affinities with pantheistic traditions given its philosophical emphasis on the formlessness of the Tao.'
p9280
aS'Taoism drew its cosmological notions from the tenets of the School of Yin Yang, and is heavily influenced and informed by the acknowledged oldest text of ancient Chinese classics, the I Ching, which prescribes a system of philosophical thought on the ethics of human behaviours based on articulating cycles of change in the natural and social worlds by means of gua or hexagrams, and includes instructions for divination practice still adhered to by modern-day religious Taoists.'
p9281
aS'The Tao Te Ching, a compact and ambiguous book containing teachings attributed to Laozi (Chinese: Lao Zi ; pinyin: Laozi; Wade-Giles: Lao Tzu), is widely considered the keystone work of this philosophy.'
p9282
aS'Together with the writings of Zhuangzi, which interprets and adds to the teaching of Laozi, these classic texts provide the philosophical foundation of Taoism deriving from the 8 trigrams (bagua) of Fu Xi in the 2700s BCE in China, the various combinations of which creates the 64 hexagrams as documented in the I Ching.Taoist propriety and ethics may vary depending on the particular school, but in general they tend to emphasize wu-wei (action through non-action), "naturalness", simplicity, spontaneity, and the Three Treasures: compassion, moderation, and humility.Taoism has had profound influence on Chinese culture in the course of the centuries, and clerics of institutionalised Taoism (Chinese: Dao Shi ; pinyin: daoshi) usually take care to note distinction between their ritual tradition and the customs and practices found in Chinese folk religion as these distinctions sometimes appear blurred.'
p9283
aS'Chinese alchemy (especially neidan), Chinese astrology, Chan (Zen) Buddhism, several martial arts, traditional Chinese medicine, feng shui, and many styles of qigong have been intertwined with Taoism throughout history.'
p9284
aS'Beyond China, Taoism also had influence on surrounding societies in Asia.After Laozi and Zhuangzi, the literature of Taoism grew steadily and was compiled in form of a canon--the Daozang--which was published at the behest of the emperor.'
p9285
aS"Based on the Moliere's play Tartuffe, or the Impostor, it is a modern opera buffa set in Paris in the 17th century."
p9286
aS'Tartuffe premiered on May 27, 1980, at the San_Francisco Opera It has since seen over 400 performances in six countries and been translated into German, Russian, Chinese, Japanese and Czech.'
p9287
aS'A "number opera" with arias, duets, trios and ensembles, Tartuffe is one of the most performed operas by an American composer.'
p9288
aS'Also often sung is Mechem\'s choral arrangement of the song "The Lighthearted Lovers," excerpted from Dorine\'s aria, "Fair Robin I Love.'
p9289
aS'" Roles Tartuffe, a hypocrite - baritoneOrgon, a wealthy Parisian - bassElmire, Orgon\'s 2nd wife - mezzo-sopranoDamis, Orgon\'s son - high baritoneMariane, Orgon\'s daughter - sopranoValere, Mariane\'s fiance - tenorDorine, Mariane\'s maid - sopranoMme.'
p9290
aS"Pernelle, Orgon's mother - mezzo-sopranoFlipote, Mme."
p9291
aS"Pernelle's maid (silent)Optional Chorus Synopsis  Act 1 Madame Pernelle, together with her maid, Flipote, is leaving the house of her son, Orgon."
p9292
aS"Almost immediately following its first performance that same year at the Versailles fetes, it was censored by King Louis XIV, probably due to the influence of the archbishop of Paris, Paul Philippe Hardouin de Beaumont de Perefixe, who was the King's confessor and had been his tutor."
p9293
aS'While the king had little personal interest in suppressing the play, he did so because, as stated in the official account of the fete:"...although it was found to be extremely diverting, the king recognized so much conformity between those that a true devotion leads on the path to heaven and those that a vain ostentation of some good works does not prevent from committing some bad ones, that his extreme delicacy to religious matters can not suffer this resemblance of vice to virtue, which could be mistaken for each other; although one does not doubt the good intentions of the author, even so he forbids it in public, and deprived himself of this pleasure, in order not to allow it to be abused by others, less capable of making a just discernment of it.'
p9294
aS'"As a result of Moliere\'s play, contemporary French and English both use the word "tartuffe" to designate a hypocrite who ostensibly and exaggeratedly feigns virtue, especially religious virtue.'
p9295
aS"The play is written entirely in 1,962 twelve-syllable lines (alexandrines) of rhyming couplets. Characters  Plot Orgon's family is up in arms because Orgon and his mother have fallen under the influence of Tartuffe, a pious fraud (and a vagrant prior to Orgon's help)."
p9296
aS"Tartuffe pretends to be pious and to speak with divine authority, and Orgon and his mother no longer take any action without first consulting him.Tartuffe's antics do not fool the rest of the family or their friends; they detest him."
p9297
aS'Orgon raises the stakes when he announces that he will marry Tartuffe to his daughter Mariane (already engaged to Valere).'
p9298
aS'Mariane, of course, feels very upset at this news, and the rest of the family realizes how deeply Tartuffe has embedded himself into the family.In an effort to show Orgon how awful Tartuffe really is, the family devises a scheme to trap Tartuffe into confessing to Elmire his desire for her.'
p9299
aS'Taxes are also imposed by many administrative divisions.'
p9300
aS'Taxes consist of direct or indirect taxes and may be paid in money or as its labour equivalent.'
p9301
aS'Few countries impose no taxation at all, such as the United Arab Emirates. Overview The legal definition and the economic definition of taxes differ in that economists do not regard many transfers to governments as taxes.'
p9302
aS'For example, some transfers to the public sector are comparable to prices.'
p9303
aS'Examples include tuition at public universities and fees for utilities provided by local governments.'
p9304
aS'Governments also obtain resources by "creating" money and coins (for example, by printing bills and by minting coins), through voluntary gifts (for example, contributions to public universities and museums), by imposing penalties (such as traffic fines), by borrowing, and by confiscating wealth.'
p9305
aS'From the view of economists, a tax is a non-penal, yet compulsory transfer of resources from the private to the public sector levied on a basis of predetermined criteria and without reference to specific benefit received.In modern taxation systems, governments levy taxes in money; but in-kind and corvee taxation are characteristic of traditional or pre-capitalist states and their functional equivalents.'
p9306
aS"The disease occurs when harmful quantities of cell membrane components known as gangliosides accumulate in the brain's nerve cells, eventually leading to the premature death of the cells."
p9307
aS'A ganglioside is a form of sphingolipid, which makes Tay-Sachs_disease a member of the sphingolipidoses.'
p9308
aS'There is no known cure or treatment.The disease is named after the British ophthalmologist Waren Tay, who in 1881 first described a symptomatic red spot on the retina of the eye; and after the American neurologist Bernard Sachs of Mount Sinai Hospital, New York, who described in 1887 the cellular changes of Tay-Sachs_disease and noted an increased disease prevalence in Ashkenazi Jewish people.Research in the late 20th century demonstrated that Tay-Sachs_disease is caused by a genetic mutation in the HEXA gene on (human) chromosome 15.'
p9309
aS'A large number of HEXA mutations have been discovered, and new ones are still being reported.'
p9310
aS'These mutations reach significant frequencies in specific populations.'
p9311
aS'French Canadians of southeastern Quebec have a carrier frequency similar to that seen in Ashkenazi Jews, but carry a different mutation.'
p9312
aS'Cajuns of southern Louisiana carry the same mutation that is seen most commonly in Ashkenazi Jews.'
p9313
aS'In 1808, they settled Prophetstown in present-day Indiana.'
p9314
aS"With a vision of establishing an independent Native American nation east of the Mississippi under British protection, Tecumseh worked to recruit additional tribes to the confederacy from the southern United_States.During the War_of_1812, Tecumseh's confederacy allied with the British and helped in the capture of Fort Detroit."
p9315
aS'Prior to the raid, Chief Tecumseh delivered a powerful speech upon a rock that is preserved to this day at Fort Malden.'
p9316
aS'After the U.S. Navy took control of Lake Erie in 1813, the Native Americans and British retreated.'
p9317
aS'American forces caught them at the Battle_of_the_Thames, and killed Tecumseh in October 1813.'
p9318
aS'With his death, his confederation disintegrated, and the Native Americans had to move west again, yet Tecumseh became an iconic folk hero in American, Aboriginal and Canadian history. Family background Tecumseh\'s father was named Puckshinwa (in Shawnee, Puckeshinwau, meaning "Alights from Flying", "Something that drops" or "I light from flying", also known as Puckeshinwa, Pucksinwah, Pukshinwa, Pukeesheno, Pekishinoah, Pooksehnwe and other variations), a minor Shawnee war chief of the Kispoko ("Dancing Tail" or "Panther") band and the Panther Clan of the tribe.'
p9319
aS"According to some sources, Puckshinwa's father was Muscogee (Creek) and his mother was Shawnee."
p9320
aS'Tennessee is bordered by Kentucky and Virginia to the north, North Carolina to the east, Georgia, Alabama, and Mississippi to the south, and Arkansas and Missouri to the west.'
p9321
aS"The Appalachian Mountains dominate the eastern part of the state, and the Mississippi River forms the state's western border."
p9322
aS"Tennessee's capital and second largest city is Nashville, which has a population of 601,222."
p9323
aS"Memphis is the state's largest city, with a population of 653,450.The state of Tennessee is rooted in the Watauga Association, a 1772 frontier pact generally regarded as the first constitutional government west of the Appalachians."
p9324
aS'What is now Tennessee was initially part of North Carolina, and later part of the Southwest Territory.'
p9325
aS'Tennessee was admitted to the Union as the 16th state on June 1, 1796.'
p9326
aS'Tennessee was the last state to leave the Union and join the Confederacy at the outbreak of the U.S. Civil War in 1861.'
p9327
aS"Though now considered a major nineteenth-century English novel and possibly Hardy's masterpiece, Tess_of_the_d'Urbervilles received mixed reviews when it first appeared, in part because it challenged the sexual morals of late Victorian England. Summary of the novel  Phase the First: The Maiden (1-11) The novel is set in impoverished rural England, Thomas Hardy's fictional Wessex, during the Long Depression of the 1870s."
p9328
aS'Tess is the oldest child of John and Joan Durbeyfield, uneducated peasants; however, John is given the impression by Parson Tringham that he may have noble blood, since "Durbeyfield" is a corruption of "D\'Urberville", the surname of a noble Norman family, then extinct.'
p9329
aS"The news immediately goes to John's head.That same day, Tess participates in the village May Dance, where she meets Angel Clare, youngest son of Reverend James Clare, who is on a walking tour with his two brothers."
p9330
aS'He stops to join the dance and partners several other girls.'
p9331
aS'Angel notices Tess too late to dance with her, as he is already late for a promised meeting with his brothers.'
p9332
aS"Tess feels slighted.Tess' father gets too drunk to drive to the market that night, so Tess undertakes the journey herself."
p9333
aS"However, she falls asleep at the reins, and the family's only horse encounters a speeding wagon and is fatally wounded."
p9334
aS'His name in the Nahuatl language is often translated as "Smoking Mirror" and alludes to his connection to obsidian, the material from which mirrors were made in Mesoamerica which were used for shamanic rituals and prophecy.'
p9335
aS'Another talisman related to Tezcatlipoca was a disc worn as a chest pectoral.'
p9336
aS'This talisman was carved out of abalone shell and depicted on the chest of both Huitzilopochtli and Tezcatlipoca in codex illustrations.He had many epithets which alluded to different aspects of his deity: Titlacauan ("We are his Slaves"), Ipalnemoani ("He by whom we live"), Necoc Yaotl("Enemy of Both Sides"), Tloque Nahuaque ("Lord of the Near and the Nigh") and Yohualli Ehecatl ("Night, Wind"), Ome Acatl ("Two Reed"), Ilhuicahua Tlalticpaque ("Possessor of the Sky and Earth").When depicted he was usually drawn with a black and a yellow stripe painted across his face.'
p9337
aS'He is often shown with his right foot replaced with an obsidian mirror or a bone--an allusion to the creation myth in which he loses his foot battling with the Earth Monster.'
p9338
aS'Sometimes the mirror was shown on his chest, and sometimes smoke would emanate from the mirror.'
p9339
aS'Tezcatlipoca\'s nagual, his animal counterpart, was the jaguar and his jaguar aspect was the deity Tepeyollotl ("Mountainheart").'
p9340
aS'In the Aztec ritual calendar the Tonalpohualli Tezcatlipoca ruled the trecena 1 Ocelotl ("1 Jaguar")--he was also patron of the days with the name Acatl ("reed").The Tezcatlipoca figure goes back to earlier Mesoamerican deities worshipped by the Olmec and Maya.'
p9341
aS"Its maritime boundaries include Vietnam in the Gulf of Thailand to the southeast, and Indonesia and India on the Andaman Sea to the southwest.Thailand is governed by a military junta that took power in the May 2014 coup d'etat."
p9342
aS"Its monarchy is headed by King Bhumibol Adulyadej, Rama IX, who is the ninth of the House of Chakri, and has reigned since 1946 as the world's longest-serving current head of state and the country's longest-reigning monarch.With a total area of approximately 513,000 km2 (198,000 sq mi), Thailand is the world's 51st-largest country."
p9343
aS'It is the 20th-most-populous country in the world, with around 66 million people.'
p9344
aS"The capital and largest city is Bangkok, which is Thailand's political, commercial, industrial, and cultural hub."
p9345
aS'About 75-95% of the population is ethnically Tai, which includes four major regional groups: central Thai, northeastern Thai (Khon [Lao] Isan), northern Thai (Khon Mueang); and southern Thai.'
p9346
aS'Thai Chinese, those of significant Chinese heritage, are 14% of the population, while Thais with partial Chinese ancestry comprise up to 40% of the population.'
p9347
aS'Thai Malays represent 3% of the population, with the remainder consisting of Mons, Khmers and various "hill tribes".'
p9348
aS"William_Cullen_Bryant's early education came from his father."
p9349
aS"In his early life Bryant would spend a great deal of time in the woods surrounding his family's New England home, and read of the extensive personal library his father had."
p9350
aS'Bryant\'s first published poem was "The Embargo; or, Sketches of the Times", a satirical work concerning Thomas Jefferson\'s Embargo Act of 1807.'
p9351
aS'It was released in a Boston newspaper in 1808.'
p9352
aS'In 1810 Bryant was forced to leave Williams College for lack of money.'
p9353
aS'Instead of a formal education, he started studying law, and began learning an eclectic mix of poetry, such as the works of as Isaac Watts and Henry Kirke White, and verses like William Cowper\'s "The Task" and Edmund Spenser\'s "The Faery Queene".When and where Bryant wrote "Thanatopsis" is unclear, and Bryant himself could not remember when he wrote the verse.'
p9354
aS"According to Parke Godwin, Bryant's friend, Bryant wrote the poem when he was seventeen years old in mid-1811, just after he had left Williams College."
p9355
aS'The book sparked much public discussion at the time, and it is widely remembered for Galbraith\'s popularizing of the term "conventional wisdom.'
p9356
aS'"Many of the same ideas were later expanded and refined in Galbraith\'s 1967 book, The New Industrial State.Former U.S. Secretary of Labor Robert Reich called it his favorite on the subject of economics.'
p9357
aS'The Modern Library placed the book at no.'
p9358
aS'46 on its list of the top 100 English-language non-fiction books of the 20th century. Themes The "central tradition" in economics, created by Adam_Smith and expanded by David_Ricardo and Thomas_Robert_Malthus in the late eighteenth and early nineteenth centuries, is poorly suited to the affluent post-World_War_II U.S. society.'
p9359
aS'This is so because the "central tradition" economists wrote during a time of widespread poverty where production of basic goods was necessary.'
p9360
aS"U.S. society, at the time of Galbraith's writing, was one of widespread affluence, where production was based on luxury goods and wants.Using production, or gross domestic product, as a measure of U.S. society's well-being omits important measures of social and personal well-being."
p9361
aS'GDP also neglects differences in output.'
p9362
aS"The play's clever fulfilment of the classical unities and vivid depiction of human folly have made it one of the few Renaissance plays (except the works of Shakespeare) with a continuing life on stage (except for a period of neglect during the Victorian era). Background The Alchemist premiered 34 years after the first permanent public theatre (The Theatre) opened in London; it is, then, a product of the early maturity of commercial drama in London."
p9363
aS'Only one of the University wits who had transformed drama in the Elizabethan period remained alive (this was Thomas Lodge); in the other direction, the last great playwright to flourish before the Interregnum, James Shirley, was already a teenager.'
p9364
aS'The theatres had survived the challenge mounted by the city and religious authorities; plays were a regular feature of life at court and for a great number of Londoners.The venue for which Jonson apparently wrote his play reflects this newly solid acceptance of theatre as a fact of city life.'
p9365
aS"In 1597, the Lord Chamberlain's Men (a.k.a."
p9366
aS"the King's Men) had been denied permission to use the theatre in Blackfriars as a winter playhouse because of objections from the neighbourhood's influential residents."
p9367
aS"Some time between 1608 and 1610, the company, now the King's Men, reassumed control of the playhouse, this time without objections."
p9368
aS'Their delayed premiere on this stage within the city walls, along with royal patronage, marks the ascendance of this company in the London play-world (Gurr, 171).'
p9369
aS'It also incorporates a much-cited example of anamorphosis in painting.'
p9370
aS'It is part of the collection at the National Gallery in London. Description Although a German-born artist who spent most of his time in England, Holbein displayed the influence of Early Netherlandish painters in this work.'
p9371
aS'This influence can be noted most outwardly in the use of oil paint, the use of which for panel paintings had been developed a century before in Early Netherlandish painting.'
p9372
aS'What is most "Flemish" of Holbein\'s use of oils is his use of the medium to render meticulous details that are mainly symbolic: as Jan van Eyck and the Master of Flemalle used extensive imagery to link their subjects to divinity, Holbein used symbols to link his figures to show the same things on the table.Among the clues to the figures\' explorative associations are a selection of scientific instruments including two globes (one terrestrial and one celestial), a quadrant, a torquetum, and a polyhedral sundial, as well as various textiles including the floor mosaic, based on a design from Westminster Abbey (the Cosmati pavement, before the High Altar), and the carpet on the upper shelf, which is most notably oriental, an example of Oriental carpets in Renaissance painting.'
p9373
aS'The choice for the inclusion of the two figures can furthermore be seen as symbolic.'
p9374
aS'The figure on the left is in secular attire while the figure on the right is dressed in clerical clothes.'
p9375
aS'Their flanking of the table, which displays open books, symbols of religious knowledge and even a symbolic link to the Virgin, is therefore believed by some critics to be symbolic of a unification of capitalism and the Church.In contrast, other scholars have suggested the painting contains overtones of religious strife.'
p9376
aS'Some of the spectators are various doctors who paid commissions to be included in the painting.'
p9377
aS'The painting is signed in the top-left hand corner Rembrandt.'
p9378
aS'f[ecit] 1632.'
p9379
aS'This may be the first instance of Rembrandt signing a painting with his forename (in its original form) as opposed to the monogramme RHL (Rembrandt Harmenszoon of Leiden), and is thus a sign of his growing artistic confidence.The event can be dated to 16 January 1632: the Amsterdam Guild of Surgeons, of which Tulp was official City Anatomist, permitted only one public dissection a year, and the body would have to be that of an executed criminal.Anatomy lessons were a social event in the 17th century, taking place in lecture rooms that were actual theatres, with students, colleagues and the general public being permitted to attend on payment of an entrance fee.'
p9380
aS'The spectators are appropriately dressed for a solemn social occasion.'
p9381
aS'It is thought that the uppermost (not holding the paper) and farthest left figures were added to the picture later.One person is missing: the Preparator, whose task it was to prepare the body for the lesson.'
p9382
aS'In the 17th century an important scientist such as Dr. Tulp would not be involved in menial and bloody work like dissection, and such tasks would be left to others.'
p9383
aS"It is one of the earliest American novels that focuses on women's issues without condescension."
p9384
aS"It is also widely seen as a landmark work of early feminism, generating a mixed reaction from contemporary readers and critics.The novel's blend of realistic narrative, incisive social commentary, and psychological complexity makes The Awakening a precursor of American modernist literature; it prefigures the works of American novelists such as William_Faulkner and Ernest_Hemingway and echoes the works of contemporaries such as Edith_Wharton and Henry_James."
p9385
aS"It can also be considered among the first Southern works in a tradition that would culminate with the modern masterpieces of Faulkner, Flannery_O'Connor, Eudora Welty, Katherine_Anne_Porter, and Tennessee Williams. Synopsis The novel opens with the Pontellier family--Leonce, a New_Orleans businessman of Louisiana Creole heritage; his wife Edna; and their two sons, Etienne and Raoul--vacationing on Grand Isle at a resort on the Gulf of Mexico managed by Madame Lebrun and her two sons, Robert and Victor.Edna spends most of her time with her close friend Adele Ratignolle, who cheerily and boisterously reminds Edna of her duties as a wife and mother."
p9386
aS"At Grand Isle, Edna eventually forms a connection with Robert Lebrun, a charming, earnest young man who actively seeks Edna's attention and affections."
p9387
aS'When they fall in love, Robert senses the doomed nature of such a relationship and flees to Mexico under the guise of pursuing a nameless business venture.'
p9388
aS"The narrative focus moves to Edna's shifting emotions as she reconciles her maternal duties with her desire for social freedom and to be with Robert.When summer vacation ends, the Pontelliers return to New_Orleans."
p9389
aS'Edna gradually reassesses her priorities and takes a more active role in her own happiness.'
p9390
aS'The premiere of Rossini\'s opera (under the title Almaviva, o sia L\'inutile precauzione) took place on 20 February 1816 at the Teatro Argentina, Rome.Rossini\'s Barber has proven to be one of the greatest masterpieces of comedy within music, and has been described as the opera buffa of all "opere buffe".'
p9391
aS"Even after two hundred years, its popularity on the modern opera stage attests to that greatness. Composition history Rossini's opera recounts the events of the first of the three plays by French playwright Pierre Beaumarchais that revolve around the clever and enterprising character named Figaro."
p9392
aS"Mozart's opera Le nozze di Figaro, composed 30 years earlier in 1786, is based on the second part of the Beaumarchais trilogy."
p9393
aS'The first Beaumarchais play was originally conceived as an opera comique, but was rejected as such by the Comedie-Italienne.'
p9394
aS'The play as it is now known was premiered in 1775 by the Comedie-Francaise at the Theatre des Tuileries in Paris.Other operas based on the first play were composed by Giovanni Paisiello (his Il barbiere di Siviglia premiered in 1782), by Nicolas Isouard in 1796, and then by Francesco Morlacchi in 1816.'
p9395
aS"Though the work of Paisiello triumphed for a time, only Rossini's version has stood the test of time and continues to be a mainstay of operatic repertoire."
p9396
aS"On 11 November 1868, two days before Rossini's death, the composer Costantino Dall'Argine (1842-1877) premiered an opera based on the same libretto as Rossini's work, bearing a dedication to Rossini."
p9397
aS'The story is about a year in the life of a young black girl named Pecola who develops an inferiority complex due to her eye color and skin appearance.'
p9398
aS"It is set in Lorain, Ohio, against the backdrop of America's Midwest during the years following the Great Depression."
p9399
aS'The point of view switches between the perspective of Claudia MacTeer, as a child and as an adult, and a third-person omniscient viewpoint.'
p9400
aS'Because of the controversial nature of the book, which deals with racism, incest, and child molestation, there have been numerous attempts to ban it from schools and libraries. Plot summary In Lorain, Ohio, 9-year-old Claudia MacTeer and her 10-year-old sister Frieda live with their parents, who take two other people into their home: Mr. Henry, a tenant, and Pecola Breedlove, a temporary foster child whose house was burned down by her wildly unstable father, Cholly: a man widely gossiped about in the community.'
p9401
aS'Pecola is a quiet, passive young girl with a hard life, whose parents are constantly fighting, both verbally and physically.'
p9402
aS'Pecola is continually reminded of what an "ugly" girl she is, fueling her desire to be white with blue eyes.'
p9403
aS"Most chapters' titles are extracts from the Dick and Jane paragraph in the novel's prologue, presenting a white family that may be contrasted with Pecola's; perhaps to incite discomfort, the chapter titles contain much sudden repetition of words or phrases, many cut-off words, and no interword separations.The novel, through flashbacks, explores the younger years of both of Pecola's parents, Cholly and Pauline, and their struggles as African-Americans in a largely White Anglo-Saxon Protestant community."
p9404
aS"The storyline concerns the struggle between Ransom and Olive for Verena's allegiance and affection, though the novel also includes a wide panorama of political activists, newspaper people, and quirky eccentrics. Plot summary Mississippi lawyer and Civil War veteran, Basil Ransom, visits his cousin Olive Chancellor in Boston."
p9405
aS'She takes him to a political meeting where Verena Tarrant delivers a feminist speech.'
p9406
aS'Ransom, a strong conservative, is annoyed by the speech but fascinated with the speaker.'
p9407
aS'Olive, who has never before set eyes on Verena, is equally fascinated.'
p9408
aS"She persuades Verena to leave her parents' house, move in with her and study in preparation for a career in the feminist movement."
p9409
aS'Meanwhile, Ransom returns to his law practice in New York, which is not doing well.'
p9410
aS'He visits Boston again and walks with Verena through the Harvard College grounds, including the impressive Civil War Memorial Hall.'
p9411
aS'The statue became known as the Bronze Horseman due to the great influence of the poem. Outline of the poem The poem is divided into three sections: a shorter introduction (90 lines) and two longer parts (164 and 222 lines).'
p9412
aS'The introduction opens with a mythologized history of the establishment of the city of Saint_Petersburg in 1703.'
p9413
aS'In the first two stanzas, Peter_the_Great stands at the edge of the River Neva and conceives the idea for a city which will threaten the Swedes and open a "window to Europe".'
p9414
aS'The poem describes the area as almost uninhabited: Peter can only see one boat and a handful of dark houses inhabited by Finnish peasants.'
p9415
aS'Saint_Petersburg was in fact constructed on territory newly gained from the Swedes in the Great Northern War, and Peter himself chose the site for the founding of a major city because it provided Russia with a corner of access to the Baltic Sea, and thus to the Atlantic and Europe.The rest of the introduction is in the first person and reads as an ode to the city of the Petersburg.'
p9416
aS'The poet-narrator describes how he loves Petersburg, including the city\'s "stern, muscular appearance" (l. 44), its landmarks such as the Admiralty (ll.'
p9417
aS'50-58), and its harsh winters and long summer evenings (ll.'
p9418
aS'The author died less than four months after its publication.The_Brothers_Karamazov is a passionate philosophical novel set in 19th century Russia, that enters deeply into the ethical debates of God, free will, and morality.'
p9419
aS'It is a spiritual drama of moral struggles concerning faith, doubt, and reason, set against a modernizing Russia, with a plot which revolves around the subject of patricide.'
p9420
aS'Dostoyevsky composed much of the novel in Staraya Russa, which inspired the main setting.'
p9421
aS'Since its publication, it has been acclaimed as one of the supreme achievements in literature. Context and background Although Dostoyevsky began his first notes for The_Brothers_Karamazov in April 1878, he had written several unfinished works years earlier.'
p9422
aS'He would incorporate some elements into his future work, particularly from the planned epos The Life of a Great Sinner, which he began work on in the summer of 1869.'
p9423
aS'It eventually remained unfinished after Dostoyevsky was interested in the Nechaev affair, which involved a group of radicals murdering one of their former members.'
p9424
aS'He picked up that story and started with The Possessed.'
p9425
aS'An exceptionally large painting, it is very clearly divided into two sections, heavenly above and terrestrial below, but it gives little impression of duality.'
p9426
aS'The upper and lower sections are brought together compositionally. Theme The theme of the painting is inspired from a legend of the beginning of the 14th century.'
p9427
aS'In 1312, a certain Don Gonzalo Ruiz, native of Toledo, and Senor of the town of Orgaz, died (his family later received the title of Count, by which he is generally and posthumously known).'
p9428
aS"The Count of Orgaz was a pious man who, among other charitable acts, left a sum of money for the enlargement and adornment of the church of Santo Tome (El_Greco's parish church)."
p9429
aS'He was also a philanthropist and a right-thinking Knight.'
p9430
aS'According to the legend, at the time he was buried, Saint Stephen and Saint Augustine descended in person from the heavens and buried him by their own hands in front of the dazzled eyes of those present. History The painting was commissioned by Andres Nunez, the parish priest of Santo Tome, for the side-chapel of the Virgin of the church of Santo Tome, and was executed by El_Greco between 1586-1588.'
p9431
aS"Nunez, who had initiated a project to refurbish the Count's burial chapel, is portrayed in the painting reading.Already in 1588, people were flocking to Orgaz to see the painting."
p9432
aS'It hangs alongside two other paintings of Matthew by Caravaggio, The Martyrdom of Saint Matthew (painted around the same time as the Calling) and The Inspiration of Saint Matthew (1602). Commission Over a decade before, Cardinal Matthieu Cointerel (in Italian, Matteo Contarelli) had left in his will funds and specific instructions for the decoration of a chapel based on themes related to his namesake, St Matthew.'
p9433
aS"The dome of the chapel was decorated with frescoes by the late Mannerist artist Cavalier D'Arpino, Caravaggio's former employer and one of the most popular painters in Rome at the time."
p9434
aS"But as D'Arpino became busy with royal and papal patronage, Cardinal Francesco Del Monte, Caravaggio's patron and also the prefect of the Fabbrica of St Peter's (the Vatican office for Church property), intervened to obtain for Caravaggio his first major church commission and his first painting with more than a handful of figures.The Calling hangs opposite The Martyrdom of Saint Matthew."
p9435
aS'While the Martyrdom was probably the first to be started, the Calling was, by report, the first to be completed.'
p9436
aS'The commission for these two lateral paintings -- the Calling and the Martyrdom -- is dated July 1599, and final payment was made in July 1600.'
p9437
aS'Between the two, at the altar, is The Inspiration of Saint Matthew (1602). Subject matter The painting depicts the story from the Gospel of Matthew (Matthew 9:9): "Jesus saw a man named Matthew at his seat in the custom house, and said to him, "Follow me", and Matthew rose and followed Him."'
p9438
aS'Caravaggio depicts Matthew the tax collector sitting at a table with four other men.'
p9439
aS'The prize for this contest is a free meal at the Tabard Inn at Southwark on their return.After a long list of works written earlier in his career, including Troilus and Criseyde, House of Fame, and "Parliament of Fowls", The_Canterbury_Tales is near-unanimously seen as Chaucer\'s magnum opus.'
p9440
aS'He uses the tales and the descriptions of its characters to paint an ironic and critical portrait of English society at the time, and particularly of the Church.'
p9441
aS'Structurally, the collection resembles The Decameron, which Chaucer may have read during his first diplomatic mission to Italy in 1372.It is sometimes argued that the greatest contribution The_Canterbury_Tales made to English literature was in popularising the literary use of the vernacular, English, rather than French or Latin.'
p9442
aS"English had, however, been used as a literary language centuries before Chaucer's time, and several of Chaucer's contemporaries--John Gower, William Langland, the Pearl Poet, and Julian of Norwich--also wrote major literary works in English."
p9443
aS'It is unclear to what extent Chaucer was responsible for starting a trend as opposed to simply being part of it.While Chaucer clearly states the addressees of many of his poems, the intended audience of The_Canterbury_Tales is more difficult to determine.'
p9444
aS'Chaucer was a courtier, leading some to believe that he was mainly a court poet who wrote exclusively for nobility. Text The question of whether The_Canterbury_Tales is finished has not yet been answered.'
p9445
aS'There are 83 known manuscripts of the work from the late medieval and early Renaissance periods, more than any other vernacular literary text with the exception of The Prick of Conscience.'
p9446
aS'It is scored for two pianos, two violins, viola, cello, double bass, flute (and piccolo), clarinet (C and B), glass harmonica, and xylophone.From the beginning, Saint-Saens regarded the work as a piece of fun.'
p9447
aS'On 9 February 1886 he wrote to his publishers Durand in Paris that he was composing a work for the coming Shrove Tuesday, and confessing that he knew he should be working on his Third Symphony, but that this work was "such fun" ("... mais c\'est si amusant!").'
p9448
aS'He had apparently intended to write the work for his students at the Ecole Niedermeyer, but it was first performed at a private concert given by the cellist Charles Lebouc on Shrove Tuesday, 9 March 1886.A second (private) performance was given on 2 April at the home of Pauline Viardot with an audience including Franz_Liszt, a friend of the composer, who had expressed a wish to hear the work.'
p9449
aS'There were other private performances, typically for the French mid-Lent festival of Mi-Careme, but Saint-Saens was adamant that the work would not be published in his lifetime, seeing it as detracting from his "serious" composer image.'
p9450
aS'He relented only for the famous cello solo The Swan, which forms the penultimate movement of the work, and which was published in 1887 in an arrangement by the composer for cello and solo piano (the original uses two pianos).Saint-Saens did specify in his will that the work should be published posthumously.'
p9451
aS"Following his death in December 1921, the work was published by Durand in Paris in April 1922 and the first public performance was given on 25 February 1922 by Concerts Colonne (the orchestra of Edouard Colonne).Carnival has since become one of Saint-Saens's best-known works, played by the original eleven instrumentalists, or more often with the full string section of an orchestra."
p9452
aS'Normally a glockenspiel substitutes for the rare glass harmonica.'
p9453
aS'Kafka died before finishing the work, but suggested it would end with K. dying in the village, the castle notifying him on his death bed that his "legal claim to live in the village was not valid, yet, taking certain auxiliary circumstances into account, he was permitted to live and work there".'
p9454
aS'Dark and at times surreal, The Castle is often understood to be about alienation, unresponsive bureaucracy, the frustration of trying to conduct business with non-transparent, seemingly arbitrary controlling systems, and the futile pursuit of an unobtainable goal. History of the novel Kafka began writing the novel on the evening of 27 January 1922, the day he arrived at the mountain resort of Spindlermuhle (now in the Czech_Republic).'
p9455
aS'A picture taken of him upon his arrival shows him by a horse-drawn sleigh in the snow in a setting reminiscent of The Castle.'
p9456
aS"Hence, the significance that the first few chapters of the handwritten manuscript were written in first person and at some point later changed by Kafka to a third person narrator, 'K."
p9457
aS"' Max Brod Kafka died before finishing the novel, and it is questionable whether he intended to finish it if he had survived his tuberculosis."
p9458
aS'On separate occasions he told his friend Max Brod of two different conditions: K., the book\'s protagonist, would continue to reside and die in the village; the castle notifying him on his death bed that his "legal claim to live in the village was not valid, yet, taking certain auxiliary circumstances into account, he was permitted to live and work there", but then on 11 September 1922 in a letter to Max Brod, he said he was giving up on the book and would never return to it.'
p9459
aS"As it is, the book ends mid-sentence.Although Brod was instructed by Kafka to destroy all his works on his death, he did not and set about publishing Kafka's writings."
p9460
aS'Fabrice grows up surrounded by intrigues and alliances for and against the French -- his father the Marchese comically fancies himself a spy for the Viennese.'
p9461
aS'It is broadly hinted at that Fabrice may have actually been fathered by a visiting French lieutenant.'
p9462
aS"The novel's early section describes Fabrice's rather quixotic effort to join Napoleon when the latter returns to France in March 1815 (the Hundred Days)."
p9463
aS'Fabrice at seventeen is idealistic, rather naive, and speaks poor French.'
p9464
aS'However, he will not be stopped and leaves his home on Lake Como to travel north with false papers.'
p9465
aS'He wanders through France, losing money and horses rapidly.'
p9466
aS'He is imprisoned as a spy, but escapes, donning the uniform of a dead French hussar.'
p9467
aS'Although Chekhov intended it as a comedy, and it does contain some elements of farce, Stanislavski insisted on directing the play as a tragedy.'
p9468
aS'Since this initial production, directors have had to contend with the dual nature of the play.'
p9469
aS'The play is often identified on the short list of the three or four outstanding plays written by Chekhov along with The Seagull, Three Sisters, and Uncle Vanya.The play concerns an aristocratic Russian woman and her family as they return to their family estate (which includes a large and well-known cherry orchard) just before it is auctioned to pay the mortgage.'
p9470
aS'While presented with options to save the estate, the family essentially does nothing and the play ends with the sale of the estate to the son of a former serf; the family leaves to the sound of the cherry orchard being cut down.'
p9471
aS'The story presents themes of cultural futility - both the futile attempts of the aristocracy to maintain its status and of the bourgeoisie to find meaning in its newfound materialism.'
p9472
aS'In reflecting the socio-economic forces at work in Russia at the turn of the 20th century, including the rise of the middle class after the abolition of serfdom in the mid-19th century and the sinking of the aristocracy, the play reflects forces at work around the globe in that period.Since the first production at the Moscow Art Theatre, this play has been translated and adapted into many languages and produced around the world, becoming a classic work of dramatic literature.'
p9473
aS'Some of the major directors of the world have directed it, each interpreting the work differently.'
p9474
aS'The novel has been the frequent target of censors and appears on the American Library Association list of the 100 Most Frequently Challenged Books of 2000-2009 at number seventeen because of the sometimes explicit content, particularly in terms of violence. Plot summary Celie, the protagonist and narrator, is a poor, uneducated, fourteen-year-old black girl living in the American South.'
p9475
aS'She writes letters to God because the man she believes to be her father, Alphonso, beats and rapes her.'
p9476
aS'Alphonso has already impregnated Celie once, a pregnancy that resulted in the birth of a girl.'
p9477
aS'Alphonso takes the girl away shortly after her birth.'
p9478
aS'Celie has a second child, a boy, whom Alphonso also abducts.'
p9479
aS"Celie's ailing mother dies after cursing Celie on her deathbed.Celie and her younger sister, Nettie, learn that a man identified only as Mister wants to marry Nettie."
p9480
aS'Alphonso refuses to let Nettie marry, instead arranging for Mister to marry Celie.'
p9481
aS'It presents an analytical approach to the class struggle (historical and present) and the problems of capitalism and the capitalist mode of production, rather than a prediction of communism\'s potential future forms.The_Communist_Manifesto summarizes Marx and Engels\' theories about the nature of society and politics, that in their own words, "The history of all hitherto existing society is the history of class struggles".'
p9482
aS'It also briefly features their ideas for how the capitalist society of the time would eventually be replaced by socialism, and then finally communism. SynopsisEdit The_Communist_Manifesto is divided into a preamble and four sections, the last of these a short conclusion.'
p9483
aS'The introduction begins by proclaiming "A spectre is haunting Europe--the spectre of communism.'
p9484
aS'All the powers of old Europe have entered into a holy alliance to exorcise this spectre".'
p9485
aS'Pointing out that parties everywhere--including those in government and those in the opposition--have flung the "branding reproach of communism" at each other, the authors infer from this that the powers-that-be acknowledge communism to be a power in itself.'
p9486
aS'Subsequently, the introduction exhorts Communists to openly publish their views and aims, to "meet this nursery tale of the spectre of communism with a manifesto of the party itself".The first section of the Manifesto, "Bourgeois and Proletarians", elucidates the materialist conception of history, that "the history of all hitherto existing society is the history of class struggles".'
p9487
aS'Societies have always taken the form of an oppressed majority living under the thumb of an oppressive minority.'
p9488
aS'This experience inspired the text, which reflects on how evil can exist in a world governed by God (the problem of theodicy), and how happiness can be attainable amidst fickle fortune, while also considering the nature of happiness and God.'
p9489
aS'It has been described as "by far the most interesting example of prison literature the world has ever seen.'
p9490
aS'"Even though reference is often made to God, the book is not strictly religious.'
p9491
aS'A link is often assumed, yet there is no reference made to Jesus Christ or Christianity or any other specific religion other than a few oblique references to Pauline scripture, such as the symmetry between the opening lines of Book 4 Chapter 3 and 1 Corinthians 9:24.'
p9492
aS'God is however represented not only as an eternal and all-knowing being, but as the source of all Good.Boethius writes the book as a conversation between himself and Lady Philosophy.'
p9493
aS'She consoles Boethius by discussing the transitory nature of fame and wealth ("no man can ever truly be secure until he has been forsaken by Fortune"), and the ultimate superiority of things of the mind, which she calls the "one true good".'
p9494
aS"She contends that happiness comes from within, and that one's virtue is all that one truly has, because it is not imperilled by the vicissitudes of fortune.Boethius engages questions such as the nature of predestination and free will, why evil men often prosper and good men fall into ruin, human nature, virtue, and justice."
p9495
aS'It is scored for soprano, tenor and bass soloists (the soloists representing the archangels Gabriel, Uriel, and Raphael, in Part III Adam and Eve), chorus and a symphonic orchestra, and is structured in three parts. Inspiration Haydn was inspired to write a large oratorio during his visits to England in 1791-1792 and 1794-1795, when he heard oratorios of Handel performed by large forces.'
p9496
aS'Israel in Egypt is believed to have been one of these.'
p9497
aS'It is likely that Haydn wanted to try to achieve results of comparable weight, using the musical language of the mature classical style. Libretto The text of The Creation has a long history.'
p9498
aS"The three sources are Genesis, the Biblical book of Psalms, and John Milton's Paradise Lost, an epic poem in ten volumes, first published in 1667."
p9499
aS'In 1795, when Haydn was leaving England, the impresario Johann Peter Salomon (1745-1815) who had arranged his concerts there handed him a new poem entitled The Creation of the World.'
p9500
aS'This original had been offered to Handel, but the old master had not worked on it, as its wordiness meant that it would have been 4 hours in length when set to music.'
p9501
aS'The libretto was probably passed on to Salomon by Thomas Linley Sr. (1733-1795), a Drury Lane oratorio concert director.'
p9502
aS"The former actually existed and was the first firm to distribute postal mail; the latter is Pynchon's invention."
p9503
aS'The novel is often classified as a notable example of postmodern fiction.'
p9504
aS'Time included the novel in its "TIME 100 Best English-language Novels from 1923 to 2005". Characters Oedipa Maas - The protagonist.'
p9505
aS'After her ex-boyfriend, Pierce Inverarity, dies and she becomes co-executor of his estate, she discovers and begins to unravel what may or may not be a world conspiracy.'
p9506
aS"The character Oedipus in Sophocles's Oedipus Rex unwittingly kills his father and marries his mother."
p9507
aS'Sigmund_Freud believed that all healthy boys go through an emotional stage just before entering the developmental stage he called latency in which they wish to supplant their father in their mother\'s affections and Freud called this the "Oedipus complex".'
p9508
aS'(The analogue for girls, the subject of plays by Aeschylus, Sophocles and Euripides, he called the Electra complex.'
p9509
aS'In some texts his father is Elatha, in others his mother is Ethniu.'
p9510
aS'Other texts say that his mother is Danu; while others yet place him as the father of Danu, perhaps due to her association with Brigit, daughter of the Dagda.'
p9511
aS'The_Dagda\'s siblings include the gods Ogma and Lir.He is also known by the epithets Eochaid Ollathair ("All-father"), Ruad Rofhessa ("lord of great knowledge"), Samildanach ("many-skilled"), Cera (possibly meaning "creator"), Fer Benn ("horned man" or "man of the peak"), Easal, Eogabal, Crom-Eocha and Ebron (which seem to refer to yew). Description Tales depict the Dagda as a figure of immense power, armed with a magic club and associated with a cauldron.'
p9512
aS'The club was supposed to be able to kill nine men with one blow; but with the handle he could return the slain to life.'
p9513
aS'The cauldron was known as the Undry and was said to be bottomless, from which no man left unsatisfied.'
p9514
aS'Uaithne, also known as "the Four Angled Music", was a richly ornamented magic harp made of oak which, when the Dagda played it, put the seasons in their correct order; other accounts tell of it being used to command the order of battle.'
p9515
aS'He possessed two pigs, one of which was always growing whilst the other was always roasting, and ever-laden fruit trees.The_Dagda was a High King of the Tuatha De Danann after his predecessor Nuada was injured in battle.'
p9516
aS'In this story, Socrates has been convicted of corrupting the youth of Athens and introducing strange gods, and has been sentenced to die by drinking poison hemlock.'
p9517
aS'Socrates, rather than fleeing when the opportunity arises, uses his death as a final lesson for his pupils, and faces it calmly.'
p9518
aS"The Phaedo, which depicts the death of Socrates, is also Plato's fourth and last dialogue to detail the philosopher's final days, which is also detailed in Euthyphro, Apology, and Crito.In the painting, an old man in a white robe sits upright on a bed, one hand extended over a cup, the other gesturing in the air."
p9519
aS'He is surrounded by other men of varying ages, most showing emotional distress, unlike the stoic old man.'
p9520
aS'The young man handing him the cup looks the other way, with his face in his free hand.'
p9521
aS'Another young man clutches the thigh of the old man.'
p9522
aS'An elderly man sits at the end of the bed, slumped over and looking in his lap.'
p9523
aS'Most of the poems resemble short dramas or dialogues.North of Boston was published by David Nutt.'
p9524
aS"Following its success, Henry Holt and Company republished Frost's first book, A Boy's Will, in 1915."
p9525
aS'The New York Times said in a review, "In republishing his first book after his second, Mr. Robert_Frost has undertaken the difficult task of competing with himself.'
p9526
aS'" List of poems "The Pasture" (introductory poem)"Mending Wall""The_Death_of_the_Hired_Man""The Mountain""A Hundred Collars""Home Burial""The Black Cottage""Blueberries""A Servant to Servants""After Apple-Picking""The Code""The Generations of Men""The Housekeeper""The Fear""The Self-seeker""The Wood-pile""Good Hours" References  External links Full text at Project GutenbergFrost, Robert.'
p9527
aS'North Of Boston(1917), Henry Holt And Co. - Full Text'
p9528
aS"The Duchess was Giovanna d'Aragona, Duchess of Amalfi (d. 1511), whose father, Enrico d'Aragona, Marquis of Gerace, was an illegitimate son of Ferdinand I of Naples."
p9529
aS'As in the play, she secretly married Antonio Beccadelli di Bologna after the death of her first husband Alfonso I Piccolomini, Duke of Amalfi.The play begins as a love story, with a Duchess who marries beneath her class, and ends as a nightmarish tragedy as her two brothers exact their revenge, destroying themselves in the process.'
p9530
aS'Jacobean drama continued the trend of stage violence and horror set by Elizabethan tragedy, under the influence of Seneca.'
p9531
aS"The complexity of some of its characters, particularly Bosola and the Duchess, plus Webster's poetic language, ensure the play is often considered among the greatest tragedies of English renaissance drama. Characters Antonio Bologna."
p9532
aS'Antonio has recently returned from France, full of scorn for the Italian courtiers whom he sees as more corrupt than the French.'
p9533
aS"Antonio is the steward of the Duchess of Malfi's palace."
p9534
aS'His honesty and good judgment of character are characteristics well known to the other characters.'
p9535
aS'Thus, The Egoist dramatizes the difficulty contingent upon being a woman in Victorian society, when women\'s bodies and minds are trafficked between fathers and husbands to cement male bonds. Critical response In an afterword by Angus Wilson, The Egoist was called "the turning point in George_Meredith\'s career."'
p9536
aS'Wilson saw Meredith as "the first great art novelist"; his afterword interprets the book as an adaptation of a stage comedy, an achievement he arrogates to few English authors, who, he suggests, present only "farce or satire."'
p9537
aS'He compliments Meredith most when he is detached from his characters, as "it is then that our laughter is most thoughtful."'
p9538
aS'Wilson is most taken by "the absolute truth of much of the dialogue," such as how "the way Sir Willoughby continues to speak through the answers of other characters, returning to notice their replies only when his own vein of thought is exhausted" is a "wonderful observation of human speech.'
p9539
aS'"In his essay "Books Which Have Influenced Me," Robert Louis Stevenson reports the following story: "A young friend of Mr. Meredith\'s (as I have the story) came to him in agony.'
p9540
aS"'This is too bad of you,' he cried."
p9541
aS"'Willoughby is me!'"
p9542
aS"It was performed at the Lenaia, one of the Festivals of Dionysus in Athens, in 405 BC, and received first place. Plot The_Frogs tells the story of the god Dionysus, who, despairing of the state of Athens' tragedians, travels to Hades (the underworld) to bring the playwright Euripides back from the dead."
p9543
aS'(Euripides had died the year before, in 406 BC).'
p9544
aS'He brings along his slave Xanthias, who is smarter and braver than Dionysus.'
p9545
aS'As the play opens, Xanthias and Dionysus argue over what kind of jokes Xanthias can use to open the play.'
p9546
aS'For the first half of the play, Dionysus routinely makes critical errors, forcing Xanthias to improvise in order to protect his master and prevent Dionysus from looking incompetent--but this only allows Dionysus to continue to make mistakes with no consequence.To find a reliable path to Hades, Dionysus seeks advice from his half-brother Heracles, who had been there before in order to retrieve the hell hound Cerberus.'
p9547
aS'Dionysus shows up at his doorstep dressed in a lion-hide and carrying a club.'
p9548
aS"Heracles, upon seeing the effeminate Dionysus dressed up like himself, can't help laughing."
p9549
aS'Dating from between 1490 and 1510, when Bosch was between about 40 and 60 years old, it is his best-known and most ambitious complete work.The triptych is painted in oil on oak and is formed from a square middle panel flanked by two other oak rectangular wings that close over the center as shutters.'
p9550
aS'The outer wings, when folded, show a grisaille painting of the earth during the biblical narrative of Creation.'
p9551
aS'The three scenes of the inner triptych are probably (but not necessarily) intended to be read chronologically from left to right.'
p9552
aS'The left panel depicts God presenting Eve to Adam, the central panel is a broad panorama of socially engaged nude figures, fantastical animals, oversized fruit and hybrid stone formations.'
p9553
aS"The right panel is a hellscape and portrays the torments of damnation.Art historians and critics frequently interpret the painting as a didactic warning on the perils of life's temptations."
p9554
aS'However, the intricacy of its symbolism, particularly that of the central panel, has led to a wide range of scholarly interpretations over the centuries.'
p9555
aS"Twentieth-century art historians are divided as to whether the triptych's central panel is a moral warning or a panorama of paradise lost."
p9556
aS'The figures range from 15 centimetres (6 in) high up to more than one metre (3 ft).'
p9557
aS'Several of the figures were also cast independently by Rodin. History The sculpture was commissioned by the Directorate of Fine Arts in 1880 and was meant to be delivered in 1885.'
p9558
aS"Rodin would continue to work on and off on this project for 37 years, until his death in 1917.The Directorate asked for an inviting entrance to a planned Decorative Arts Museum with the theme being left to Rodin's selection."
p9559
aS"Even before this commission, Rodin had developed sketches of some of Dante's characters based on his admiration of Dante's Inferno.The Decorative Arts Museum was never built."
p9560
aS'Rodin worked on this project on the ground floor of the Hotel Biron.'
p9561
aS'Near the end of his life, Rodin donated sculptures, drawings and reproduction rights to the French government.'
p9562
aS"In 1919, two years after his death, The Hotel Biron became the Musee Rodin housing a cast of The_Gates_of_Hell and related works. Inspiration for The_Gates_of_Hell A work of the scope of The_Gates_of_Hell had not been attempted before, but inspiration came from Lorenzo_Ghiberti's Gates of Paradise at the Baptistery of St. John, Florence; the 15th century bronze doors depict figures from the Old Testament."
p9563
aS'It was noted by Nietzsche to be "the most personal of all [his] books", and contains the greatest number of poems in any of his published works.'
p9564
aS" Title The book's title uses a phrase that was well known at the time."
p9565
aS'It was derived from a Provencal expression (gai saber) for the technical skill required for poetry-writing that had already been used by Ralph Waldo Emerson and E. S. Dallas and, in inverted form, by Thomas Carlyle in "the dismal science".'
p9566
aS"The book's title was first translated into English as The Joyous Wisdom, but The_Gay_Science has become the common translation since Walter Kaufmann's version in the 1960s."
p9567
aS'Kaufmann cites The Shorter Oxford English Dictionary (1955) that lists "The gay science (Provencal gai saber): the art of poetry".In Ecce Homo, Nietzsche refers to the poems in the Appendix of The_Gay_Science, saying they were...written for the most part in Sicily, are quite emphatically reminiscent of the Provencal concept of gaia scienza--that unity of singer, knight, and free spirit which distinguishes the wonderful early culture of the Provencals from all equivocal cultures.'
p9568
aS'The very last poem above all, "To the Mistral", an exuberant dancing song in which, if I may say so, one dances right over morality, is a perfect Provencalism.This alludes to the birth of modern European poetry that occurred in Provence around the 13th century, whereupon, after the culture of the troubadours fell into almost complete desolation and destruction due to the Albigensian Crusade (1209-1229), other poets in the 14th century ameliorated and thus cultivated the gai saber or gaia scienza.'
p9569
aS'In a similar vein, in Beyond_Good_and_Evil Nietzsche observed that,...love as passion--which is our European speciality--[was invented by] the Provencal knight-poets, those magnificent and inventive human beings of the "gai saber" to whom Europe owes so many things and almost owes itself.Another indicator of the deficiency of the original translation as The Joyous Wisdom is that the German Wissenschaft never indicates "wisdom" (wisdom  Weisheit), but a propensity toward any rigorous practice of a poised, controlled, and disciplined quest for knowledge, and is typically translated as "science".The book is usually placed within Nietzsche\'s middle period, during which his work extolled the merits of science, skepticism, and intellectual discipline as routes to mental freedom.'
p9570
aS"The essay was later republished in French in 1950 and translated into English in 1954, first, by Ian Cunnison and, in 1990 by W. D. Halls. Argument Mauss's essay focuses on the way that the exchange of objects between groups builds relationships between humans.It analyzes the economic practices of various so-called archaic societies and finds that they have a common central practice centered on reciprocal exchange."
p9571
aS'In them, he finds evidence contrary to the presumptions of modern Western societies about the history and nature of exchange.'
p9572
aS'He shows that early exchange systems center around the obligations to give, to receive, and, most importantly, to reciprocate.'
p9573
aS'They occur between groups, not individuals, and they are a crucial part of "total phenomena" that work to build not just wealth and alliances but social solidarity because "the gift" pervades all aspects of the society: politics, economics, religion, law, morality, and aesthetics.'
p9574
aS'He uses a comparative method, drawing upon published secondary scholarship on peoples from around the world, but especially the Pacific Northwest (especially potlatch), Polynesia (especially the Maori concept of the hau), and Melanesia (especially the kula exchange).After examining the reciprocal gift-giving practices of each, he finds in them common features, despite some variation.'
p9575
aS'From the disparate evidence, he builds a case for a foundation to human society based on collective (vs. individual) exchange practices.'
p9576
aS'In so doing, he refutes the English tradition of liberal thought, such as utilitarianism, as distortions of human exchange practices.'
p9577
aS'A few years later, in 1946, Hesse went on to win the Nobel Prize in Literature.'
p9578
aS'In honoring him in its Award Ceremony Speech, the Swedish Academy said that the novel "occupies a special position" in Hesse\'s work.'
p9579
aS'"Glass Bead Game" is a literal translation of the German title, but the book has also been published under the title Magister Ludi, Latin for "Master of the Game", which is an honorific title awarded to the book\'s central character.'
p9580
aS'"Magister Ludi" can also be seen as a pun: lud- is a Latin stem meaning both "game" and "school".'
p9581
aS'However, the title Magister Ludi is misleading, as it implies the book is a straightforward bildungsroman.'
p9582
aS'In reality, the book touches on many different genres, and the bulk of the story is on one level a parody of the biography genre. Plot The_Glass_Bead_Game takes place at an unspecified date centuries into the future.'
p9583
aS"Hesse suggested that he imagined the book's narrator writing around the start of the 25th century."
p9584
aS'In writing the play, Williams drew on an earlier short story, as well as a screenplay he had written under the title of The Gentleman Caller.The play premiered in Chicago in 1944.'
p9585
aS'After a shaky start it was championed by Chicago critics Ashton Stevens and Claudia Cassidy, whose enthusiasm helped build audiences so the producers could move the play to Broadway where it won the New York Drama Critics Circle Award in 1945.'
p9586
aS"The_Glass_Menagerie was Williams's first successful play; he went on to become one of America's most highly regarded playwrights. Characters Amanda WingfieldA faded Southern belle, abandoned by her husband, who is trying to raise her two children under harsh financial conditions."
p9587
aS'Amanda yearns for the comforts from her youth and also longs for her children to have the same comforts, but her devotion to them has made her - as she admits at one point - almost "hateful" towards them.Tom WingfieldAmanda\'s son, and younger brother to sister, Laura.'
p9588
aS'Tom works at a shoe warehouse to support his family but is frustrated by his job and aspires to be a poet.'
p9589
aS'He struggles to write for he is sleep-deprived and annoyed.'
p9590
aS'Yet, he escapes from reality through nightly excursions, apparently to the movies but also to local bars.'
p9591
aS"The work was aimed at a wide literate audience raised on tales as told in such publications as Thomas Bulfinch's The Age of Fable, or Stories of Gods and Heroes (1855).Frazer offered a modernist approach to discussing religion, treating it dispassionately as a cultural phenomenon rather than from a theological perspective."
p9592
aS'The influence of The_Golden_Bough on contemporary European literature and thought was substantial. Subject matter The_Golden_Bough attempts to define the shared elements of religious belief and scientific thought, discussing fertility rites, human sacrifice, the dying god, the scapegoat and many other symbols and practices whose influence has extended into twentieth-century culture.'
p9593
aS'Its thesis is that old religions were fertility cults that revolved around the worship and periodic sacrifice of a sacred king.'
p9594
aS"Frazer proposed that mankind progresses from magic through religious belief to scientific thought.This thesis was developed in relation to J. M. W. Turner's painting of The_Golden_Bough, a sacred grove where a certain tree grew day and night."
p9595
aS'It was a transfigured landscape in a dream-like vision of the woodland lake of Nemi, "Diana\'s Mirror", where religious ceremonies and the "fulfillment of vows" of priests and kings were held.The king was the incarnation of a dying and reviving god, a solar deity who underwent a mystic marriage to a goddess of the Earth.'
p9596
aS'He died at the harvest and was reincarnated in the spring.'
p9597
aS'Frazer claims that this legend of rebirth is central to almost all of the world\'s mythologies.Frazer based his thesis on the pre-Roman priest-king at the fane of Nemi, who was ritually murdered by his successor:"When I first put pen to paper to write The_Golden_Bough I had no conception of the magnitude of the voyage on which I was embarking; I thought only to explain a single rule of an ancient Italian priesthood."'
p9598
aS"The novel is told using a series of flashbacks in non-chronological order, a literary technique that formed part of Ford's pioneering view of literary impressionism."
p9599
aS'Ford employs the device of the unreliable narrator to great effect as the main character gradually reveals a version of events that is quite different from what the introduction leads the reader to believe.'
p9600
aS"The novel was loosely based on two incidents of adultery and on Ford's messy personal life.The novel's original title was The Saddest Story, but after the onset of World_War_I, the publishers asked Ford for a new title."
p9601
aS'Ford suggested (sarcastically) The_Good_Soldier, and the name stuck.In 1998, the Modern Library ranked The_Good_Soldier 30th on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century. Plot summary The_Good_Soldier is narrated by the character John Dowell, half of one of the couples whose dissolving relationships form the subject of the novel.'
p9602
aS'Dowell tells the stories of those dissolutions as well as the deaths of three characters and the madness of a fourth, in a rambling, non-chronological fashion that leaves gaps for the reader to fill.'
p9603
aS'The "plot" is not then the real story; the reader is asked to consider whether s/he believes Dowell and what part he truly played in how this "saddest story ever told" actually plays out. Events as narrated The novel opens with the famous line, "This is the saddest story I have ever heard."'
p9604
aS'Dowell explains that for nine years he, his wife Florence and their friends Captain Edward Ashburnham (the "good soldier" of the book\'s title) and his wife Leonora had an ostensibly normal friendship while Edward and Florence sought treatment for their heart ailments at a spa in Nauheim, Germany.As it turns out, nothing in the relationships or in the characters is as it first seems.'
p9605
aS'It is oil on canvas and measures 8 feet (240 cm) by 6.5 feet (200 cm).'
p9606
aS'Dr. Samuel D. Gross, a seventy-year-old professor dressed in a black frock coat, lectures a group of Jefferson Medical College students.'
p9607
aS'Included among the group is a self-portrait of Eakins, who is seated to the right of the tunnel railing, sketching or writing.'
p9608
aS'Seen over Dr.'
p9609
aS"Gross's right shoulder is the clinic clerk, Dr. Franklin West, taking notes on the operation."
p9610
aS"Eakins's signature is painted into the painting, on the front of the surgical table. Description Admired for its uncompromising realism, The_Gross_Clinic has an important place documenting the history of medicine--both because it honors the emergence of surgery as a healing profession (previously, surgery was associated primarily with amputation), and because it shows us what the surgical theater looked like in the nineteenth century."
p9611
aS'The painting is based on a surgery witnessed by Eakins, in which Gross treated a young man for osteomyelitis of the femur.'
p9612
aS'Since many of the philosophical concepts, such as his view of theodicy and the relationship between philosophy and religion, are relevant beyond strictly Jewish theology, it has been the work most commonly associated with Maimonides in the non-Jewish world and it is known to have influenced several major non-Jewish philosophers.'
p9613
aS'Following its publication, "almost every philosophic work for the remainder of the Middle Ages cited, commented on, or criticized Maimonides\' views."'
p9614
aS'Within Judaism, the Guide became widely popular, with many Jewish communities requesting copies of the manuscript, but also quite controversial, with some communities limiting its study or banning it altogether. Contents The_Guide_for_the_Perplexed was originally written about 1190 by Maimonides in Judeo-Arabic.'
p9615
aS'It was first translated in 1204 into Hebrew by a contemporary of Maimonides, Samuel ben Judah ibn Tibbon.'
p9616
aS'The work is divided into three books.'
p9617
aS'According to Maimonides, he wrote the Guide "to promote the true understanding of the real spirit of the Law, to guide those religious persons who, adhering to the Torah, have studied philosophy and are embarrassed by the contradictions between the teachings of philosophy and the literal sense of the Torah," and his main purpose is to expound on Maaseh Bereishit and Maaseh Merkavah, works of Jewish mysticism regarding the theology of creation from Genesis and the passage of the Chariot from Ezekiel, these being the two main mystical texts in the Tanakh (Hebrew Bible).'
p9618
aS"This analysis occurs in the third book, and from this perspective, the issues raised in the first two books are there to provide background and a progression in the mystical and philosophical knowledge required to ponder the climax. Book One The book begins with Maimonides' thesis against anthropomorphism."
p9619
aS'The novel\'s title was inspired by Geoffrey_Chaucer\'s The_Canterbury_Tales, which is a series of connected stories ("The Merchant\'s Tale", "The Parson\'s Tale", etc.'
p9620
aS")The_Handmaid's_Tale won the 1985 Governor General's Award and the first Arthur C. Clarke Award in 1987; it was also nominated for the 1986 Nebula Award, the 1986 Booker Prize, and the 1987 Prometheus Award."
p9621
aS'It has been adapted for the cinema, radio, opera, and stage. Plot summary The_Handmaid\'s_Tale is set in the Republic of Gilead, a theocratic military dictatorship formed within the borders of what was formerly the United_States of America.Beginning with a staged terrorist attack (blamed on Islamic extremists) that kills the President and most of Congress, a movement calling itself the "Sons of Jacob" launches a revolution and suspends the United_States Constitution under the pretext of restoring order.'
p9622
aS"They are quickly able to take away all of women's rights, largely attributed to financial records being stored electronically and labelled by gender."
p9623
aS'The new regime, the Republic of Gilead, moves quickly to consolidate its power and reorganize society along a new militarized, hierarchical, compulsorily Christian regime of Old Testament-inspired social and religious ultra-conservatism among its newly created social classes.'
p9624
aS'In this society, almost all women are forbidden to read.The story is presented from the point of view of a woman called Offred (literally Of-Fred).'
p9625
aS'The character is one of a class of women kept as concubines ("handmaids") for reproductive purposes by the ruling class in an era of declining births due to sterility from pollution and sexually transmitted diseases.'
p9626
aS"Willy Lott's Cottage, also the subject of an eponymous painting by Constable, is visible on the far left."
p9627
aS'The scene takes place near Flatford Mill in Suffolk, though since the Stour forms the border of two counties, the left bank is in Suffolk and the landscape on the right bank is in Essex.The_Hay_Wain is one of a series of paintings by Constable called the "six-footers", large-scale canvasses which he painted for the annual summer exhibitions at the Royal Academy.'
p9628
aS'As with all of the paintings in this series Constable produced a full-scale oil sketch for the work; this is now in the Victoria and Albert Museum in London.'
p9629
aS"Constable originally exhibited the finished work with the title Landscape: Noon, suggesting that he envisaged it as belonging to the classical landscape tradition of representing the cycles of nature. History Flatford Mill was owned by Constable's father."
p9630
aS'The house on the left side of the painting belonged to a neighbour, Willy Lott, a tenant farmer, who was said to have been born in the house and never to have left it for more than four days in his lifetime.'
p9631
aS"Willy Lott's Cottage has survived to this day practically unaltered, but none of the trees in the painting exist today.Although The_Hay_Wain is revered today as one of the greatest British paintings, when it was originally exhibited at the Royal Academy in 1821 (under the title Landscape: Noon), it failed to find a buyer.It was considerably better received in France where it was praised by Theodore_Gericault."
p9632
aS"The painting caused a sensation when it was exhibited with other works by Constable at the 1824 Paris Salon (it has been suggested that the inclusion of Constable's paintings in the exhibition was a tribute to Gericault, who died early that year)."
p9633
aS'The poem is divided into five parts and consists of 98 lines of which the last four are "probably the most quoted lines of any 20th-century poet writing in English". Overview Eliot wrote that he produced the title "The_Hollow_Men" by combining the titles of the romance "The Hollow Land" by William Morris with the poem "The Broken Men" by Rudyard_Kipling: but it is possible that this is one of Eliot\'s many constructed allusions, and that the title originates more transparently from Shakespeare\'s Julius Caesar or from the character Kurtz in Joseph_Conrad\'s Heart_of_Darkness who is referred to as a "hollow sham" and "hollow at the core".The two epigraphs to the poem, "Mistah Kurtz - he dead" and "A penny for the Old Guy", are allusions to Conrad\'s character and to Guy Fawkes, attempted arsonist of the English house of Parliament, and his straw-man effigy that is burned each year in the United Kingdom on Guy Fawkes Night.Some critics read the poem as told from three perspectives, each representing a phase of the passing of a soul into one of death\'s kingdoms ("death\'s dream kingdom", "death\'s twilight kingdom", and "death\'s other kingdom").'
p9634
aS'Eliot describes how we, the living, will be seen by "Those who have crossed/With direct eyes [...] not as lost/Violent souls, but only/As the hollow men/The stuffed men."'
p9635
aS'The image of eyes figures prominently in the poem, notably in one of Eliot\'s most famous lines "Eyes I dare not meet in dreams".'
p9636
aS'Such eyes are also generally accepted to be in reference to Dante\'s Beatrice (see below).The poet depicts figures "Gathered on this beach of the tumid river" - drawing considerable influence from Dante\'s third and fourth cantos of the Inferno which describes Limbo, the first circle of Hell - showing man in his inability to cross into Hell itself or to even beg redemption, unable to speak with God.'
p9637
aS'Dancing "round the prickly pear," the figures worship false gods, recalling children and reflecting Eliot\'s interpretation of Western culture after World_War_I.The final stanza may be the most quoted of all of Eliot\'s poetry:This is the way the world endsThis is the way the world endsThis is the way the world endsNot with a bang but a whimper.This last line alludes to, amongst some talk of war, the actual end of the Gunpowder_Plot mentioned at the beginning: not with its planned bang, but with Guy Fawkes\'s whimper, as he was caught, tortured and executed on the gallows.When asked if he would write these lines again, Eliot responded with a \'no\':One reason is that while the association of the H-bomb is irrelevant to it, it would today come to everyone\'s mind.'
p9638
aS'Another is that he is not sure the world will end with either.'
p9639
aS'People whose houses were bombed have told him they don\'t remember hearing anything.Other significant references include the Lord\'s Prayer, Shakespeare\'s Julius Caesar, and Conrad\'s An Outcast of the Islands ("Life is very long"). Critical reception and Eliot\'s career Allen Tate, reviewing Eliot\'s new volume in 1926, perceived a shift in Eliot\'s method and noted that, \'\'The mythologies disappear altogether in The_Hollow_Men\' - a striking claim for a poem as indebted to Dante as anything else in Eliot\'s early work, to say little of the modern English mythology - the \'Old Guy [Fawkes]\' of the Gunpowder_Plot - or the colonial and agrarian mythos of Conrad and Frazer, which, at least for reasons of textual history, echoes The_Waste_Land.'
p9640
aS'Lorca did not include it in his plan for a "trilogy of the Spanish earth" (which remained unfinished at the time of his murder).Lorca described the play in its subtitle as a drama of women in the villages of Spain.'
p9641
aS"The_House_of_Bernarda_Alba was Lorca's last play, completed on 19 June 1936, two months before Lorca's death during the Spanish_Civil_War."
p9642
aS'The play was first performed on 8 March 1945 at the Avenida Theatre in Buenos_Aires.'
p9643
aS'The play centers on the events of a house in Andalusia during a period of mourning, in which Bernarda Alba (aged 60) wields total control over her five daughters Angustias (39 years old), Magdalena (30), Amelia (27), Martirio, (24), and Adela (20).'
p9644
aS"The housekeeper (La Poncia) and Bernarda's elderly mother (Maria Josefa) also live there.The deliberate exclusion of any male character from the action helps build up the high level of sexual tension that is present throughout the play."
p9645
aS'Pepe "el Romano", the love interest of Bernarda\'s daughters and suitor of Angustias, never appears on stage.'
p9646
aS"The play explores themes of repression, passion, and conformity, and inspects the effects of men upon women. Plot Summary Upon her second husband's death, domineering matriarch Bernarda Alba imposes a 7-year mourning period on her household in accordance with her family tradition."
p9647
aS'"Edith_Wharton\'s original title for the manuscript was A Moment\'s Ornament, which plainly stated the facts-of-life of the story of the socialite woman Lily Bart; and directly addressed the social limitations imposed upon her, as such, by the mores of the social class and social stratum to which she belonged by birth, education, and breeding.The manuscript title, A Moment\'s Ornament, refers to the Romantic imagery of the first stanza of the poem "She was a Phantom of Delight" (1804), by William_Wordsworth (1770-1850), which describes an ideal of beauty of the type that narrowly circumscribed the life of Lily Bart:"She was a Phantom of delight / When first she gleam\'d upon my sight; / A lovely Apparition, sent / To be a moment\'s ornament: / Her eyes as stars of twilight fair; / Like twilight\'s, too, her dusky hair; / But all things else about her drawn / From May-time and the cheerful dawn; / A dancing shape, an image gay, / To haunt, to startle, and waylay.'
p9648
aS'" Plot In The_House_of_Mirth (1905), the story of Lily Bart begins with her visiting the apartment of Lawrence Selden, a man for whom she has romantic feelings, but, for the sake of a high social-standing, decides that she must marry Percy Gryce, a young, timid millionaire who is wealthier than Selden.'
p9649
aS'Despite the people of her social circle being convinced that Percy will propose marriage to Lily when they next meet, Lily changes her mind, and withdraws from their relationship, on account of an unexpected visit from Lawrence Selden.'
p9650
aS'Despite feeling convinced that he loves Lily, Selden does not yet want to risk marriage; meanwhile, Gryce marries another girl, from within their social circle.Her social standing begins to erode when Gus Trenor, husband of friend Judy, gives Lily a large sum of money, accepted in the innocent belief that it represents profits from investments Gus had made in her behalf.'
p9651
aS"The rumors that arise from that transaction, worsened by her injudicious and mysterious visit to Gus's townhouse in the city, further erode Lily's social standing."
p9652
aS'In the event, Lily one day receives a note from Selden, who asks to meet with her; certain that he shall propose marriage, Lily accepts to meet him the next day.'
p9653
aS"Surprised by her acceptance, Selden becomes frightened by Lily's apparent change-of-heart, because earlier, Lily had escaped his attempt to kiss her; the fearful Selden flees New_York_City, first to Havana and then to Europe, cravenly leaving Lily with no notice.To escape the rumors arisen from the gossip caused by her financial dealings with Gus Trenor, and also disappointed by Selden's emotional cowardice, Lily accepts Bertha Dorset's invitation to join her and her husband, George, on a cruise of Europe aboard their yacht, the Sabrina."
p9654
aS'The story is set in the Late Middle Ages, during the reign of Louis XI (1461-1483). Background Victor_Hugo began writing The_Hunchback_of_Notre-Dame in 1829, largely to make his contemporaries more aware of the value of the Gothic architecture, which was neglected and often destroyed to be replaced by new buildings, or defaced by replacement of parts of buildings in a newer style.'
p9655
aS'For instance, the medieval stained glass panels of Notre-Dame de Paris had been replaced by white glass to let more light into the church.'
p9656
aS'This explains the large descriptive sections of the book, which far exceed the requirements of the story.'
p9657
aS"A few years earlier, Hugo had already published a paper entitled Guerre aux Demolisseurs (War to the Demolishers) specifically aimed at saving Paris' medieval architecture."
p9658
aS'The agreement with his original publisher, Gosselin, was that the book would be finished that same year, but Hugo was constantly delayed due to the demands of other projects.'
p9659
aS'In the summer of 1830 Gosselin demanded that Hugo complete the book by February 1831.'
p9660
aS'Beginning in September 1830, Hugo worked nonstop on the project thereafter.'
p9661
aS'He has a tendency to give out free drinks, though he constantly says otherwiseEd Mosher - Hope\'s brother-in-law (brother of Hope\'s late wife Bess), a con-man and former circus manPat McGloin - Former police lieutenant who was convicted on criminal charges and kicked off the forceWillie Oban - Harvard Law School alumnusJoe Mott - Former proprietor of a gambling houseGeneral Piet Wetjoen - Former leader of a Boer commandoCaptain Cecil Lewis - Former Captain of British infantryJames Cameron "Jimmy Tomorrow" - Former Boer War correspondent who is constantly daydreaming about getting his old job back again tomorrow (hence his nickname)Hugo Kalmar - Former editor of anarchist periodicals who often quotes the Old TestamentLarry Slade - Former syndicalist-anarchistRocky Pioggi - Night bartender, who is paid little and makes his living mostly by allowing Pearl and Margie to stay at the bar in exchange for a substantial cut of all the money they make from prostitution, he despises being called a pimpDon Parritt - Teenager, son of a former anarchistPearl - Street walker working for RockyMargie - Street walker working for RockyCora - Street walker, Chuck\'s girlfriendChuck Morello - Day bartender, Cora\'s boyfriendTheodore "Hickey" Hickman - Hardware salesmanMoran - Police detectiveLieb - Police detective Plot summary The_Iceman_Cometh is set in Harry Hope\'s decidedly downmarket Greenwich Village saloon and rooming house, in 1912.'
p9662
aS"The patrons, who are all men except for three female prostitutes, are all dead-end alcoholics who spend every possible moment seeking oblivion in each other's company and trying to con or wheedle free drinks from Harry and the bartenders."
p9663
aS'They drift without purpose from day to day, coming fully to life only during the semi-annual visits of the salesman Theodore Hickman, known to them as Hickey.'
p9664
aS'When Hickey finishes a tour of his business territory, which is apparently a wide expanse of the East Coast, he typically turns up at the saloon and starts the party.'
p9665
aS"As the play opens, the regulars are expecting Hickey to turn up in time for Harry's birthday party."
p9666
aS"The first act introduces the various characters and shows them bickering amongst themselves, showing just how drunk and delusional they are, all the while awaiting Hickey's arrival.Joe Mott insists that he will soon re-open his casino."
p9667
aS'Cecil "The Captain" Lewis and Piet "The General" Wetjoen, who fought each other during the Boer War, are now good friends, and both insist that they\'ll soon go back to their nations of origin.'
p9668
aS"Working within the social conventions of late Victorian London, the play's major themes are the triviality with which it treats institutions as serious as marriage, and the resulting satire of Victorian ways."
p9669
aS"Contemporary reviews all praised the play's humour, though some were cautious about its explicit lack of social messages, while others foresaw the modern consensus that it was the culmination of Wilde's artistic career so far."
p9670
aS"Its high farce and witty dialogue have helped make The_Importance_of_Being_Earnest Wilde's most enduringly popular play.The successful opening night marked the climax of Wilde's career but also heralded his downfall."
p9671
aS"The Marquess of Queensberry, whose son Lord Alfred Douglas was Wilde's lover, planned to present the writer with a bouquet of rotten vegetables and disrupt the show."
p9672
aS'Wilde was tipped off and Queensberry was refused admission.'
p9673
aS"Soon afterwards their feud came to a climax in court, where Wilde's homosexual double life was revealed to the Victorian public and he was eventually sentenced to imprisonment."
p9674
aS'His notoriety caused the play, despite its early success, to be closed after 86 performances.'
p9675
aS'However, most readers were more concerned with his exposure of health violations and unsanitary practices in the American meatpacking industry during the early 20th century, based on an investigation he did for a socialist newspaper.The book depicts working class poverty, the lack of social supports, harsh and unpleasant living and working conditions, and a hopelessness among many workers.'
p9676
aS'These elements are contrasted with the deeply rooted corruption of people in power.'
p9677
aS'A review by the writer Jack London called it, "the Uncle_Tom\'s_Cabin of wage slavery".Sinclair was considered a muckraker, or journalist who exposed corruption in government and business.'
p9678
aS'He first published the novel in serial form in 1905, in the Socialist newspaper, Appeal to Reason, between February 25, 1905 and November 4, 1905.'
p9679
aS'In 1904, Sinclair had spent seven weeks gathering information while working incognito in the meatpacking plants of the Chicago stockyards for the newspaper.'
p9680
aS"It was published as a book on February 26, 1906, by Doubleday and in a subscribers' edition.A film version of the novel was made in 1914, but it has since become lost. Plot summary The main character in the book is Jurgis Rudkus, a Lithuanian immigrant trying to make ends meet in Chicago."
p9681
aS"The book begins with his and Ona's wedding feast."
p9682
aS'The work is composed of oil paint with applied layers of gold leaf, an aspect that gives it its strikingly modern, yet evocative appearance.'
p9683
aS'The painting is now in the Osterreichische Galerie Belvedere museum in the Belvedere palace, Vienna, and is widely considered a masterpiece of the early modern period.'
p9684
aS"It is a symbol of Vienna Jugendstil--Viennese Art Nouveau--and is considered Klimt's most popular work. Background It was painted soon after his three-part Vienna Ceiling series which created a scandal and were criticized as both 'pornography' and evidence of 'perverted excess'."
p9685
aS'The works had recast the artist as an enfant terrible for his anti-authoritarian and anti-popularist views on art.'
p9686
aS'He wrote, "If you can not please everyone with your deeds and your art, please a few".'
p9687
aS'By contrast, The Kiss was enthusiastically received, and immediately found a buyer. Description Klimt depicts the couple locked in intimacy, while the rest of the painting dissolves into shimmering, extravagant flat pattern.'
p9688
aS'The patterning suggests the style of Art Nouveau and the organic forms of the Arts and Crafts movement.'
p9689
aS'It is unique however in the relatively small number of its characters and this was due to its scurrilous preoccupation with one man, the pro-war populist Cleon.'
p9690
aS'Cleon had prosecuted Aristophanes for slandering the polis with an earlier play, The Babylonians (426 BC), for which the young dramatist had promised revenge in The Acharnians (425 BC), and it was in The_Knights (424 BC) that his revenge was exacted.The_Knights won first prize at the Lenaia festival when it was produced in 424 BC. Plot The_Knights is a satire on political and social life in 5th-century BC Athens, the characters are drawn from real life and Cleon is clearly intended to be the villain.'
p9691
aS"However it is also an allegory, the characters are figures of fantasy and the villain in this context is Paphlagonian, a comic monstrosity responsible for almost everything that's wrong with the world."
p9692
aS"The identity CleonPaphlagonian is awkward and the ambiguities aren't easily resolved."
p9693
aS'This summary features the real-world names Cleon, Nicias and Demosthenes (though these names are never mentioned in the play).'
p9694
aS"See Discussion for an overview of the ambiguous use of characterization in The_Knights.Short summary: A sausage seller, Agoracritus, vies with Cleon for the confidence and approval of Demos ('The People' in Greek), an elderly man who symbolizes the Athenian citizenry."
p9695
aS'Agoracritus emerges triumphant from a series of contests and he restores Demos to his former glory.Detailed summary: Nicias and Demosthenes run from a house in Athens, complaining of a beating that they have just received from their master, Demos, and cursing their fellow slave, Cleon, as the cause of their troubles.'
p9696
aS'The Pathfinder, published 14 years later in 1840, is its sequel.'
p9697
aS"The_Last_of_the_Mohicans is set in 1757, during the French and Indian War (the Seven Years' War), when France and Great Britain battled for control of North America."
p9698
aS'During this war, both the French and the British used Native American allies, but the French were particularly dependent, as they were outnumbered in the Northeast frontier areas by the more numerous British colonists.The novel is primarily set in the upper New York wilderness, detailing the transport of the two daughters of Colonel Munro, Alice and Cora, to a safe destination at Fort William Henry.'
p9699
aS"Among the caravan guarding the women are the frontiersman Natty Bumppo, the Major Duncan Heyward, and the Indians Chingachgook and Uncas, the former of whom is the novel's title character."
p9700
aS'These characters are sometimes seen as a microcosm of the budding American society, particularly with regards to their racial composition.According to the Encyclopedia of Media and Propaganda in Wartime America, the novel has been one of the "most popular novels in English" since its publication and it remains "widely read in American literature courses".'
p9701
aS"It has been adapted numerous times and in different languages for films, TV movies and cartoons. Historical background At the time of Cooper's writing, many people believed that the Native Americans were disappearing, and would ultimately be assimilated or fail to survive."
p9702
aS'Especially in the East, their numbers continued to decline.'
p9703
aS'The painting represents the scene of The Last Supper of Jesus with his disciples, as it is told in the Gospel of John, 13:21.'
p9704
aS'Leonardo has depicted the consternation that occurred among the Twelve Disciples when Jesus announced that one of them would betray him.Due to the methods used, and a variety of environmental factors, as well as intentional damage, very little of the original painting remains today, despite numerous restoration attempts, the last being completed in 1999. The painting The Last Supper measures 460 cm x 880 cm (180 in x 350 in) and covers an end wall of the dining hall at the monastery of Santa Maria delle Grazie in Milan, Italy.'
p9705
aS'The theme was a traditional one for refectories, although the room was not a refectory at the time that Leonardo painted it.'
p9706
aS'The main church building had only recently been completed (in 1498), but was remodeled by Bramante, hired by Ludovico Sforza to build a Sforza family mausoleum.'
p9707
aS'The painting was commissioned by Sforza to be the centerpiece of the mausoleum.'
p9708
aS'The lunettes above the main painting, formed by the triple arched ceiling of the refectory, are painted with Sforza coats-of-arms.'
p9709
aS'The opposite wall of the refectory is covered by the Crucifixion fresco by Giovanni Donato da Montorfano, to which Leonardo added figures of the Sforza family in tempera.'
p9710
aS'In 2012, The Observer named it as one of "The 10 best historical novels".The novel was also made into an award-winning 1963 film of the same name, directed by Luchino Visconti and starring Burt Lancaster, Claudia Cardinale and Alain Delon. The author Tomasi was the last in a line of minor princes in Sicily, and he had long contemplated writing a historical novel based on his great-grandfather, Don Giulio Fabrizio Tomasi, another Prince of Lampedusa.'
p9711
aS'After the Lampedusa palace was bombed and pillaged by Allied forces in World_War_II, Tomasi sank into a lengthy depression, and began to write Il Gattopardo as a way to combat it. The title Despite being universally known in English as The_Leopard, the original title Il Gattopardo actually refers to a serval.'
p9712
aS"Although uncommon north of the Sahara Desert, one of the serval's few North African ranges is quite near Lampedusa."
p9713
aS"This animal is in the coat of arms of Tomasi's family. Themes and interpretation The novel is the story of Don Fabrizio Corbera, Prince of Salina, a 19th-century Sicilian nobleman caught in the midst of civil war and revolution."
p9714
aS'As a result of political upheaval, the prince\'s position in the island\'s class system is eroded by newly moneyed peasants and "shabby minor gentry."'
p9715
aS'As the novel progresses, the Prince is forced to choose between upholding the continuity of upper class values, and breaking tradition to secure continuity of his (nephew\'s) family\'s influence ("everything needs to change, so everything can stay the same").'
p9716
aS'A central theme of the story is the struggle between mortality and decay (death, fading of beauty, fading of memories, change of political system, false relics etc.'
p9717
aS"Set in a small town in Alabama in 1900, it focuses on the struggle for control of a family business.The fictional Hubbards in the play are reputedly drawn from Lillian Hellman's Marx relatives."
p9718
aS"Hellman's mother was Julia Newhouse of Demopolis, Alabama."
p9719
aS"Julia Newhouse's parents were Leonard Newhouse, a Demopolis wholesale liquor dealer, and Sophie Marx, of a successful Demopolis banking family."
p9720
aS'According to Hellman, Sophie Marx Newhouse never missed an opportunity to belittle and mock her father for his poor business sense in front of her and her mother.'
p9721
aS"The discord between the Marx and Hellman families was to later serve as the inspiration for the play. Plot The play's focus is Southerner Regina Hubbard Giddens, who struggles for wealth and freedom within the confines of an early 20th-century society where fathers considered only sons as legal heirs."
p9722
aS"As a result of this practice, her avaricious brothers Benjamin and Oscar are independently wealthy, while she must rely upon her sickly, wheelchair-using husband Horace for financial support.Regina's brother Oscar married Birdie, his much-maligned alcoholic wife, solely to acquire her family's plantation and its cotton fields."
p9723
aS'Oscar now wants to join forces with his brother, Benjamin, to construct a cotton mill.'
p9724
aS'It has been described as "one of the most famous short stories in the history of American literature.'
p9725
aS'"Initial response to the story was negative, surprising Jackson and The New Yorker.'
p9726
aS'Readers canceled subscriptions and sent hate mail throughout the summer.'
p9727
aS'The story was banned in the Union of South Africa.'
p9728
aS'Since then, it has been accepted as a classic American short story, subject to critical interpretations and media adaptations, and it has been taught in middle schools and high schools for decades since its publication. Plot Details of contemporary small-town American life are embroidered upon a description of an annual ritual known as "the lottery".'
p9729
aS'In a small village of about 300 residents, the locals are in an excited yet nervous mood on June 27.'
p9730
aS'Children gather stones as the adult townsfolk assemble for their annual event, which in the local tradition is practiced to ensure a good harvest (one character quotes an old proverb: "Lottery in June, corn be heavy soon"), though there are some rumors that nearby communities are talking about giving up the lottery.The lottery preparations start the night before with Mr. Summers and Mr. Graves making the paper slips and the list of all the families.'
p9731
aS'It was later printed as part of a twelve-poem pamphlet (or chapbook) titled Prufrock and Other Observations in 1917.'
p9732
aS'At the time of its publication, Prufrock was considered outlandish, but is now seen as heralding a paradigmatic cultural shift from late 19th-century Romantic verse and Georgian lyrics to Modernism.'
p9733
aS"The poem is regarded as the beginning of Eliot's career as an influential poet.The poem's structure was heavily influenced by Eliot's extensive reading of Dante Alighieri and makes several references to the Bible and other literary works--including William_Shakespeare's plays Henry IV Part II, Twelfth Night, and Hamlet, the poetry of seventeenth-century metaphysical poet John Donne, and the nineteenth-century French Symbolists."
p9734
aS'Eliot narrates the experience of Prufrock using the stream of consciousness technique developed by his fellow Modernist writers.'
p9735
aS'The poem, described as a "drama of literary anguish", is a dramatic interior monologue of an urban man, stricken with feelings of isolation and an incapability for decisive action that is said "to epitomize frustration and impotence of the modern individual" and "represent thwarted desires and modern disillusionment."'
p9736
aS'Prufrock laments his physical and intellectual inertia, the lost opportunities in his life and lack of spiritual progress, and he is haunted by reminders of unattained carnal love.'
p9737
aS'With visceral feelings of weariness, regret, embarrassment, longing, emasculation, sexual frustration, a sense of decay, and an awareness of mortality, "Prufrock" has become one of the most recognised voices in modern literature. Composition and publication history  Writing and first publication Eliot wrote "The Love Song of J. Alfred Prufrock" between February 1910 and July or August 1911.'
p9738
aS"The work premiered on 30 September 1791 at Schikaneder's theatre, the Freihaus-Theater auf der Wieden in Vienna. Composition The opera was the culmination of a period of increasing involvement by Mozart with Schikaneder's theatrical troupe, which since 1789 had been the resident company at the Theater auf der Wieden."
p9739
aS'Mozart was a close friend of one of the singer-composers of the troupe, tenor Benedikt Schack (the first Tamino), and had contributed to the compositions of the troupe, which were often collaboratively written.'
p9740
aS'Mozart\'s participation increased with his contributions to the 1790 collaborative opera Der Stein der Weisen (The Philosopher\'s Stone), including the duet ("Nun liebes Weibchen", K. 625/592a) among other passages.'
p9741
aS"Like The_Magic_Flute, Der Stein der Weisen was a fairy-tale opera and can be considered a kind of precursor; it employed much the same cast in similar roles.The libretto for The_Magic_Flute, written by Schikaneder, shares much of its plot and many of its characters with the Singspiel Oberon, written by Karl Ludwig Giesecke for the Schikaneder troupe two years earlier (and set to music by Paul Wranitzky) as a re-adaptation of Sophie Seyler's Singspiel Huon und Amande.Mozart evidently wrote keeping in mind the skills of the singers intended for the premiere, which included both virtuosi and ordinary comic actors asked to sing for the occasion."
p9742
aS'Thus, the vocal lines for Papageno--sung by Schikaneder himself--and Monostatos (Johann Joseph Nouseul) are often stated first in the strings so the singer can find his pitch, and are frequently doubled by instruments.'
p9743
aS"In contrast, Mozart's sister-in-law Josepha Hofer, who premiered the role of the Queen of the Night, evidently needed little such help: this role is famous for its difficulty."
p9744
aS'In ensembles, Mozart skillfully combined voices of different ability levels.The vocal ranges of two of the original singers for whom Mozart tailored his music have posed challenges for many singers who have since recreated their roles.'
p9745
aS'It began as a much shorter narrative which revisited in a comic manner aspects of Death_in_Venice, a novella that he was then preparing for publication.'
p9746
aS"The newer work reflected his experiences and impressions during a period when his wife, who was suffering from a lung complaint, was confined to Dr. Friedrich Jessen's Waldsanatorium in Davos, Switzerland for several months."
p9747
aS'In May and June 1912 Mann visited her and became acquainted with the team of doctors who were treating her in this cosmopolitan institution.'
p9748
aS'According to Mann, in the afterword that was later included in the English translation, this stay became the foundation of the opening chapter (Arrival) of the completed novel.The outbreak of the First World War interrupted work on the book.'
p9749
aS'The conflict and its aftermath led the author to undertake a major re-examination of European bourgeois society, including the sources of the willful, perverse destructiveness displayed by much of civilised humanity.'
p9750
aS'He was also drawn to speculate about more general questions surrounding personal attitudes to life, health, illness, sexuality and mortality.'
p9751
aS'Given this, Mann felt compelled to radically revise and expand the pre-war text before completing it in 1924.'
p9752
aS"The opera's libretto is based on a stage comedy by Pierre Beaumarchais, La folle journee, ou le Mariage de Figaro (first performed in 1784).The_Marriage_of_Figaro is now regarded as a cornerstone of the standard operatic repertoire, and it appears among the top ten at the Operabase list of the most-performed operas worldwide. Composition history Beaumarchais's earlier play The_Barber_of_Seville had already made a successful transition to opera in a version by Paisiello."
p9753
aS"Although Beaumarchais's Marriage of Figaro was at first banned in Vienna because of its licentiousness, Mozart's librettist managed to get official approval for an operatic version which eventually achieved great success.The opera was the first of three collaborations between Mozart and Da Ponte; their later collaborations were Don Giovanni and Cosi fan tutte."
p9754
aS"It was Mozart who originally selected Beaumarchais's play and brought it to Da Ponte, who turned it into a libretto in six weeks, rewriting it in poetic Italian and removing all of the original's political references."
p9755
aS"In particular, Da Ponte replaced Figaro's climactic speech against inherited nobility with an equally angry aria against unfaithful wives."
p9756
aS'Contrary to the popular myth, the libretto was approved by the Emperor, Joseph II, before any music was written by Mozart.The Imperial Italian opera company paid Mozart 450 florins for the work; this was three times his (low) yearly salary when he had worked as a court musician in Salzburg.'
p9757
aS'Da Ponte was paid 200 florins. Performance history Figaro premiered at the Burgtheater in Vienna on 1 May 1786, with a cast listed in the "Roles" section below.'
p9758
aS'Mozart himself directed the first two performances, conducting seated at the keyboard, the custom of the day.'
p9759
aS'Many critics consider it to be one of the best novels of the 20th century, as well as the foremost of Soviet satires. History Bulgakov started writing the novel in 1928, but burned the first manuscript in 1930, seeing no future as a writer in the Soviet Union.'
p9760
aS'He restarted the novel in 1931.'
p9761
aS"In early 1920's Bulgakov visited atheistic-propaganda journal redaction meeting, which was transformed by Bulgakov into the Walpurgis Night ball of the novel."
p9762
aS'The second draft was completed in 1936, by which point all the major plot lines of the final version were in place.'
p9763
aS'There would follow four other versions.'
p9764
aS'Bulgakov stopped writing four weeks before his death in 1940, leaving the novel with some unfinished sentences and loose ends.A censored version, with about 12 percent of the text removed and still more changed, was first published in Moscow magazine (no.'
p9765
aS'11, 1966 and no.'
p9766
aS'It opened at the Trafalgar Theatre, London on the 20th of the following month, with Herbert H. Waring in the name part and Elizabeth Robins as Hilda.'
p9767
aS'The English translation was by the theatre critic William Archer.'
p9768
aS'Productions in Oslo and Copenhagen were coordinated to open on 8 March 1893.'
p9769
aS"In the following year the work was taken up by Theatre de l'OEuvre, the international company based in Paris, and they mounted productions in Paris, London and other European capitals."
p9770
aS"The first U.S. performance was at the Carnegie Lyceum, New York, on 16 January 1900, with William Pascoe and Florence Kahn. Characters Halvard Solness, master builder.Aline Solness, his wife.Doctor Herdal, physician.Knut Brovik, formerly an architect, now in Solness's employment.Ragnar Brovik, Knut Brovik's son, a draftsman.Kaia Fosli, a book-keeper.Hilda Wangel, a character introduced earlier, in Ibsen's The Lady from the Sea. Plot summary Halvard Solness is the middle-aged Master Builder of a small town in Norway who has become a successful architect of some distinction and local reputation."
p9771
aS'One day while having a visit from his friend Doctor Herdal, Solness is visited by Hilde Wangel, a young woman of twenty-four from another town whom the doctor promptly recognizes from a recent trip.'
p9772
aS'Soon after the Doctor leaves and Solness is alone with Hilde, she reminds him that they are not strangers and that they had previously met in her home town ten years ago when she was fourteen years of age.'
p9773
aS'It features the character Sir John Falstaff, the fat knight who had previously been featured in Henry IV Parts 1 and 2.'
p9774
aS'It has been adapted for the opera on several occasions. Characters  Synopsis The play is nominally set in the early 1400s, during the same period as the Henry IV plays featuring Falstaff, but there is only one brief reference to this period, a line in which the character Fenton is said to have been one of Prince Hal\'s rowdy friends (he "kept company with the wild prince and Poins").'
p9775
aS'In all other respects, the play implies a contemporary setting of the Elizabethan era, circa 1600.Falstaff arrives in Windsor very short on money.'
p9776
aS'He decides, to obtain financial advantage, that he will court two wealthy married women, Mistress Ford and Mistress Page.'
p9777
aS'Falstaff decides to send the women identical love letters and asks his servants - Pistol and Nym - to deliver them to the wives.'
p9778
aS"When they refuse, Falstaff sacks them, and, in revenge, the men tell Ford and Page (the husbands) of Falstaff's intentions."
p9779
aS"Page is not concerned, but the jealous Ford persuades the Host of the Garter to introduce him to Falstaff as a 'Master Brook' so that he can find out Falstaff's plans.Meanwhile, three different men are trying to win the hand of Page's daughter, Mistress Anne Page."
p9780
aS'The story begins with a traveling salesman, Gregor Samsa, waking to find himself transformed (metamorphosed) into a large, monstrous insect-like creature.'
p9781
aS"The cause of Gregor's transformation is never revealed, and Kafka himself never gave an explanation."
p9782
aS'The rest of Kafka\'s novella deals with Gregor\'s attempts to adjust to his new condition as he deals with being burdensome to his parents and sister, who are repulsed by the horrible, verminous creature Gregor has become. Plot  Part I One day, Gregor Samsa, a traveling salesman, wakes up to find himself transformed into a giant insect (the most common translation of the German description ungeheures Ungeziefer, literally "monstrous vermin").'
p9783
aS'He believes it is a dream and reflects on how dreary life as a traveling salesman is.'
p9784
aS'As he looks at the wall clock, he notices that he has overslept and missed his train for work.'
p9785
aS'He ponders the consequences of this delay.'
p9786
aS'Gregor becomes annoyed at how his boss never accepts excuses or explanations from any of his employees no matter how hard-working they are, displaying an apparent lack of trusting abilities.'
p9787
aS'It was loosely based on the Latin comedy Aulularia by Plautus, from which many incidents and scraps of dialogue are borrowed, as well as from contemporary Italian farces.The miser of the title is called Harpagon, a name adapted from the Latin harpago, meaning a hook or grappling iron.'
p9788
aS'He is obsessed with the wealth he has amassed and always ready to save expenses.'
p9789
aS'Now a widower, he has a son, Cleante, and a daughter, Elise.'
p9790
aS'Although he is over seventy, he is attempting to arrange a marriage between himself and an attractive young woman, Mariane.'
p9791
aS'She and Cleante are already devoted to each other, however, and the son attempts to procure a loan to help her and her sick mother, who are impoverished.'
p9792
aS"Elise, Harpagon's daughter, is the beloved of Valere, but her father hopes to marry her to a wealthy man of his choosing, Seigneur Anselme."
p9793
aS"Meanwhile Valere has taken a job as steward in Harpagon's household so as to be close to Elise."
p9794
aS'The story was first published on 17 February 1884 in the French newspaper Le Gaulois.'
p9795
aS'"The_Necklace" has been adapted to film and television several times. Plot Madame Mathilde Loisel has always imagined herself in a high social position with wonderful jewels.'
p9796
aS'However, she has nothing and marries a low-paid clerk who tries his best to make her happy.'
p9797
aS'Through lots of begging at work, her husband is able to get a couple of invitations to the Ministry of Education party.'
p9798
aS'Mathilde then refuses to go, for she has nothing to wear.Her husband is upset to see her displeasure and, using money that he was saving to buy a hunting rifle, gives Mathilde 400 francs to use.'
p9799
aS'Mathilde goes out and buys a dress, but even with the dress she is not happy, as she is without any jewels to wear with it.'
p9800
aS'The pair does not have much money left, so her husband suggests that she should buy flowers to wear with it.'
p9801
aS'It is prominently displayed in the Rijksmuseum, Amsterdam, the Netherlands, as the best known painting in its collection.'
p9802
aS'The_Night_Watch is a world renowned example of Baroque art. Key elements The painting is renowned for three characteristics: its colossal size (363 cm x 437 cm (11.91 ft x 14.34 ft)), the effective use of light and shadow (chiaroscuro), and the perception of motion in what would have traditionally been a static military portrait.The painting was completed in 1642, at the peak of the Dutch Golden Age.'
p9803
aS'It depicts the eponymous company moving out, led by Captain Frans Banning Cocq (dressed in black, with a red sash) and his lieutenant, Willem van Ruytenburch (dressed in yellow, with a white sash).'
p9804
aS'With effective use of sunlight and shade, Rembrandt leads the eye to the three most important characters among the crowd, the two gentlemen in the centre (from whom the painting gets its original title), and the small girl in the centre left background.'
p9805
aS"Behind them, the company's colours are carried by the ensign, Jan Visscher Cornelissen.Rembrandt has displayed the traditional emblem of the Arquebusiers in the painting in a natural way: the girl in yellow dress in the background is carrying the main symbols."
p9806
aS"She is a kind-of mascot herself: the claws of a dead chicken on her belt represent the clauweniers (arquebusiers); the pistol behind the chicken stands for 'clover'; and, she is holding the militia's goblet."
p9807
aS'The man in front of her is wearing a helmet with an oak leaf, a traditional motif of the Arquebusiers.'
p9808
aS'Norris was inspired to write the novel by the Central Pacific Railroad and the Mussel Slough Tragedy.'
p9809
aS"In the novel he depicts the tensions between the railroad, the ranchers and the ranchers' League."
p9810
aS'The book emphasized the control of "forces"--such as the power of railroad monopolies--over individuals.'
p9811
aS"Some editions of the work give the subtitle as alternately, A California Story. Origins Following the release and subsequent success of Norris' 1899 McTeague, Norris began searching for an idea for his next project."
p9812
aS"Within a few weeks hehad formulated his idea for a trilogy of novels on the topic of wheat, his 'Epic of the Wheat', from its growth in California (which would be the basis of The Octopus), to its distribution in Chicago (The Pit, published posthumously in 1903), to its consumption in a famished region of Europe or Asia (intended to be titled The Wolf, although never begun before his death).The Octopus itself was based on the Mussel Slough Tragedy of 1880, which involved a bloody conflict between ranchers and law agents defending the Southern Pacific Railroad."
p9813
aS'The central issue was over the ownership of the ranches, which the farmers had leased from the railroad nearly ten years earlier with intentions of eventually purchasing the land.'
p9814
aS'Although originally priced at $2.50 to $5 per acre, the railroad eventually opened the land for sale at prices adjusted for land improvements, leading to the conflict depicted in the book.Norris decided upon the project in March 1899, and by early April had left for California to research the project.'
p9815
aS'Written during World_War_II, The_Open_Society_and_Its_Enemies was first printed in London by Routledge in 1945.'
p9816
aS'Originally published in two volumes, "The Spell of Plato" and "The High Tide of Prophecy: Hegel, Marx, and the Aftermath", a one volume edition with a new introduction by Alan Ryan and an essay by E. H. Gombrich was published by Princeton University Press in 2013.'
p9817
aS"The work was on the Modern Library Board's 100 Best Nonfiction books of the 20th century."
p9818
aS'Popper has been criticized for misinterpreting Plato, Hegel, and Marx. Publication As Popper was writing in academic obscurity in New Zealand for the duration of World_War_II, several other figures in philosophy and the social sciences were involved in its path to publication.'
p9819
aS'Gombrich was entrusted with the main task of finding a publisher; Friedrich Hayek wanted to get Popper to the London School of Economics and thus was enthused by his turn to social philosophy; Lionel Robbins and Harold Laski reviewed the manuscript.'
p9820
aS'Lastly, J.N.'
p9821
aS"Findlay suggested the book's ultimate title after three others had been discarded."
p9822
aS'The story and its author have had great influence on Russian literature, as expressed in a quote attributed to Fyodor Dostoevsky: "We all come out from Gogol\'s \'Overcoat\'."'
p9823
aS'The story has been adapted into a variety of stage and film interpretations. Summary The story narrates the life and death of titular councillor Akaky Akakievich Bashmachkin (Akakii Akakievich Bashmachkin), an impoverished government clerk and copyist in the Russian capital of St. Petersburg.'
p9824
aS'Akaky is dedicated to his job, though little recognized in his department for his hard work.'
p9825
aS'Instead, the younger clerks tease him and attempt to distract him whenever they can.'
p9826
aS'His threadbare overcoat is often the butt of their jokes.'
p9827
aS"Akaky decides it is necessary to have the coat repaired, so he takes it to his tailor, Petrovich, who declares the coat irreparable, telling Akaky he must buy a new overcoat.The cost of a new overcoat is beyond Akaky's meager salary, so he forces himself to live within a strict budget to save sufficient money to buy the new overcoat."
p9828
aS'Meanwhile, he and Petrovich frequently meet to discuss the style of the new coat.'
p9829
aS'"The world comes to be painted at my studio" said Courbet.'
p9830
aS"The figures in the painting are allegorical representations of various influences on Courbet's artistic life."
p9831
aS'On the left are human figures from all levels of society.'
p9832
aS'In the center, Courbet works on a landscape, while turned away from a nude model who is a symbol of academic art tradition.'
p9833
aS'On the right are friends and associates of Courbet including writers George Sand and Charles Baudelaire, Champfleury, Pierre-Joseph Proudhon, collector Alfred Bruyas, and Francois Sabatier and his wife, Caroline Unger.'
p9834
aS"The ghostly female figure visible to the left of Baudelaire (in the right corner of the painting) is believed to be Baudelaire's mistress Jeanne Duval, who Baudelaire requested to be painted over.The 1855 Paris World Fair's jury accepted eleven of Courbet's work, but refused this one."
p9835
aS'So, in an act of self promotion Courbet, with the help of Jacques-Louis-Alfred Bruyas, opened his own exhibition close to the official exposition; this was a forerunner of the various Salon des Refuses.'
p9836
aS'The title can be translated as either The_Phenomenology_of_Spirit or The Phenomenology of Mind, because the German word Geist has both meanings.'
p9837
aS"The book's working title, which also appeared in the first edition, was Science of the Experience of Consciousness."
p9838
aS'On its initial publication (see cover image on right), it was identified as Part One of a projected "System of Science", of which the Science of Logic was the second part.'
p9839
aS'A smaller work, titled Philosophy of Spirit (also translated as "Philosophy of Mind"), appears in Hegel\'s Encyclopedia of the Philosophical Sciences, and recounts in briefer and somewhat altered form the major themes of the original Phenomenology.Phenomenology was the basis of Hegel\'s later philosophy and marked a significant development in German idealism after Kant.'
p9840
aS'Focusing on topics in metaphysics, epistemology, physics, ethics, history, religion, perception, consciousness, and political philosophy, The Phenomenology is where Hegel develops his concepts of dialectic (including the Master-slave dialectic), absolute idealism, ethical life, and Aufhebung.'
p9841
aS'The book had a profound effect in Western philosophy, and "has been praised and blamed for the development of existentialism, communism, fascism, death of God theology, and historicist nihilism.'
p9842
aS'" Historical context Hegel was putting the finishing touches to this book as Napoleon engaged Prussian troops on October 14, 1806, in the Battle of Jena on a plateau outside the city.'
p9843
aS'Despite that censorship, The_Picture_of_Dorian_Gray offended the moral sensibilities of British book reviewers, some of whom said that Oscar Wilde merited prosecution for violating the laws guarding the public morality.'
p9844
aS'In response, Wilde aggressively defended his novel and art in correspondence with the British press.Wilde revised and expanded the magazine edition of The_Picture_of_Dorian_Gray (1890) for publication as a novel; the book edition (1891) featured an aphoristic preface -- an apologia about the art of the novel and the reader.'
p9845
aS'The content, style, and presentation of the preface made it famous in its own literary right, as social and cultural criticism.'
p9846
aS"In April 1891, the editorial house Ward, Lock and Company published the revised version of The_Picture_of_Dorian_Gray.The only novel written by Wilde, The_Picture_of_Dorian_Gray exists in two versions, the 1890 magazine edition (in 13 Chapters) as submitted to Lippincott's Monthly Magazine, and the 1891 book edition (in 20 Chapters)."
p9847
aS"As literature of the 19th century, The_Picture_of_Dorian_Gray is an example of Gothic fiction with strong themes interpreted from the legendary Faust. Summary Dorian Gray is the subject of a full-length portrait in oil by Basil Hallward, an artist who is impressed and infatuated by Dorian's beauty; he believes that Dorian's beauty is responsible for the new mode in his art as a painter."
p9848
aS"Through Basil, Dorian meets Lord Henry Wotton, and he soon is enthralled by the aristocrat's hedonistic worldview: that beauty and sensual fulfilment are the only things worth pursuing in life.Newly understanding that his beauty will fade, Dorian expresses the desire to sell his soul, to ensure that the picture, rather than he, will age and fade."
p9849
aS"The wish is granted, and Dorian pursues a libertine life of varied and amoral experiences; all the while his portrait ages and records every soul-corrupting sin. Plot The_Picture_of_Dorian_Gray begins on a beautiful summer day in Victorian era England, where Lord Henry Wotton, an opinionated man, is observing the sensitive artist Basil Hallward painting the portrait of Dorian Gray, a handsome young man who is Basil's ultimate muse."
p9850
aS"While it is mostly a personal work, Shonagon's writing and poetic skill makes it interesting as a work of literature, and it is valuable as a historical document."
p9851
aS"Part of it was revealed to the Court by accident during Shonagon's life."
p9852
aS'The book was first translated into English in 1889 by T. Purcell and W. G. Aston.'
p9853
aS'Other notable English translations were by Arthur Waley in 1928, Ivan Morris in 1967, and Meredith McKinney in 2006.'
p9854
aS'The Dog Pillow is an Edo period parody. Overview Starting with the "exhaustiveness" of the "collection of similar things" and how it is represented by "as for worms", "as for the flowers of trees", "awful things", and "things of beauty", author Sei Shonagon\'s "Ramblings" observed the nature of everyday life and the four seasons, and described in diverse sentences "her recollections" (her diary) that look back at the society of the imperial court surrounding Empress Teishi of whom she served, among other things.Three types of classification were proposed by Kikan Ikeda.'
p9855
aS'However, there are sections that are rather ambiguous and are difficult to classify (e.g., in the first paragraph of her ramblings, "As for Spring, (it is) the dawn [that is lovely]", there are objections to common opinions of what is actually meant here).It is composed primarily in Japanese hiragana, and generally many of her short stories were written in a witty literary style.'
p9856
aS'Confessions of her personal feelings are mixed into her writing with occasionally subtle sentimentality that reflects the downfall of the emperor\'s adviser, Fujiwara no Michitaka (her biological father), as well as the misfortune of both Emperor and Empress Teishi.The author\'s sophisticated sense and her eye for particular things are fused together, for if one compares the sentimentality of "mono no aware (the Pathos of Things)" as found in "The Tales of Genji", similar beauty of the world is revealed through the use of the intellectual word "okashi (lovely)" in this piece.The miscellaneous collection has been arranged loosely into three types, while the collection of similar things has been compiled by distinct classification, and this so-called compiling was done afterwards by the hands of people other than Sei Shonagon.In general this piece has been written in brief statements where the length of one paragraph is relatively short, and it is easy to read the contents even for modern Japanese speakers. Other pillow books More generally, a pillow book is a collection of notebooks or notes which have been collated to show a period of someone or something\'s life.'
p9857
aS"NYU's main campus is located at Greenwich Village in Lower Manhattan."
p9858
aS'The University also established NYU Abu Dhabi, NYU Shanghai and maintains 11 other Global Academic Centers in Accra, Berlin, Buenos_Aires, Florence, London, Madrid, Paris, Prague, Sydney, Tel Aviv and Washington, D.C.'
p9859
aS"Together, these form NYU's Global Network University."
p9860
aS'NYU was elected to the Association of American Universities in 1950.'
p9861
aS'NYU counts 36 Nobel Prize winners, four Abel Prize winners, 10 National Medal of Science recipients, 16 Pulitzer Prize winners, over 30 Academy Award winners, four Putnam Competition winners, Russ Prize, Gordon Prize, and Draper Prize winners, Turing Award winners, and Emmy, Grammy, and Tony Award winners among its faculty and alumni.'
p9862
aS'NYU also has MacArthur and Guggenheim Fellowship holders as well as National Academy of Sciences and National Academy of Engineering members among its past and present graduates and faculty.NYU is organized into more than 20 schools, colleges, and institutes, located in six centers throughout Manhattan and Downtown Brooklyn.'
p9863
aS'According to the Institute of International Education, NYU sends more students to study abroad than any other US college or university, and the College Board reports more online searches by international students for "NYU" than for any other university. History Albert Gallatin, Secretary of Treasury under Thomas Jefferson and James Madison, declared his intention to establish "in this immense and fast-growing city ... a system of rational and practical education fitting for all and graciously opened to all".'
p9864
aS'Each movement of the suite is named after a planet of the Solar System and its corresponding astrological character as defined by Holst.From its premiere to the present day, the suite has been enduringly popular, influential, widely performed and frequently recorded.'
p9865
aS'The work was not heard in a complete public performance, however, until some years after it was completed.'
p9866
aS'Although there were four performances between September 1918 and October 1920, they were all either private (the first performance, in London) or incomplete (two others in London and one in Birmingham).'
p9867
aS"The premiere was at the Queen's Hall on 29 September 1918, conducted by Holst's friend Adrian Boult before an invited audience of about 250 people."
p9868
aS'The first complete public performance was finally given in London by Albert Coates conducting the London Symphony Orchestra on 15 November 1920. Background The concept of the work is astrological rather than astronomical (which is why Earth is not included): each movement is intended to convey ideas and emotions associated with the influence of the planets on the psyche, not the Roman deities.'
p9869
aS"The idea of the work was suggested to Holst by Clifford Bax, who introduced him to astrology when the two were part of a small group of English artists holidaying in Majorca in the spring of 1913; Holst became quite a devotee of the subject, and would cast his friends' horoscopes for fun."
p9870
aS"Holst also used Alan Leo's book What is a Horoscope?"
p9871
aS'It tells the story of Christy Mahon, a young man running away from his farm, claiming he killed his father.'
p9872
aS"The locals are more interested in vicariously enjoying his story than in condemning the immorality of his murderous deed, and in fact, Christy's tale captures the romantic attention of the bar-maid Pegeen Mike, the daughter of Flaherty."
p9873
aS"The play is best known for its use of poetic, evocative language as Synge celebrates the lyrical speech of the peasant Irish. Characters in the play Christy MahonOld Mahon, Christy's father, a squatterMichael James Flaherty, a publicanMargaret Flaherty, called Pegeen Mike, Michael's daughter, and the bar-maidShawn Keogh, Pegeen's fianceWidow Quin, a widow of about thirtyPhilly Cullen and Jimmy Farrell, farmersSara Tansey, Susan Brady, Honor Blake, and Nelly, village girlsA BellmanSome peasantssagar and sagar mudgal, farmers Synopsis On the west coast of County Mayo Christy Mahon stumbles into Flaherty's tavern."
p9874
aS'There he claims that he is on the run because he killed his own father by driving a loy into his head.'
p9875
aS"Flaherty praises Christy for his boldness, and Flaherty's daughter (and the barmaid), Pegeen, falls in love with Christy, to the dismay of her betrothed, Shawn Keogh."
p9876
aS"Because of the novelty of Christy's exploits and the skill with which he tells his own story, he becomes something of a town hero."
p9877
aS"Many other women also become attracted to him, including the Widow Quin, who tries unsuccessfully to seduce Christy at Shawn's behest."
p9878
aS'She inherits a large amount of money and subsequently becomes the victim of Machiavellian scheming by two American expatriates.'
p9879
aS"Like many of James's novels, it is set in Europe, mostly England and Italy."
p9880
aS"Generally regarded as the masterpiece of James's early period, this novel reflects James's continuing interest in the differences between the New World and the Old, often to the detriment of the former."
p9881
aS"It also treats in a profound way the themes of personal freedom, responsibility, and betrayal. Plot summary Isabel Archer, originally from Albany, New York, is invited by her maternal aunt, Lydia Touchett, to visit Lydia's rich husband Daniel at his estate near London, following the death of Isabel's father."
p9882
aS"There, she meets her cousin Ralph Touchett, her friendly invalid uncle, and the Touchetts' robust neighbor, Lord Warburton."
p9883
aS"Isabel later declines Warburton's sudden proposal of marriage."
p9884
aS'She also rejects the hand of Caspar Goodwood, the charismatic son and heir of a wealthy Boston mill owner.'
p9885
aS'It was also published in the U.S., initially under the name The Labyrinthine Ways.'
p9886
aS'The novel tells the story of an outlaw Roman Catholic priest in the Mexican state of Tabasco during the 1930s, when the Mexican government was trying to suppress the Catholic Church.In 1941, the novel received the British literary award, the Hawthornden Prize.'
p9887
aS"In 2005, it was chosen by TIME magazine as one of the hundred best English-language novels since 1923. PlotEdit The main character is an unnamed 'whisky priest', who combines a great power for self-destruction with pitiful cravenness, an almost painful penitence and a desperate quest for dignity."
p9888
aS'By the end, though, the priest "acquires a real holiness."'
p9889
aS'The other principal character is a police lieutenant tasked with hunting down this priest.'
p9890
aS'This Lieutenant - also unnamed but thought to be based upon Tomas Garrido Canabal - is a committed socialist who despises the Church.The story starts with the arrival of the priest in a country town in an area where Catholicism is outlawed, and then follows him on his trip through Mexico, where he tries to minister to the people as best as he can.'
p9891
aS'He is also haunted by his personal demons, especially by the fact that he fathered a child in his parish some years before.'
p9892
aS"Originally published in Scotland in 1956 and in the United_States in 1959, it was Goffman's first and most famous book, for which he received the American Sociological Association's MacIver award in 1961.In 1998, the International Sociological Association listed this work as the tenth most important sociological book of the twentieth century. Background and summary The_Presentation_of_Self_in_Everyday_Life was the first book to treat face-to-face interaction as a subject of sociological study."
p9893
aS'Goffman treated it as a kind of report in which he frames out the theatrical performance that applies to face-to-face interactions.'
p9894
aS'He believed that when an individual comes in contact with other people, that individual will attempt to control or guide the impression that others might make of him by changing or fixing his or her setting, appearance and manner.'
p9895
aS'At the same time, the person the individual is interacting with is trying to form and obtain information about the individual.Goffman also believed that all participants in social interactions are engaged in certain practices to avoid being embarrassed or embarrassing others.'
p9896
aS"This led to Goffman's dramaturgical analysis."
p9897
aS'Goffman saw a connection between the kinds of acts that people put on in their daily life and theatrical performances.In social interaction, as in theatrical performance, there is a front region where the "actors" (individuals) are on stage in front of the audiences.'
p9898
aS'This is where the positive aspect of the idea of self and desired impressions are highlighted.'
p9899
aS"However, the printed version was not published until 1532, five years after Machiavelli's death."
p9900
aS'This was done with the permission of the Medici pope Clement VII, but "long before then, in fact since the first appearance of the Prince in manuscript, controversy had swirled about his writings".Although it was written as if it were a traditional work in the mirrors for princes style, it is generally agreed that it was especially innovative.'
p9901
aS"This is only partly because it was written in the vernacular Italian rather than Latin, a practice which had become increasingly popular since the publication of Dante's Divine Comedy and other works of Renaissance literature.The_Prince is sometimes claimed to be one of the first works of modern philosophy, especially modern political philosophy, in which the effective truth is taken to be more important than any abstract ideal."
p9902
aS'It was also in direct conflict with the dominant Catholic and scholastic doctrines of the time concerning how to consider politics and ethics.Although it is relatively short, the treatise is the most remembered of Machiavelli\'s works and the one most responsible for bringing the word "Machiavellian" into usage as a pejorative.'
p9903
aS'It also helped make "Old Nick" an English term for the devil, and even contributed to the modern negative connotations of the words "politics" and "politician" in western countries.'
p9904
aS'In terms of subject matter it overlaps with the much longer Discourses on Livy, which was written a few years later.'
p9905
aS'In its use of near-contemporary Italians as examples of people who perpetrated criminal deeds for politics, another lesser-known work by Machiavelli which The_Prince has been compared to is the Life of Castruccio Castracani.The descriptions within The_Prince have the general theme of accepting that the aims of princes--such as glory and survival--can justify the use of immoral means to achieve those ends. SummaryEdit The work has a recognizable structure, for the most part indicated by the author himself, which can be summarized as follows. The subject matter: New Princedoms (Chapters 1 & 2)Edit The_Prince starts by describing the subject matter it will handle.'
p9906
aS'It is considered a founding text in economic sociology and sociology in general.In the book, Weber wrote that capitalism in Northern Europe evolved when the Protestant (particularly Calvinist) ethic influenced large numbers of people to engage in work in the secular world, developing their own enterprises and engaging in trade and the accumulation of wealth for investment.'
p9907
aS'In other words, the Protestant work ethic was an important force behind the unplanned and uncoordinated emergence of modern capitalism.'
p9908
aS'This idea is also known as the "Protestant Ethic thesis.'
p9909
aS'"In 1998 the International Sociological Association listed this work as the fourth most important sociological book of the 20th century. Summary  Basic concepts Although not a detailed study of Protestantism but rather an introduction to Weber\'s later studies of interaction between various religious ideas and economics (The Religion of China: Confucianism and Taoism, The Religion of India: The Sociology of Hinduism and Buddhism, and Ancient Judaism), The_Protestant_Ethic_and_the_Spirit_of_Capitalism argues that Puritan ethics and ideas influenced the development of capitalism.Religious devotion, Weber argues, is usually accompanied by a rejection of worldly affairs, including the pursuit of wealth and possessions.'
p9910
aS'To illustrate his theory, Weber quotes the ethical writings of Benjamin_Franklin:Remember, that time is money.'
p9911
aS'He that can earn ten shillings a day by his labor, and goes abroad, or sits idle, one half of that day, though he spends but sixpence during his diversion or idleness, ought not to reckon that the only expense; he has really spent, or rather thrown away, five shillings besides.[...'
p9912
aS']Remember, that money is the prolific, generating nature.'
p9913
aS'At 491 cm x 716 cm (16\' 1"  x 23\' 6" ), it is an over-life-size painting that depicts a moment from the aftermath of the wreck of the French naval frigate Meduse, which ran aground off the coast of today\'s Mauritania on July 2, 1816.'
p9914
aS'On July 5, 1816 at least 147 people were set adrift on a hurriedly constructed raft; all but 15 died in the 13 days before their rescue, and those who survived endured starvation and dehydration and practiced cannibalism.'
p9915
aS'The event became an international scandal, in part because its cause was widely attributed to the incompetence of the French captain perceived to be acting under the authority of the recently restored French monarchy.'
p9916
aS"In reality, King Louis XVIII had no say in the captain's appointment, since monarchs were not directly involved in appointments made to vessels like a naval frigate."
p9917
aS'The appointment of the vicomte de Chaumareys as captain of the Meduse would have been a routine naval appointment, made within the Ministry of the Navy.In choosing the tragedy as subject matter for his first major work--an uncommissioned depiction of an event from recent history--Gericault consciously selected a well-known incident that would generate great public interest and help launch his career.'
p9918
aS'The event fascinated the young artist, and before he began work on the final painting, he undertook extensive research and produced many preparatory sketches.'
p9919
aS'He interviewed two of the survivors, and constructed a detailed scale model of the raft.'
p9920
aS"The final form of the poem was available in 1717 with the addition of Clarissa's speech on good humour. DescriptionEdit The poem satirises a minor incident by comparing it to the epic world of the gods."
p9921
aS"It was based on an actual incident recounted by Pope's friend, John Caryll."
p9922
aS'Arabella Fermor and her suitor, Lord Petre, were both from aristocratic recusant Catholic families at a period in England when under such laws as the Test Act, all denominations except Anglicanism suffered legal restrictions and penalties (for example Petre could not take up his place in the House of Lords as a Catholic).'
p9923
aS'Petre, lusting after Arabella, had cut off a lock of her hair without permission, and the consequent argument had created a breach between the two families.'
p9924
aS'Pope, also a Catholic, wrote the poem at the request of friends in an attempt to "comically merge the two."'
p9925
aS'He utilised the character Belinda to represent Arabella and introduced an entire system of "sylphs," or guardian spirits of virgins, a parodised version of the gods and goddesses of conventional epic.'
p9926
aS"Pope derived his sylphs from the 17th-century French Rosicrucian novel Comte de Gabalis.Pope's poem uses the traditional high stature of classical epics to emphasise the triviality of the incident."
p9927
aS'Recounted by Livy and Plutarch (Parallel Lives II, 15 and 19), it provided a subject for Renaissance and post-Renaissance works of art that combined a suitably inspiring example of the hardihood and courage of ancient Romans with the opportunity to depict multiple figures, including heroically semi-nude figures, in intensely passionate struggle.'
p9928
aS'Comparable themes from Classical Antiquity are the Battle of the Lapiths and Centaurs and the theme of Amazonomachy, the battle of Theseus with the Amazons. Story The Rape is supposed to have occurred in the early history of Rome, shortly after its founding by Romulus and his mostly male followers.'
p9929
aS'Seeking wives in order to found families, the Romans negotiated unsuccessfully with the Sabines, who populated the area.'
p9930
aS'Fearing the emergence of a rival society, the Sabines refused to allow their women to marry the Romans.'
p9931
aS"Consequently, the Romans planned to abduct Sabine women, during a festival of Neptune Equester and proclaimed the festival among Rome's neighbours."
p9932
aS"According to Livy, many people from Rome's neighbours including folk from the Caeninenses, Crustumini, and Antemnates, and many of the Sabines attended."
p9933
aS'At the festival Romulus gave a signal, at which the Romans grabbed the Sabine women and fought off the Sabine men.'
p9934
aS'In English, Le Rouge et le Noir is variously translated as Red and Black, Scarlet and Black, and The_Red_and_the_Black, without the sub-title.The title refers to the tension between the clerical and secular interests of the protagonist, which is a matter of some debate. Background Le Rouge et le Noir is the Bildungsroman of Julien Sorel, the intelligent and ambitious protagonist.'
p9935
aS'He comes from a poor family and fails to understand much about the ways of the world he sets out to conquer.'
p9936
aS'He harbours many romantic illusions, but becomes mostly a pawn in the political machinations of the ruthless and influential people about him.'
p9937
aS'The adventures of the hero satirize early 19th-century French society, especially the hypocrisy and materialism of the aristocracy and members of the Roman Catholic Church, foretelling the coming radical changes that will depose them from their leading role in French society.The first volume\'s epigraph is attributed to Danton: "La verite, l\'apre verite" ("The truth, the harsh truth"), but like most of the chapter epigraphs it is actually fictional.'
p9938
aS'The first chapter of each volume repeats the title Le Rouge et le Noir and the Chronique de 1830 sub-title.'
p9939
aS"The novel's title refers to the contrasting uniforms of the Army and the Church."
p9940
aS'Early in the story, Julien Sorel realistically observes that under the Bourbon restoration it is impossible for a man of his plebeian social class to distinguish himself in the army (as he might have done under Napoleon), hence only a Church career offers social advancement and glory.In complete editions, the first book ("Livre premier", ending after Chapter XXX) concludes with the quotation "To the Happy Few", a dedication that refers to The Vicar of Wakefield by Oliver_Goldsmith, parts of which he had memorized in the course of teaching himself English.'
p9941
aS"Plato's best-known work, it has proven to be one of the world's most influential works of philosophy and political theory, both intellectually and historically."
p9942
aS'In it, Socrates along with various Athenians and foreigners discuss the meaning of justice and examine whether or not the just man is happier than the unjust man by considering a series of different cities coming into existence "in speech", culminating in a city called Kallipolis (Kallipolis), which is ruled by philosopher-kings; and by examining the nature of existing regimes.'
p9943
aS'The participants also discuss the theory of forms, the immortality of the soul, and the roles of the philosopher and of poetry in society. Structure  By book  Book I While visiting the Piraeus with Glaucon, Socrates is asked by Polemarchus to join him for a celebration.'
p9944
aS'Cephalus, Polemarchus, and Thrasymachus are then each asked their definitions of justice by Socrates.'
p9945
aS'Cephalus defines justice as giving what is owed.'
p9946
aS'Polemarchus says justice is "the art which gives good to friends and evil to enemies".'
p9947
aS'Thrasymachus proclaims "justice is nothing else than the interest of the stronger".'
p9948
aS"Because of the novel's controversial themes, Hardy had some difficulty finding a publisher; reviews, however, though somewhat mixed, were generally positive."
p9949
aS"In the twentieth century, The_Return_of_the_Native became one of Hardy's most popular novels. Plot summary The novel takes place entirely in the environs of Egdon Heath, and, with the exception of the epilogue, Aftercourses, covers exactly a year and a day."
p9950
aS'The narrative begins on the evening of Guy Fawkes Night as Diggory Venn is slowly crossing the heath with his van, which is being drawn by ponies.'
p9951
aS'In his van is a passenger.'
p9952
aS'When darkness falls, the country folk light bonfires on the surrounding hills, emphasising--not for the last time--the pagan spirit of the heath and its denizens.Venn is a reddleman; he travels the country supplying farmers with a red mineral called "reddle", a dialect term for red ochre) that farmers use to mark their sheep.'
p9953
aS'Although his trade has stained him red from head to foot, underneath his devilish colouring he is a handsome, shrewd, well-meaning young man.'
p9954
aS'His passenger is a young woman named Thomasin Yeobright, whom Venn is taking home.'
p9955
aS"Silas earns a fortune in the paint business, but he lacks social standards, which he tries to attain through his daughter's marriage into the aristocratic Corey family."
p9956
aS"Silas' morality does not fail him."
p9957
aS'He loses his money but makes the right moral decision when his partner proposes the unethical selling of the mills to English settlers.Howells is known to be the father of American realism, and a denouncer of the sentimental novel.'
p9958
aS"The resolution of the love triangle of Irene Lapham, Tom Corey, and Penelope Lapham highlights Howells' rejection of the conventions of sentimental romantic novels as unrealistic and deceitful. List of characters Silas LaphamPenelope LaphamMrs."
p9959
aS'LaphamIrene LaphamTom CoreyBromfield CoreyMrs.'
p9960
aS'CoreyMilton K. Rogers Plot summary The novel begins with Silas Lapham being interviewed for a newspaper profile, during which he explains his financial success in the mineral paint business.'
p9961
aS'The Lapham family is somewhat self-conscious in their sudden rise on the social ladder and often fumble in their attempts at following etiquette norms.'
p9962
aS'When first performed, at the Theatre des Champs-Elysees on 29 May 1913, the avant-garde nature of the music and choreography caused a sensation and a near-riot in the audience.'
p9963
aS'Although designed as a work for the stage, with specific passages accompanying characters and action, the music achieved equal if not greater recognition as a concert piece, and is widely considered to be one of the most influential musical works of the 20th century.Stravinsky was a young, virtually unknown composer when Diaghilev recruited him to create works for the Ballets Russes.'
p9964
aS'The Rite was the third such project, after the acclaimed Firebird (1910) and Petrushka (1911).'
p9965
aS'The concept behind The_Rite_of_Spring, developed by Roerich from Stravinsky\'s outline idea, is suggested by its subtitle, "Pictures of Pagan Russia in Two Parts"; in the scenario, after various primitive rituals celebrating the advent of spring, a young girl is chosen as a sacrificial victim and dances herself to death.'
p9966
aS"After a mixed critical reception for its original run and a short London tour, the ballet was not performed again until the 1920s, when a version choreographed by Leonide Massine replaced Nijinsky's original."
p9967
aS"Massine's was the forerunner of many innovative productions directed by the world's leading ballet-masters, which gained the work worldwide acceptance."
p9968
aS"In the 1980s, Nijinsky's original choreography, long believed lost, was reconstructed by the Joffrey Ballet in Los Angeles.Stravinsky's score contains many novel features for its time, including experiments in tonality, metre, rhythm, stress and dissonance."
p9969
aS'Bergman developed the film from his own play Wood Painting.'
p9970
aS'The title refers to a passage from the Book of Revelation, used both at the very start of the film, and again towards the end, beginning with the words "And when the Lamb had opened the seventh seal, there was silence in heaven about the space of half an hour".[Rev.'
p9971
aS'8:1] Here the motif of silence refers to the "silence of God," which is a major theme of the film.The_Seventh_Seal is considered a classic of world cinema.'
p9972
aS'It established Bergman as a world-renowned director, containing scenes which have become iconic through homages, critical analysis, and parodies. Synopsis Disillusioned knight Antonius Block (Max von Sydow) and his nihilistic squire Jons (Gunnar Bjornstrand) return after fighting in the Crusades and find Sweden being ravaged by the plague.'
p9973
aS'On the beach immediately after their arrival, The knight encounters Death (Bengt Ekerot), personified as a pale, black-cowled figure resembling a monk.'
p9974
aS'The knight, in the middle of a chess game he has been playing alone, challenges Death to a chess match, believing that he can forestall his demise as long as the game continues.'
p9975
aS'Death agrees, and they start a new game.The other characters in the story, except for the squire, do not see Death, and when the chess board comes out at various times in the story, they believe the knight is continuing his habit of playing alone.The knight with his squire heads for his castle.'
p9976
aS'This quotation comes from the story of Lazarus, in which Jesus raises a man from the dead.'
p9977
aS'However, Anti-Climacus raises the question: would not this statement still be true even if Jesus had not raised Lazarus from the dead?'
p9978
aS'While the human conception of death is the end, the Christian conception of death is merely another stop along the way of the eternal life.'
p9979
aS'In this way, for the Christian, death is nothing to fear.'
p9980
aS'The true "Sickness unto Death," which does not describe physical but spiritual death, is something to fear according to Anti-Climacus.This sickness unto death is what Kierkegaard calls despair.'
p9981
aS'According to Kierkegaard, an individual is "in despair" if he does not align himself with God or God\'s plan for the self.'
p9982
aS'In this way he loses his self, which Kierkegaard defines as the "relation\'s relating itself to itself in the relation."'
p9983
aS'Of all his works, this book was the most known to the general public.'
p9984
aS"Towards the end of Goethe's life, a personal visit to Weimar became crucial to any young man's tour of Europe. Plot summary The majority of The_Sorrows_of_Young_Werther is presented as a collection of letters written by Werther, a young artist of highly sensitive and passionate temperament, and sent to his friend Wilhelm.In these letters, Werther gives a very intimate account of his stay in the fictional village of Wahlheim (based on the town of Garbenheim, near Wetzlar)."
p9985
aS'He is enchanted by the simple ways of the peasants there.'
p9986
aS'He meets Lotte, a beautiful young girl who is taking care of her siblings following the death of their mother.'
p9987
aS'Despite knowing beforehand that Lotte is already engaged to a man named Albert who is 11 years her senior, Werther falls in love with her.Although this causes Werther great pain, he spends the next few months cultivating a close friendship with both of them.'
p9988
aS'His pain eventually becomes so great that he is forced to leave and go to Weimar.'
p9989
aS'While he is away, he makes the acquaintance of Fraulein von B.'
p9990
aS'It has been in the permanent collection of the Museum of Modern Art in New_York_City since 1941, acquired through the Lillie P. Bliss Bequest.'
p9991
aS"It is regarded as among Van Gogh's finest works, and one of the most recognized monuments in the history of Western culture. The asylumEdit In the aftermath of the 23 December 1888 breakdown that resulted in the self-mutilation of his left ear, Van Gogh voluntarily admitted himself to the Saint-Paul-de-Mausole lunatic asylum on 8 May 1889."
p9992
aS'Housed in a former monastery, Saint-Paul-de-Mausole catered to the wealthy and was less than half full when Van Gogh arrived, allowing him to occupy not only a second-story bedroom but also a ground-floor room for use as a painting studio.During the year Van Gogh stayed at the asylum, the heavy output of paintings he had begun in Arles continued.'
p9993
aS"During this period, he produced some of the best-known works of his career, including the Irises from May, 1889, now in the J. Paul Getty Museum, and the blue self-portrait from September, 1889, in the Musee d'Orsay."
p9994
aS"The_Starry_Night was painted mid-June by around 18 June, the date he wrote his brother Theo to say he had a new study of a starry sky. The paintingEdit Although The_Starry_Night was painted during the day in Van Gogh's ground-floor studio, it would be inaccurate to state that the picture was painted from memory."
p9995
aS'The view has been identified as the one from his bedroom window, facing east, a view which Van Gogh painted variations of no fewer than twenty-one times, including The_Starry_Night.'
p9996
aS'"Through the iron-barred window," he wrote to his brother, Theo, around 23 May 1889, "I can see an enclosed square of wheat .'
p9997
aS'The story is divided into two parts: Meursault\'s first-person narrative view before and after the murder, respectively.In January 1955, Camus said, "I summarized The Stranger a long time ago, with a remark I admit was highly paradoxical: \'In our society any man who does not weep at his mother\'s funeral runs the risk of being sentenced to death.\''
p9998
aS'I only meant that the hero of my book is condemned because he does not play the game.'
p9999
aS'" Plot  Part one Meursault learns of his mother\'s death.'
p10000
aS'At her funeral, he expresses none of the expected emotions of grief.'
p10001
aS'When asked if he wishes to view the body, he says no, and, instead, smokes and drinks coffee in front of the coffin.'
p10002
aS'Rather than expressing his feelings, he only comments to the reader about the others at the funeral.'
p10003
aS'He later encounters Marie, a former employee of his firm.'
p10004
aS'Kuhn challenged the then prevailing view of progress in "normal science."'
p10005
aS'Normal scientific progress was viewed as "development-by-accumulation" of accepted facts and theories.'
p10006
aS'Kuhn argued for an episodic model in which periods of such conceptual continuity in normal science were interrupted by periods of revolutionary science.'
p10007
aS'The discovery of "anomalies" during revolutions in science leads to new paradigms.'
p10008
aS'New paradigms then ask new questions of old data, move beyond the mere "puzzle-solving" of the previous paradigm, change the rules of the game and the "map" directing new research.For example, Kuhn\'s analysis of the Copernican Revolution emphasized that, in its beginning, it did not offer more accurate predictions of celestial events, such as planetary positions, than the Ptolemaic system, but instead appealed to some practitioners based on a promise of better, simpler, solutions that might be developed at some point in the future.'
p10009
aS'Kuhn called the core concepts of an ascendant revolution its "paradigms" and thereby launched this word into widespread analogical use in the second half of the 20th century.'
p10010
aS"Kuhn's insistence that a paradigm shift was a melange of sociology, enthusiasm and scientific promise, but not a logically determinate procedure, caused an uproar in reaction to his work."
p10011
aS'Hemingway biographer Jeffrey Meyers writes that it is "recognized as Hemingway\'s greatest work", and Hemingway scholar Linda Wagner-Martin calls it his most important novel.'
p10012
aS"The novel was published in the United_States in October 1926 by the publishing house Scribner's."
p10013
aS'A year later, the London publishing house Jonathan Cape published the novel with the title of Fiesta.'
p10014
aS'Since then it has been continuously in print.Hemingway began writing the novel on his birthday (21 July) in 1925, finishing the draft manuscript barely two months later in September.'
p10015
aS'After setting aside the manuscript for a short period, he worked on revisions during the winter of 1926.'
p10016
aS"The basis for the novel was Hemingway's 1925 trip to Spain."
p10017
aS'The setting was unique and memorable, showing seedy cafe life in Paris, and the excitement of the Pamplona festival, with a middle section devoted to descriptions of a fishing trip in the Pyrenees.'
p10018
aS'As the lady goes high on the swing, she lets the young man take a furtive peep under her dress, all while flicking her own shoe off in the direction of a Cupid and turning her back to two angelic cherubim on the side of the older man.The lady is wearing a bergere hat (shepherdess hat) which is ironic since shepherds are normally associated with virtue because of their living close to nature, uncorrupted by the temptations of the city.According to the memoirs of the dramatist Charles Colle, a courtier (homme de la cour) asked first Gabriel Francois Doyen to make this painting of him and his mistress.'
p10019
aS'Not comfortable with this frivolous work, Doyen refused and passed on the commission to Fragonard.'
p10020
aS'The man had requested a portrait of his mistress seated on a swing being pushed by a bishop, but Fragonard painted a layman.This style of "frivolous" painting soon became the target of the philosophers of the Enlightenment, who demanded a more serious art which would show the nobility of man. Provenance The original owner remains unclear.'
p10021
aS'A firm provenance begins only with the tax farmer M.-F. Menage de Pressigny, who died in 1794, after which it was seized by the revolutionary government.'
p10022
aS'It was possibly later owned by the marquis des Razins de Saint-Marc, and certainly by the duc de Morny.'
p10023
aS"After his death in 1865 it was bought at auction in Paris by Lord Hertford, the main founder of the Wallace Collection. Copies There are a number of copies, none by Fragonard.one once owned by Edmond James de Rothschild, slightly different from the original; the lady's dress is blue, not pinka smaller version (56 x 46 cm) owned by Duke Jules de Polignac."
p10024
aS'This painting became the property of the Grimaldi family in 1930 when Pierre de Polignac (1895-1964) married Princess Charlotte, Duchess of Valentinois (1898-1977).'
p10025
aS'He conjures up a storm, the eponymous tempest, to lure his usurping brother Antonio and the complicit King Alonso of Naples to the island.'
p10026
aS"There, his machinations bring about the revelation of Antonio's lowly nature, the redemption of the King, and the marriage of Miranda to Alonso's son, Ferdinand.There is no obvious single source for the plot of The_Tempest, but researchers have seen parallels in Erasmus's Naufragium, Peter Martyr's De orbe novo, and eyewitness reports by William Strachey and Sylvester Jordain of the real-life shipwreck of the Sea Venture on the islands of Bermuda, and the subsequent conflict between Sir Thomas Gates and Sir George Somers."
p10027
aS"In addition, one of Gonzalo's speeches is derived from Montaigne's essay Of the Canibales, and much of Prospero's renunciative speech is taken word for word from a speech by Medea in Ovid's poem Metamorphoses."
p10028
aS'The masque in Act 4 may have been a later addition, possibly in honour of the wedding of Princess Elizabeth and Frederick V in 1613.'
p10029
aS"The play was first published in the First Folio of 1623.The story draws heavily on the tradition of the romance, and it was influenced by tragicomedy, the courtly masque and perhaps the commedia dell'arte."
p10030
aS"It differs from Shakespeare's other plays in its observation of a stricter, more organised neoclassical style."
p10031
aS'Critics see The_Tempest as explicitly concerned with its own nature as a play, frequently drawing links between Prospero\'s "art" and theatrical illusion, and early critics saw Prospero as a representation of Shakespeare, and his renunciation of magic as signalling Shakespeare\'s farewell to the stage.'
p10032
aS'However, Dumas also frequently works into the plot various injustices, abuses and absurdities of the old regime, giving the novel an additional political aspect at a time when the debate in France between republicans and monarchists was still fierce.'
p10033
aS'The story was first serialized from March to July 1844, during the July Monarchy, four years before the French Revolution of 1848 violently established the Second Republic.'
p10034
aS"The author's father, Thomas-Alexandre Dumas, had been a well-known General in France's Republican army during the French Revolutionary Wars.The story of d'Artagnan is continued in Twenty Years After and The Vicomte of Bragelonne: Ten Years Later."
p10035
aS"Those three novels by Dumas are together known as the d'Artagnan Romances. Origin In the very first sentences of his preface, Alexandre Dumas indicated as his source Memoires de Monsieur d'Artagnan (1700), a historical novel by Gatien de Courtilz de Sandras, which Dumas discovered during his research for his history of Louis XIV, printed by Pierre Rouge in Amsterdam."
p10036
aS"It was in this book, he said, that d'Artagnan relates his first visit to M. de Treville, captain of the Musketeers, where in the antechamber he met three young Bearnese with the names Athos, Porthos and Aramis."
p10037
aS'This information struck the imagination of Dumas so much--he tells us--that he continued his investigation and finally encountered once more the names of the three musketeers in a manuscript with the title Memoire de M. le comte de la Fere, etc.. Elated--so continues his yarn--he asked permission to reprint the manuscript.'
p10038
aS"Permission granted:Now, this is the first part of this precious manuscript which we offer to our readers, restoring it to the title which belongs to it, and entering into an engagement that if (of which we have no doubt) this first part should obtain the success it merits, we will publish the second immediately.In the meanwhile, since godfathers are second fathers, as it were, we beg the reader to lay to our account, and not to that of the Comte de la Fere, the pleasure or the ennui he may experience.This being understood, let us proceed with our story.The book he referred to was Memoires de M. d'Artagnan, capitaine lieutenant de la premiere compagnie des Mousquetaires du Roi (Memoirs of Mister d'Artagnan, Lieutenant Captain of the first company of the King's Musketeers) by Gatien de Courtilz de Sandras (Cologne, 1700)."
p10039
aS"It was adapted into a 1979 film, which won both the Palme d'Or, in the same year, and the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film the following year. Plot summary The story revolves around the life of Oskar Matzerath, as narrated by himself when confined in a mental hospital during the years 1952-1954."
p10040
aS"Born in 1924 in the Free City of Danzig (now Gdansk, Poland), with an adult's capacity for thought and perception, he decides never to grow up when he hears his father declare that he would become a grocer."
p10041
aS'Gifted with a piercing shriek that can shatter glass or be used as a weapon, Oskar declares himself to be one of those "clairaudient infants", whose "spiritual development is complete at birth and only needs to affirm itself".'
p10042
aS'He retains the stature of a child while living through the beginning of World_War_II, several love affairs, and the world of postwar Europe.'
p10043
aS'Through all this, a toy tin drum, the first of which he received as a present on his third birthday, followed by many replacement drums each time he wears one out from over-vigorous drumming, remains his treasured possession; he is willing to commit violence to retain it.Oskar considers himself to have two "presumptive fathers"--his mother\'s husband Alfred Matzerath, a member of the Nazi Party, and her cousin and lover Jan Bronski, a Danzig Pole who is executed for defending the Polish Post Office in Danzig during the German invasion of Poland.'
p10044
aS"Oskar's mother having died, Alfred marries Maria, a woman who is secretly Oskar's first mistress."
p10045
aS"After marrying Alfred, Maria gives birth to Oskar's possible son, Kurt."
p10046
aS"Heavily influenced by Dostoevsky's Crime_and_Punishment and The_Brothers_Karamazov, Kafka even went so far as to call Dostoevsky a blood relative."
p10047
aS"Like Kafka's other novels, The_Trial was never completed, although it does include a chapter which brings the story to an end.After Kafka's death in 1924 his friend and literary executor Max Brod edited the text for publication by Verlag Die Schmiede."
p10048
aS'The original manuscript is held at the Museum of Modern Literature, Marbach am Neckar, Germany.'
p10049
aS'The first English language translation, by Willa and Edwin Muir, was published in 1937.'
p10050
aS"In 1999, the book was listed in Le Monde's 100 Books of the Century and as No."
p10051
aS'2 of the Best German Novels of the Twentieth Century. Plot On his thirtieth birthday, the chief financial officer of a bank, Josef K., is unexpectedly arrested by two unidentified agents from an unspecified agency for an unspecified crime.'
p10052
aS"The agents' boss later arrives and holds a mini-tribunal in the room of K.'s neighbor, Fraulein Burstner."
p10053
aS'It owes its importance in particular to its revolutionary use of perspective and chiaroscuro.'
p10054
aS'The Tribute Money suffered great damage in the centuries after its creation, until the chapel went through a thorough restoration in the 1980s. The Brancacci Chapel The Brancacci Chapel, in the basilica of Santa Maria del Carmine, was founded around 1366/7 by Piero di Piuvichese Brancacci.'
p10055
aS"The chapel passed to Piero's nephew, Felice Brancacci, who some time between 1423 and 1425 commissioned the painter Masolino to decorate the walls with a series of frescoes from the life of Saint Peter."
p10056
aS'Peter was the name-saint of the founder, and the patron saint of the Brancacci family, but the choice also reflected support for the Roman papacy during the Great Schism.At some point Masolino was joined by another artist, the eighteen years younger Masaccio.'
p10057
aS'Masolino eventually left, either for Hungary in 1425 or for Rome in 1427, leaving the completion of the chapel to Masaccio.'
p10058
aS'In 1427 or 28, before the chapel was completed, Masaccio joined Masolino in Rome.'
p10059
aS'Only in the 1480s was the work finished, by Filippino Lippi.'
p10060
aS'Many critics have tried to determine the exact nature of the evil hinted at by the story.'
p10061
aS'However, others have argued that the true brilliance of the novella comes with its ability to create an intimate confusion and suspense for the reader. Plot summary An unnamed narrator listens to Douglas, a friend, read a manuscript written by a former governess whom Douglas claims to have known and who is now dead.'
p10062
aS'The manuscript tells the story of how the young governess is hired by a man who has become responsible for his young nephew and niece after the deaths of their parents.'
p10063
aS'He lives mainly in London and is uninterested in raising the children himself.The boy, Miles, is attending a boarding school, while his younger sister, Flora, is living at a country estate in Essex.'
p10064
aS'She is currently being cared for by the housekeeper, Mrs. Grose.'
p10065
aS"The governess' new employer, Miles and Flora's uncle, gives her full charge of the children and explicitly states that she is not to bother him with communications of any sort."
p10066
aS"The governess travels to her new employer's country house, Bly, and begins her duties.Miles soon returns from school for the summer just after a letter arrives from the headmaster stating that he has been expelled."
p10067
aS'Published in 1922, the 434-line poem first appeared in the United Kingdom in the October issue of The Criterion and in the United_States in the November issue of The Dial.'
p10068
aS'It was published in book form in December 1922.'
p10069
aS'Among its famous phrases are "April is the cruellest month", "I will show you fear in a handful of dust", and the mantra in the Sanskrit language "Shantih shantih shantih".Eliot\'s poem loosely follows the legend of the Holy Grail and the Fisher King combined with vignettes of contemporary British society.'
p10070
aS'Eliot employs many literary and cultural allusions from the Western canon, Buddhism and the Hindu Upanishads.'
p10071
aS'Because of this, critics and scholars regard the poem as obscure.'
p10072
aS"The poem shifts between voices of satire and prophecy featuring abrupt and unannounced changes of speaker, location, and time and conjuring of a vast and dissonant range of cultures and literatures.The poem's structure is divided into five sections."
p10073
aS'The first section, The Burial of the Dead, introduces the diverse themes of disillusionment and despair.'
p10074
aS'Set in central and southern Florida in the early 20th century, the novel was initially poorly received for its rejection of racial uplift literary prescriptions.'
p10075
aS"Today, it has come to be regarded as a seminal work in both African-American literature and women's literature."
p10076
aS'TIME included the novel in its 2005 list of the 100 best English-language novels published since 1923. Historical context  Racism in the early 1900s African Americans like Hurston grew up in a hostile economic, political, and social climate.'
p10077
aS'White Democrats had regained power in the South in the late 19th century through violence and intimidation around elections; once in power, they passed Jim Crow laws and, from 1890 to 1910, passed new constitutions and laws that disfranchised most blacks.'
p10078
aS'The Ku Klux Klan terrorized blacks, leading to the steady decline of African-American political representation.'
p10079
aS'In 1900, African-American Congressman George Henry White introduced an anti-lynching bill to the Judiciary Committee.'
p10080
aS'It was defeated by a large majority, led by southern Democrats.'
p10081
aS"Monk is the second-most recorded jazz composer after Duke Ellington, which is particularly remarkable as Ellington composed more than 1,000 pieces, whereas Monk wrote about 70.His compositions and improvisations feature dissonances and angular melodic twists, and are consistent with Monk's unorthodox approach to the piano, which combined a highly percussive attack with abrupt, dramatic use of silences and hesitations.He was renowned for his distinctive style in suits, hats, and sunglasses."
p10082
aS'He was also noted for an idiosyncratic habit observed at times during performances: while the other musicians in the band continued playing, he would stop, stand up from the keyboard, and dance for a few moments before returning to the piano.Monk is one of five jazz musicians to have been featured on the cover of Time, after Louis_Armstrong, Dave_Brubeck, and Duke Ellington, and before Wynton Marsalis. Early life Thelonious Sphere Monk was born two years after his sister Marion on October 10, 1917, in Rocky Mount, North Carolina, the son of Thelonious and Barbara Monk.'
p10083
aS'His badly written birth certificate misspelled his first name as "Thelious" or "Thelius".'
p10084
aS'It also did not list his middle name, taken from his maternal grandfather, Sphere Batts.'
p10085
aS'A brother, Thomas, was born in January 1920.'
p10086
aS'In 1922, the family moved to 243 West 63rd Street, in Manhattan, New_York_City.'
p10087
aS'Monk started playing the piano at the age of six.'
p10088
aS'His father was King Theodemir, a Germanic Amali nobleman, and his mother was Ereleuva.'
p10089
aS'Theodoric grew up as a hostage in Constantinople, receiving a privileged education, and he succeeded his father as leader of the Pannonian Ostrogoths in 473.'
p10090
aS'Settling his people in lower Moesia, Theoderic came into conflict with Thracian Ostrogoths led by Theodoric Strabo, whom he eventually supplanted, uniting the peoples in 484.Emperor Zeno subsequently gave him the title of Patrician and the office of Magister militum (master of the soldiers), and even appointed him as Roman Consul.'
p10091
aS'Seeking further gains, Theoderic frequently ravaged the provinces of the Eastern Roman Empire, eventually threatening Constantinople itself.'
p10092
aS'In 488, Emperor Zeno ordered Theoderic to overthrow the German Foederatus Odoacer, who had likewise been made patrician and even King of Italy, but who had since betrayed Zeno, supporting the rebellious Leontius.'
p10093
aS'After a victorious three-year war, Theoderic killed Odoacer with his own hands, settled his 100,000 to 200,000 people in Italy, and founded an Ostrogothic Kingdom based in Ravenna.'
p10094
aS'While he promoted separation between the Arian Ostrogoths and the Roman population, Theoderic stressed the importance of racial harmony, though intermarriage was outlawed.'
p10095
aS"Dreiser's best known novels include Sister_Carrie (1900) and An_American_Tragedy (1925). Early life Dreiser was born in Terre Haute, Indiana, to Sarah Maria (nee Schanab) and John Paul Dreiser."
p10096
aS'John Dreiser was a German immigrant from Mayen in the Eifel region, and Sarah was from the Mennonite farming community near Dayton, Ohio.'
p10097
aS'Her family disowned her for converting to Roman Catholicism in order to marry John Dreiser.'
p10098
aS'Theodore was the twelfth of thirteen children (the ninth of the ten surviving).'
p10099
aS'Paul Dresser (1857-1906) was one of his older brothers; Paul changed the spelling of his name as he became a popular songwriter.'
p10100
aS'They were reared as Catholics.After graduating from high school in Warsaw, Indiana, Dreiser attended Indiana University in the years 1889-1890 before dropping out. Writing career Within several years, Dreiser was writing as a journalist for the Chicago Globe newspaper and then the St. Louis Globe-Democrat.'
p10101
aS'He wrote several articles on writers such as Nathaniel_Hawthorne, William Dean Howells, Israel Zangwill, John Burroughs, and interviewed public figures such as Andrew Carnegie, Marshall Field, Thomas Edison, and Theodore Thomas.'
p10102
aS'Gericault soon left the classroom, choosing to study at the Louvre, where from 1810 to 1815 he copied paintings by Rubens, Titian, Velazquez and Rembrandt.'
p10103
aS'During this period at the Louvre he discovered a vitality he found lacking in the prevailing school of Neoclassicism.'
p10104
aS"Much of his time was spent in Versailles, where he found the stables of the palace open to him, and where he gained his knowledge of the anatomy and action of horses. Success Gericault's first major work, The Charging Chasseur, exhibited at the Paris Salon of 1812, revealed the influence of the style of Rubens and an interest in the depiction of contemporary subject matter."
p10105
aS'This youthful success, ambitious and monumental, was followed by a change in direction: for the next several years Gericault produced a series of small studies of horses and cavalrymen.'
p10106
aS'He exhibited Wounded Cuirassier at the Salon in 1814, a work more labored and less well received.'
p10107
aS'Gericault in a fit of disappointment entered the army and served for a time in the garrison of Versailles.'
p10108
aS'In the nearly two years that followed the 1814 Salon, he also underwent a self-imposed study of figure construction and composition, all the while evidencing a personal predilection for drama and expressive force.A trip to Florence, Rome, and Naples (1816-17), prompted in part by the desire to flee from a romantic entanglement with his aunt, ignited a fascination with Michelangelo.'
p10109
aS'Roethke is regarded as one of the most accomplished and influential poets of his generation.'
p10110
aS"Roethke's work is characterized by its introspection, rhythm and natural imagery."
p10111
aS'He was awarded the Pulitzer Prize for poetry in 1954 for his book The Waking, and he won the annual National Book Award for Poetry twice, in 1959 for Words for the Wind and posthumously in 1965 for The Far Field.In the November 1968 edition of the Atlantic Monthly, former U.S.'
p10112
aS'Poet Laureate and author James Dickey wrote Roethke was: "...in my opinion the greatest poet this country has yet produced."'
p10113
aS'Roethke was also a highly regarded poetry teacher.'
p10114
aS'He taught at University of Washington for fifteen years.'
p10115
aS'His students from that period won two Pulitzer Prizes for Poetry and two others were nominated for the award.'
p10116
aS'Born a sickly child with debilitating asthma, Roosevelt embraced a strenuous lifestyle and successfully regained his health.'
p10117
aS'He integrated his exuberant personality, vast range of interests, and world-famous achievements into a "cowboy" persona defined by robust masculinity.'
p10118
aS'Home-schooled, he became a lifelong naturalist before attending Harvard College.'
p10119
aS'His first of many books, The Naval War_of_1812 (1882), established his reputation as both a learned historian and a popular writer.'
p10120
aS"He entered politics, becoming the leader of the reform faction of Republicans in New York's state legislature."
p10121
aS'Following the deaths of his wife and mother, he escaped to the wilderness and operated a cattle ranch in the Dakotas.'
p10122
aS'He returned to run unsuccessfully for Mayor of New_York_City in 1886.'
p10123
aS'They are also used widely in heat flux sensors (such as the Moll thermopile and Eppley pyrheliometer) and gas burner safety controls.'
p10124
aS'The output of a thermopile is usually in the range of tens or hundreds of millivolts.'
p10125
aS'As well as increasing the signal level, the device may be used to provide spatial temperature averaging.Thermopiles are also used to generate electrical energy from, for instance, heat from electrical components, solar wind, radioactive materials, or combustion.'
p10126
aS'The process is also an example of the Peltier Effect (electric current transferring heat energy) as the process transfers heat from the hot to the cold junctions. See also Seebeck effect--the physical effect responsible for the generation of voltage in a thermopile.Thermoelectric materials--high-performance materials that can be used to construct a compact thermopile that delivers high power. External links The Museum of Retro Technology: Thermo-Electric GeneratorsTPA81 Thermopile detector Array Technical Specification References '
p10127
aS'The myths surrounding Theseus--his journeys, exploits, and family--have provided material for fiction throughout the ages.Theseus was responsible for the synoikismos ("dwelling together")--the political unification of Attica under Athens, represented emblematically in his journey of labours, subduing ogres and monstrous beasts.'
p10128
aS'Because he was the unifying king, Theseus built and occupied a palace on the fortress of the Acropolis that may have been similar to the palace that was excavated in Mycenae.'
p10129
aS'Pausanias reports that after the synoikismos, Theseus established a cult of Aphrodite Pandemos ("Aphrodite of all the People") and Peitho on the southern slope of the Acropolis.Plutarch\'s vita (a literalistic biography) of Theseus makes use of varying accounts of the death of the Minotaur, Theseus\' escape, and the love of Ariadne for Theseus.'
p10130
aS"Plutarch's sources, not all of whose texts have survived independently, included Pherecydes (mid-fifth century BC), Demon (c. 400 BC), Philochorus, and Cleidemus (both fourth century BC). Birth and early years Aegeus (1282-1234 BC), one of the primordial kings of Athens, found a bride, Aethra who was the daughter of king Pittheus at Troezen, a small city southwest of Athens."
p10131
aS'Still without a male heir, Aegeus asked the oracle at Delphi for advice.'
p10132
aS'Her cryptic words were "Do not loosen the bulging mouth of the wineskin until you have reached the height of Athens, lest you die of grief."'
p10133
aS'Aegeus did not understand the prophecy and was disappointed.'
p10134
aS'It is a staple book in schools throughout Africa and is widely read and studied in English-speaking countries around the world.'
p10135
aS"It was first published in 1958 by William Heinemann Ltd in the UK; in 1962, it was also the first work published in Heinemann's African Writers Series."
p10136
aS'The title of the novel comes from a line in W. B. Yeats\' poem "The Second Coming".The novel follows the life of Okonkwo, an Igbo ("Ibo" in the novel) leader and local wrestling champion in the fictional Nigerian village of Umuofia.'
p10137
aS'The work is split into three parts, the first describing his family and personal history, the customs and society of the Igbo, and the second and third sections introduce the influence of British colonialism and Christian missionaries on the Igbos community.Things_Fall_Apart was followed by a sequel, No_Longer_at_Ease (1960), originally written as the second part of a larger work along with Arrow of God (1964).'
p10138
aS"Achebe states that his two later novels, A Man of the People (1966) and Anthills of the Savannah (1987), while not featuring Okonkwo's descendants, are spiritual successors to the previous novels in chronicling African history. Plot Things_Fall_Apart, a novel set in Pre-colonial Nigeria in the 1890s highlights the fight between colonialism and traditional societies."
p10139
aS'The protagonist Okonkwo is famous in the surrounding villages for being a wrestling champion, defeating a wrestler nicknamed "the cat" (because he never lands on his back).'
p10140
aS'He is strong, hard-working, and strives to show no weakness.'
p10141
aS'The -SH functional group itself is referred to as either a thiol group or a sulfhydryl group.Many thiols have strong odors resembling that of garlic.'
p10142
aS'Thiols are used as odorants to assist in the detection of natural gas (which in pure form is odorless), and the "smell of natural gas" is due to the smell of the thiol used as the odorant.Thiols are often referred to as mercaptans.'
p10143
aS"The term mercaptan /m@r'kaeptaen/ is derived from the Latin mercurium captans (capturing mercury) because the thiolate group bonds very strongly with mercury compounds."
p10144
aS'Thiols react with mercury to form mercaptides. Structure and bonding Thiols and alcohols have similar molecular structure.'
p10145
aS'The major difference is the size of the chalcogenide, C-S bond lengths being around 180 picometers in length and C-O bond lengths being around 143 picometers in length.'
p10146
aS'The C-S-H angles approach 90deg.'
p10147
aS'In the solid or molten liquids, the hydrogen-bonding between individual thiol groups is weak, the main cohesive force being van der Waals interactions between the highly polarizable divalent sulfur centers.Due to the lesser electronegativity difference between sulfur and hydrogen compared to oxygen and hydrogen, an S-H bond is less polar than the hydroxyl group.'
p10148
aS'The war also bankrupted most of the combatant powers.'
p10149
aS"Both mercenaries and soldiers in armies were expected to fund themselves by looting or extorting tribute, which imposed severe hardships on the inhabitants of occupied territories.The Thirty_Years'_War ended with the treaties of Osnabruck and Munster, part of the wider Peace of Westphalia. Origins of the war The Peace of Augsburg (1555), signed by Charles V, Holy Roman Emperor, confirmed the result of the 1526 Diet of Speyer, ending the war between German Lutherans and Catholics, and establishing that:Rulers of the 224 German states could choose the religion (Lutheranism or Catholicism) of their realms according to their consciences, and compel their subjects to follow that faith (the principle of cuius regio, eius religio).Lutherans living in a prince-bishopric (a state ruled by a Catholic bishop) could continue to practice their faith.Lutherans could keep the territory they had taken from the Catholic Church since the Peace of Passau in 1552.Those prince-bishops who had converted to Lutheranism were required to give up their territories (the principle called reservatum ecclesiasticum).Although the Peace of Augsburg created a temporary end to hostilities, it did not resolve the underlying religious conflict, which was made yet more complex by the spread of Calvinism throughout Germany in the years that followed."
p10150
aS"This added a third major faith to the region, but its position was not recognized in any way by the Augsburg terms, to which only Catholicism and Lutheranism were parties.The rulers of the nations neighboring the Holy Roman Empire also contributed to the outbreak of the Thirty_Years'_War:Spain was interested in the German states because it held the territories of the Spanish Netherlands in the western part of the Empire and states within Italy that were connected by land through the Spanish Road."
p10151
aS'The Dutch revolted against Spanish domination during the 1560s, leading to a protracted war of independence that led to a truce only in 1609.France was nearly surrounded by territory controlled by the two Habsburg states - Spain and the Holy Roman Empire, and feeling threatened, was eager to exert its power against the weaker German states.'
p10152
aS"This dynastic concern overtook religious ones and led to Catholic France's participation on the otherwise Protestant side of the war.Sweden and Denmark were interested in gaining control over northern German states bordering the Baltic Sea.The Holy Roman Empire was a fragmented collection of largely independent states."
p10153
aS'The position of the Holy Roman Emperor was mainly titular, but the emperors, from the House of Habsburg, also directly ruled a large portion of Imperial territory (the Archduchy of Austria and the Kingdom of Bohemia) as well as the Kingdom of Hungary.'
p10154
aS'The Austrian domain was thus a major European power in its own right, ruling over some eight million subjects.'
p10155
aS'He painted several hundred portraits, usually of friends, family members, or prominent people in the arts, sciences, medicine, and clergy.'
p10156
aS'Taken en masse, the portraits offer an overview of the intellectual life of Philadelphia in the late 19th and early 20th centuries; individually, they are incisive depictions of thinking persons.In addition, Eakins produced a number of large paintings which brought the portrait out of the drawing room and into the offices, streets, parks, rivers, arenas, and surgical amphitheaters of his city.'
p10157
aS'These active outdoor venues allowed him to paint the subject which most inspired him: the nude or lightly clad figure in motion.'
p10158
aS'In the process he could model the forms of the body in full sunlight, and create images of deep space utilizing his studies in perspective.'
p10159
aS"Eakins also took a keen interest in the new technologies of motion photography, a field in which he is now seen as an innovator.No less important in Eakins' life was his work as a teacher."
p10160
aS'As an instructor he was a highly influential presence in American art.'
p10161
aS'The difficulties which beset him as an artist seeking to paint the portrait and figure realistically were paralleled and even amplified in his career as an educator, where behavioral and sexual scandals truncated his success and damaged his reputation.Eakins was a controversial figure whose work received little by way of official recognition during his lifetime.'
p10162
aS'His fiction and nonfiction writings encompass a vast array of subject matter, genres and themes, including (but not limited to) the fields of history, music, science, and mathematics.'
p10163
aS"For Gravity's Rainbow Pynchon won the 1974 U.S. National Book Award for Fiction.Hailing from Long Island, Pynchon served two years in the United_States Navy and earned an English degree from Cornell University."
p10164
aS"After publishing several short stories in the late 1950s and early 1960s, he began composing the novels for which he is best known: V. (1963), The_Crying_of_Lot_49 (1966), Gravity's Rainbow (1973), and Mason & Dixon (1997)."
p10165
aS"Pynchon is also notoriously reclusive; very few photographs of him have ever been published, and rumors about his location and identity have circulated since the 1960s.Pynchon's most recent novel, Bleeding Edge, was published September 17, 2013. Biography Thomas_Pynchon was born in 1937 in Glen Cove, Long Island, New York, one of three children of Thomas Ruggles Pynchon, Sr. (1907-1995) and Katherine Frances Bennett (1909-1996)."
p10166
aS'His earliest American ancestor, William Pynchon, emigrated to the Massachusetts Bay Colony with the Winthrop Fleet in 1630, then became the founder of Springfield, Massachusetts in 1636, and thereafter a long line of Pynchon descendants found wealth and repute on American soil.'
p10167
aS'Pynchon\'s family background and aspects of his ancestry have provided source material for his fictions, particularly in the Slothrop family histories related in the short story "The Secret Integration" (1964) and Gravity\'s Rainbow (1973).'
p10168
aS'Pynchon was raised Catholic. Childhood and education Pynchon attended Oyster Bay High School in Oyster Bay, where he was awarded "student of the year" and contributed short fictional pieces to his school newspaper.'
p10169
aS'Malthus himself used only his middle name Robert.His An Essay on the Principle of Population observed that sooner or later population will be checked by famine and disease, leading to what is known as a Malthusian catastrophe.'
p10170
aS'He wrote in opposition to the popular view in 18th-century Europe that saw society as improving and in principle as perfectible.'
p10171
aS'He thought that the dangers of population growth precluded progress towards a utopian society: "The power of population is indefinitely greater than the power in the earth to produce subsistence for man".'
p10172
aS'As an Anglican cleric, Malthus saw this situation as divinely imposed to teach virtuous behaviour.'
p10173
aS'Malthus wrote:That the increase of population is necessarily limited by the means of subsistence,That population does invariably increase when the means of subsistence increase, and,That the superior power of population is repressed, and the actual population kept equal to the means of subsistence, by misery and vice.Malthus placed the longer-term stability of the economy above short-term expediency.'
p10174
aS'He criticized the Poor Laws, and (alone among important contemporary economists) supported the Corn Laws, which introduced a system of taxes on British imports of wheat.'
p10175
aS'His views became influential, and controversial, across economic, political, social and scientific thought.'
p10176
aS'All of the Wilder children spent part of their childhood in China.'
p10177
aS'His older brother, Amos Niven Wilder, was Hollis Professor of Divinity at the Harvard Divinity School, a noted poet, and foundational to the development of the field of theopoetics.'
p10178
aS'Amos was also a nationally ranked tennis player who competed at the Wimbledon tennis championships in 1922 and 1924.'
p10179
aS'His sister, Isabel, was an accomplished writer.'
p10180
aS'Both of his other sisters, Charlotte Wilder, a poet, and Janet Wilder Dakin, a zoologist, attended Mount Holyoke College. Education Wilder began writing plays while at The Thacher School in Ojai, California, where he did not fit in and was teased by classmates as overly intellectual.'
p10181
aS'According to a classmate, "We left him alone, just left him alone.'
p10182
aS'And he would retire at the library, his hideaway, learning to distance himself from humiliation and indifference."'
p10183
aS'It is a distinction between what Veblen called "institutions" and "technology".'
p10184
aS'Besides his technical work, Veblen was a popular and witty critic of capitalism, as illustrated by his best-known book The Theory of the Leisure Class (1899).Veblen is famous in the history of economic thought for combining a Darwinian evolutionary perspective with his new institutionalist approach to economic analysis.'
p10185
aS'He combined sociology with economics in his masterpiece, The Theory of the Leisure Class (1899), where he argued that there was a fundamental split in society between those who make their way via exploitation and those who make their way via industry.'
p10186
aS'In hunter-gatherer societies, this was the difference between the hunter and the gatherer in the tribe, but in feudalism, it became the difference between the landed gentry and the indentured servant.'
p10187
aS'In society\'s progressively modernized forms, those with the power to exploit are known as the "leisure class", defined by a commitment to demonstrations of idleness and a lack of productive economic activity.'
p10188
aS'Veblen maintains that as societies mature, conspicuous leisure gives way to "conspicuous consumption".'
p10189
aS'Both are performed to demonstrate wealth or mark social status.While Veblen was sympathetic to state ownership of industry, he did not support labor movements of the time.'
p10190
aS"His feminine counterpart was Seshat, and his wife was Ma'at.Thoth's chief temple was located in the city of Khmun, later called Hermopolis Magna during the Greco-Roman era (in reference to him through the Greeks' interpretation that he was the same as their god Hermes) and Shmounein in the Coptic rendering."
p10191
aS'In that city, he led the Ogdoad pantheon of eight principal deities.'
p10192
aS"He also had numerous shrines within the cities of Abydos, Hesert, Urit, Per-Ab, Rekhui, Ta-ur, Sep, Hat, Pselket, Talmsis, Antcha-Mutet, Bah, Amen-heri-ab, and Ta-kens.Thoth played many vital and prominent roles in Egyptian mythology, such as maintaining the universe, and being one of the two deities (the other being Ma'at) who stood on either side of Ra's boat."
p10193
aS'In the later history of ancient Egypt, Thoth became heavily associated with the arbitration of godly disputes, the arts of magic, the system of writing, the development of science, and the judgment of the dead. NameEdit  EtymologyEdit The Egyptian of dhwty is not fully known, but may be reconstructed as *dihauti, based on the Ancient Greek borrowing Thoth (Thoth [tko:tk]) or Theut and the fact that it evolved into Sahidic Coptic variously as Thoout, Thoth, Thoot, Thaut, as well as Bohairic Coptic Thoout.'
p10194
aS'The final -y may even have been pronounced as a consonant, not a vowel.'
p10195
aS'However, many write "Djehuty", inserting the letter \'e\' automatically between consonants in Egyptian words, and writing \'w\' as \'u\', as a convention of convenience for English speakers, not the transliteration employed by Egyptologists.According to Theodor Hopfner, Thoth\'s Egyptian name written as dhwty originated from dhw, claimed to be the oldest known name for the ibis although normally written as hbj.'
p10196
aS'The addition of -ty denotes that he possessed the attributes of the ibis.'
p10197
aS'This is formed by angle of the thyroid cartilage that surrounds the larynx.'
p10198
aS"The thyroid gland controls how quickly the body uses energy, makes proteins, and controls the body's sensitivity to other hormones."
p10199
aS'It participates in these processes by producing thyroid hormones, the principal ones being triiodothyronine (T3) and thyroxine (sometimes referred to as tetraiodothyronine (T4)).'
p10200
aS'These hormones regulate the growth and rate of function of many other systems in the body.'
p10201
aS'T3 and T4 are synthesized from iodine and tyrosine.'
p10202
aS'The thyroid also produces calcitonin, which plays a role in calcium homeostasis.Hormonal output from the thyroid is regulated by thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH) produced by the anterior pituitary, which itself is regulated by thyrotropin-releasing hormone (TRH) produced by the hypothalamus. Structure The thyroid gland is a butterfly-shaped organ and is composed of two cone-like lobes or wings, lobus dexter (right lobe) and lobus sinister (left lobe), connected via the isthmus.'
p10203
aS'Each lobe is about 5 cm long, 3 cm wide and 2 cm thick.'
p10204
aS"Tierra_del_Fuego is divided between Chile and Argentina, with the latter controlling the eastern half of the main island and the former the western half plus the islands south of Beagle Channel.The first Europeans came upon it in Ferdinand Magellan's expedition of 1520."
p10205
aS'No Europeans settled there until the second half of the 19th century, at the height of the sheep farming and gold rush booms.'
p10206
aS'Today, petroleum extraction dominates economic activity in the north of Tierra_del_Fuego, while tourism, manufacturing, and Antarctic logistics are important in the south. HistoryEdit  Prehistory and European explorationEdit The earliest human settlement occurred around 8,000 B.C.'
p10207
aS'The Yaghan were some of the earliest known humans to settle in Tierra_del_Fuego.'
p10208
aS'Archeological sites with characteristics of their culture have been found at locations such as Navarino Island.The name Tierra_del_Fuego derives from the Portuguese explorer Ferdinand Magellan; sailing for the Spanish Crown, in 1520 he was the first European to visit these lands.'
p10209
aS'He believed he was seeing the many fires (fuego in Spanish) of the Yaghan, which were visible from the sea, and that the "Indians" were waiting in the forests to ambush his armada.'
p10210
aS'Originally called the "Land of Smoke", the name was later changed to "Land of Fire".In 1525 Francisco de Hoces was the first to speculate that Tierra_del_Fuego was one or more islands rather than part of what was then called Terra Australis.'
p10211
aS'The central character is a well beloved citizen of Athens who through tremendous generosity spends his entire fortunes on corrupt hangers-on only interested in getting the next payout.The earliest known production of the play was in 1674, when Thomas Shadwell wrote an adaptation under the title The History of Timon_of_Athens, The Man-hater.'
p10212
aS'Multiple other adaptations followed over the next century, by writers such as Thomas Hull, James Love and Richard Cumberland.'
p10213
aS'The straight Shakespearean text was at Smock Alley in Dublin in 1761, but adaptations continued to dominate the stage until well into the 20th century.Timon_of_Athens was originally grouped with the tragedies, but some scholars name it one of the problem plays. Characters  Synopsis In the beginning, Timon, later a misanthrope, is a wealthy and generous Athenian gentleman.'
p10214
aS'He hosts a large banquet, attended by nearly all the main characters.'
p10215
aS'Timon gives away money wastefully, and everyone wants to please him to get more, except for Apemantus, a churlish philosopher whose cynicism Timon cannot yet appreciate.'
p10216
aS'He accepts art from Poet and Painter, and a jewel from the Jeweller, but by the end of Act 1, he has given that away to another friend.'
p10217
aS"Timon's servant, Lucilius, has been wooing the daughter of an old Athenian."
p10218
aS'From these conquests he founded the Timurid Empire, although it fragmented shortly after his death.Timur is considered the last of the great nomadic conquerors of the Eurasian Steppe, and his empire set the stage for the rise of the more structured and lasting Gunpowder Empires in the 1500s and 1600s.Timur envisioned the restoration of the Mongol Empire of Genghis_Khan.'
p10219
aS'"In his formal correspondence Temur continued throughout his life as the restorer of Chinggisid rights.'
p10220
aS'He even justified his Iranian, Mamluk and Ottoman campaigns as a re-imposition of legitimate Mongol control over lands taken by usurpers[.]"'
p10221
aS'As a means of legitimating his conquests, Timur relied on Islamic symbols and language, referring to himself as the "Sword of Islam" and patronizing educational and religious institutions.'
p10222
aS'He converted nearly all the Borjigin leaders to Islam during his lifetime.'
p10223
aS'"Temur, a non-Chinggisid, tried to build a double legitimacy based on his role as both guardian and restorer of the Mongol Empire."'
p10224
aS'Timur also decisively defeated the Christian Knights Hospitaller at Smyrna, styling himself a ghazi.'
p10225
aS"Tiresias participated fully in seven generations at Thebes, beginning as advisor to Cadmus himself. Overview Eighteen allusions to mythic Tiresias, noted by Luc Brisson, fall into three groups: one, in two episodes, recounts Tiresias' sex-change and his encounter with Zeus and Hera; a second group recounts his blinding by Athena; a third, all but lost, seems to have recounted the misadventures of Tiresias.How Tiresias obtained his information varied: sometimes, like the oracles, he would receive visions; other times he would listen for the songs of birds, or ask for a description of visions and pictures appearing within the smoke of burnt offerings, and so interpret them.On Mount Cyllene in the Peloponnese, as Tiresias came upon a pair of copulating snakes, he hit the pair a smart blow with his stick."
p10226
aS'Hera was not pleased, and she punished Tiresias by transforming him into a woman.'
p10227
aS'As a woman, Tiresias became a priestess of Hera, married and had children, including Manto, who also possessed the gift of prophecy.'
p10228
aS'According to some versions of the tale, Lady Tiresias was a prostitute of great renown.'
p10229
aS'After seven years as a woman, Tiresias again found mating snakes; depending on the myth, either she made sure to leave the snakes alone this time, or, according to Hyginus, trampled on them.'
p10230
aS'As a result, Tiresias was released from his sentence and permitted to regain his masculinity.'
p10231
aS"This ancient story is recorded in lost lines of Hesiod.In Hellenistic and Roman times Tiresias' sex-change was embroidered upon and expanded into seven episodes, with appropriate amours in each, probably written by the Alexandrian Ptolemaeus Chennus, but attributed by Eustathius to Sostratus of Phanagoria's lost elegiac Tiresias."
p10232
aS'According to Jain Agamas, that which helps one to cross samsara is a tirtha ("ford") and the rare individual who refounds Jainism is a tirthankara ("ford-maker").'
p10233
aS'Tirthankara also organise sangha, a fourfold order of male and female monastics, sravaka (male followers) and sravaika (female followers).Twenty-four tirthankaras grace each half of the cosmic time cycle in Jain cosmology.'
p10234
aS"The 24th tirthankara of the current cycle was Mahavira, who was a contemporary of Gautama Buddha. Overview The tirthankaras' teachings form the basis for the Jain canons."
p10235
aS'The inner knowledge of tirthankara is believed to be perfect and identical in every respect and their teachings do not contradict one another.'
p10236
aS'However, the degree of elaboration varies according to the spiritual advancement and purity of the society during their period of leadership.'
p10237
aS'The higher the spiritual advancement and purity of mind of the society, the lower the elaboration required.While tirthankaras are documented and revered by Jains, their grace is said to be available to all living beings, regardless of religious orientation.Tirthankaras are Arihants who after attaining Kevala Jnana (pure infinite knowledge) preach the true dharma.'
p10238
aS'An Arihant is also called Jina (victor), that is one who has conquered inner enemies such as anger, attachment, pride and greed.'
p10239
aS"Tisha_B'Av falls in July or August in the Western calendar.The observance of the day includes five prohibitions, most notable of which is a 25-hour fast."
p10240
aS'The Book of Lamentations, which mourns the destruction of Jerusalem is read in the synagogue, followed by the recitation of kinnot, liturgical dirges that lament the loss of the Temple and Jerusalem.'
p10241
aS"As the day has become associated with remembrance of other major calamities which have befallen the Jewish people, some kinnot also recall events such as the murder of the Ten Martyrs, massacres in numerous medieval Jewish communities during the Crusades and the Holocaust. History  Biblical origins according to Judaism According to Rabbinic tradition (as seen in the Mishnah Taanit 4:6), the sin of the Ten Spies produced the annual fast day of Tisha_B'Av."
p10242
aS'When the Israelites accepted the false report, they wept over the false belief that God was setting them up for defeat.'
p10243
aS"The night that the people cried was the ninth of Av, which became a day of weeping and misfortune for all time. Destruction of the Temple The fast commemorates the destruction of the First and Second Temples, which both occurred on Av 9, about 655 years apart.In connection with the fall of Jerusalem, three other fast-days were established at the same time as the Ninth Day of Av: these were the Tenth of Tevet, when the siege began; the Seventeenth of Tammuz, when the first breach was made in the wall; and the Third of Tishrei, known as the Fast of Gedaliah, the day when Gedaliah was assassinated.The three weeks leading up to Tisha_B'Av are known as The Three Weeks, while the days leading up to Tisha_B'Av are known as The Nine Days. Five calamities According to the Mishnah (Taanit 4:6), five specific events occurred on the ninth of Av that warrant fasting:The twelve spies sent by Moses to observe the land of Canaan returned from their mission."
p10244
aS'Only two of the spies, Joshua and Caleb, brought a positive report, while the others spoke disparagingly about the land.'
p10245
aS'The majority report caused the Children of Israel to cry, panic and despair of ever entering the "Promised Land".'
p10246
aS"Frequently described as a planet-like moon, Titan's diameter is 50% larger than Earth's natural satellite, the Moon, and it is 80% more massive."
p10247
aS"It is the second-largest moon in the Solar System, after Jupiter's moon Ganymede, and is larger by volume than the smallest planet, Mercury, although only 40% as massive."
p10248
aS'Discovered in 1655 by the Dutch astronomer Christiaan Huygens, Titan was the first known moon of Saturn, and the fifth known satellite of another planet.Titan is primarily composed of water ice and rocky material.'
p10249
aS"Much as with Venus before the Space Age, the dense opaque atmosphere prevented understanding of Titan's surface until new information accumulated when the Cassini-Huygens mission arrived in 2004, including the discovery of liquid hydrocarbon lakes in Titan's polar regions."
p10250
aS'The geologically young surface is generally smooth, with few impact craters, although mountains and several possible cryovolcanoes have been found.The atmosphere of Titan is largely nitrogen; minor components lead to the formation of methane-ethane clouds and nitrogen-rich organic smog.'
p10251
aS'The climate--including wind and rain--creates surface features similar to those of Earth, such as dunes, rivers, lakes, seas (probably of liquid methane-ethane), and deltas, and is dominated by seasonal weather patterns as on Earth.'
p10252
aS"With its liquids (both surface and subsurface) and robust nitrogen atmosphere, Titan's methane cycle is analogous to Earth's water cycle, although at a much lower temperature. History Titan was discovered on March 25, 1655 by the Dutch astronomer Christiaan Huygens."
p10253
aS'During his lifetime he was often called da Cadore, taken from the place of his birth.Recognized by his contemporaries as "The Sun Amidst Small Stars" (recalling the famous final line of Dante\'s Paradiso), Titian was one of the most versatile of Italian painters, equally adept with portraits, landscape backgrounds, and mythological and religious subjects.'
p10254
aS"His painting methods, particularly in the application and use of color, would exercise a profound influence not only on painters of the Italian Renaissance, but on future generations of Western art.During the course of his long life, Titian's artistic manner changed drastically but he retained a lifelong interest in color."
p10255
aS'Although his mature works may not contain the vivid, luminous tints of his early pieces, their loose brushwork and subtlety of tone are without precedent in the history of Western painting.'
p10256
aS"He was noted for his mastery of colour. Biography  Early years The exact date of Titian's birth is uncertain."
p10257
aS'When he was an old man he claimed in a letter to Philip II, King of Spain, to have been born in 1474, but this seems most unlikely.'
p10258
aS'Other writers contemporary to his old age give figures that would equate to birthdates between 1473 to after 1482.'
p10259
aS"Most modern scholars believe a date nearer 1490 is more likely; the Metropolitan Museum of Art's timeline supports c.1488, as does the Getty Research Institute.He was the son of Gregorio Vecelli and his wife Lucia."
p10260
aS'A reagent, called the titrant or titrator is prepared as a standard solution.'
p10261
aS'A known concentration and volume of titrant reacts with a solution of analyte or titrand to determine concentration.'
p10262
aS'The volume of titrant reacted is called titration volume. History and etymology The word "titration" comes from the Latin word titulus, meaning inscription or title.'
p10263
aS'The French word titre, also from this origin, means rank.Volumetric analysis originated in late 18th-century France.'
p10264
aS'Francois-Antoine-Henri Descroizilles (fr) developed the first burette (which was similar to a graduated cylinder) in 1791.'
p10265
aS'Joseph Louis Gay-Lussac developed an improved version of the burette that included a side arm, and coined the terms "pipette" and "burette" in an 1824 paper on the standardization of indigo solutions.'
p10266
aS'A major breakthrough in the methodology and popularization of volumetric analysis was due to Karl Friedrich Mohr, who redesigned the burette by placing a clamp and a tip at the bottom, and wrote the first textbook on the topic, Lehrbuch der chemisch-analytischen Titrirmethode (Textbook of analytical-chemical titration methods), published in 1855. Procedure A typical titration begins with a beaker or Erlenmeyer flask containing a very precise volume of the analyte and a small amount of indicator (such as phenolphthalein) placed underneath a calibrated burette or chemistry pipetting syringe containing the titrant.'
p10267
aS'Tlaloc is also associated with caves, springs, and mountains, most specifically the sacred mountain in which he was believed to reside.'
p10268
aS'His animal forms include herons and other wet or water dwelling creatures such as amphibians, snails, and possibly sea creatures, particularly ones that inhabit seashells.'
p10269
aS'A specific plant also bears a relationship to Tlaloc.'
p10270
aS'Known to the Aztecs as Yauhtli, Tagetes lucida, was burned as a ritual incense in native religious ceremonies.The cult of Tlaloc is one of the oldest and most universal in ancient Mexico.'
p10271
aS'Although the name Tlaloc is specifically Aztec, worship of a storm god like Tlaloc, almost always associated with mountaintop shrines and with life-giving rain, is as at least as old as Teotihuacan and likely was adopted from the Maya god Chaac or vice versa, and/or ultimately perhaps from an earlier Olmec precursor.'
p10272
aS'An underground Tlaloc shrine has been found at Teotihuacan.In Aztec cosmology, the four corners of the universe are marked by "the four Tlalocs" (Classical Nahuatl: Tlaloque [tla:\'lo:ke?])'
p10273
aS'which both hold up the sky and function as the frame for the passing of time.'
p10274
aS'At that time, Marvell was serving as a tutor to the daughter of the retired commander of the New Model Army, Sir Thomas Fairfax. Synopsis The speaker of the poem addresses a woman who has been slow to respond to his sexual advances.'
p10275
aS'In the first stanza he describes how he would love her if he were to be unencumbered by the constraints of a normal lifespan.'
p10276
aS'He could spend centuries admiring each part of her body and her resistance to his advances (i.e., coyness) would not discourage him.'
p10277
aS'In the second stanza, he laments how short human life is.'
p10278
aS'Once life is over, the speaker contends, the opportunity to enjoy one another is gone, as no one embraces in death.'
p10279
aS'In the last stanza, the speaker urges the woman to requite his efforts, and argues that in loving one another with passion they will both make the most of the brief time they have to live. Structure The poem is written in iambic tetrameter and rhymes in couplets.'
p10280
aS'The first verse stanza ("Had we...") is ten couplets long, the second ("But...") six, and the third ("Now therefore...") seven.'
p10281
aS"The plot and characters are loosely based on the author's observations of her family and neighbors, as well as on an event that occurred near her hometown in 1936, when she was 10 years old.The novel is renowned for its warmth and humor, despite dealing with the serious issues of rape and racial inequality."
p10282
aS"The narrator's father, Atticus Finch, has served as a moral hero for many readers and as a model of integrity for lawyers."
p10283
aS'One critic explains the novel\'s impact by writing, "In the twentieth century, To_Kill_a_Mockingbird is probably the most widely read book dealing with race in America, and its protagonist, Atticus Finch, the most enduring fictional image of racial heroism.'
p10284
aS'"As a Southern Gothic novel and a Bildungsroman, the primary themes of To_Kill_a_Mockingbird involve racial injustice and the destruction of innocence.'
p10285
aS'Scholars have noted that Lee also addresses issues of class, courage, compassion, and gender roles in the American Deep South.'
p10286
aS'The book is widely taught in schools in the United_States with lessons that emphasize tolerance and decry prejudice.'
p10287
aS'Despite its themes, To_Kill_a_Mockingbird has been subject to campaigns for removal from public classrooms, often challenged for its use of racial epithets.Reaction to the novel varied widely upon publication.'
p10288
aS'His given name is sometimes spelled Iyeyasu, according to the historical pronunciation of he.'
p10289
aS'Ieyasu was posthumously enshrined at Nikko Tosho-gu with the name Tosho Daigongen (Dong Zhao Da Quan Xian ). Early life (1542-1556) Tokugawa_Ieyasu was born in Okazaki Castle in Mikawa on the 26th day of the twelfth month of the eleventh year of Tenbun, according to the Japanese calendar.'
p10290
aS'Originally named Matsudaira Takechiyo (Song Ping  Zhu Qian Dai ), he was the son of Matsudaira Hirotada (Song Ping  Guang Zhong ), the daimyo of Mikawa of the Matsudaira clan, and Odai-no-kata (Yu Da noFang , Lady Odai), the daughter of a neighboring samurai lord, Mizuno Tadamasa (Shui Ye  Zhong Zheng ).'
p10291
aS'His mother and father were step-siblings.'
p10292
aS'They were just 17 and 15 years old, respectively, when Ieyasu was born.'
p10293
aS'Two years later, Odai-no-kata was sent back to her family and the couple never lived together again.'
p10294
aS'As both husband and wife remarried and both went on to have further children, Ieyasu in the end had 11 half-brothers and sisters.The Matsudaira family was split in 1550: one side wanted to be vassals of the Imagawa clan, while the other side preferred the Oda clan.'
p10295
aS'The Tokugawa_shogunate ruled from Edo Castle and the years of the shogunate became known as the Edo period.'
p10296
aS'This time is also called the Tokugawa period or pre-modern (Kinsei (Jin Shi )). History Following the Sengoku Period of "warring states", the central government had been largely reestablished by Oda Nobunaga during the Azuchi-Momoyama period.'
p10297
aS'After the Battle of Sekigahara in 1600, central authority fell to Tokugawa_Ieyasu.Society in the Tokugawa period, unlike the shogunates before it, was supposedly based on the strict class hierarchy originally established by Toyotomi Hideyoshi.'
p10298
aS'The daimyo, or lords, were at the top, followed by the warrior-caste of samurai, with the farmers, artisans, and traders ranking below.'
p10299
aS'In some parts of the country, particularly smaller regions, daimyo and samurai were more or less identical, since daimyo might be trained as samurai, and samurai might act as local rulers.'
p10300
aS'Otherwise, the largely inflexible nature of this social stratification system unleashed disruptive forces over time.'
p10301
aS'Taxes on the peasantry were set at fixed amounts which did not account for inflation or other changes in monetary value.'
p10302
aS"While all three uncompleted works were posthumously published, only Tom_Sawyer's Conspiracy has a complete plot, as Twain abandoned the other two works after finishing only a few chapters.The fictional character's name may have been derived from a jolly and flamboyant fireman named Tom_Sawyer whom Twain was acquainted with in San_Francisco, California, while Twain was employed as a reporter at the San_Francisco Call."
p10303
aS'Twain used to listen to Sawyer tell stories of his youth, "Sam, he would listen to these pranks of mine with great interest and he\'d occasionally take \'em down in his notebook.'
p10304
aS"One day he says to me: 'I am going to put you between the covers of a book some of these days, Tom.'"
p10305
aS'\'Go ahead, Sam,\' I said, \'but don\'t disgrace my name.\'"'
p10306
aS'Twain himself said the character sprang from three people, later identified as: John B. Briggs (who died in 1907), William Bowen (who died in 1893) and Twain; however Twain later changed his story saying Sawyer was fully formed solely from his imagination, but as Robert Graysmith says, "The great appropriator liked to pretend his characters sprang fully grown from his fertile mind.'
p10307
aS'" Character description Tom_Sawyer\'s best friends include Joe Harper and Huckleberry Finn.'
p10308
aS"In The Adventures of Tom_Sawyer, Tom's infatuation with classmate Becky Thatcher is apparent as he tries to intrigue her with his strength, boldness, and handsome looks."
p10309
aS'He co-wrote the screenplays for Brazil, The Russia House, and Shakespeare in Love, and has received one Academy Award and four Tony Awards.'
p10310
aS'Themes of human rights, censorship and political freedom pervade his work along with exploration of linguistics and philosophy.'
p10311
aS'Stoppard has been a key playwright of the National Theatre and is one of the most internationally performed dramatists of his generation.Born in Czechoslovakia, Stoppard left as a child refugee, fleeing imminent Nazi occupation.'
p10312
aS'He settled with his family in Britain after the war, in 1946, having spent the three years prior (1943-46) in a boarding school in Darjeeling in the Indian Himalayas.'
p10313
aS'After being educated at schools in Nottingham and Yorkshire, Stoppard became a journalist, a drama critic and then, in 1960, a playwright.'
p10314
aS'He has been married three times, to Josie Ingle (m. 1965), then Miriam Stoppard (m. 1972), and Sabrina Guinness (m. 2014). Life and career  Early years Stoppard was born Tomas Straussler, in Zlin, a "Shoe Town", in the Moravia region of Czechoslovakia.'
p10315
aS'He was the son of Martha Beckova and Eugen Straussler, a doctor with the Bata shoe company.'
p10316
aS'Among her best known novels are The_Bluest_Eye, Sula, Song of Solomon and Beloved.'
p10317
aS'She was also commissioned to write the libretto for a new opera, Margaret Garner, first performed in 2005.'
p10318
aS'She won the Pulitzer Prize and the American Book Award in 1988 for Beloved and the Nobel Prize in 1993.'
p10319
aS'On May 29, 2012, she received the Presidential Medal of Freedom.'
p10320
aS'Morrison serves as Professor Emeritus at Princeton University. Early life and career Toni_Morrison was born in Lorain, Ohio, to Ramah (nee Willis) and George Wofford.'
p10321
aS'She is the second of four children in a working-class family.'
p10322
aS'Her parents moved to Ohio to escape southern racism and instilled a sense of heritage through telling traditional African American folktales.'
p10323
aS'Until the beginning of the 20th century, Tasso remained one of the most widely read poets in Europe. Biography  Early life Born in Sorrento, Torquato was the son of Bernardo Tasso, a nobleman of Bergamo and an epic and lyric poet of considerable fame in his day, and his wife Porzia de Rossi, a noblewoman from Naples.'
p10324
aS'His father had for many years been secretary in the service of Ferrante Sanseverino, prince of Salerno, and his mother was closely connected with the most illustrious Neapolitan families.'
p10325
aS"When the prince of Salerno came into collision with the Spanish government of Naples, being subsequently outlawed and deprived of his hereditary fiefs, Tasso's father shared in this his patron's fate."
p10326
aS'He was proclaimed a rebel to the state, together with his son Torquato, and his patrimony was sequestered.'
p10327
aS"These things happened during the boy's childhood."
p10328
aS'In 1552 Torquato was living with his mother and his only sister Cornelia at Naples, pursuing his education under the Jesuits, who had recently opened a school there.'
p10329
aS'The precocity of intellect and the religious fervour of the boy attracted general admiration.'
p10330
aS'A degenerate case is when the axis is a diameter of the circle, which simply generates a 2-sphere.'
p10331
aS'The ring torus bounds a solid known as a solid torus or, alternatively, a ring toroid.'
p10332
aS'The adjective toroidal can be applied to tori, toroids or, more generally, any ring shape as in toroidal inductors and transformers.Real-world examples of (approximately) toroidal objects include inner tubes, swim rings, and magnetic confinement fusion devicesA torus should not be confused with a solid torus, which is formed by rotating a disk, rather than a circle, around an axis.'
p10333
aS'It is the torus plus the volume inside the torus.'
p10334
aS'Real-world approximations include doughnuts, vadai or vada, many lifebuoys, and O-rings.In topology, a ring torus is homeomorphic to the Cartesian product of two circles: S1 x S1, and the latter is taken to be the definition in that context.'
p10335
aS'It is a compact 2-manifold of genus 1.'
p10336
aS'The ring torus is one way to embed this space into three-dimensional Euclidean space, but another way to do this is the Cartesian product of the embedding of S1 in the plane.'
p10337
aS"The work, based on Victorien Sardou's 1887 French-language dramatic play, La Tosca, is a melodramatic piece set in Rome in June 1800, with the Kingdom of Naples's control of Rome threatened by Napoleon's invasion of Italy."
p10338
aS"It contains depictions of torture, murder and suicide, as well as some of Puccini's best-known lyrical arias.Puccini saw Sardou's play when it was touring Italy in 1889 and, after some vacillation, obtained the rights to turn the work into an opera in 1895."
p10339
aS'Turning the wordy French play into a succinct Italian opera took four years, during which the composer repeatedly argued with his librettists and publisher.'
p10340
aS'Tosca premiered at a time of unrest in Rome, and its first performance was delayed for a day for fear of disturbances.'
p10341
aS'Despite indifferent reviews from the critics, the opera was an immediate success with the public.Musically, Tosca is structured as a through-composed work, with arias, recitative, choruses and other elements musically woven into a seamless whole.'
p10342
aS'Puccini used Wagnerian leitmotifs (short musical statements) to identify characters, objects and ideas.'
p10343
aS'While critics have frequently dismissed the opera as a facile melodrama with confusions of plot--musicologist Joseph Kerman famously called it a "shabby little shocker"--the power of its score and the inventiveness of its orchestration have been widely acknowledged.'
p10344
aS"G. E. Moore originally suggested the work's Latin title as homage to the Tractatus_Theologico-Politicus by Baruch Spinoza.Wittgenstein wrote the notes for the Tractatus while he was a soldier during World_War_I and completed it when a prisoner of war at Como and later Cassino in August 1918."
p10345
aS'It was first published in German in 1921 as Logisch-Philosophische Abhandlung.'
p10346
aS'The Tractatus was influential chiefly amongst the logical positivists of the Vienna Circle, such as Rudolf Carnap and Friedrich Waismann.'
p10347
aS'Bertrand Russell\'s article "The Philosophy of Logical Atomism" is presented as a working out of ideas that he had learned from Wittgenstein.The Tractatus employs a notoriously austere and succinct literary style.'
p10348
aS'The work contains almost no arguments as such, but rather consists of declarative statements that are meant to be self-evident.'
p10349
aS"The statements are hierarchically numbered, with seven basic propositions at the primary level (numbered 1-7), with each sub-level being a comment on or elaboration of the statement at the next higher level (e.g., 1, 1.1, 1.11, 1.12).Wittgenstein's later works, notably the posthumously published Philosophical Investigations, criticised many of the ideas in the Tractatus. Main theses There are seven main propositions in the text."
p10350
aS'These are:The world is everything that is the case.What is the case (a fact) is the existence of states of affairs.A logical picture of facts is a thought.A thought is a proposition with a sense.A proposition is a truth-function of elementary propositions.'
p10351
aS'In order to protect the author and publisher from political retribution, the title page identified the city of publication as Hamburg and the publisher as Henricus Kunraht.'
p10352
aS'It was written in New Latin rather than the vernacular Dutch in an attempt to avoid censorship by the secular Dutch authorities. Philosophical influences The two most significant philosophical influences on the Political-Theological Treatise were Moses Maimonides and Thomas Hobbes.'
p10353
aS"While the view of each thinker runs throughout the text, Maimonides heavily influenced Spinoza's approach to religion, and the political philosophy of the final chapters of the text was heavily influenced by Hobbes. Treatment of religion In the treatise, Spinoza put forth his most systematic critique of Judaism, and all organized religion in general."
p10354
aS'Spinoza argued that theology and philosophy must be kept separate, particularly in the reading of scripture.'
p10355
aS'Whereas the goal of theology is obedience, philosophy aims at understanding rational truth.'
p10356
aS'Scripture does not teach philosophy and thus cannot be made to conform with it, otherwise the meaning of scripture will be distorted.'
p10357
aS'Conversely, if reason is made subservient to scripture, then, Spinoza argues, "the prejudices of a common people of long ago... will gain a hold on his understanding and darken it.'
p10358
aS"Barbara McClintock's discovery of these jumping genes earned her a Nobel prize in 1983.TEs make up a large fraction of the C-value of eukaryotic cells."
p10359
aS'They are generally considered non-coding DNA, although it has been shown that TEs are important in genome function and evolution.'
p10360
aS'In Oxytricha, which has a unique genetic system, they play a critical role in development.'
p10361
aS'They are also very useful to researchers as a means to alter DNA inside a living organism. Discovery Barbara McClintock discovered the first TEs in maize, Zea mays, at the Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory.'
p10362
aS'McClintock was experimenting with maize plants that had broken chromosomes.'
p10363
aS'In the winter of 1944-1945 McClintock planted corn kernels that were self-pollinated, meaning that the flowers were pollinated by the silk of their own plant.'
p10364
aS'These kernels came from a long line of plants that had been self-pollinated, causing broken arms on the end of their ninth chromosome.'
p10365
aS'Thus, it is possible that the worst-case running time for any algorithm for the TSP increases superpolynomially (perhaps, specifically, exponentially) with the number of cities.The problem was first formulated in 1930 and is one of the most intensively studied problems in optimization.'
p10366
aS'It is used as a benchmark for many optimization methods.'
p10367
aS'Even though the problem is computationally difficult, a large number of heuristics and exact methods are known, so that some instances with tens of thousands of cities can be solved completely and even problems with millions of cities can be approximated within a small fraction of 1%.The TSP has several applications even in its purest formulation, such as planning, logistics, and the manufacture of microchips.'
p10368
aS'Slightly modified, it appears as a sub-problem in many areas, such as DNA sequencing.'
p10369
aS'In these applications, the concept city represents, for example, customers, soldering points, or DNA fragments, and the concept distance represents travelling times or cost, or a similarity measure between DNA fragments.'
p10370
aS'The TSP also appears in astronomy, as astronomers observing many sources will want to minimise the time spent slewing the telescope between the sources.'
p10371
aS'In many applications, additional constraints such as limited resources or time windows may be imposed. History The origins of the travelling salesman problem are unclear.'
p10372
aS'Two follow-up implementation treaties were signed at Nice on 4 December 1748 and 21 January 1749 by Austria, Spain, Sardinia, Modena, and Genoa. Terms Great Britain and France dictated the proposed terms of the treaty, which had previously been agreed at the Congress of Breda, and other nations accepted them.'
p10373
aS"These were:Austria recognised Frederick II of Prussia's conquest of Silesia, as well as renouncing parts of its Italian territories to Spain.France withdrew from the Netherlands in order to have some of its colonies returned."
p10374
aS'France regained Cape Breton Island, lost during the war, while it returned the captured city of Madras in India to Great Britain and gave up the Barrier towns to the Dutch.'
p10375
aS'France withdrew from the Austrian Netherlands.Maria Theresa ceded the Duchy of Parma, Piacenza and Guastalla in present-day Italy to Spain.The Duchy of Modena and the Republic of Genoa, conquered by Austria, were restored.The Asiento contract, which had been guaranteed to Great Britain in 1713 through the Treaty of Utrecht, was renewed.'
p10376
aS'Spain later raised objections to the Asiento clauses, and the Treaty of Madrid, signed on 5 October 1750, stipulated that Great Britain surrendered her claims under those clauses in return for a sum of PS100,000. Reactions For the most part, the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle and the War of Austrian Succession concluded status quo ante bellum.'
p10377
aS'In the commercial struggle between Britain and France in the West Indies, Africa, and India, nothing was settled; the treaty was thus no basis for a lasting peace.In France, there was a general resentment at what was seen as a foolish throwing away of advantages (particularly in the Austrian Netherlands, which had largely been conquered by the brilliant strategy of Marshal Saxe), and it came to be popular in Paris to use the phrases Bete comme la paix ("Stupid as the peace") and La guerre pour le roi de Prusse ("The war for the king of Prussia").'
p10378
aS'By the same token, British colonists in New England and merchants back in Great Britain resented the return of Louisbourg to the French after they had captured the stronghold in a 46-day siege.'
p10379
aS'The treaty was forced on the Bolshevik government by the threat of further advances by German and Austrian forces.'
p10380
aS"According to the treaty, Soviet Russia defaulted on all of Imperial Russia's commitments to the Triple Entente alliance.In the treaty, Bolshevik Russia ceded the Baltic States to Germany, and its province of Kars Oblast in the south Caucasus to the Ottoman_Empire."
p10381
aS'It also recognized the independence of Ukraine.'
p10382
aS'Russia also agreed to pay six billion German gold mark in reparations.'
p10383
aS'Historian Spencer Tucker says, "The German General Staff had formulated extraordinarily harsh terms that shocked even the German negotiator."'
p10384
aS'Congress Poland was not mentioned in the treaty, as Germans refused to recognize the existence of any Polish representatives, which in turn led to Polish protests.'
p10385
aS'When Germans later complained that the Treaty_of_Versailles of 1919 was too harsh on them, the Allies (and historians favorable to the Allies) responded that it was more benign than Brest-Litovsk.'
p10386
aS'The treaty was signed by Castile, 2 July 1494 and by Portugal, 5 September 1494.'
p10387
aS'The other side of the world would be divided a few decades later by the Treaty of Zaragoza or Saragossa, signed on 22 April 1529, which specified the antimeridian to the line of demarcation specified in the Treaty_of_Tordesillas.'
p10388
aS'Originals of both treaties are kept at the Archivo General de Indias in Spain and at the Arquivo Nacional da Torre do Tombo in Portugal.This treaty worked fairly well as between Spain and Portugal, despite considerable ignorance as to the geography of the New World, but it omitted all of the other European powers.'
p10389
aS'Those countries generally ignored the treaty, particularly those that became Protestant after the Reformation. Signing and enforcement The Treaty_of_Tordesillas was intended to solve the dispute that had been created following the return of Christopher Columbus and his crew, who had sailed for the crown of Castile.'
p10390
aS'On his way back to Spain he first reached Lisbon, in Portugal.'
p10391
aS'There he asked for another meeting with King John II to show him the newly discovered lands.After learning of the Castilian-sponsored voyage, the Portuguese King sent a threatening letter to the Catholic Monarchs stating that by the previous Alcacovas Treaty signed in 1479 (confirmed In 1481, with the papal bull AEterni regis that granted all lands south of the Canary Islands to Portugal) all of the lands discovered by Columbus belonged, in fact, to Portugal.'
p10392
aS'Also, the Portuguese King stated that he was already making arrangements for a fleet to depart shortly and take possession of the new lands.'
p10393
aS'It was signed on 28 June 1919, exactly five years after the assassination of Archduke Franz Ferdinand.'
p10394
aS'The other Central Powers on the German side of World_War_I were dealt with in separate treaties.'
p10395
aS'Although the armistice, signed on 11 November 1918, ended the actual fighting, it took six months of negotiations at the Paris Peace Conference to conclude the peace treaty.'
p10396
aS'The treaty was registered by the Secretariat of the League of Nations on 21 October 1919, and was printed in The League of Nations Treaty Series.Of the many provisions in the treaty, one of the most important and controversial required "Germany [to] accept the responsibility of Germany and her allies for causing all the loss and damage" during the war (the other members of the Central Powers signed treaties containing similar articles).'
p10397
aS'This article, Article 231, later became known as the War Guilt clause.'
p10398
aS'The treaty forced Germany to disarm, make substantial territorial concessions, and pay reparations to certain countries that had formed the Entente powers.'
p10399
aS'In 1921 the total cost of these reparations was assessed at 132 billion Marks (then $31.4 billion or PS6.6 billion, roughly equivalent to US $442 billion or UK PS284 billion in 2015).'
p10400
aS'For example, looking at a tree as a whole, one can talk about "the parent node" of a given node, but in general as a data structure a given node only contains the list of its children, but does not contain a reference to its parent (if any). Definition A tree is a (possibly non-linear) data structure made up of nodes or vertices and edges without having any cycle.'
p10401
aS'The tree with no nodes is called the null or empty tree.'
p10402
aS"A tree that is not empty consists of a root node and potentially many levels of additional nodes that form a hierarchy. Terminologies used in Trees Root - The top node in a tree.Parent - The converse notion of child.Siblings - Nodes with the same parent.Descendant - a node reachable by repeated proceeding from parent to child.Ancestor - a node reachable by repeated proceeding from child to parent.Leaf - a node with no children.Internal node - a node with at least one child.External node - a node with no children.Degree - number of sub trees of a node.Edge - connection between one node to another.Path - a sequence of nodes and edges connecting a node with a descendant.Level - The level of a node is defined by 1 + the number of connections between the node and the root.Height of tree -The height of a tree is the number of edges on the longest downward path between the root and a leaf.Height of node -The height of a node is the number of edges on the longest downward path between that node and a leaf.Depth -The depth of a node is the number of edges from the node to the tree's root node.Forest - A forest is a set of n > 0 disjoint trees. Data type vs. data structure There is a distinction between a tree as an abstract data type and as a concrete data structure, analogous to the distinction between a list and a linked list."
p10403
aS'As a data type, a tree has a value and children, and the children are themselves trees; the value and children of the tree are interpreted as the value of the root node and the subtrees of the children of the root node.'
p10404
aS'To allow finite trees, one must either allow the list of children to be empty (in which case trees can be required to be non-empty, an "empty tree" instead being represented by a forest of zero trees), or allow trees to be empty, in which case the list of children can be of fixed size (branching factor, especially 2 or "binary"), if desired.As a data structure, a linked tree is a group of nodes, where each node has a value and a list of references to other nodes (its children).'
p10405
aS'This data structure actually defines a directed graph, because it may have loops or several references to the same node, just as a linked list may have a loop.'
p10406
aS'Thus there is also the requirement that no two references point to the same node (that each node has at most a single parent, and in fact exactly one parent, except for the root), and a tree that violates this is "corrupt".Due to the use of references to trees in the linked tree data structure, trees are often discussed implicitly assuming that they are being represented by references to the root node, as this is often how they are actually implemented.'
p10407
aS'A forest is a disjoint union of trees.The various kinds of data structures referred to as trees in computer science have underlying graphs that are trees in graph theory, although such data structures are generally rooted trees, thus in fact being directed graphs, and may also have additional ordering of branches.Rooted trees in their directed graph form may be called directed rooted trees.'
p10408
aS'Other terms for this include arborescence, out-arborescence, out-tree, and even branching.The term "tree" was coined in 1857 by the British mathematician Arthur Cayley. Definitions A tree is an undirected simple graph G that satisfies any of the following equivalent conditions:G is connected and has no cycles.G has no cycles, and a simple cycle is formed if any edge is added to G.G is connected, but is not connected if any single edge is removed from G.G is connected and the 3-vertex complete graph  is not a minor of G.Any two vertices in G can be connected by a unique simple path.If G has finitely many vertices, say n of them, then the above statements are also equivalent to any of the following conditions:G is connected and has n - 1 edges.G has no simple cycles and has n - 1 edges.As elsewhere in graph theory, the order-zero graph (graph with no vertices) is generally excluded from consideration: while it is vacuously connected as a graph (any two vertices can be connected by a path), it is not 0-connected (or even (-1)-connected) in algebraic topology, unlike non-empty trees, and violates the "one more node than edges" relation.A leaf is a vertex of degree 1.'
p10409
aS'An internal vertex is a vertex of degree at least 2.An irreducible (or series-reduced) tree is a tree in which there is no vertex of degree 2.'
p10410
aS'A forest is an undirected graph, all of whose connected components are trees; in other words, the graph consists of a disjoint union of trees.'
p10411
aS'Equivalently, a forest is an undirected cycle-free graph.'
p10412
aS'As special cases, an empty graph, a single tree, and the discrete graph on a set of vertices (that is, the graph with these vertices that has no edges), all are examples of forests.The term hedge sometimes refers to an ordered sequence of trees.A polytree (also known as oriented tree or singly connected network) is a directed acyclic graph (DAG) whose underlying undirected graph is a tree.'
p10413
aS'In other words, if we replace its directed arcs with undirected edges, we obtain an undirected graph that is both connected and acyclic.A directed tree is a directed graph which would be a tree if the directions on the edges were ignored, i.e.'
p10414
aS'In looser senses, the taller palms, the tree ferns, bananas and bamboos are also trees.'
p10415
aS'Trees tend to be long-lived, some reaching several thousand years old.'
p10416
aS'The tallest known tree, a coast redwood named Hyperion, stands 115.6 m (379 ft) high.'
p10417
aS'Trees have been in existence on the Earth for 370 million years.'
p10418
aS'Trees are not a taxonomic group but include a variety of plant species that have independently evolved a woody trunk and branches as a way to tower above other plants to compete for sunlight.A tree typically has many secondary branches supported clear of the ground by the trunk.'
p10419
aS'This trunk typically contains woody tissue for strength, and vascular tissue to carry materials from one part of the tree to another.'
p10420
aS'For most trees it is surrounded by a layer of bark which serves as a protective barrier.'
p10421
aS'Most of the victims were recent Jewish and Italian immigrant women aged 16 to 23; of the victims whose ages are known, the oldest victim was Providenza Panno at 43, and the youngest were 14-year-olds Kate Leone and "Sara" Rosaria Maltese.Because the owners had locked the doors to the stairwells and exits, a common practice used to prevent workers from taking unauthorized breaks and pilferage, many of the workers who could not escape the burning building jumped from the eighth, ninth, and tenth floors to the streets below.'
p10422
aS"The fire led to legislation requiring improved factory safety standards and helped spur the growth of the International Ladies' Garment Workers' Union (ILGWU), which fought for better working conditions for sweatshop workers.The factory was located in the Asch Building, at 23-29 Washington Place in the Greenwich Village neighborhood of Manhattan, now known as the Brown Building and part of New York University."
p10423
aS'The building has been designated a National Historic Landmark and a New_York_City landmark. FireEdit The Triangle Waist Company factory occupied the eighth, ninth, and tenth floors of the 10-story Asch Building on the northwest corner of Greene Street and Washington Place, just east of Washington Square Park, in the Greenwich Village area of New_York_City.'
p10424
aS'Under the ownership of Max Blanck and Isaac Harris, the factory produced women\'s blouses, known as "shirtwaists."'
p10425
aS"The factory normally employed about 500 workers, mostly young immigrant women, who worked nine hours a day on weekdays plus seven hours on Saturdays, earning for their 52 hours of work between $7 and $12 a week, the 2014 equivalent of $166 to $285 a week, or $3.20 to $5.50 per hour.As the workday was ending on the afternoon of Saturday, March 25, 1911, a fire flared up at approximately 4:40 PM in a scrap bin under one of the cutter's tables at the northeast corner of the eighth floor."
p10426
aS'The first fire alarm was sent at 4:45 PM by a passerby on Washington Place who saw smoke coming from the eighth floor.'
p10427
aS'Both owners of the factory were in attendance and had invited their children to the factory on that afternoon.'
p10428
aS'A triangle with vertices A, B, and C is denoted .In Euclidean geometry any three points, when non-collinear, determine a unique triangle and a unique plane (i.e.'
p10429
aS'a two-dimensional Euclidean space).'
p10430
aS'This article is about triangles in Euclidean geometry except where otherwise noted. Types of triangle  By relative lengths of sides Triangles can be classified according to the relative lengths of their sides:An equilateral triangle has all sides the same length.'
p10431
aS'An equilateral triangle is also a regular polygon with all angles measuring 60deg.An isosceles triangle has two sides of equal length.'
p10432
aS'An isosceles triangle also has two angles of the same measure; namely, the angles opposite to the two sides of the same length; this fact is the content of the isosceles triangle theorem, which was known by Euclid.'
p10433
aS'Some mathematicians define an isosceles triangle to have exactly two equal sides, whereas others define an isosceles triangle as one with at least two equal sides.'
p10434
aS'The latter definition would make all equilateral triangles isosceles triangles.'
p10435
aS'Only the L-stereoisomer of tryptophan is used in structural or enzyme proteins, but the R-stereoisomer is occasionally found in naturally produced peptides (for example, the marine venom peptide contryphan).'
p10436
aS'The distinguishing structural characteristic of tryptophan is that it contains an indole functional group. Isolation The isolation of tryptophan was first reported by Frederick Hopkins in 1901 through hydrolysis of casein.'
p10437
aS'From 600 grams of crude casein one obtains 4-8 grams of tryptophan. Biosynthesis and industrial production Plants and microorganisms commonly synthesize tryptophan from shikimic acid or anthranilate.'
p10438
aS'The latter condenses with phosphoribosylpyrophosphate (PRPP), generating pyrophosphate as a by-product.'
p10439
aS'After ring opening of the ribose moiety and following reductive decarboxylation, indole-3-glycerinephosphate is produced, which in turn is transformed into indole.'
p10440
aS'In the last step, tryptophan synthase catalyzes the formation of tryptophan from indole and the amino acid serine.The industrial production of tryptophan is also biosynthetic and is based on the fermentation of serine and indole using either wild-type or genetically modified bacteria such as B. amyloliquefaciens, B. subtilis, C. glutamicum or E. coli.'
p10441
aS'These strains carry either mutations that prevent the reuptake of aromatic amino acids or multiple/overexpressed trp operons.'
p10442
aS"Over the decades, Veinte poemas has become Neruda's best-known work, and has sold more than a million copies."
p10443
aS'The book has been translated into many languages; in English, the translation was made by poet W. S. Merwin.In 2001, the alternative rock musician Lynda Thomas released as a single the flamenco song Ay, Ay, Ay, which was based on this work. See also Cape Editions References '
p10444
aS"The paper is an attack on two central aspects of the logical positivists' philosophy."
p10445
aS'One is the analytic-synthetic distinction between analytic truths and synthetic truths, explained by Quine as truths grounded only in meanings and independent of facts, and truths grounded in facts.'
p10446
aS'The other is reductionism, the theory that each meaningful statement gets its meaning from some logical construction of terms that refers exclusively to immediate experience.'
p10447
aS'"Two Dogmas" is divided into six sections.'
p10448
aS'The first four sections are focused on analyticity, the last two sections on reductionism.'
p10449
aS"There, Quine turns the focus to the logical positivists' theory of meaning."
p10450
aS"He also presents his own holistic theory of meaning. Analyticity and circularity Most of Quine's argument against analyticity in the first four sections is focused on showing that different explanations of analyticity are circular."
p10451
aS"The Latinised name is Tius or Tio.In the late Icelandic Eddas, Tyr is portrayed, alternately, as the son of Odin (Prose Edda) or of Hymir (Poetic Edda), while the origins of his name and his possible relationship to Tuisto (see Tacitus' Germania) suggest he was once considered the father of the gods and head of the pantheon, since his name is ultimately cognate to that of *Dyeus (cf."
p10452
aS'Dyaus), the reconstructed chief deity in Indo-European religion.'
p10453
aS'It is assumed that Tiwaz was overtaken in popularity and in authority by both Odin and Thor at some point during the Migration Age, as Odin shares his role as God of war.Tyr is a god of war and will take mead, meat and blood for sacrifice.'
p10454
aS'If a warrior carved the rune Tiwaz on his weapon he would be dedicating it to Tyr and strengthen the outcome of a battle to be in his favor.'
p10455
aS'After a warrior has dedicated his weapon to Tyr he should not lose it or break it.'
p10456
aS'Tiw was equated with Mars in the interpretatio germanica.'
p10457
aS'Tuesday is in fact "Tiw\'s Day" (also in Alemannic Zischtig from zies tag), translating dies Martis. Name Old Norse Tyr, literally "god", plural tivar "gods", comes from Proto-Germanic *Tiwaz (cf.'
p10458
aS"Uganda is the world's second most populous landlocked country after Ethiopia."
p10459
aS'The southern part of the country includes a substantial portion of Lake_Victoria, shared with Kenya and Tanzania, situating the country in the African Great Lakes region.'
p10460
aS'Uganda also lies within the Nile basin, and has a varied but generally equatorial climate.Uganda takes its name from the Buganda kingdom, which encompasses a large portion of the south of the country including the capital Kampala.'
p10461
aS'The people of Uganda were hunter-gatherers until 1,700 to 2,300 years ago, when Bantu-speaking populations migrated to the southern parts of the country.Beginning in the late 1800s, the area was ruled as a protectorate by the British, who established administrative law across the territory.'
p10462
aS'Uganda gained independence from Britain on 9 October 1962.'
p10463
aS"The period since then has been marked by intermittent conflicts, most recently a lengthy civil war against the Lord's Resistance Army, which has caused tens of thousands of casualties and displaced more than a million people.The official languages are Swahili and English."
p10464
aS'Luganda, a central language, is widely spoken across the country, and multiple other languages are also spoken including Runyoro, Runyankole Rukiga, Langi and many others.'
p10465
aS'It has an area of 603,628 km2 (233,062 sq mi), making it the largest country entirely within Europe.'
p10466
aS'Ukraine borders Russia to the east and northeast, Belarus to the northwest, Poland and Slovakia to the west, Hungary, Romania, and Moldova to the southwest, and the Black_Sea and Sea of Azov to the south and southeast, respectively.The territory of modern Ukraine has been inhabited since 32,000 BC.'
p10467
aS"During the Middle Ages, the area was a key center of East Slavic culture, with the powerful state of Kievan Rus' forming the basis of Ukrainian identity."
p10468
aS'Following its fragmentation in the 13th century, the territory was contested, ruled and divided by a variety of powers, including Lithuania, Poland, the Ottoman_Empire, Austria-Hungary, and Russia.'
p10469
aS"A Cossack republic emerged and prospered during the 17th and 18th centuries, but Ukraine's territories remained divided until they were consolidated into a Soviet republic in the 20th century."
p10470
aS"It became independent in 1991 following the dissolution of the Soviet Union.Ukraine has long been a global breadbasket because of its extensive, fertile farmlands, and it remains one of the world's largest grain exporters."
p10471
aS'The diversified economy of Ukraine includes a large heavy industry sector, particularly in aerospace and industrial equipment.Ukraine is a unitary republic under a semi-presidential system with separate powers: legislative, executive, and judicial branches.'
p10472
aS'It is considered to be one of the most important works of modernist literature, and has been called "a demonstration and summation of the entire movement".'
p10473
aS'According to Declan Kiberd, "Before Joyce, no writer of fiction had so foregrounded the process of thinking."'
p10474
aS'However, even proponents of Ulysses such as Anthony Burgess have described the book as "inimitable, and also possibly mad".Ulysses chronicles the peripatetic appointments and encounters of Leopold Bloom in Dublin in the course of an ordinary day, 16 June 1904.'
p10475
aS"Ulysses is the Latinised name of Odysseus, the hero of Homer's epic poem Odyssey, and the novel establishes a series of parallels between its characters and events and those of the poem (e.g., the correspondence of Leopold Bloom to Odysseus, Molly Bloom to Penelope, and Stephen Dedalus to Telemachus).Ulysses is approximately 265,000 words in length, uses a lexicon of 30,030 words (including proper names, plurals and various verb tenses), and is divided into eighteen episodes."
p10476
aS'Since publication, the book has attracted controversy and scrutiny, ranging from early obscenity trials to protracted textual "Joyce Wars".'
p10477
aS"Ulysses' stream-of-consciousness technique, careful structuring, and experimental prose--full of puns, parodies, and allusions, as well as its rich characterisations and broad humour, made the book a highly regarded novel in the modernist pantheon."
p10478
aS'In 1998, the American publishing firm Modern Library ranked Ulysses first on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century.'
p10479
aS'Facing old age, mythical hero Ulysses describes his discontent and restlessness upon returning to his kingdom, Ithaca, after his far-ranging travels.'
p10480
aS'Despite his reunion with his wife Penelope and son Telemachus, Ulysses yearns to explore again.The character of Ulysses (in Greek, Odysseus) has been explored widely in literature.'
p10481
aS"The adventures of Odysseus were first recorded in Homer's Iliad and Odyssey (c. 800-700 BC), and Tennyson draws on Homer's narrative in the poem."
p10482
aS"Most critics, however, find that Tennyson's Ulysses recalls Dante's Ulisse in his Inferno (c. 1320)."
p10483
aS'In Dante\'s re-telling, Ulisse is condemned to hell among the false counsellors, both for his pursuit of knowledge beyond human bounds and for his adventures in disregard of his family.For much of this poem\'s history, readers viewed Ulysses as resolute and heroic, admiring him for his determination "To strive, to seek, to find, and not to yield".'
p10484
aS'The view that Tennyson intended a heroic character is supported by his statements about the poem, and by the events in his life--the death of his closest friend--that prompted him to write it.'
p10485
aS'In the twentieth century, some new interpretations of "Ulysses" highlighted potential ironies in the poem.'
p10486
aS'This caliphate was centered on the Umayyad dynasty (Arabic: l\'mwywn, al-`Umawiyyun, or bnw \'my@, Banu `Umayya, "Sons of Umayya"), hailing from Mecca.'
p10487
aS'The Umayyad family had first come to power under the third caliph, Uthman ibn Affan (r. 644-656), but the Umayyad regime was founded by Muawiya ibn Abi Sufyan, long-time governor of Syria, after the end of the First Muslim Civil War in 661 CE/41 AH.'
p10488
aS"Syria remained the Umayyads' main power base thereafter, and Damascus was their capital."
p10489
aS'The Umayyads continued the Muslim conquests, incorporating the Caucasus, Transoxiana, Sindh, the Maghreb and the Iberian Peninsula (Al-Andalus) into the Muslim world.'
p10490
aS'At its greatest extent, the Umayyad_Caliphate covered 15 million km2 (5.79 million square miles), making it the largest empire the world had yet seen, and the fifth largest ever to exist.At the time, the Umayyad taxation and administrative practice were perceived as unjust by some Muslims.'
p10491
aS'The non-Muslim population had autonomy; their judicial matters were dealt with in accordance with their own laws and by their own religious heads or their appointees, although they did pay a poll tax for policing to the central state.'
p10492
aS'Muhammad had stated explicitly during his lifetime that each religious minority should be allowed to practice its own religion and govern itself, and the policy had on the whole continued.'
p10493
aS"He has since written further novels, including Il pendolo di Foucault (Foucault's_Pendulum) and L'isola del giorno prima (The Island of the Day Before)."
p10494
aS"His most recent novel Il cimitero di Praga (The Prague Cemetery), released in 2010, was a best-seller.Eco has also written academic texts, children's books and many essays."
p10495
aS'He is founder of the Dipartimento di Comunicazione (Department of Media Studies) at the University of the Republic of San Marino, President of the Scuola Superiore di Studi Umanistici (Graduate School for the Study of the Humanities), University of Bologna, member of the Accademia dei Lincei (since November 2010), and an Honorary Fellow of Kellogg College, University of Oxford. Biography Eco was born in the city of Alessandria in the region of Piedmont in northern Italy.'
p10496
aS'His father, Giulio, one of thirteen children, was an accountant before the government called upon him to serve in three wars.'
p10497
aS'During World_War_II, Umberto and his mother Giovanna moved to a small village in the Piedmontese mountainside.'
p10498
aS'Eco received a Salesian education and has made references to the order and its founder in his works and interviews.'
p10499
aS"His family name is supposedly an acronym of ex caelis oblatus (from Latin: a gift from the heavens), which was given to his grandfather (a foundling) by a city official.Umberto's father urged him to become a lawyer, but he entered the University of Turin to take up medieval philosophy and literature, writing his thesis on Thomas Aquinas and earning a Laurea degree in philosophy in 1954."
p10500
aS'The formal inequality relating the standard deviation of position sx and the standard deviation of momentum sp was derived by Earle Hesse Kennard later that year and by Hermann Weyl in 1928:(h is the reduced Planck constant).Historically, the uncertainty principle has been confused with a somewhat similar effect in physics, called the observer effect, which notes that measurements of certain systems cannot be made without affecting the systems.'
p10501
aS'Heisenberg offered such an observer effect at the quantum level (see below) as a physical "explanation" of quantum uncertainty.'
p10502
aS'It has since become clear, however, that the uncertainty principle is inherent in the properties of all wave-like systems, and that it arises in quantum mechanics simply due to the matter wave nature of all quantum objects.'
p10503
aS'Thus, the uncertainty principle actually states a fundamental property of quantum systems, and is not a statement about the observational success of current technology.'
p10504
aS'It must be emphasized that measurement does not mean only a process in which a physicist-observer takes part, but rather any interaction between classical and quantum objects regardless of any observer.Since the uncertainty principle is such a basic result in quantum mechanics, typical experiments in quantum mechanics routinely observe aspects of it.'
p10505
aS'Certain experiments, however, may deliberately test a particular form of the uncertainty principle as part of their main research program.'
p10506
aS'These include, for example, tests of number-phase uncertainty relations in superconducting or quantum optics systems.'
p10507
aS"The sentimental novel depicts the reality of slavery while also asserting that Christian love can overcome something as destructive as enslavement of fellow human beings.Uncle_Tom's_Cabin was the best-selling novel of the 19th century and the second best-selling book of that century, following the Bible."
p10508
aS'It is credited with helping fuel the abolitionist cause in the 1850s.'
p10509
aS'In the first year after it was published, 300,000 copies of the book were sold in the United_States; one million copies in Great Britain.'
p10510
aS'In 1855, three years after it was published, it was called "the most popular novel of our day."'
p10511
aS'The impact attributed to the book is great, reinforced by a story that when Abraham Lincoln met Stowe at the start of the Civil War, Lincoln declared, "So this is the little lady who started this great war."'
p10512
aS'The quote is apocryphal; it did not appear in print until 1896, and it has been argued that "The long-term durability of Lincoln\'s greeting as an anecdote in literary studies and Stowe scholarship can perhaps be explained in part by the desire among many contemporary intellectuals ... to affirm the role of literature as an agent of social change.'
p10513
aS'"The book and the plays it inspired helped popularize a number of stereotypes about black people.'
p10514
aS'During periods of recession, an economy usually experiences a relatively high unemployment rate.'
p10515
aS"According to International Labour Organization report, more than 200 million people globally or 6% of the world's workforce were without a job in 2012.There remains considerable theoretical debate regarding the causes, consequences and solutions for unemployment."
p10516
aS'Classical economics, New classical economics, and the Austrian School of economics argue that market mechanisms are reliable means of resolving unemployment.'
p10517
aS'These theories argue against interventions imposed on the labor market from the outside, such as unionization, bureaucratic work rules, minimum wage laws, taxes, and other regulations that they claim discourage the hiring of workers.Keynesian economics emphasizes the cyclical nature of unemployment and recommends government interventions in the economy that it claims will reduce unemployment during recessions.'
p10518
aS'This theory focuses on recurrent shocks that suddenly reduce aggregate demand for goods and services and thus reduce demand for workers.'
p10519
aS'Keynesian models recommend government interventions designed to increase demand for workers; these can include financial stimuli, publicly funded job creation, and expansionist monetary policies.'
p10520
aS'Its namesake, economist John_Maynard_Keynes, believed that the root cause of unemployment is the desire of investors to receive more money rather than produce more products, which is not possible without public bodies producing new money.In addition to these comprehensive theories of unemployment, there are a few categorizations of unemployment that are used to more precisely model the effects of unemployment within the economic system.'
p10521
aS'7, in accordance with the revised Deutsch catalogue and the Neue Schubert-Ausgabe), commonly known as the "Unfinished Symphony" (German: Unvollendete), is a work that Schubert started in 1822 but left with only two movements--though Schubert lived for another six years.'
p10522
aS"A scherzo, nearly completed in piano score but with only two pages orchestrated, also survives.Many have theorized that Schubert may have sketched a finale that instead became the big B minor entr'acte from his incidental music to Rosamunde, but all evidence for this is circumstantial."
p10523
aS"One possible reason for Schubert's leaving the symphony incomplete is the predominance of the same meter (triple meter)."
p10524
aS'The first movement is in 3/4, the second in 3/8 and the third (an incomplete scherzo) also in 3/4.'
p10525
aS"Three consecutive movements in basically the same meter rarely occur in symphonies, sonatas or chamber works of the most important Viennese composers.Schubert's eighth symphony is sometimes called the first Romantic symphony due to its emphasis on expressive melody, vivid harmony and creative combinations of orchestral tone color despite the architecturally imposing Classical structures of its two completed movements highlighted by the dramatically climactic development section of the first movement based solely on its quietly sinister opening theme.To this day, musicologists still disagree as to why Schubert failed to complete the symphony."
p10526
aS'Some have speculated that he stopped work in the middle of the scherzo in the fall of 1822 because he associated it with his initial outbreak of syphilis--or that he was distracted by the inspiration for his Wanderer Fantasy for solo piano, which occupied his time and energy immediately afterward.'
p10527
aS'It could have been a combination of both factors. Early history In 1823, the Graz Music Society gave Schubert an honorary diploma.'
p10528
aS'The state of Alaska is located in the northwestern part of North America and the state of Hawaii is an archipelago in the mid-Pacific.'
p10529
aS'The country also has five populated and numerous unpopulated territories in the Pacific and the Caribbean.'
p10530
aS"At 3.8 million square miles (9.842 million km2) and with over 320 million people, the United_States is the world's fourth-largest country by total area and third most populous."
p10531
aS"It is one of the world's most ethnically diverse and multicultural nations, the product of large-scale immigration from many countries."
p10532
aS'The geography and climate of the United_States are also extremely diverse, and the country is home to a wide variety of wildlife.Paleo-Indians migrated from Eurasia to what is now the U.S. mainland at least 15,000 years ago, with European colonization beginning in the 16th century.'
p10533
aS'The United_States emerged from 13 British colonies located along the East Coast.'
p10534
aS'Disputes between Great Britain and the colonies led to the American Revolution.'
p10535
aS'The concepts of Brahman (Ultimate Reality) and Atman (Soul, Self) are central ideas in all the Upanishads, and "Know your Atman" their thematic focus.'
p10536
aS'The Upanishads are the foundation of Hindu philosophical thought and its diverse traditions.'
p10537
aS'Of the Vedic corpus, they alone are widely known, and the central ideas of the Upanishads are at the spiritual core of Hindus.More than 200 Upanishads are known, of which the first dozen or so are the oldest and most important and are referred to as the principal or main (mukhya) Upanishads.'
p10538
aS'The mukhya Upanishads are found mostly in the concluding part of the Brahmanas and Aranyakas and were, for centuries, memorized by each generation and passed down verbally.'
p10539
aS'The early Upanishads all predate the Common Era, some in all likelihood pre-Buddhist (6th century BCE), down to the Maurya period.'
p10540
aS'Of the remainder, some 95 Upanishads are part of the Muktika canon, composed from about the start of common era through medieval Hinduism.'
p10541
aS'New Upanishads, beyond the 108 in the Muktika canon, continued to being composed through the early modern and modern era, though often dealing with subjects which are unconnected to the Vedas.Along with the Bhagavad Gita and the Brahmasutra the mukhya Upanishads (known collectively as the Prasthanatrayi), provide a foundation for the several later schools of Vedanta, among them, two influential monistic schools of Hinduism.With the translation of the Upanishads in the early 19th century they also started to attract attention from a western audience.'
p10542
aS'In 1919, he published The Brass Check, a muckraking expose of American journalism that publicized the issue of yellow journalism and the limitations of the "free press" in the United_States.'
p10543
aS'Four years after publication of The Brass Check, the first code of ethics for journalists was created.'
p10544
aS'Time magazine called him "a man with every gift except humor and silence."'
p10545
aS'He is remembered for writing the famous line: "It is difficult to get a man to understand something, when his salary depends upon his not understanding it.'
p10546
aS'"Sinclair was an outspoken socialist and ran unsuccessfully for Congress as a nominee from the Socialist Party.'
p10547
aS'He was also the Democratic Party candidate for Governor of California during the Great Depression, but was defeated in the 1934 elections. Early life and education Sinclair was born in Baltimore, Maryland to Upton Beall Sinclair and Priscilla Harden.'
p10548
aS"His father was a liquor salesman whose alcoholism shadowed his son's childhood."
p10549
aS'A uranium atom has 92 protons and 92 electrons, of which 6 are valence electrons.'
p10550
aS'Uranium is weakly radioactive because all its isotopes are unstable (with half-lives of the 6 naturally known isotopes, uranium-233 to uranium-238, varying between 69 years and 4.5 billion years).'
p10551
aS'The most common isotopes of uranium are uranium-238 (which has 146 neutrons and accounts for almost 99.3% of the uranium found in nature) and uranium-235 (which has 143 neutrons, accounting for 0.7% of the element found naturally).'
p10552
aS'Uranium has the second highest atomic weight of the primordially occurring elements, lighter only than plutonium.'
p10553
aS'Its density is about 70% higher than that of lead, but slightly lower than that of gold or tungsten.'
p10554
aS'It occurs naturally in low concentrations of a few parts per million in soil, rock and water, and is commercially extracted from uranium-bearing minerals such as uraninite.In nature, uranium is found as uranium-238 (99.2739-99.2752%), uranium-235 (0.7198-0.7202%), and a very small amount of uranium-234 (0.0050-0.0059%).'
p10555
aS'Uranium decays slowly by emitting an alpha particle.'
p10556
aS'In mammals, the urea cycle takes place primarily in the liver, and to a lesser extent in the kidney. Function Organisms that cannot easily and quickly remove ammonia usually have to convert it to some other substance, like urea or uric acid, which are much less toxic.'
p10557
aS'Insufficiency of the urea cycle occurs in some genetic disorders (inborn errors of metabolism), and in liver failure.'
p10558
aS'The result of liver failure is accumulation of nitrogenous waste, mainly ammonia, which leads to hepatic encephalopathy. Reactions The urea cycle consists of five reactions: two mitochondrial and three cytosolic.'
p10559
aS'The cycle converts two amino groups, one from NH4+ and one from Asp, and a carbon atom from HCO3-, to the relatively nontoxic excretion product urea at the cost of four "high-energy" phosphate bonds (3 ATP hydrolyzed to 2 ADP and one AMP).'
p10560
aS'Ornithine is the carrier of these carbon and nitrogen atoms.The reactions of the urea cycle1 L-ornithine2 carbamoyl phosphate3 L-citrulline4 argininosuccinate5 fumarate6 L-arginine7 ureaL-Asp L-aspartateCPS-1 carbamoyl phosphate synthetase IOTC Ornithine transcarbamoylaseASS argininosuccinate synthetaseASL argininosuccinate lyaseARG1 arginase 1In the first reaction, NH4+ + HCO3- is equivalent to NH3 + CO2 + H2O.Thus, the overall equation of the urea cycle is:NH3 + CO2 + aspartate + 3 ATP + 2 H2O - urea + fumarate + 2 ADP + 2 Pi + AMP + PPiSince fumarate is obtained by removing NH3 from aspartate (by means of reactions 3 and 4), and PPi + H2O - 2 Pi, the equation can be simplified as follows:2 NH3 + CO2 + 3 ATP + H2O - urea + 2 ADP + 4 Pi + AMPNote that reactions related to the urea cycle also cause the production of 2 NADH, so the urea cycle releases slightly more energy than it consumes.'
p10561
aS'These NADH are produced in two ways:One NADH molecule is reduced by the enzyme glutamate dehydrogenase in the conversion of glutamate to ammonium and a-ketoglutarate.'
p10562
aS'Glutamate is the non-toxic carrier of amine groups.'
p10563
aS'It is a colorless, odorless solid, highly soluble in water and practically non-toxic (LD50 is 15 g/kg for rats).'
p10564
aS'Dissolved in water, it is neither acidic nor alkaline.'
p10565
aS'The body uses it in many processes, the most notable one being nitrogen excretion.'
p10566
aS'Urea is widely used in fertilizers as a convenient source of nitrogen.'
p10567
aS'Urea is also an important raw material for the chemical industry.The discovery by Friedrich Wohler in 1828 that urea can be produced from inorganic starting materials was an important conceptual milestone in chemistry, as it showed for the first time that a substance previously known only as a byproduct of life could be synthesized in the laboratory without any biological starting materials, contradicting the widely held doctrine of vitalism. Related compoundsEdit The term "urea" is also used for a class of chemical compounds sharing the same functional group, a carbonyl group attached to two organic amine residues: RR\'N--CO--NRR\'.'
p10568
aS'Examples include carbamide peroxide, allantoin, and hydantoin.'
p10569
aS'Ureas are closely related to biurets and related in structure to amides, carbamates, carbodiimides, and thiocarbamides. HistoryEdit Urea was first discovered in urine in 1727 by the Dutch scientist Herman Boerhaave, though this discovery is often attributed to the French chemist Hilaire Rouelle.In 1828, the German chemist Friedrich Wohler obtained urea artificially by treating silver cyanate with ammonium chloride.AgNCO + NH4Cl - (NH2)2CO + AgClThis was the first time an organic compound was artificially synthesized from inorganic starting materials, without the involvement of living organisms.'
p10570
aS'Utilitarianism is a form of consequentialism, which implies that the "end justifies the means".'
p10571
aS'This view can be contrasted or combined with seeing intentions, virtues or the compliance with rules as ethically important.'
p10572
aS"Classical utilitarianism's two most influential contributors are Jeremy_Bentham and John_Stuart_Mill."
p10573
aS'Bentham, who takes happiness as the measure for utility, says, "it is the greatest happiness of the greatest number that is the measure of right and wrong". Etymology As to the origin of the word \'Utilitarianism\' Mill acknowledged in a footnote that, though "believing himself to be the first person who brought the word utilitarian into use, he did not invent it.'
p10574
aS'Rather, he adopted it from a passing expression in Mr. Galt\'s Annals of the Parish."'
p10575
aS"Mill seems to have been unaware that Bentham had previously used the word 'utilitarian' in his 1781 letter to George Wilson and in Bentham's 1802 letter to Dumont he had claimed that 'Utilitarian' was the proper name for his new creed. Historical background The importance of happiness as an end for humans has long been recognized."
p10576
aS'Forms of hedonism were put forward by Aristippus and Epicurus; Aristotle argued that eudaimonia is the highest human good and Augustine wrote that "all men agree in desiring the last end, which is happiness."'
p10577
aS'She served as first reader, editor, and critic of his writings.'
p10578
aS'Naipaul dedicated his A House for Mr. Biswas to her.'
p10579
aS'Naipaul married Nadira Naipaul, a Pakistani former journalist, in 1996.'
p10580
aS'Naipaul was knighted in 1989. Childhood V.'
p10581
aS'S. Naipaul, familiarly Vidia Naipaul, was born on 17 August 1932 in Chaguanas in Trinidad.'
p10582
aS'He was the second child of mother Droapatie (nee Capildeo) and father Seepersad Naipaul.'
p10583
aS"In the 1880s, his grandparents emigrated from India to work as indentured servants in Trinidad's sugar plantations."
p10584
aS"The discovery of the belts is credited to James Van Allen and as a result the Earth's belts bear his name."
p10585
aS'The main belts extend from an altitude of about 1,000 to 60,000 kilometers above the surface in which region radiation levels vary.'
p10586
aS'Most of the particles that form the belts are thought to come from solar wind and other particles by cosmic rays.'
p10587
aS"The belts are located in the inner region of the Earth's magnetosphere."
p10588
aS'The belts contain energetic electrons that form the outer belt and a combination of protons and electrons that form the inner belt.'
p10589
aS'The radiation belts additionally contain lesser amounts of other nuclei, such as alpha particles.'
p10590
aS'The belts endanger satellites, which must protect their sensitive components with adequate shielding if their orbit spends significant time in the radiation belts.'
p10591
aS'It relates to the tendency of particles to escape from the liquid (or a solid).'
p10592
aS'A substance with a high vapor pressure at normal temperatures is often referred to as volatile.The pressure exhibited by vapor present above a liquid surface is known as vapor pressure.'
p10593
aS'On increasing temperature, kinetic energy of molecules increases, so more number of molecules come in vapor phase, thereby increasing the vapor pressure.The vapor pressure of any substance increases non-linearly with temperature according to the Clausius-Clapeyron relation.'
p10594
aS'The atmospheric pressure boiling point of a liquid (also known as the normal boiling point) is the temperature at which the vapor pressure equals the ambient atmospheric pressure.'
p10595
aS'With any incremental increase in that temperature, the vapor pressure becomes sufficient to overcome atmospheric pressure and lift the liquid to form vapor bubbles inside the bulk of the substance.'
p10596
aS'Bubble formation deeper in the liquid requires a higher pressure, and therefore higher temperature, because the fluid pressure increases above the atmospheric pressure as the depth increases.The vapor pressure that a single component in a mixture contributes to the total pressure in the system is called partial pressure.'
p10597
aS'For example, air at sea level, and saturated with water vapor at 20 degC, has partial pressures of about 2.3 kPa of water, 78 kPa of nitrogen, 21 kPa of oxygen and 0.9 kPa of argon. Measurement and units Vapor_pressure is measured in the standard units of pressure.'
p10598
aS"Vasopressin regulates the body's retention of water by acting to increase water reabsorption in the kidney's collecting ducts, the tubules which receive the very dilute urine produced by the functional unit of the kidney, the nephrons."
p10599
aS"Vasopressin is a peptide hormone that increases water permeability of the kidney's collecting duct and distal convoluted tubule by inducing translocation of aquaporin-CD water channels in the plasma membrane of collecting duct cells."
p10600
aS'It also increases peripheral vascular resistance, which in turn increases arterial blood pressure.'
p10601
aS'It plays a key role in homeostasis, by the regulation of water, glucose, and salts in the blood.'
p10602
aS'It is derived from a preprohormone precursor that is synthesized in the hypothalamus and stored in vesicles at the posterior pituitary.'
p10603
aS'Most of it is stored in the posterior pituitary to be released into the bloodstream.'
p10604
aS'However, some AVP may also be released directly into the brain, and accumulating evidence suggests it plays an important role in social behavior, sexual motivation and pair bonding, and maternal responses to stress.'
p10605
aS'700116666666666666960 km/h to the north.'
p10606
aS'Velocity is an important concept in kinematics, the branch of classical mechanics that describes the motion of bodies.Velocity is a physical vector quantity; both magnitude and direction are needed to define it.'
p10607
aS'The scalar absolute value (magnitude) of velocity is called "speed", a quantity that is measured in metres per second (m/s or m[?'
p10608
aS']s-1) in the SI (metric) system.'
p10609
aS'For example, "5 metres per second" is a scalar (not a vector), whereas "5 metres per second east" is a vector.If there is a change in speed, direction, or both, then the object has a changing velocity and is said to be undergoing an acceleration. Constant velocity vs acceleration To have a constant velocity, an object must have a constant speed in a constant direction.'
p10610
aS"Constant direction constrains the object to motion in a straight path (the object's path does not curve)."
p10611
aS'Thus, a constant velocity means motion in a straight line at a constant speed.For example, a car moving at a constant 20 kilometres per hour in a circular path has a constant speed, but does not have a constant velocity because its direction changes.'
p10612
aS'Venice is renowned for the beauty of its setting, its architecture, and its artwork.'
p10613
aS'The city in its entirety is listed as a World Heritage Site, along with its lagoon.Venice is the capital of the Veneto region.'
p10614
aS'In 2009, there were 270,098 people residing in Venice\'s comune (the population estimate of 272,000 inhabitants includes the population of the whole Comune of Venezia; around 60,000 in the historic city of Venice (Centro storico); 176,000 in Terraferma (the Mainland), mostly in the large frazioni (roughly equivalent to "parishes" or "wards" in other countries) of Mestre and Marghera; 31,000 live on other islands in the lagoon).'
p10615
aS'Together with Padua and Treviso, the city is included in the Padua-Treviso-Venice Metropolitan Area (PATREVE), with a total population of 2,600,000.'
p10616
aS'PATREVE is only a statistical metropolitan area without any degree of autonomy.The name is derived from the ancient Veneti people who inhabited the region by the 10th century BC.'
p10617
aS'The city historically was the capital of the Republic of Venice.'
p10618
aS'Venice has been known as the "La Dominante", "Serenissima", "Queen of the Adriatic", "City of Water", "City of Masks", "City of Bridges", "The Floating City", and "City of Canals".'
p10619
aS'It hangs in the Galleria degli Uffizi in Florence.'
p10620
aS"The figure's pose is based on Giorgione's Sleeping Venus (c. 1510), which Titian completed."
p10621
aS'In this depiction, Titian has domesticated Venus by moving her to an indoor setting, engaging her with the viewer, and making her sensuality explicit.'
p10622
aS'Devoid as it is of any classical or allegorical trappings - Venus displays none of the attributes of the goddess she is supposed to represent - the painting is unapologetically erotic. Description and history The Venus stares straight at the viewer, unconcerned with her nudity.'
p10623
aS'In her right hand she holds a posy of roses whilst she holds her other hand over her genitals.'
p10624
aS'In the near background is a dog, often a symbol of fidelity.The painting was commissioned by Guidobaldo II della Rovere, the Duke of Urbino, possibly to celebrate his 1534 marriage.'
p10625
aS'It would originally have decorated a cassone, a chest traditionally given in Italy as a wedding present.'
p10626
aS'It is named after the Roman goddess of love and beauty.'
p10627
aS'After the Moon, it is the brightest natural object in the night sky, reaching an apparent magnitude of -4.6, bright enough to cast shadows.'
p10628
aS'Because Venus is an inferior planet from Earth, it never appears to venture far from the Sun: its elongation reaches a maximum of 47.8deg.Venus is a terrestrial planet and is sometimes called Earth\'s "sister planet" because of their similar size, mass, proximity to the Sun and bulk composition.'
p10629
aS'It is radically different from Earth in other respects.'
p10630
aS'It has the densest atmosphere of the four terrestrial planets, consisting of more than 96% carbon dioxide.'
p10631
aS"The atmospheric pressure at the planet's surface is 92 times that of Earth's."
p10632
aS'With a mean surface temperature of 735 K (462 degC; 863 degF), Venus is by far the hottest planet in the Solar System, even though Mercury is closer to the Sun.'
p10633
aS'It has been the seat of the bishop of Verdun since the 4th century AD, with interruptions.'
p10634
aS'In the Treaty of Verdun in AD 843, the empire of Charlemagne was divided into three parts.The city has been famous for Dragees or sugared almonds from 1200 onwards; they were distributed at the baptism of French princes.Verdun was part of the middle kingdom of Lotharingia, and in 1374 it became an Imperial Free City of the Holy Roman Empire.'
p10635
aS'The Bishopric of Verdun formed together with Tull (Toul) and Metz the Three Bishoprics, which were annexed by France in 1552 (recognized in 1648 by the Peace of Westphalia).From 1624 to 1636, a large bastioned citadel was constructed on the site of the Abbey of Saint Vanne.'
p10636
aS'In 1670, Vauban visited Verdun and drew up an ambitious scheme to fortify the whole city.'
p10637
aS'Although much of his plan was built in the following decades, some of the elements were not completed until after the Napoleonic Wars.'
p10638
aS'Despite the extensive fortifications, Verdun was captured by the Prussians in 1792, but abandoned by them after the Battle of Valmy.'
p10639
aS'During the Napoleonic War, the citadel was used to hold British prisoners-of-war.'
p10640
aS'The screenplay was written by Alec Coppel and Samuel A. Taylor.The film stars James Stewart as former police detective John "Scottie" Ferguson.'
p10641
aS'Scottie is forced into early retirement because an incident in the line of duty has caused him to develop acrophobia (an extreme fear of heights) and vertigo (a sensation of false, rotational movement).'
p10642
aS"Scottie is hired by an acquaintance, Gavin Elster, as a private investigator to follow Gavin's wife Madeleine (Kim Novak), who is behaving strangely.The film was shot on location in San_Francisco, California, and at Paramount Studios in Hollywood."
p10643
aS"It is the first film to utilize the dolly zoom, an in-camera effect that distorts perspective to create disorientation, to convey Scottie's acrophobia."
p10644
aS'As a result of its use in this film, the effect is often referred to as "the Vertigo effect".The film received mixed reviews upon initial release, but is now often cited as a classic Hitchcock film and one of the defining works of his career.'
p10645
aS"Attracting significant scholarly criticism, it replaced Citizen Kane as the best film of all time in the 2012 British Film Institute's Sight & Sound critics' poll and has appeared repeatedly in best film polls by the American Film Institute, as well as being named in 2008 as the 40th greatest movie of all time by Empire magazine in its issue of The 500 Greatest Movies of All Time."
p10646
aS'In 1996, Vertigo underwent a major restoration to create a new 70mm print and DTS soundtrack.'
p10647
aS"In France, Hugo's literary fame comes first from his poetry but also rests upon his novels and his dramatic achievements."
p10648
aS'Among many volumes of poetry, Les Contemplations and La Legende des siecles stand particularly high in critical esteem.'
p10649
aS'Outside France, his best-known works are the acclaimed novels Les Miserables, 1862, and Notre-Dame de Paris, 1831 (known in English as The_Hunchback_of_Notre-Dame).'
p10650
aS"He also produced more than 4,000 drawings, which have since been admired for their beauty, and earned widespread respect as a campaigner for social causes such as the abolition of the death penalty.Though a committed royalist when he was young, Hugo's views changed as the decades passed, and he became a passionate supporter of republicanism; his work touches upon most of the political and social issues and artistic trends of his time."
p10651
aS'He was buried in the Pantheon.'
p10652
aS'His legacy has been honored in many ways, including his portrait being placed on francs. Personal life Hugo was the third son of Joseph Leopold Sigisbert Hugo (1774-1828) and Sophie Trebuchet (1772-1821); his brothers were Abel Joseph Hugo (1798-1855) and Eugene Hugo (1800-1837).'
p10653
aS'He was born in 1802 in Besancon (in the region of Franche-Comte).'
p10654
aS'The Viet Cong (also known as the National Liberation Front, or NLF), a South Vietnamese communist common front aided by the North, fought a guerrilla war against anti-communist forces in the region.'
p10655
aS"The People's Army of Vietnam (also known as the North Vietnamese Army) engaged in a more conventional war, at times committing large units to battle.As the war continued, the part of the Viet Cong in the fighting decreased as the role of the NVA grew."
p10656
aS'U.S. and South Vietnamese forces relied on air superiority and overwhelming firepower to conduct search and destroy operations, involving ground forces, artillery, and airstrikes.'
p10657
aS'In the course of the war, the U.S. conducted a large-scale strategic bombing campaign against North Vietnam, and over time the North Vietnamese airspace became the most heavily defended in the world.The U.S. government viewed its involvement in the war as a way to prevent a Communist takeover of South Vietnam.'
p10658
aS'This was part of a wider containment policy, with the stated aim of stopping the spread of communism.'
p10659
aS'The North Vietnamese government and the Viet Cong were fighting to reunify Vietnam under communist rule.'
p10660
aS'They viewed the conflict as a colonial war, fought initially against forces from France and then America, and later against South Vietnam.Beginning in 1950, American military advisors arrived in what was then French Indochina.'
p10661
aS'The name Vietnam translates as "Southern Viet" (synonymous with the much older term Nam Viet); it was first officially adopted in 1802 by Emperor Gia Long, and was adopted again in 1945 with the founding of the Democratic Republic of Vietnam under Ho Chi Minh.'
p10662
aS'The country is bordered by China to the north, Laos to the northwest, Cambodia to the southwest, and the South China Sea to the east.'
p10663
aS'Its capital city has been Hanoi since the reunification of North and South Vietnam in 1976.Vietnam was part of Imperial China for over a millennium, from 111 BC to AD 938.'
p10664
aS'The Vietnamese became independent from Imperial China in 938, following the Vietnamese victory in the Battle of Bach Dang River.'
p10665
aS'Successive Vietnamese royal dynasties flourished as the nation expanded geographically and politically into Southeast Asia, until the Indochina Peninsula was colonized by the French in the mid-19th century.'
p10666
aS'Following a Japanese occupation in the 1940s, the Vietnamese fought French rule in the First Indochina War, eventually expelling the French in 1954.'
p10667
aS'Thereafter, Vietnam was divided politically into two rival states, North and South Vietnam.'
p10668
aS"The painting of the Dutch artist's hometown is among his most popular, painted at a time when cityscapes were not commonplace."
p10669
aS'It is one of three known paintings of Delft by Vermeer, along with The Little Street and the lost painting House Standing in Delft.'
p10670
aS'The use of pointillism in the work suggests that it postdates The Little Street. Painting materials The technical analysis shows that Vermeer used a limited choice of pigments for this painting: lead white, yellow ochre, natural ultramarine and madder lake are the main painting materials.'
p10671
aS'His painting technique on the other hand is very elaborate and meticulous. Legacy In 2011, the painting was featured on gold and silver commemorative coins issued by the Royal Dutch Mint.'
p10672
aS"The painting also features in Marcel Proust's novel In Search of Lost Time. References  Further reading Liedtke, Walter A."
p10673
aS'(2001).'
p10674
aS'Vermeer and the Delft School.'
p10675
aS'He has received several awards including Padma Shri, Sahitya Akademi Award, Pravasi Bharatiya Samman, WH Smith Literary Award and Crossword Book Award.'
p10676
aS'Seth\'s collections of poetry such as "Mappings" and "Beastly tales", are notable contributions to the Indian English language poetry Canon. Background Vikram_Seth was born on 20 June 1952 to Leila.'
p10677
aS'He spent part of his childhood in Patna since his parents were posted there for a while.'
p10678
aS"He attended St. Xavier's High School.Seth spent part of his youth in London and returned to India in 1987."
p10679
aS"He received primary education at Welham Boys' School and then moved to The Doon School."
p10680
aS'While at Doon, Seth was the editor-in-chief of The Doon School Weekly.'
p10681
aS'After graduating from The Doon School in India, Seth went to Tonbridge School, England to complete his A-levels, where he developed an interest in poetry and learned Chinese.'
p10682
aS'He was also responsible for popularising the use of the term "elite" in social analysis.He introduced the concept of Pareto efficiency and helped develop the field of microeconomics.'
p10683
aS'He was also the first to discover that income follows a Pareto distribution, which is a power law probability distribution.'
p10684
aS'The Pareto principle was named after him and built on observations of his such as that 80% of the land in Italy was owned by 20% of the population.'
p10685
aS'He also contributed to the fields of sociology and mathematics.'
p10686
aS'According to the mathematician Benoit Mandelbrot and Richard L. Hudson:"His legacy as an economist was profound.'
p10687
aS'Partly because of him, the field evolved from a branch of moral philosophy as practised by Adam_Smith into a data intensive field of scientific research and mathematical equations.'
p10688
aS'His books look more like modern economics than most other texts of that day: tables of statistics from across the world and ages, rows of integral signs and equations, intricate charts and graphs.'
p10689
aS'His output includes portraits, self portraits, landscapes and still lifes of cypresses, wheat fields and sunflowers.'
p10690
aS'He drew as a child but did not paint until his late twenties; he completed many of his best-known works during the last two years of his life.'
p10691
aS'In just over a decade, he produced more than 2,100 artworks, including 860 oil paintings and more than 1,300 watercolors, drawings, sketches and prints.Van Gogh was born to upper middle class parents and spent his early adulthood working for a firm of art dealers.'
p10692
aS'He traveled between The Hague, London and Paris, after which he taught in England at Isleworth and Ramsgate.'
p10693
aS'He was deeply religious as a younger man and aspired to be a pastor.'
p10694
aS'From 1879 he worked as a missionary in a mining region in Belgium, where he began to sketch people from the local community.'
p10695
aS'In 1885 he painted The Potato Eaters, considered his first major work.'
p10696
aS'"Woolf suffered from severe bouts of mental illness throughout her life, thought to have been the result of what is now termed bipolar disorder, and committed suicide by drowning in 1941 at the age of 59. Early life Virginia_Woolf was born Adeline Virginia Stephen at 22 Hyde Park Gate in London.'
p10697
aS'Her parents were Sir Leslie Stephen (1832-1904) and Julia Prinsep Duckworth Stephen (nee Jackson, 1846-1895).'
p10698
aS'Leslie Stephen was a notable historian, author, critic and mountaineer.'
p10699
aS"He was a founding editor of the Dictionary of National Biography, a work which would influence Woolf's later experimental biographies."
p10700
aS'Julia Stephen was born in British India to Dr. John and Maria Pattle Jackson.'
p10701
aS'She was also the niece of the photographer Julia Margaret Cameron and first cousin of the temperance leader Lady Henry Somerset.'
p10702
aS'Julia moved to England with her mother, where she served as a model for Pre-Raphaelite painters such as Edward Burne-Jones.Woolf was educated by her parents in their literate and well-connected household at 22 Hyde Park Gate, Kensington.'
p10703
aS'The geography and climate of the Commonwealth are shaped by the Blue Ridge Mountains and the Chesapeake Bay, which provide habitat for much of its flora and fauna.'
p10704
aS'The capital of the Commonwealth is Richmond; Virginia Beach is the most populous city, and Fairfax County is the most populous political subdivision.'
p10705
aS"The Commonwealth's estimated population as of 2014 is over 8.3 million.The area's history begins with several indigenous groups, including the Powhatan."
p10706
aS'In 1607 the London Company established the Colony of Virginia as the first permanent New World English colony.'
p10707
aS"Slave labor and the land acquired from displaced Native American tribes each played a significant role in the colony's early politics and plantation economy."
p10708
aS"Virginia was one of the 13 Colonies in the American Revolution and joined the Confederacy in the American Civil War, during which Richmond was made the Confederate capital and Virginia's northwestern counties seceded to form the state of West Virginia."
p10709
aS'Although the Commonwealth was under single-party rule for nearly a century following Reconstruction, both major national parties are competitive in modern Virginia.The Virginia General Assembly is the oldest continuous law-making body in the New World.'
p10710
aS'For example, honey has a much higher viscosity than water.Viscosity is a property arising from collisions between neighboring particles in a fluid that are moving at different velocities.'
p10711
aS"When the fluid is forced through a tube, the particles which comprise the fluid generally move more quickly near the tube's axis and more slowly near its walls: therefore some stress, (such as a pressure difference between the two ends of the tube), is needed to overcome the friction between particle layers to keep the fluid moving."
p10712
aS"For the same velocity pattern, the stress required is proportional to the fluid's viscosity.A fluid that has no resistance to shear stress is known as an ideal or inviscid fluid."
p10713
aS'Zero viscosity is observed only at very low temperatures in superfluids.'
p10714
aS'Otherwise, all fluids have positive viscosity, and are technically said to be viscous or viscid.'
p10715
aS'In common parlance however, a liquid is said to be viscous if its viscosity is substantially greater than that of water; and may be described as mobile if the viscosity is noticeably less than water.'
p10716
aS'A fluid with a relatively high viscosity, for example, pitch, may appear to be a solid. Etymology The word "viscosity" is derived from the Latin "viscum", meaning mistletoe and also a viscous glue (birdlime) made from mistletoe berries and applied to twigs to catch birds. Definition  Dynamic (shear) viscosity The dynamic (shear) viscosity of a fluid expresses its resistance to shearing flows, where adjacent layers move parallel to each other with different speeds.'
p10717
aS'The Visigoths emerged from earlier Gothic groups (possibly the Thervingi) who had invaded the Roman Empire beginning in 376 and had defeated the Romans at the Battle_of_Adrianople in 378.'
p10718
aS'The Visigoths invaded Italy under Alaric I and sacked Rome in 410.'
p10719
aS'Their long history of migration led the Visigoths to compare themselves to the Biblical Hebrew people who purportedly wandered for forty years in the Sinai Desert.'
p10720
aS'After the Visigoths sacked Rome, they began settling down, first in southern Gaul and eventually in Spain and Portugal, where they founded the Kingdom of the Visigoths.The Visigoths first settled in southern Gaul as foederati of the Romans - a relationship established in 418.'
p10721
aS'However, they soon fell out with their Roman hosts (for reasons that are now obscure) and established their own kingdom with its capital at Toulouse.'
p10722
aS'They next extended their authority into Hispania at the expense of the Suevi and Vandals.'
p10723
aS'In 507, however, their rule in Gaul was ended by the Franks under Clovis I, who defeated them in the Battle of Vouille.'
p10724
aS'Vlad III is revered as a folk hero in Romania and Bulgaria for his protection of the Romanians and Bulgarians both north and south of the Danube.'
p10725
aS'Following his raids on the Ottomans, a significant number of Bulgarian common folk and remaining boyars resettled north of the Danube to Wallachia and recognized his leadership.As the cognomen "The Impaler" suggests, his practice of impaling his enemies is part of his historical reputation.'
p10726
aS'During his lifetime, his reputation for excessive cruelty spread abroad, to Germany and elsewhere in Europe.'
p10727
aS"The name of the vampire Count Dracula in Bram Stoker's 1897 novel Dracula was inspired by Vlad's patronymic and reputation. NameEdit During his life, Vlad wrote his name in Latin documents as Wladislaus Dragwlya, vaivoda partium Transalpinarum (1475).His Romanian patronymic Dragwlya (or Dragkwlya) Dragulea, Dragolea, Draculea, is a diminutive of the epithet Dracul carried by his father Vlad II, who in 1431 was inducted as a member of the Order of the Dragon, a chivalric order founded by Emperor Sigismund in 1408."
p10728
aS'Dracul is the Romanian definite form, the -ul being the suffixal definite article (deriving from Latin ille).'
p10729
aS'The noun drac "dragon" itself continues Latin draco.'
p10730
aS'In Modern Romanian, the word drac has adopted the meaning of "devil" (the term for "dragon" now being balaur or dragon).'
p10731
aS'Probably partly based on Sir Henry Wotton, and partly on the traveller, Anthony Shirley.Lady Would-Be (the parrot) - English lady and wife of Sir Politic-Would-BePeregrine - another, more sophisticated, English travellerNano - a dwarf, companion of VolponeAndrogyno - a hermaphrodite, companion of VolponeCastrone - a eunuch, companion of VolponeThe Avocatori - the judges of Venice Synopsis Volpone is a Venetian gentleman who pretends to be on his deathbed, after a long illness, in order to dupe Voltore, Corbaccio, and Corvino, three men who aspire to inherit his fortune.'
p10732
aS"In their turns, each man arrives to Volpone's house bearing a luxurious gift, intent upon having his name inscribed to the will of Volpone, as his heir."
p10733
aS"Mosca, Volpone's parasite servant, encourages each man, Voltore, Corbaccio, and Corvino, to believe that he has been named heir to Volpone's fortune; in the course of which, Mosca persuades Corbaccio to disinherit his own son in favour of Volpone.To Volpone, Mosca mentions that Corvino has a beautiful wife, Celia."
p10734
aS'Disguised as Scoto the Mountebank, Volpone goes to see Celia.'
p10735
aS'Corvino drives away Scoto (Volpone), who then becomes insistent that he must possess Celia as his own.'
p10736
aS'Mosca deceives Corvino into believing that the moribund Volpone requires sexual congress with a young woman in order to revive and rise from his deathbed.'
p10737
aS"The cupidity of Corvino leads him to offer Celia, his wife, in order to please Volpone's voluptuousness, and so become his heir.Just before Corvino and Celia are due to arrive for her sexual congress with Volpone, Corbaccio's son, Bonario, arrives to catch his father in the act of disinheriting him."
p10738
aS'He wrote more than 20,000 letters and more than 2,000 books and pamphlets.'
p10739
aS'He was an outspoken advocate, despite the risk this placed him in under the strict censorship laws of the time.'
p10740
aS"As a satirical polemicist, he frequently made use of his works to criticize intolerance, religious dogma, and the French institutions of his day. Biography Francois-Marie Arouet was born in Paris, the youngest of the five children (three of whom survived) of Francois Arouet (1650 - 1 January 1722), a lawyer who was a minor treasury official, and his wife, Marie Marguerite d'Aumart (ca."
p10741
aS'1660 - 13 July 1701), from a noble family of the province of Poitou.'
p10742
aS'Some speculation surrounds his date of birth, which Voltaire always claimed to be 20 February 1694.'
p10743
aS'Voltaire was educated by the Jesuits at the College Louis-le-Grand (1704-1711), where he learned Latin and Greek; later in life he became fluent in Italian, Spanish and English.By the time he left school, Voltaire had decided he wanted to be a writer, against the wishes of his father, who wanted him to become a lawyer.'
p10744
aS'Voltaire, pretending to work in Paris as an assistant to a notary, spent much of his time writing poetry.'
p10745
aS'This quantity must not be confused with the angular velocity of the particles relative to some other point.More precisely, the vorticity is a pseudovector field o-, defined as the curl (rotational) of the flow velocity u- vector.'
p10746
aS'The definition can be expressed by the vector analysis formula:where [?]'
p10747
aS'is the del operator.'
p10748
aS"The vorticity of a two-dimensional flow is always perpendicular to the plane of the flow, and therefore can be considered a scalar field.The vorticity is related to the flow's circulation (line integral of the velocity) along a closed path by the Stokes equation."
p10749
aS'Namely, for any infinitesimal surface element C with normal direction n- and area dA, the circulation dG along the perimeter of C is the dot product o- [?]'
p10750
aS'(dA n-) where o- is the vorticity at the center of C.Many phenomena, such as the blowing out of a candle by a puff of air, are more readily explained in terms of vorticity rather than the basic concepts of pressure and velocity.'
p10751
aS'This applies, in particular, to the formation and motion of vortex rings. Examples In a mass of continuum that is rotating like a rigid body, the vorticity is twice the angular velocity vector of that rotation.'
p10752
aS'/oU/, pronounced with an open vocal tract so that there is no build-up of air pressure at any point above the glottis.'
p10753
aS'This contrasts with consonants, such as English sh!'
p10754
aS'[S:], which have a constriction or closure at some point along the vocal tract.'
p10755
aS'A vowel is also understood to be syllabic: an equivalent open but non-syllabic sound is called a semivowel.In all oral languages, vowels form the nucleus or peak of syllables, whereas consonants form the onset and (in languages that have them) coda.'
p10756
aS'Some languages also allow other sounds to form the nucleus of a syllable, such as the syllabic l in the English word table [\'tkeI.bl] (the stroke under the l indicates that it is syllabic; the dot separates syllables)--which, nevertheless, many still consider to have a weak vowel sound [\'tkeI.b@l]--or the r in Croatian or Serbian vrt [vrt], meaning "garden".There is a conflict between the phonetic definition of "vowel" (a sound produced with no constriction in the vocal tract) and the phonological definition (a sound that forms the peak of a syllable).'
p10757
aS'The approximants [j] and [w] illustrate this conflict: both are produced without much of a constriction in the vocal tract (so phonetically they seem to be vowel-like), but they occur on the edge of syllables, such as at the beginning of the English words "yet" and "wet" (which suggests that phonologically they are consonants).'
p10758
aS'The American linguist Kenneth Pike (1943) suggested the terms "vocoid" for a phonetic vowel and "vowel" for a phonological vowel, so using this terminology, [j] and [w] are classified as vocoids but not vowels.'
p10759
aS'Yeats was a driving force behind the Irish Literary Revival and, along with Lady Gregory, Edward Martyn, and others, founded the Abbey Theatre, where he served as its chief during its early years.'
p10760
aS'In 1923, he was awarded the Nobel Prize in Literature as the first Irishman so honoured for what the Nobel Committee described as "inspired poetry, which in a highly artistic form gives expression to the spirit of a whole nation."'
p10761
aS'Yeats is generally considered one of the few writers who completed their greatest works after being awarded the Nobel Prize; such works include The Tower (1928) and The Winding Stair and Other Poems (1929).'
p10762
aS'Yeats was a very good friend of American expatriate poet and Bollingen Prize laureate Ezra_Pound.'
p10763
aS"Yeats wrote the introduction for Rabindranath_Tagore's Gitanjali, which was published by the India Society.William Butler Yeats was born in Sandymount, Ireland and educated there and in London; he spent his childhood holidays in County Sligo."
p10764
aS'He studied poetry in his youth and from an early age was fascinated by both Irish legends and the occult.'
p10765
aS'Those topics feature in the first phase of his work, which lasted roughly until the turn of the 20th century.'
p10766
aS"Du Bois (pronounced /du:'boIz/ doo-BOYZ; February 23, 1868 - August 27, 1963) was an American sociologist, historian, civil rights activist, Pan-Africanist, author and editor."
p10767
aS'Born in Great Barrington, Massachusetts, Du Bois grew up in a relatively tolerant and integrated community.'
p10768
aS'After graduating from Harvard, where he was the first African American to earn a doctorate, he became a professor of history, sociology and economics at Atlanta University.'
p10769
aS'Du Bois was one of the co-founders of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP) in 1909.Du Bois rose to national prominence as the leader of the Niagara Movement, a group of African-American activists who wanted equal rights for blacks.'
p10770
aS'Du Bois and his supporters opposed the Atlanta compromise, an agreement crafted by Booker T. Washington which provided that Southern blacks would work and submit to white political rule, while Southern whites guaranteed that blacks would receive basic educational and economic opportunities.'
p10771
aS'Instead, Du Bois insisted on full civil rights and increased political representation, which he believed would be brought about by the African-American intellectual elite.'
p10772
aS"He referred to this group as the Talented Tenth and believed that African Americans needed the chances for advanced education to develop its leadership.Racism was the main target of Du Bois's polemics, and he strongly protested against lynching, Jim Crow laws, and discrimination in education and employment."
p10773
aS'It was voted "the most significant English language play of the 20th century".'
p10774
aS'Waiting_for_Godot is Beckett\'s translation of his own original French version, En attendant Godot, and is subtitled (in English only) "a tragicomedy in two acts".'
p10775
aS'The original French text was composed between 9 October 1948 and 29 January 1949.'
p10776
aS'The premiere was on 5 January 1953 in the Theatre de Babylone, Paris.'
p10777
aS'The production was directed by Roger Blin, who also played the role of Pozzo. Plot  Act I The play opens on an outdoor scene of two bedraggled companions: the pensive Vladimir and the struggling Estragon who cannot remove his boots from his ailing feet, finally muttering "Nothing to be done."'
p10778
aS'Vladimir takes up the thought, while Estragon vaguely remembers having been beaten the night before.'
p10779
aS'Finally, his boots come off and the pair ramble and bicker pointlessly.'
p10780
aS'American composer Philip Glass has also written an opera of the same name based on the book which premiered in September 2005 in Erfurt, Germany.Coetzee took the title from the poem "Waiting_for_the_Barbarians" by Greek poet Constantine P. Cavafy. Plot The story is narrated in the first person by the unnamed magistrate of a small colonial town that exists as the territorial frontier of "the Empire".'
p10781
aS'The Magistrate\'s rather peaceful existence comes to an end with the Empire\'s declaration of a state of emergency and with the deployment of the Third Bureau--special forces of the Empire--due to rumours that the area\'s indigenous people, called "barbarians" by the colonists, might be preparing to attack the town.'
p10782
aS'Consequently, the Third Bureau conducts an expedition into the land beyond the frontier.'
p10783
aS"Led by a sinister Colonel Joll, the Third Bureau captures a number of barbarians, brings them back to town, tortures them, kills some of them, and leaves for the capital in order to prepare a larger campaign.In the meantime, the Magistrate begins to question the legitimacy of imperialism and personally nurses a barbarian girl who was left crippled and partly blinded by the Third Bureau's torturers."
p10784
aS'The Magistrate has an intimate yet uncertain relationship with the girl.'
p10785
aS'Eventually, he decides to take her back to her people.'
p10786
aS'After a life-threatening trip through the barren land, during which they have sex, he succeeds in returning her--finally asking, to no avail, if she will stay with him--and returns to his own town.'
p10787
aS'Wales has over 1,680 miles (2,700 km) of coastline and is largely mountainous, with its higher peaks in the north and central areas, including Snowdon (Yr Wyddfa), its highest summit.'
p10788
aS'The country lies within the north temperate zone and has a changeable, maritime climate.Welsh national identity emerged among the Celtic Britons after the Roman withdrawal from Britain in the 5th century, and Wales is regarded as one of the modern Celtic nations.'
p10789
aS"Llywelyn ap Gruffudd's death in 1282 marked the completion of Edward I of England's conquest of Wales, though Owain Glyndwr briefly restored independence to what was to become modern Wales, in the early 15th century."
p10790
aS'The whole of Wales was annexed by England and incorporated within the English legal system under the Laws in Wales Acts 1535-1542.'
p10791
aS'Distinctive Welsh politics developed in the 19th century.'
p10792
aS'Welsh Liberalism, exemplified in the early 20th century by Lloyd George, was displaced by the growth of socialism and the Labour Party.'
p10793
aS'Welsh national feeling grew over the century; Plaid Cymru was formed in 1925 and the Welsh Language Society in 1962.'
p10794
aS'He won the Pulitzer Prize for Poetry for his Collected Poems in 1955.Some of his best-known poems include "Anecdote of the Jar," "Disillusionment of Ten O\'Clock," "The Emperor of Ice-Cream," "The Idea of Order at Key West," "Sunday Morning," "The Snow Man," and "Thirteen Ways of Looking at a Blackbird.'
p10795
aS'" Life and career  Education and marriage The son of a prosperous lawyer, Stevens attended Harvard as a non-degree special student, after which he moved to New_York_City and briefly worked as a journalist.'
p10796
aS'He then attended New York Law School, graduating in 1903.'
p10797
aS'On a trip back to Reading in 1904 Stevens met Elsie Viola Kachel (1886-1963, also known as Elsie Moll), a young woman who had worked as a saleswoman, milliner, and stenographer.'
p10798
aS'After a long courtship, he married her in 1909 over the objections of his parents, who considered her lower-class.'
p10799
aS'As The New York Times reported in an article in 2009, "Nobody from his family attended the wedding, and Stevens never again visited or spoke to his parents during his father\'s lifetime."'
p10800
aS'A daughter, Holly, was born in 1924.'
p10801
aS'Whitman is among the most influential poets in the American canon, often called the father of free verse.'
p10802
aS'His work was very controversial in its time, particularly his poetry collection Leaves of Grass, which was described as obscene for its overt sexuality.Born in Huntington on Long Island, Whitman worked as a journalist, a teacher, a government clerk, and--in addition to publishing his poetry--was a volunteer nurse during the American Civil War.'
p10803
aS'Early in his career, he also produced a temperance novel, Franklin Evans (1842).'
p10804
aS"Whitman's major work, Leaves of Grass, was first published in 1855 with his own money."
p10805
aS'The work was an attempt at reaching out to the common person with an American epic.'
p10806
aS'He continued expanding and revising it until his death in 1892.'
p10807
aS'After a stroke towards the end of his life, he moved to Camden, New Jersey, where his health further declined.'
p10808
aS'It was made into a film in 1947, with a remake directed by and starring Ben Stiller released in 2013.Mitty is a meek, mild man with a vivid fantasy life: in a few dozen paragraphs he imagines himself a wartime pilot, an emergency-room surgeon, and a devil-may-care killer.'
p10809
aS"The character's name has come into more general use to refer to an ineffectual dreamer and appears in several dictionaries."
p10810
aS'The American Heritage Dictionary defines a Walter_Mitty as "an ordinary, often ineffectual person who indulges in fantastic daydreams of personal triumphs".'
p10811
aS'The most famous of Thurber\'s inept male protagonists, the character is considered "the archetype for dreamy, hapless, Thurber Man".Although the story has humorous elements, there is a darker and more significant message underlying the text, leading to a more tragic interpretation of the Mitty character.'
p10812
aS'Even in his heroic daydreams, Mitty does not triumph, several fantasies being interrupted before the final one sees Mitty dying bravely in front of a firing squad.'
p10813
aS'In the brief snatches of reality that punctuate Mitty\'s fantasies the audience meets well-meaning but insensitive strangers who inadvertently rob Mitty of some of his remaining dignity. Use of the term When referencing actor Errol Flynn, Warner Brothers studio head, Jack L. Warner, noted in his autobiography, My First Hundred Years in Hollywood, "To the Walter_Mittys of the world he [Flynn] was all the heroes in one magnificent, sexy, animal package".In his 1992 biography of Henry Kissinger, Walter Isaacson records that on 6 October 1973, during the 1973 Arab Israeli War, Kissinger urged President Richard_Nixon\'s Chief of Staff General Alexander Haig to keep Nixon in Florida in order to avoid "any hysterical moves" and to "keep any Walter_Mitty tendencies under control".In the 1997 text Into Thin Air by Jon Krakauer--a personal account of the events of the 1996 Everest disaster--Krakauer states: "Walter_Mittys with Everest dreams need to bear in mind that when things go wrong up in the death zone (above 26,000 feet)--and sooner or later they always do--the strongest guides in the world may be powerless to save a client\'s life; indeed as the events of 1996 demonstrated, the strongest guides in the world are sometimes powerless to save even their own lives.'
p10814
aS'"In 2007, Automaker Ford admitted that it had to exclude from the list of potential bidders "Walter_Mitty" types who had dreams but no experience, prior to the sale of their Aston Martin British GT car brand to a consortium of business interests from America and the Middle East, headed by Prodrive founder and world rally championship owner David Richards.The Guardian reported on 20 April 2009 that a leaked British National Party training manual described some members as "liars, oddballs, and Walter_Mitty types".Terry Gilliam described his film Brazil as "Walter_Mitty Meets Franz_Kafka". British military slang Individuals who impersonate serving or retired members of the armed forces are known as "Walts" in the British Armed Forces, a shortened form of the name "Walter_Mitty".'
p10815
aS"Famous titles include Ivanhoe, Rob Roy, Old Mortality, The Lady of the Lake, Waverley, The Heart of Midlothian and The Bride of Lammermoor.Although primarily remembered for his extensive literary works and his political engagement, Scott was an advocate, judge and legal administrator by profession, and throughout his career combined his writing and editing work with his daily occupation as Clerk of Session and Sheriff-Depute of Selkirkshire.A prominent member of the Tory establishment in Edinburgh, Scott was an active member of the Highland Society and served a long term as President of the Royal Society of Edinburgh (1820-32). Biography  Early days The son of a Writer to the Signet (solicitor), Scott was born in 1771 in his Presbyterian family's third floor flat on College Wynd in the Old Town of Edinburgh, a narrow alleyway leading from the Grassmarket to the gates of the old University of Edinburgh."
p10816
aS'He survived a childhood bout of polio in 1773 that left him lame, a condition that was to have a significant effect on his life and writing.'
p10817
aS"To cure his lameness he was sent in 1773 to live in the rural Scottish Borders at his paternal grandparents' farm at Sandyknowe, adjacent to the ruin of Smailholm Tower, the earlier family home."
p10818
aS'Here he was taught to read by his aunt Jenny, and learned from her the speech patterns and many of the tales and legends that characterised much of his work.'
p10819
aS'In January 1775 he returned to Edinburgh, and that summer went with his aunt Jenny to take spa treatment at Bath in England, where they lived at 6 South Parade.'
p10820
aS'In the winter of 1776 he went back to Sandyknowe, with another attempt at a water cure at Prestonpans during the following summer.In 1778, Scott returned to Edinburgh for private education to prepare him for school, and joined his family in their new house built as one of the first in George Square.'
p10821
aS'In October 1779 he began at the Royal High School of Edinburgh.'
p10822
aS"It is considered Tolstoy's finest literary achievement, along with his other major prose work, Anna_Karenina (1873-1877).War_and_Peace delineates in graphic detail events surrounding the French invasion of Russia, and the impact of the Napoleonic era on Tsarist society, as seen through the eyes of five Russian aristocratic families."
p10823
aS'Portions of an earlier version of the novel, then known as The Year 1805, were serialized in the magazine The Russian Messenger between 1865 and 1867.'
p10824
aS'The novel was first published in its entirety in 1869.'
p10825
aS'Newsweek in 2009 ranked it first in its list of the Top 100 Books.'
p10826
aS'In 2003, the novel was listed at number 20 on the BBC\'s survey The Big Read.Tolstoy himself, somewhat enigmatically, said of War_and_Peace that it was "not a novel, even less is it a poem, and still less a historical chronicle".'
p10827
aS'Large sections of the work, especially in the later chapters, are philosophical discussion rather than narrative.'
p10828
aS'He went on to elaborate that the best Russian literature does not conform to standards and hence hesitated to call War_and_Peace a novel.'
p10829
aS'The war resolved many issues which remained from the American Revolutionary War but involved no boundary changes.'
p10830
aS'The United_States declared war on June 18, 1812 for several reasons, including trade restrictions brought about by the British war with France, the impressment of American merchant sailors into the Royal Navy, British support of Indian tribes against American expansion, outrage over insults to national honor after humiliations on the high seas, and possible American interest in annexing British territory in modern-day Canada.The war was fought in three principal theatres.'
p10831
aS"Firstly, at sea, warships and privateers of each side attacked the other's merchant ships, while the British blockaded the Atlantic coast of the United_States and mounted large raids in the later stages of the war."
p10832
aS'Secondly, land and naval battles were fought on the American-Canadian frontier, which ran along the Great Lakes, the Saint Lawrence River and the northern end of Lake Champlain.'
p10833
aS"Thirdly, the American South and Gulf Coast also saw big land battles, in which the American forces defeated Britain's Indian allies and a British invasion force at New_Orleans."
p10834
aS'At the end of the war both sides signed the Treaty of Ghent and both parties returned occupied land to its pre-war owner and resumed friendly trade relations.With the majority of its land and naval forces tied down in Europe fighting the Napoleonic Wars, the British used a defensive strategy in the Provinces of Upper and Lower Canada, repelling initial American invasions.'
p10835
aS'Early victories over poorly led American armies such as the Battle of Queenston Heights, demonstrated that the conquest of the Canadas would prove more difficult than anticipated.'
p10836
aS'Austria was supported by Great Britain and the Dutch Republic, the traditional enemies of France, as well as the Kingdom of Sardinia and the Electorate of Saxony.'
p10837
aS"France and Prussia were allied with the Electorate of Bavaria.Spain, which had been at war with Britain over colonies and trade ever since 1739, entered the war on the Continent to re-establish its influence in northern Italy, further reversing an Austrian dominance over the Italian peninsula that had been achieved at Spain's expense as a consequence of Spain's war of succession earlier in the 18th century.The war ended with the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle in 1748, by which Maria Theresa was confirmed as Archduchess of Austria and Queen of Hungary, but Prussia retained control of Silesia. Background In 1740, after the death of her father, Charles VI, Maria Theresa succeeded him as Queen of Hungary, Croatia and Bohemia, Archduchess of Austria and Duchess of Parma."
p10838
aS'Her father had been Holy Roman Emperor, but Maria Theresa was not a candidate for that title, which had never been held by a woman; the plan was for her to succeed to the hereditary domains, and her husband, Francis Stephen, to be elected Holy Roman Emperor.'
p10839
aS'The complications involved in a female Habsburg ruler had been long foreseen, and Charles VI had persuaded most of the states of Germany to agree to the Pragmatic Sanction of 1713.Problems began when King Frederick II of Prussia violated the Pragmatic Sanction and invaded Silesia on 16 December 1740, using the 1537 Treaty of Brieg (under which the Hohenzollerns of Brandenburg were to inherit the Duchy of Brieg) as a pretext.'
p10840
aS'Maria Theresa, as a woman, was perceived as weak, and other rulers (such as Charles Albert of Bavaria) put forward their own competing claims to the crown as male heirs with a clear genealogical basis to inherit the elected dignities of the great Imperial title. Strategies For much of the eighteenth century, France approached its wars in the same way.'
p10841
aS'It would let its colonies defend themselves, or would offer only minimal help (sending them only limited numbers of troops or inexperienced soldiers), anticipating that fights for the colonies would likely be lost anyway.'
p10842
aS'This strategy was, to a degree, forced upon France: geography, coupled with the superiority of the British navy, made it difficult for the French navy to provide significant supplies and support to French colonies.'
p10843
aS"The slight amount of fighting in Poland resulted in the accession of Augustus III, who in addition to Russia and Saxony, was politically supported by the Habsburgs.The war's major military campaigns occurred outside Poland."
p10844
aS'The Bourbons, supported by Charles Emmanuel III of Sardinia, moved against isolated Habsburg territories.'
p10845
aS'In the Rhineland France successfully took the Duchy of Lorraine, and in Italy Spain regained control over the kingdoms of Naples and Sicily (lost in the War_of_the_Spanish_Succession), while territorial gains in northern Italy were limited despite bloody campaigning.'
p10846
aS"Great Britain's unwillingness to support Habsburg Austria demonstrated major cracks in the Anglo-Austrian Alliance and may have contributed to Austria's military failures.Although a preliminary peace was reached in 1735, the war was formally ended with the Treaty of Vienna (1738) in which Augustus III was confirmed as king of Poland and his opponent Stanislaw I (who had received virtually no foreign military support) was awarded the Duchy of Lorraine."
p10847
aS'Francis Stephen, the duke of Lorraine, was given the Grand Duchy of Tuscany in compensation for the loss of Lorraine.'
p10848
aS'The Duchy of Parma went to Austria whereas Charles of Parma took the crowns of Naples and Sicily, resulting in territorial gains for the Bourbons.'
p10849
aS'Poland also gave up claims to Livonia and direct control over the Duchy of Courland and Semigallia, which, although remaining a Polish fief, was not integrated into Poland proper, and came under strong Russian influence. Background Ever since the death of Sigismund II Augustus in 1572, Polish monarchs were elected by the Polish nobility.'
p10850
aS'Attempts to solve the problem by partitioning the empire between the eligible candidates from the royal Houses of France (Bourbon), Austria (Habsburg), and Bavaria (Wittelsbach) ultimately failed, and on his deathbed Charles II fixed the entire Spanish inheritance on Philip, Duke of Anjou, the second-eldest grandson of King Louis_XIV_of_France.'
p10851
aS'With Philip ruling in Spain, Louis XIV would secure great advantages for his dynasty, but some statesmen regarded a dominant House of Bourbon as a threat to European stability, jeopardising the balance of power.Louis XIV had good reasons for accepting his grandson on the Spanish thrones, but he subsequently made a series of controversial moves: he sent troops to secure the Spanish Netherlands (the buffer zone between France and the Dutch Republic); he sought to dominate the Spanish American trade at the expense of English and Dutch merchants; and he refused to remove Philip from the French line of succession, thereby opening the possibility of France and Spain uniting under a single powerful monarch at a future date.'
p10852
aS"To counter Louis XIV's growing dominance England, the Dutch Republic, and Austria - together with their allies in the Holy Roman Empire - re-formed the Grand Alliance (1701) and supported Emperor Leopold I's claim to the whole Spanish inheritance for his second son, Archduke Charles."
p10853
aS'By backing the Habsburg candidate (known to his supporters as King Charles III of Spain) each member of the coalition sought to reduce the power of France, ensure their own territorial and dynastic security, and restore and improve the trade opportunities they had enjoyed under Charles II.The English, the Dutch and the Austrians formally declared war in May 1702.'
p10854
aS"By 1708 the Duke of Marlborough and Prince Eugene of Savoy had secured victory in the Spanish Netherlands and in Italy, and had defeated Louis XIV's ally, Bavaria."
p10855
aS'France faced invasion and ruin, but Allied unity broke first.'
p10856
aS'With the Grand Alliance defeated in Spain, and with its casualties mounting and aims diverging, the Tories came to power in Great Britain in 1710 and resolved to end the war.'
p10857
aS'They were fought in several sporadic episodes between 1455 and 1487, although there was related fighting before and after this period.'
p10858
aS"The conflict resulted from social and financial troubles that followed the Hundred Years' War, combined with the mental infirmity and weak rule of Henry VI, which revived interest in the alternative claim to the throne of Richard, Duke of York.The final victory went to a claimant of the Lancastrian party, Henry Tudor, who defeated the last Yorkist king, Richard III, at the Battle_of_Bosworth_Field."
p10859
aS'After assuming the throne as Henry VII, Henry Tudor married Elizabeth of York, the eldest daughter and heiress of Edward IV, thereby uniting the two claims.'
p10860
aS'The House of Tudor ruled England and Wales until 1603. Name and symbols The name Wars_of_the_Roses refers to the Heraldic badges associated with the two royal houses, the White Rose of York and the Red Rose of Lancaster.'
p10861
aS'Wars_of_the_Roses came into common use in the nineteenth century, after the publication of Anne of Geierstein by Sir Walter_Scott.'
p10862
aS"Scott based the name on a scene in William_Shakespeare's play Henry VI Part 1, set in the gardens of the Temple Church, where a number of noblemen and a lawyer pick red or white roses to show their loyalty to the Lancastrian or Yorkist faction respectively."
p10863
aS"The Yorkist faction used the symbol of the white rose from early in the conflict, but the Lancastrian red rose was apparently introduced only after the victory of Henry Tudor at the Battle of Bosworth, when it was combined with the Yorkist white rose to form the Tudor rose, which symbolised the union of the two houses; the origins of the Rose as a cognizance itself stem from Edward I's use of a golden rose stalked proper."
p10864
aS'That action was the first move in a surprise attack against the Hessian forces at Trenton, New Jersey, in the Battle_of_Trenton.The original was part of the collection at the Kunsthalle in Bremen, Germany, and was destroyed in a British air raid in 1942, during World_War_II.'
p10865
aS'Leutze painted two more versions, one of which is now in the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New_York_City.'
p10866
aS'The other was in the West Wing reception area of the White House, but is now in possession of The Minnesota Marine Art Museum in Winona, Minnesota. History German-born Emanuel Gottlieb Leutze (1816-1868) grew up in America, then returned to Germany as an adult, where he conceived of the idea for this painting during the Revolutions of 1848.'
p10867
aS"Hoping to encourage Europe's liberal reformers through the example of the American Revolution, and using American tourists and art students as models and assistants, among them Worthington Whittredge and Andreas Achenbach, Leutze finished the first painting in 1850."
p10868
aS'Just after it was completed, the first version was damaged by fire in his studio, subsequently restored, and acquired by the Kunsthalle Bremen.'
p10869
aS"In 1942, during World_War_II, it was destroyed in a bombing raid by the British Royal Air Force, which has led to a persistent joke that the raid was Britain's final retaliation for the American Revolution.The second painting, a full-sized replica of the first, was begun in 1850 and placed on exhibition in New York in October 1851."
p10870
aS'More than 50,000 people viewed it.'
p10871
aS'Irving served as the U.S. ambassador to Spain from 1842 to 1846.He made his literary debut in 1802 with a series of observational letters to the Morning Chronicle, written under the pseudonym Jonathan Oldstyle.'
p10872
aS'After moving to England for the family business in 1815, he achieved international fame with the publication of The Sketch Book of Geoffrey Crayon, Gent.'
p10873
aS'in 1819-20.'
p10874
aS'He continued to publish regularly -- and almost always successfully -- throughout his life, and just eight months before his death (at age 76, in Tarrytown, New York), completed a five-volume biography of George_Washington.Irving, along with James_Fenimore_Cooper, was among the first American writers to earn acclaim in Europe, and Irving encouraged American authors such as Nathaniel_Hawthorne, Herman Melville, Henry_Wadsworth_Longfellow, and Edgar Allan Poe.'
p10875
aS'Irving was also admired by some European writers, including Walter_Scott, Lord Byron, Thomas Campbell, Francis Jeffrey, and Charles Dickens.'
p10876
aS"As America's first genuine internationally best-selling author, Irving advocated for writing as a legitimate profession, and argued for stronger laws to protect American writers from copyright infringement. BiographyEdit  Early yearsEdit Washington_Irving's parents were William Irving, Sr., originally of Quholm, Shapinsay, Orkney, and Sarah (nee Sanders), Scottish-English immigrants."
p10877
aS'They married in 1761 while William was serving as a petty officer in the British Navy.'
p10878
aS'He is credited with painting one of the first purely abstract works.'
p10879
aS'Born in Moscow, Kandinsky spent his childhood in Odessa, where he graduated at Grekov Odessa Art school.'
p10880
aS'He enrolled at the University of Moscow, studying law and economics.'
p10881
aS"Successful in his profession--he was offered a professorship (chair of Roman Law) at the University of Dorpat--Kandinsky began painting studies (life-drawing, sketching and anatomy) at the age of 30.In 1896 Kandinsky settled in Munich, studying first at Anton Azbe's private school and then at the Academy of Fine Arts."
p10882
aS'He returned to Moscow in 1914, after the outbreak of World_War_I. Kandinsky was unsympathetic to the official theories on art in Communist Moscow, and returned to Germany in 1921.'
p10883
aS'There, he taught at the Bauhaus school of art and architecture from 1922 until the Nazis closed it in 1933.'
p10884
aS'He then moved to France, where he lived for the rest of his life, becoming a French citizen in 1939 and producing some of his most prominent art.'
p10885
aS'It has introduced to readers many of the best-known characters in Chinese literature, such as Wu Song, Lin Chong and Lu Zhishen. Historical context and development Water_Margin was based on the exploits of the outlaw Song Jiang and his 36 companions.'
p10886
aS'The group was active in the Huainan region and surrendered to the Song government in 1121.'
p10887
aS'They were recorded in the historical text History of Song.'
p10888
aS'The name of "Song Jiang" also appeared in the biography of Emperor Huizong of Song, which stated:The outlaw Song Jiang of Huainan and others attacked the army at Huaiyang, (the Emperor) sent generals to attack and arrest them.'
p10889
aS'(The outlaws) infringed on east of the capital (Kaifeng), Hebei, and entered the boundaries of Chu (referring to present-day Hubei and Hunan) and Haizhou (covering parts of present-day Jiangsu).'
p10890
aS"The prefect Zhang Shuye was ordered to pacify them.Zhang Shuye's biography further described Song Jiang and the outlaws' activities and how they were eventually defeated by Zhang.Folk stories of Song Jiang circulated during the Southern Song."
p10891
aS"The first source to name Song Jiang's 36 companions was Miscellaneous observations from the year of Guixin (Gui Xin Za Shi ) by Zhou Mi, written in the 13th century."
p10892
aS'Some of the music is also preserved in arrangement for a smaller orchestra; this version is not suitable for outdoor performance, as the sound of stringed instruments does not carry well in the open air. Structure The Water Music opens with a French overture and includes minuets, bourrees and hornpipes.'
p10893
aS'It is divided into three suites: Suite in F major (HWV 348) Overture (Largo - Allegro)Adagio e staccatoAllegro - Andante - Allegro da capo AriaMinuetAirMinuetBourreeHornpipeAllegro (no actual tempo marking)Allegro (variant)Alla Hornpipe (variant) Suite in D major (HWV 349) Overture (Allegro)Alla HornpipeMinuetLentementBourree Suite in G major (HWV 350) AllegroRigaudonAllegroMinuetAllegroThere is evidence for the different arrangement found in Chrysander\'s Gesellschaft edition of Handel\'s works (in volume 47, published in 1886), where the movements from the "suites" in D and G were mingled and published as one work with HWV 348.'
p10894
aS"This sequence derives from Samuel Arnold's first edition of the complete score in 1788 and the manuscript copies dating from Handel's lifetime."
p10895
aS"Chrysander's edition also contains an earlier version of the first two movements of HWV 349 in the key of F major composed in 1715 (originally scored for two natural horns, two oboes, bassoon, strings and continuo), where in addition to the horn fanfares and orchestral responses, the original version contained an elaborate concerto-like first violin part.The music in each of the suites has no set order today. First performance The first performance of the Water Music suites is recorded in the Daily Courant, a London newspaper."
p10896
aS'At about 8 p.m. on Wednesday, 17 July 1717, King George I and several aristocrats boarded a royal barge at Whitehall Palace for an excursion up the Thames toward Chelsea.'
p10897
aS'The rising tide propelled the barge upstream without rowing.'
p10898
aS"Another barge provided by the City of London contained about fifty musicians who performed Handel's music."
p10899
aS'Water is a liquid at standard ambient temperature and pressure, but it often co-exists on Earth with its solid state, ice; and gaseous state, steam (water vapor).'
p10900
aS"It also exists as snow, fog, dew and cloud.Water covers 71% of the Earth's surface."
p10901
aS'It is vital for all known forms of life.'
p10902
aS"On Earth, 96.5% of the planet's water is found in seas and oceans, 1.7% in groundwater, 1.7% in glaciers and the ice caps of Antarctica and Greenland, a small fraction in other large water bodies, and 0.001% in the air as vapor, clouds (formed of ice and liquid water suspended in air), and precipitation."
p10903
aS"Only 2.5% of the Earth's water is freshwater, and 98.8% of that water is in ice (excepting ice in clouds) and groundwater."
p10904
aS"Less than 0.3% of all freshwater is in rivers, lakes, and the atmosphere, and an even smaller amount of the Earth's freshwater (0.003%) is contained within biological bodies and manufactured products.Water on Earth moves continually through the water cycle of evaporation and transpiration (evapotranspiration), condensation, precipitation, and runoff, usually reaching the sea."
p10905
aS'Evaporation and transpiration contribute to the precipitation over land.'
p10906
aS'D-503 lives in the One State, an urban nation constructed almost entirely of glass, which allows the secret police/spies to inform on and supervise the public more easily.'
p10907
aS'The structure of the state is analogous to the prison design concept developed by Jeremy_Bentham commonly referred to as the Panopticon.'
p10908
aS'Furthermore, life is organized to promote maximum productive efficiency along the lines of the system advocated by the hugely influential F. W. Taylor.'
p10909
aS'People march in step with each other and wear identical clothing.'
p10910
aS'There is no way of referring to people save by their given numbers.'
p10911
aS'The society is run strictly by logic or reason as the primary justification for the laws or the construct of the society.'
p10912
aS"The individual's behaviour is based on logic by way of formulas and equations outlined by the One State. Plot One thousand years after the One State's conquest of the entire world, the spaceship Integral is being built in order to invade and conquer extraterrestrial planets."
p10913
aS'The theory of the weak interaction is sometimes called quantum flavordynamics (QFD), in analogy with the terms QCD and QED, but the term is rarely used because the weak force is best understood in terms of electro-weak theory (EWT).In the Standard Model of particle physics, the weak interaction is caused by the emission or absorption of W and Z bosons.'
p10914
aS'All known fermions interact through the weak interaction.'
p10915
aS'Fermions are particles that have half-integer spin (one of the fundamental properties of particles).'
p10916
aS'A fermion can be an elementary particle, such as the electron, or it can be a composite particle, such as the proton.'
p10917
aS'The masses of W+, W-, and Z bosons are each far greater than that of protons or neutrons, consistent with the short range of the weak force.'
p10918
aS'The force is termed weak because its field strength over a given distance is typically several orders of magnitude less than that of the strong nuclear force and electromagnetic force.During the quark epoch, the electroweak force split into the electromagnetic and weak forces.'
p10919
aS'Most fermions will decay by a weak interaction over time.'
p10920
aS'It became law in 1791, and was intended to generate revenue to help reduce the national debt.'
p10921
aS'Although the tax applied to all distilled spirits, whiskey was by far the most popular distilled beverage in the 18th-century U.S. Because of this, the excise became widely known as a "whiskey tax".'
p10922
aS"The new excise was a part of U.S. treasury secretary Alexander_Hamilton's program to fund war debt incurred during the American Revolutionary War.The tax was resisted by farmers in the western frontier regions who were long accustomed to distilling their surplus grain and corn into whiskey."
p10923
aS'In these regions, whiskey was sufficiently popular that it often served as a medium of exchange.'
p10924
aS'Many of the resisters were war veterans who believed that they were fighting for the principles of the American Revolution, in particular against taxation without local representation, while the U.S. federal government maintained the taxes were the legal expression of the taxation powers of Congress.Throughout counties in Western Pennsylvania, protesters used violence and intimidation to prevent federal officials from collecting the tax.'
p10925
aS'Resistance came to a climax in July 1794, when a U.S. marshal arrived in western Pennsylvania to serve writs to distillers who had not paid the excise.'
p10926
aS'The alarm was raised, and more than 500 armed men attacked the fortified home of tax inspector General John Neville.'
p10927
aS'Qing control weakened and prosperity diminished by the 19th century.The rebellion is estimated to have caused the deaths of some 100,000 rebels. The White Lotus Society The White_Lotus_Rebellion began as a tax protest led by the White Lotus Society, a secret religious society.'
p10928
aS'The White Lotus Society is traditionally considered to have first appeared during the 14th century under the Mongol-led Yuan dynasty.'
p10929
aS'The Red Turban Rebellion which took place in 1352, was led by the White Lotus group.'
p10930
aS'By 1387, after more than 30 years of war, their leader, Zhu Yuanzhang conquered the North China Plain and occupied the Yuan capital Khanbaliq (present-day Beijing).'
p10931
aS'Having attained the Mandate of Heaven and the status of Emperor, Zhu Yuanzhang named his period of reign "Hongwu" (thus he was known as the Hongwu Emperor) and founded a new dynasty - the Ming dynasty.'
p10932
aS'The group later reemerged in the late 18th century in the form of an inspired Chinese movement.Though many movements and rebellions were considered by imperial bureaucrats to have been led by White Lotus Society leaders, there is reason to doubt that the White Lotus Society had any organizational unity.'
p10933
aS'BJ Ter Haar has argued that the term "White Lotus" was used primarily by Ming and Qing imperial bureaucrats to disparagingly explain a wide range of unconnected millenarian traditions, rebel movements, and popular religious practices.'
p10934
aS'It is widely considered DeLillo\'s "breakout" work and brought him to the attention of a much larger audience.'
p10935
aS'Time included the novel in its Time 100 Best English-language Novels from 1923 to 2005.'
p10936
aS'DeLillo originally wanted to call the book Panasonic, but the Panasonic Corporation objected.White Noise explores several themes that emerged during the mid-to-late twentieth century, e.g., rampant consumerism, media saturation, novelty academic intellectualism, underground conspiracies, the disintegration and reintegration of the family, human-made disasters, and the potentially regenerative nature of human violence.'
p10937
aS'The novel\'s style is characterized by a heterogeneity that utilizes "montages of tones, styles, and voices that have the effect of yoking together terror and wild humor as the essential tone of contemporary America.'
p10938
aS'" Plot Set at a bucolic Midwestern college known only as The-College-on-the-Hill, White Noise follows a year in the life of Jack Gladney, a professor who has made his name by pioneering the field of Hitler studies (though he hasn\'t taken German language lessons until this year).'
p10939
aS'He has been married five times to four women and rears a brood of children and stepchildren (Heinrich, Denise, Steffie, Wilder) with his current wife, Babette.'
p10940
aS'Jack and Babette are both extremely afraid of death; they frequently wonder which of them will be the first to die.'
p10941
aS'It examines the breakdown of the marriage of a middle-aged couple, Martha and George.'
p10942
aS'Late one evening, after a university faculty party, they receive an unwitting younger couple, Nick and Honey, as guests, and draw them into their bitter and frustrated relationship.'
p10943
aS'The play is in three acts, normally taking a little less than three hours to perform, with two 10-minute intermissions.'
p10944
aS'The title is a pun on the song "Who\'s Afraid of the Big Bad Wolf?"'
p10945
aS"from Walt Disney's Three Little Pigs (1933), substituting the name of the celebrated English author Virginia_Woolf."
p10946
aS"Martha and George repeatedly sing this version of the song throughout the play.Who's Afraid of Virginia_Woolf?"
p10947
aS"won both the 1963 Tony Award for Best Play and the 1962-63 New York Drama Critics' Circle Award for Best Play."
p10948
aS'He is widely regarded as the "father of experimental psychology".'
p10949
aS'In 1879, Wundt founded the first formal laboratory for psychological research at the University of Leipzig.'
p10950
aS'This marked psychology as an independent field of study.'
p10951
aS'A Review of General Psychology survey, published in 2002, ranked Wundt as the 93rd most cited psychologist of the 20th century, tied with Edwin Boring, John_Dewey, and Amos Tversky.By creating this laboratory he was able to explore the nature of religious beliefs, identify mental disorders and abnormal behavior, and find damaged parts of the brain.'
p10952
aS'In doing so, he was able to establish psychology as a separate science from other topics.'
p10953
aS'He also formed the first academic journal for psychological research, Philosophische Studien, in the year 1883.Wundt concentrated on three areas of mental functioning; thoughts, images and feelings.'
p10954
aS'These are the basic areas studied today in Cognitive psychology.'
p10955
aS'In 1923 she was awarded the Pulitzer Prize for One of Ours (1922), a novel set during World_War_I.Cather grew up in Virginia and Nebraska, and graduated from the University of Nebraska-Lincoln.'
p10956
aS'She lived and worked in Pittsburgh for ten years.'
p10957
aS"At the age of 33 she moved to New_York_City, her primary home for the rest of her life, though she also traveled widely and spent considerable time at her summer residence in New Brunswick, Canada. Early life and education Cather was born Wilella Sibert Cather in 1873 on her maternal grandmother's farm in the Back Creek Valley near Winchester, Virginia (see Willa_Cather Birthplace)."
p10958
aS'Her father was Charles Fectigue Cather (d. 1928), whose family had lived on land in the valley for six generations.'
p10959
aS"Cather's family originated in Wales, the family name deriving from Cadair Idris, a mountain range in northwestern Wales."
p10960
aS':13 Her mother was Mary Virginia Boak (died 1931), a former school teacher.'
p10961
aS"Within a year of Cather's birth, the family moved to Willow Shade, a Greek Revival-style home on 130 acres given to them by her paternal grandparents.At the urging of Charles Cathers' parents, the family moved to Nebraska in 1883 when Willa was nine years old."
p10962
aS'He filled the Edgar Pierce Chair of Philosophy at Harvard from 1956 to 1978.'
p10963
aS'A recent poll conducted among analytic philosophers named Quine as the fifth most important philosopher of the past two centuries.'
p10964
aS'He won the first Schock Prize in Logic and Philosophy in 1993 for "his systematical and penetrating discussions of how learning of language and communication are based on socially available evidence and of the consequences of this for theories on knowledge and linguistic meaning."'
p10965
aS'In 1996 he was awarded the Kyoto Prize in Arts and Philosophy for his "outstanding contributions to the progress of philosophy in the 20th century by proposing numerous theories based on keen insights in logic, epistemology, philosophy of science and philosophy of language.'
p10966
aS'"Quine falls squarely into the analytic philosophy tradition while also being the main proponent of the view that philosophy is not conceptual analysis but the abstract branch of the empirical sciences.'
p10967
aS'His major writings include "Two_Dogmas_of_Empiricism" (1951), which attacked the distinction between analytic and synthetic propositions and advocated a form of semantic holism, and Word and Object (1960), which further developed these positions and introduced Quine\'s famous indeterminacy of translation thesis, advocating a behaviorist theory of meaning.'
p10968
aS'He also developed an influential naturalized epistemology that tried to provide "an improved scientific explanation of how we have developed elaborate scientific theories on the basis of meager sensory input."'
p10969
aS'The group also consists of Robert_Frost, who was born in 1874; Wallace_Stevens, who was born in 1879; and Hilda "H.D."'
p10970
aS'Doolittle, who was born in 1886.'
p10971
aS'Of these four, Williams died last, several weeks after Frost.'
p10972
aS'(Stevens was first to die, in 1955, while H.D.'
p10973
aS'lived until 1961).In addition to his writing, Williams had a long career as a physician practicing both pediatrics and general medicine.'
p10974
aS"He was affiliated with what was then known as Passaic General Hospital in Passaic, New Jersey, where he served as the hospital's chief of pediatrics from 1924 until his death."
p10975
aS'The hospital, which is now known as St. Mary\'s General Hospital, pays tribute to Williams with a memorial plaque that states "we walk the wards that Williams walked". Life and career Williams was born in Rutherford, New Jersey.'
p10976
aS'20, 1820), a doctor and later a state legislator, and Sarah Snell (b. Dec. 4, 1768, d. May 6, 1847).'
p10977
aS"The genealogies of both of his parents trace back to passengers on the Mayflower; his mother's to John Alden (b."
p10978
aS"1599, d. 1687); his father's to Francis Cooke (b."
p10979
aS"1577, d. 1663).He was also a nephew of Charity Bryant, a Vermont seamstress who is the subject of Rachel Hope Cleves' 2014 book Charity and Sylvia: A Same-Sex Marriage in Early America.Bryant and his family moved to a new home when he was two years old."
p10980
aS'The William_Cullen_Bryant Homestead, his boyhood home, is now a museum.'
p10981
aS'After just one year at Williams College (he entered with sophomore standing), he hoped to transfer to Yale,but a talk with his father led to the realization that family finances would not support it.'
p10982
aS'His father counseled a legal career as his best available choice, and the disappointed poet began to study law in Worthington and Bridgewater in Massachusetts.'
p10983
aS'He is primarily known for his novels and short stories set in the fictional Yoknapatawpha County, based on Lafayette County, Mississippi, where he spent most of his life.Faulkner is one of the most celebrated writers in American literature generally and Southern literature specifically.'
p10984
aS'Though his work was published as early as 1919, and largely during the 1920s and 1930s, Faulkner was relatively unknown until receiving the 1949 Nobel Prize in Literature, for which he became the only Mississippi-born Nobel laureate.'
p10985
aS'Two of his works, A Fable (1954) and his last novel The Reivers (1962), won the Pulitzer Prize for Fiction.'
p10986
aS'In 1998, the Modern Library ranked his 1929 novel The Sound and the Fury sixth on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century; also on the list were As I Lay Dying (1930) and Light in August (1932).'
p10987
aS'Absalom, Absalom!'
p10988
aS'(1936) is often included on similar lists. Biography Faulkner was born in New Albany, Mississippi, the first of four sons of Murry Cuthbert Falkner (August 17, 1870 - August 7, 1932) and Maud Butler (November 27, 1871 - October 19, 1960).'
p10989
aS'He had three younger brothers: Murry Charles "Jack" Falkner (June 26, 1899 - December 24, 1975), author John Falkner (September 24, 1901 - March 28, 1963) and Dean Swift Falkner (August 15, 1907 - November 10, 1935).'
p10990
aS'He was a fellow of the Royal Society of Literature.'
p10991
aS'In 2008, The Times ranked Golding third on their list of "The 50 greatest British writers since 1945". Biography  Early life William_Golding was born in his grandmother\'s house, 47 Mount Wise, Newquay, Cornwall, and he spent many childhood holidays there.'
p10992
aS'He grew up in Marlborough, Wiltshire, where his father (Alec Golding) was a science master at Marlborough Grammar School (1905 to retirement).'
p10993
aS'Alec Golding was a socialist who advocated science-inspired rationalism, and the young Golding and his elder brother Joseph attended the school where his father taught.'
p10994
aS'His mother, Mildred (Curnoe), kept house at 29, The Green, Marlborough, and was a campaigner for female suffrage.'
p10995
aS'In 1930 Golding went to Brasenose College, Oxford, where he read Natural Sciences for two years before transferring to English Literature.Golding took his B.A.'
p10996
aS"degree with Second Class Honours in the summer of 1934, and later that year a book of his Poems was published by Macmillan & Co, with the help of his Oxford friend, the anthroposophist Adam Bittleston.He was a schoolmaster teaching Philosophy and English in 1939, then just English from 1945 to 1962 at Bishop Wordsworth's School, Salisbury, Wiltshire. Marriage and family Golding married Ann Brookfield, an analytic chemist, on 30 September 1939."
p10997
aS'He was one of the most influential teachers at Yale or any major schools.'
p10998
aS'Sumner was a polymath with numerous books and essays on American history, economic history, political theory, sociology, and anthropology.'
p10999
aS'He introduced the term "ethnocentrism" to identify the roots of imperialism, which he strongly opposed.'
p11000
aS'He was a spokesman against imperialism and in favor of the "forgotten man" of the middle class and had a long-term influence on Conservatism in the United_States. Biography Born in Paterson, New Jersey, Sumner graduated from Yale College in 1863, where he had been a member of Skull and Bones.'
p11001
aS'During the late 1860s Sumner was an Episcopal priest.'
p11002
aS'In 1872, Sumner accepted the chair of Political Economy at Yale University. Economics Sumner was a staunch advocate of laissez-faire economics, as well as "a forthright proponent of free trade and the gold standard and a foe of socialism."'
p11003
aS'Sumner was active in the intellectual promotion of free-trade classical liberalism.'
p11004
aS"Although regarded as the leading contender for the party's presidential nomination in 1860, he was defeated by Abraham Lincoln.Seward was born in southeastern New York, where his father, a farmer, owned slaves."
p11005
aS'He became educated as a lawyer, moving to the Western New York town of Auburn.'
p11006
aS'Seward was elected to the New York State Senate in 1830 as an Anti-Mason.'
p11007
aS"Four years later, he became the Whig Party's gubernatorial nominee."
p11008
aS'Though he was not successful in that race, Seward was elected governor in 1838, winning a second two-year term in 1840.'
p11009
aS'During this period, he signed several laws advancing the rights and opportunities for black residents, as well as guaranteeing fugitive slaves jury trials in the state, protecting abolitionists, and using his position to intervene in cases of free blacks enslaved in the South.After several years practicing law in Auburn, he was elected by the state legislature to the U.S. Senate in 1849.'
p11010
aS"Seward's strong stances and provocative words against slavery brought him hatred in the South."
p11011
aS'He demanded "Free Silver" because it reduced power attributed to money and put more money in the hands of the people.'
p11012
aS'He was a peace advocate, a supporter of Prohibition, and an opponent of Darwinism on religious and humanitarian grounds.'
p11013
aS'With his deep, commanding voice and wide travels, he was one of the best-known orators and lecturers of the era.'
p11014
aS'Because of his faith in the wisdom of the common people, he was called "The Great Commoner.'
p11015
aS'"In the intensely fought 1896 and 1900 elections, he was defeated by William_McKinley but retained control of the Democratic Party.'
p11016
aS'With over 500 speeches in 1896, Bryan invented the national stumping tour, in an era when other presidential candidates stayed home.'
p11017
aS'In his three presidential bids, he promoted Free Silver in 1896, anti-imperialism in 1900, and trust-busting in 1908, calling on Democrats to fight the trusts (big corporations) and big banks, and embrace anti-elitist ideals of republicanism.'
p11018
aS"His mother, Anne Becher (1792-1864), was the second daughter of Harriet Becher and John Harman Becher, who was also a secretary (writer) for the East India Company.William's father, Richmond, died in 1815, which caused his mother to send him to England in 1816 (whilst she remained in India)."
p11019
aS'The ship on which he travelled made a short stopover at St. Helena where the imprisoned Napoleon was pointed out to him.'
p11020
aS'Once in England he was educated at schools in Southampton and Chiswick and then at Charterhouse School, where he was a close friend of John Leech.'
p11021
aS'He disliked Charterhouse, parodying it in his later fiction as "Slaughterhouse".'
p11022
aS'(Nevertheless, Thackeray was honoured in the Charterhouse Chapel with a monument after his death.)'
p11023
aS'Illness in his last year there (during which he reportedly grew to his full height of 6\' 3") postponed his matriculation at Trinity College, Cambridge, until February 1829.'
p11024
aS'Never too keen on academic studies, he left the University in 1830, though some of his earliest writing appeared in university publications The Snob and The Gownsman.He travelled for some time on the continent, visiting Paris and Weimar, where he met Goethe.'
p11025
aS'After the war, he settled in Canton, Ohio, where he practiced law and married Ida Saxton.'
p11026
aS"In 1876, he was elected to Congress, where he became the Republican Party's expert on the protective tariff, which he promised would bring prosperity."
p11027
aS'His 1890 McKinley Tariff was highly controversial; which together with a Democratic redistricting aimed at gerrymandering him out of office, led to his defeat in the Democratic landslide of 1890.'
p11028
aS"He was elected Ohio's governor in 1891 and 1893, steering a moderate course between capital and labor interests."
p11029
aS'With the aid of his close adviser Mark Hanna, he secured the Republican nomination for president in 1896, amid a deep economic depression.'
p11030
aS'He defeated his Democratic rival, William_Jennings_Bryan, after a front-porch campaign in which he advocated "sound money" (the gold standard unless altered by international agreement) and promised that high tariffs would restore prosperity.Rapid economic growth marked McKinley\'s presidency.'
p11031
aS'He promoted the 1897 Dingley Tariff to protect manufacturers and factory workers from foreign competition, and in 1900, he secured the passage of the Gold Standard Act.'
p11032
aS'His extant works, including some collaborations, consist of around 38 plays, 154 sonnets, two long narrative poems, and a few other verses, of which the authorship of some is uncertain.'
p11033
aS'His plays have been translated into every major living language and are performed more often than those of any other playwright.Shakespeare was born and brought up in Stratford-upon-Avon, Warwickshire.'
p11034
aS'At the age of 18, he married Anne Hathaway, with whom he had three children: Susanna, and twins Hamnet and Judith.'
p11035
aS"Between 1585 and 1592, he began a successful career in London as an actor, writer, and part-owner of a playing company called the Lord Chamberlain's Men, later known as the King's Men."
p11036
aS'He appears to have retired to Stratford around 1613 at age 49, where he died three years later.'
p11037
aS"Few records of Shakespeare's private life survive, and there has been considerable speculation about such matters as his physical appearance, sexuality, religious beliefs, and whether the works attributed to him were written by others.Shakespeare produced most of his known work between 1589 and 1613."
p11038
aS'His early plays were mainly comedies and histories and these works remain regarded as some of the best work produced in these genres.'
p11039
aS'After a long struggle to establish his power, by 1060 his hold on Normandy was secure, and he launched the Norman conquest of England in 1066.'
p11040
aS"The rest of his life was marked by struggles to consolidate his hold over England and his continental lands and by difficulties with his eldest son.William was the son of the unmarried Robert I, Duke of Normandy, by Robert's mistress Herleva."
p11041
aS'His illegitimate status and his youth caused some difficulties for him after he succeeded his father, as did the anarchy that plagued the first years of his rule.'
p11042
aS'During his childhood and adolescence, members of the Norman aristocracy battled each other, both for control of the child duke and for their own ends.'
p11043
aS'In 1047 William was able to quash a rebellion and begin to establish his authority over the duchy, a process that was not complete until about 1060.'
p11044
aS'His marriage in the 1050s to Matilda of Flanders provided him with a powerful ally in the neighbouring county of Flanders.'
p11045
aS'By the time of his marriage, William was able to arrange the appointments of his supporters as bishops and abbots in the Norman church.'
p11046
aS"His best-known works include Facade, the cantata Belshazzar's Feast, the Viola Concerto and the First Symphony.Born in Oldham, Lancashire, the son of a musician, Walton was a chorister and then an undergraduate at Christ Church, Oxford."
p11047
aS'On leaving the university, he was taken up by the literary Sitwell siblings, who provided him with a home and a cultural education.'
p11048
aS'His earliest work of note was a collaboration with Edith Sitwell, Facade, which at first brought him notoriety as a modernist, but later became a popular ballet score.In middle age, Walton left Britain and set up home with his young wife on the Italian island of Ischia.'
p11049
aS'By this time, he had ceased to be regarded as a modernist, and some of his compositions of the 1950s were criticised as old-fashioned.'
p11050
aS'His only full-length opera, Troilus and Cressida, was among the works to be so labelled and has made little impact in opera houses.'
p11051
aS'In his last years, his works came back into critical fashion; his later compositions, dismissed by critics at the time of their premieres, were revalued and regarded alongside his earlier works.Walton was a slow worker, painstakingly perfectionist, and his complete body of work across his long career is not large.'
p11052
aS'His most popular compositions continue to be frequently performed in the twenty-first century, and by 2010 almost all his works had been released on CD. Biography  Early years Walton was born into a musical family in Oldham, Lancashire, the second son in a family of three boys and a girl.'
p11053
aS"Wordsworth was Britain's Poet Laureate from 1843 until his death in 1850. Early life The second of five children born to John Wordsworth and Ann Cookson, William_Wordsworth was born on 7 April 1770 in Wordsworth House in Cockermouth, Cumberland, part of the scenic region in northwestern England known as the Lake District."
p11054
aS'His sister, the poet and diarist Dorothy Wordsworth, to whom he was close all his life, was born the following year, and the two were baptised together.'
p11055
aS"They had three other siblings: Richard, the eldest, who became a lawyer; John, born after Dorothy, who went to sea and died in 1805 when the ship of which he was captain, the Earl of Abergavenny, was wrecked off the south coast of England; and Christopher, the youngest, who entered the Church and rose to be Master of Trinity College, Cambridge.Wordsworth's father was a legal representative of James Lowther, 1st Earl of Lonsdale and, through his connections, lived in a large mansion in the small town."
p11056
aS'He was frequently away from home on business, so the young William and his siblings had little involvement with him and remained distant from him until his death in 1783.'
p11057
aS'However, he did encourage William in his reading, and in particular set him to commit to memory large portions of verse, including works by Milton, Shakespeare and Spenser.'
p11058
aS"William was also allowed to use his father's library."
p11059
aS"William also spent time at his mother's parents' house in Penrith, Cumberland, where he was exposed to the moors, but did not get along with his grandparents or his uncle, who also lived there."
p11060
aS'It is set in the fictional town of Winesburg, Ohio (not to be confused with the actual Winesburg), which is based loosely on the author\'s childhood memories of Clyde, Ohio.Mostly written from late 1915 to early 1916, with a few stories completed closer to publication, they were "...conceived as complementary parts of a whole, centered in the background of a single community."'
p11061
aS'The book consists of twenty-two stories, with the first story, "The Book of the Grotesque", serving as an introduction.'
p11062
aS"Each of the stories shares a specific character's past and present struggle to overcome the loneliness and isolation that seems to permeate the town."
p11063
aS'Stylistically, because of its emphasis on the psychological insights of characters over plot, and plain-spoken prose, Winesburg, Ohio is known as one of the earliest works of Modernist literature.Winesburg, Ohio was received well by critics despite some reservations about its moral tone and unconventional storytelling.'
p11064
aS'Though its reputation waned in the 1930s, it has since rebounded and is now considered one of the most influential portraits of pre-industrial small-town life in the United_States.In 1998, the Modern Library ranked Winesburg, Ohio 24th on its list of the 100 best English-language novels of the 20th century. Genre Though there is practically no argument about the unity of structure within Winesburg, Ohio, few scholars have concluded that it fits the standards of a conventional novel.'
p11065
aS'Instead, it is typically placed "...midway between the novel proper and the mere collection of stories," known as the short story cycle.'
p11066
aS'Aside from its structural unity, the common setting, characters, symbolism and "consistency of mood" are all additional qualities that tie the stories together despite their initial publication as separate tales.Promoted to younger writers by Anderson himself, Winesburg, Ohio has served as a representative early example of the modern short story cycle in American letters.'
p11067
aS'He subsequently took up oil painting and produced major studio works characterized by the weight and density he exploited from the medium.'
p11068
aS'He also worked extensively in watercolor, creating a fluid and prolific oeuvre, primarily chronicling his working vacations. Early life Born in Boston, Massachusetts in 1836, Homer was the second of three sons of Charles Savage Homer and Henrietta Benson Homer, both from long lines of New Englanders.'
p11069
aS"His mother was a gifted amateur watercolorist and Homer's first teacher."
p11070
aS'She and her son had a close relationship throughout their lives.'
p11071
aS'Homer took on many of her traits, including her quiet, strong-willed, terse, sociable nature; her dry sense of humor; and her artistic talent.'
p11072
aS'Homer had a happy childhood, growing up mostly in then rural Cambridge, Massachusetts.'
p11073
aS'He was an average student, but his art talent was evident in his early years.Homer\'s father was a volatile, restless businessman who was always looking to "make a killing".'
p11074
aS'He won the Nobel Prize in Literature, and was the first person to be made an honorary citizen of the United_States.Churchill was born into the aristocratic family of the Dukes of Marlborough, a branch of the Spencer family.'
p11075
aS'His father, Lord Randolph Churchill, was a charismatic politician who served as Chancellor of the Exchequer; his mother, Jennie Jerome, was an American socialite.'
p11076
aS'As a young army officer, he saw action in British India, the Sudan, and the Second_Boer_War.'
p11077
aS'He gained fame as a war correspondent and wrote books about his campaigns.At the forefront of politics for fifty years, he held many political and cabinet positions.'
p11078
aS"Before the First World War, he served as President of the Board of Trade, Home Secretary, and First Lord of the Admiralty as part of Asquith's Liberal government."
p11079
aS'During the war, he continued as First Lord of the Admiralty until the disastrous Gallipoli Campaign caused his departure from government.'
p11080
aS'He then briefly resumed active army service on the Western Front as commander of the 6th Battalion of the Royal Scots Fusiliers.'
p11081
aS'After study in Nigeria and the UK, he worked with the Royal Court Theatre in London.'
p11082
aS'He went on to write plays that were produced in both countries, in theatres and on radio.'
p11083
aS"He took an active role in Nigeria's political history and its struggle for independence from Great Britain."
p11084
aS'In 1965, he seized the Western Nigeria Broadcasting Service studio and broadcast a demand for the cancellation of the Western Nigeria Regional Elections.'
p11085
aS"In 1967 during the Nigerian Civil War, he was arrested by the federal government of General Yakubu Gowon and put in solitary confinement for two years.Soyinka has been a strong critic of successive Nigerian governments, especially the country's many military dictators, as well as other political tyrannies, including the Mugabe regime in Zimbabwe."
p11086
aS'Much of his writing has been concerned with "the oppressive boot and the irrelevance of the colour of the foot that wears it".'
p11087
aS'During the regime of General Sani Abacha (1993-98), Soyinka escaped from Nigeria via the "NADECO Route" on a motorcycle.'
p11088
aS'Already competent on keyboard and violin, he composed from the age of five and performed before European royalty.'
p11089
aS'At 17, he was engaged as a musician at the Salzburg court, but grew restless and travelled in search of a better position.'
p11090
aS'While visiting Vienna in 1781, he was dismissed from his Salzburg position.'
p11091
aS'He chose to stay in the capital, where he achieved fame but little financial security.'
p11092
aS'During his final years in Vienna, he composed many of his best-known symphonies, concertos, and operas, and portions of the Requiem, which was largely unfinished at the time of his death.'
p11093
aS'The circumstances of his early death have been much mythologized.'
p11094
aS'He was survived by his wife Constanze and two sons.He composed over 600 works, many acknowledged as pinnacles of symphonic, concertante, chamber, operatic, and choral music.'
p11095
aS'He was Governor of New Jersey from 1911 to 1913, and led his Democratic Party to win control of both the White House and Congress in 1912.Wilson induced a Democratic Congress to pass a progressive legislative agenda, unparalleled until the New Deal in 1933.'
p11096
aS'This included the Federal Reserve Act, Federal Trade Commission Act, the Clayton_Antitrust_Act, the Federal Farm Loan Act and a small income tax.'
p11097
aS'Wilson also averted a railroad strike and an ensuing economic crisis through passage of the Adamson Act, imposing an 8-hour workday for railroads.'
p11098
aS'At the outbreak of World_War_I in 1914, Wilson maintained a policy of neutrality.'
p11099
aS'However, he took a much more aggressive policy in dealing with Mexico\'s civil war.Narrowly re-elected in 1916 around the slogan "He kept us out of war," Wilson\'s second term was dominated by American entry into World_War_I.'
p11100
aS'In April 1917, when Germany resumed unrestricted submarine warfare, Wilson asked Congress to declare war in order to make "the world safe for democracy."'
p11101
aS'The United_States conducted military operations with the Allies, without a formal alliance.'
p11102
aS"It was one of the deadliest conflicts in history, paving the way for major political changes, including revolutions in many of the nations involved.The war drew in all the world's economic great powers, assembled in two opposing alliances: the Allies (based on the Triple Entente of the United Kingdom, France and the Russian Empire) and the Central Powers of Germany and Austria-Hungary."
p11103
aS'Although Italy had also been a member of the Triple Alliance alongside Germany and Austria-Hungary, it did not join the Central Powers, as Austria-Hungary had taken the offensive against the terms of the alliance.'
p11104
aS'These alliances were reorganised and expanded as more nations entered the war: Italy, Japan and the United_States joined the Allies, and the Ottoman_Empire and Bulgaria the Central Powers.'
p11105
aS'More than 70 million military personnel, including 60 million Europeans, were mobilised in one of the largest wars in history.'
p11106
aS'The trigger for war was the 28 June 1914 assassination of Archduke Franz Ferdinand of Austria, heir to the throne of Austria-Hungary, by Yugoslav nationalist Gavrilo Princip in Sarajevo.'
p11107
aS'This set off a diplomatic crisis when Austria-Hungary delivered an ultimatum to the Kingdom of Serbia, and entangled international alliances formed over the previous decades were invoked.'
p11108
aS'Within weeks, the major powers were at war and the conflict soon spread around the world.On 28 July, the Austro-Hungarians declared war on Serbia and subsequently invaded.'
p11109
aS"Wuthering_Heights and Anne Bronte's Agnes Grey were accepted by publisher Thomas Newby before the success of their sister Charlotte's novel, Jane_Eyre."
p11110
aS"After Emily's death, Charlotte edited the manuscript of Wuthering_Heights, and arranged for the edited version to be published as a posthumous second edition in 1850.Although Wuthering_Heights is now widely regarded as a classic of English literature, contemporary reviews for the novel were deeply polarized; it was considered controversial because its depiction of mental and physical cruelty was unusually stark, and it challenged strict Victorian ideals of the day, including religious hypocrisy, morality, social classes and gender inequality."
p11111
aS'The English poet and painter Dante Gabriel Rossetti referred to it as "A fiend of a book - an incredible monster ...'
p11112
aS'The action is laid in hell, - only it seems places and people have English names there.'
p11113
aS'"In the second half of the 19th century, Charlotte Bronte\'s Jane_Eyre was considered the best of the Bronte sisters\' works, but following later re-evaluation, critics began to argue Wuthering_Heights was superior.'
p11114
aS'The book has inspired adaptations, including film, radio and television dramatisations, a musical by Bernard J. Taylor, a ballet, operas (by Bernard Herrmann, Carlisle Floyd, and Frederic Chaslin), a role-playing game, and a 1978 song by Kate Bush. Plot  Opening (chapters 1 to 3) In 1801, Mr. Lockwood, a wealthy man from the south of England, rents Thrushcross Grange in Yorkshire for peace and recuperation.'
p11115
aS'He visits his landlord, Mr Heathcliff, who lives in a remote moorland farmhouse, "Wuthering_Heights", where he finds an odd assemblage: Heathcliff seems to be a gentleman, but his manners are uncouth; the reserved mistress of the house is in her mid-teens; and a young man seems to be a family member yet dresses and speaks like a servant.Snowed in, Lockwood is grudgingly allowed to stay and is shown to a bedchamber where he notices books and graffiti left by a former inhabitant named Catherine.'
p11116
aS'The X_chromosome was named for its unique properties by early researchers, which resulted in the naming of its counterpart Y chromosome, for the next letter in the alphabet, after it was discovered later. Humans  Function The X_chromosome in humans spans more than 153 million base pairs (the building material of DNA).'
p11117
aS'It represents about 2000 out of 20,000 - 25,000 genes.'
p11118
aS'Each person normally has one pair of sex chromosomes in each cell.'
p11119
aS'Females have two X_chromosomes, whereas males have one X and one Y chromosome.'
p11120
aS"Both males and females retain one of their mother's X_chromosomes, and females retain their second X_chromosome from their father."
p11121
aS"Since the father retains his X_chromosome from his mother, a human female has one X_chromosome from her paternal grandmother (father's side), and one X_chromosome from her mother.Identifying genes on each chromosome is an active area of genetic research."
p11122
aS'Due to the fact that researchers use different approaches to predict the number of genes on each chromosome, the estimated number of genes varies.'
p11123
aS'X-ray wavelengths are shorter than those of UV rays and typically longer than those of gamma rays.'
p11124
aS'In many languages, X-radiation is referred to with terms meaning Rontgen radiation, after Wilhelm Rontgen, who is usually credited as its discoverer, and who had named it X-radiation to signify an unknown type of radiation.'
p11125
aS'Spelling of X-ray(s) in the English language includes the variants x-ray(s), xray(s) and X ray(s).X-rays with photon energies above 5-10 keV (below 0.2-0.1 nm wavelength) are called hard X-rays, while those with lower energy are called soft X-rays.'
p11126
aS'Due to their penetrating ability, hard X-rays are widely used to image the inside of objects, e.g., in medical radiography and airport security.'
p11127
aS'As a result, the term X-ray is metonymically used to refer to a radiographic image produced using this method, in addition to the method itself.'
p11128
aS'Since the wavelengths of hard X-rays are similar to the size of atoms they are also useful for determining crystal structures by X-ray crystallography.'
p11129
aS'By contrast, soft X-rays are easily absorbed in air and the attenuation length of 600 eV (~2 nm) X-rays in water is less than 1 micrometer.There is no universal consensus for a definition distinguishing between X-rays and gamma rays.'
p11130
aS"Tracheids and vessel elements are distinguished by their shape; vessel elements are shorter, and are connected together into long tubes that are called vessels.Xylem also contains two other cell types: parenchyma and fibers.Xylem can be found:in vascular bundles, present in non-woody plants and non-woody parts of woody plantsin secondary xylem, laid down by a meristem called the vascular cambium in woody plantsas part of a stelar arrangement not divided into bundles, as in many ferns.In transitional stages of plants with secondary growth, the first two categories are not mutually exclusive, although usually a vascular bundle will contain primary xylem only.The branching pattern exhibited by xylem follows Murray's law. Primary and secondary xylem Primary xylem is the xylem that is formed during primary growth from procambium."
p11131
aS'It includes protoxylem and metaxylem.'
p11132
aS'Metaxylem develops after the protoxylem but before secondary xylem.'
p11133
aS'Metaxylem has wider vessels and tracheids than protoxylem.Secondary xylem is the xylem that is formed during secondary growth from vascular cambium.'
p11134
aS'Although secondary xylem is also found in members of the "gymnosperm" groups Gnetophyta and Ginkgophyta and to a lesser extent in members of the Cycadophyta, the two main groups in which secondary xylem can be found are:conifers (Coniferae): there are some six hundred species of conifers.'
p11135
aS'All species have secondary xylem, which is relatively uniform in structure throughout this group.'
p11136
aS'Many conifers become tall trees: the secondary xylem of such trees is used and marketed as softwood.angiosperms (Angiospermae): there are some quarter of a million to four hundred thousand species of angiosperms.'
p11137
aS'He had an older sister who was taken in by an aunt, and whom he met only once thereafter, at the age of ten (July 1909) (she died when he was 11).'
p11138
aS"Kawabata's grandmother died when he was seven (September 1906), and his grandfather when he was fifteen (May 1914).Having lost all close relatives, he moved in with his mother's family (the Kurodas)."
p11139
aS'However, in January 1916, he moved into a boarding house near the junior high school (comparable to a modern high school) to which he had formerly commuted by train.'
p11140
aS"Through many of Kawabata's works the sense of distance in his life is represented."
p11141
aS'He often gives the impression that his characters have built up a wall around them that moves them into isolation.'
p11142
aS'In a 1934 published work Kawabata wrote: "I feel as though I have never held a woman\'s hand in a romantic sense[...] Am I a happy man deserving of pity?".'
p11143
aS'Indeed this does not have to be taken literally, but it does show the type of emotional insecurity that Kawabata felt, especially experiencing two painful love affairs at a young age.'
p11144
aS'It is a primary color in subtractive color, used in color printing, along with cyan, magenta, and black.According to surveys in Europe and the United_States, yellow is the color people most often associate with amusement, optimism, gentleness, and spontaneity, but also with duplicity, envy, jealousy, avarice, and, in the U.S., with cowardice.'
p11145
aS'It plays an important role in Asian culture, particularly in China, where it is seen as the color of happiness, glory, wisdom, harmony and culture.'
p11146
aS' Etymology and definitions The word "yellow" comes from the Old English geolu, geolwe (oblique case), meaning "yellow, yellowish", derived from the Proto-Germanic word gelwaz "yellow".'
p11147
aS'It has the same Indo-European base, gkel-, as the word yell; gkel- means both bright and gleaming, and to cry out.'
p11148
aS'Yellow is a color which cries out for attention.The English term is related to other Germanic words for yellow, namely Scots (Scottish people) yella, East Frisian jeel, West Frisian giel, Dutch geel, German gelb, and Swedish gul.'
p11149
aS'According to the Oxford English Dictionary, the oldest known use of this word in English is from The Epinal Glossary in the year 700. History, art, and fashion  Prehistory and antiquity Yellow, in the form of yellow ochre pigment made from clay, was one of the first colors used in prehistoric cave art.'
p11150
aS'The cave of Lascaux has an image of a horse colored with yellow estimated to be 17,300 years old.In Ancient Egypt, yellow was associated with gold, which was considered to be imperishable, eternal and indestructible.'
p11151
aS'They appear in organic chemistry as reagents or reactive intermediates.The class name "ylide" for the compound should not be confused with the suffix "-ylide". Resonance structures Many ylides may be depicted by a multiple bond form in a resonance structure, known as the ylene form:The actual electron distribution in the molecules and hence the relative importance of the ylide and ylene forms is dependent on the "onium" center and substituent pattern (the identity of the various R groups). Phosphonium ylides Phosphonium ylides are used in the Wittig reaction, a method used to convert ketones and especially aldehydes to alkenes.'
p11152
aS'The positive charge in these Wittig reagents is carried by a phosphorus atom with three phenyl substituents and a bond to a carbanion.'
p11153
aS"Ylides can be 'stabilised' or 'non-stabilised'."
p11154
aS'A phosphonium ylide can be prepared rather straightforwardly.'
p11155
aS'Typically, triphenylphosphine is allowed to react with an alkyl halide in a mechanism analogous to that of an SN2 reaction.'
p11156
aS'This quaternization forms an alkyltriphenylphosphonium salt, which can be isolated or treated in situ with a strong base (in this case, butyl lithium) to form the ylide.Due to the SN2 mechanism, a less sterically hindered alkyl halide reacts more favorably with triphenylphosphine than an alkyl halide with significant steric hindrance (such as tert-butyl bromide).'
p11157
aS"Because of this, there will typically be one synthetic route in a synthesis involving such compounds that is more favorable than another. Other ylide types  Based on sulfur Other common ylides include sulfonium ylides and sulfoxonium ylides, for instance the Corey-Chaykovsky reagent used in the preparation of epoxides or in the Stevens rearrangement. Based on oxygen Carbonyl ylides (RR'CO+C-RR') can form by ring-opening of epoxides."
p11158
aS'Jewish people traditionally observe this holy day with an approximate 25-hour period of fasting and intensive prayer, often spending most of the day in synagogue services. Etymology Yom means "day" in Hebrew and Kippur comes from a root that means "to atone".'
p11159
aS'Yom_Kippur is usually expressed in English as "day of atonement". Rosh_Hashanah and Yom_Kippur Yom_Kippur is "the tenth day of [the] seventh month" (Tishrei) and is regarded as the "Sabbath of Sabbaths".'
p11160
aS'Rosh_Hashanah (referred to in the Torah as Yom Teruah) is the first day of that month according to the Hebrew calendar.'
p11161
aS'On this day forgiveness of sins is also asked of God.Yom_Kippur completes the annual period known in Judaism as the High Holy Days or Yamim Nora\'im ("Days of Awe") that commences with Rosh_Hashanah. Heavenly books opened According to Jewish tradition, God inscribes each person\'s fate for the coming year into a book, the Book of Life, on Rosh_Hashanah, and waits until Yom_Kippur to "seal" the verdict.'
p11162
aS'During the Days of Awe, a Jew tries to amend his or her behavior and seek forgiveness for wrongs done against God (bein adam leMakom) and against other human beings (bein adam lechavero).'
p11163
aS'The evening and day of Yom_Kippur are set aside for public and private petitions and confessions of guilt (Vidui).'
p11164
aS'At the end of Yom_Kippur, one hopes that they have been forgiven by God. Prayer service The Yom_Kippur prayer service includes several unique aspects.'
p11165
aS'His avant-garde work displayed a blending of modern and traditional aesthetics that broke cultural boundaries, with a focus on sexuality, death, and political change.'
p11166
aS'He is remembered for his ritual suicide by seppuku after a failed coup d\'etat attempt, known as the "Mishima Incident".Mishima was also known for his natural bodybuilding and modelling.The Mishima Prize was established in 1988 to honor his life and works. Life and work  Early life Mishima was born in the Yotsuya district of Tokyo (now part of Shinjuku).'
p11167
aS'His father was Azusa Hiraoka, a government official, and his mother, Shizue, was the daughter of the 5th principal of the Kaisei Academy.'
p11168
aS"Shizue's father, Kenzo Hashi, was a scholar of Chinese classics, and the Hashi family had served the Maeda clan for generations in Kaga Domain."
p11169
aS"Mishima's paternal grandparents were Sadataro Hiraoka and Natsuko (family register name: Natsu) Hiraoka."
p11170
aS'He had a younger sister, Mitsuko, who died of typhus in 1945 at the age of 17, and a younger brother, Chiyuki.'
p11171
aS"Neither of his parents' families were technically part of the most elite families in Japan.Mishima's early childhood was dominated by the shadow of his grandmother, Natsuko, who took the boy, separating him from his immediate family for several years."
p11172
aS"The 2,574-kilometre-long river (1,599 mi) rises in Zambia and flows through eastern Angola, along the eastern border of Namibia and the northern border of Botswana, then along the border between Zambia and Zimbabwe to Mozambique, where it crosses that country to empty into the Indian Ocean.The Zambezi's most noted feature is Victoria Falls."
p11173
aS'Other notable falls include the Chavuma Falls at the border between Zambia and Angola, and Ngonye Falls, near Sioma in Western Zambia.There are two main sources of hydroelectric power on the river, the Kariba Dam, which provides power to Zambia and Zimbabwe, and the Cahora Bassa Dam in Mozambique, which provides power to Mozambique and South Africa.'
p11174
aS'There is also a smaller power station at Victoria Falls. Course of the riverEdit  SourcesEdit The river rises in a black marshy dambo in north-west Zambia, in dense undulating miombo woodland, about 1,524 m (4,900 ft) above sea level.'
p11175
aS'Eastward of the source, the watershed between the Congo and Zambezi basins is a well-marked belt of high ground, running nearly east-west and falling abruptly to the north and south.'
p11176
aS'This distinctly cuts off the basin of the Lualaba (the main branch of the upper Congo) from that of the Zambezi.'
p11177
aS'In the neighborhood of the source the watershed is not as clearly defined, but the two river systems do not connect.The region drained by the Zambezi is a vast broken-edged plateau 900-1200 m high, composed in the remote interior of metamorphic beds and fringed with the igneous rocks of the Victoria Falls.'
p11178
aS'At Shupanga, on the lower Zambezi, thin strata of grey and yellow sandstones, with an occasional band of limestone, crop out on the bed of the river in the dry season, and these persist beyond Tete, where they are associated with extensive seams of coal.'
p11179
aS'As such, it deemphasizes mere knowledge of sutras and doctrine and favors direct understanding through zazen and interaction with an accomplished teacher.The teachings of Zen include various sources of Mahayana thought, especially Yogacara, the Tathagatagarbha Sutras and Huayan, with their emphasis on Buddha-nature, totality, and the Bodhisattva-ideal.'
p11180
aS'The Prajnaparamita literature and, to a lesser extent, Madhyamaka have also been influential in the shaping of the "paradoxical language" of the Zen-tradition. Etymology The word Zen is derived from the Japanese pronunciation of the Middle Chinese word Chan  (dzjen) (pinyin: Chan), which in turn is derived from the Sanskrit word dhyana, which can be approximately translated as "absorption" or "meditative state". Zen practice  Dhyana - Zen meditation Central to Zen is the practice of dhyana or meditation. Observing the breath During sitting meditation, practitioners usually assume a position such as the lotus position, half-lotus, Burmese, or seiza postures, using the dhyana mudra.'
p11181
aS'To regulate the mind, awareness is directed towards counting or watching the breath or by bringing that awareness to the energy center below the navel (see also anapanasati).'
p11182
aS'Often, a square or round cushion placed on a padded mat is used to sit on; in some other cases, a chair may be used.'
p11183
aS'This practice may simply be called sitting dhyana, which is zuochan (Zuo Shan ) in Chinese, and zazen (Zuo Shan ) in Japanese. Observing the mind In the Soto school of Zen, meditation with no objects, anchors, or content, is the primary form of practice.'
p11184
aS'The meditator strives to be aware of the stream of thoughts, allowing them to arise and pass away without interference.'
p11185
aS'Considerable textual, philosophical, and phenomenological justification of this practice can be found throughout Dogen\'s Shobogenzo, as for example in the "Principles of Zazen" and the "Universally Recommended Instructions for Zazen".'
p11186
aS'In most traditions he is married to Hera, although, at the oracle of Dodona, his consort is Dione: according to the Iliad, he is the father of Aphrodite by Dione.'
p11187
aS'He is known for his erotic escapades.'
p11188
aS'These resulted in many godly and heroic offspring, including Athena, Apollo, Artemis, Hermes, Persephone (by Demeter), Dionysus, Perseus, Heracles, Helen of Troy, Minos, and the Muses (by Mnemosyne); by Hera, he is usually said to have fathered Ares, Hebe and Hephaestus.As Walter Burkert points out in his book, Greek Religion, "Even the gods who are not his natural children address him as Father, and all the gods rise in his presence."'
p11189
aS'For the Greeks, he was the King of the Gods, who oversaw the universe.'
p11190
aS'As Pausanias observed, "That Zeus is king in heaven is a saying common to all men".'
p11191
aS"In Hesiod's Theogony Zeus assigns the various gods their roles."
p11192
aS'In the Homeric Hymns he is referred to as the chieftain of the gods.His symbols are the thunderbolt, eagle, bull, and oak.'
p11193
aS'In some respects zinc is chemically similar to magnesium: its ion is of similar size and its only common oxidation state is +2.'
p11194
aS"Zinc is the 24th most abundant element in Earth's crust and has five stable isotopes."
p11195
aS'The most common zinc ore is sphalerite (zinc blende), a zinc sulfide mineral.'
p11196
aS'The largest mineable amounts are found in Australia, Asia, and the United_States.'
p11197
aS'Zinc production includes froth flotation of the ore, roasting, and final extraction using electricity (electrowinning).Brass, which is an alloy of copper and zinc, has been used since at least the 10th century BC in Judea and by the 7th century BC in Ancient Greece.'
p11198
aS'Zinc metal was not produced on a large scale until the 12th century in India and was unknown to Europe until the end of the 16th century.'
p11199
aS'The mines of Rajasthan have given definite evidence of zinc production going back to the 6th century BC.'
p11200
aS'However, its foundations had been in development from 1818 with the creation of a variety of custom unions among the German states.'
p11201
aS'By 1866, the Zollverein included most of the German states.'
p11202
aS'The foundation of the Zollverein was the first instance in history in which independent states had consummated a full economic union without the simultaneous creation of a political federation or union.Prussia was the prime motivating force behind the creation of the customs union.'
p11203
aS'Austria was excluded from the Zollverein because of its highly protected industry and also due to the fact that Prince von Metternich was against the idea.'
p11204
aS'With the founding of the North German Confederation in 1867, the Zollverein included approximately 425,000 square kilometres, and had produced economic agreements with several non-German states, including Sweden-Norway.'
p11205
aS'After the founding of the German Empire in 1871, the Empire assumed the control of the customs union.'
p11206
aS'However, not all states within the Empire were part of the Zollverein until 1888.'
p11207
aS'The Zoot_Suit_Riots were in part the effect of the infamous Sleepy Lagoon murder trial which followed the death of a young Latino man in a barrio near Los Angeles.'
p11208
aS"The incident triggered similar attacks against Latinos in Beaumont, Chicago, San Diego, Oakland, Detroit, Evansville, Philadelphia, and New_York_City. History The zoot suit riots began in Los Angeles, California amidst a period of rising tensions between Anglo American servicemen stationed in Southern California and Los Angeles' Mexican-American population."
p11209
aS'Although Mexican-American men were over-represented in the military as a percentage of their population, many European-American servicemen resented the sight of Latinos socializing in clothing considered extravagant and unpatriotic during wartime. Origins During the 20th century, in addition to those whose families had already been in the American Southwest before 1848, many Mexicans immigrated to places such as Texas, Arizona, and California.'
p11210
aS'In the early 1930s in Los Angeles County, more than 12,000 people of Mexican descent--including many American citizens--were deported to Mexico (see Mexican Repatriation).'
p11211
aS'Despite the deportations, by the late 1930s there were still about 3 million Mexican Americans in the United_States.'
p11212
aS'Los Angeles had the highest concentration of Mexicans outside of Mexico.'
p11213
aS'The Latinos were segregated into an area of the city with the oldest, most run-down housing.'
p11214
a.